Democrats celebrated the unlikely victory of their candidate, Doug Jones, above, in  . ( .) The upset trims the Republican majority in the Senate to one. And it is a snub to   who backed Roy Moore, the Republican candidate, despite accusations of sexual misconduct with teenage girls. Earlier in the day Mr. Trump   and insulted a female senator as someone who “would do anything” for campaign contributions. Meanwhile, congressional Republicans are   and began work on  . _____ a battle cry for President Trump, has been adopted by strongmen across the world to silence critics and journalists.  . One country where “fake news” has been invoked is Turkey, which leads the world in the number of journalists jailed in connection with their work.  , a record number of journalists are imprisoned around the world. Separately, a statement by the U.S. ambassador to Britain, suggesting Mr. Trump  , has deepened questions about whether the two countries’ “special relationship” can withstand his tenure. _____ in Paris, President Emmanuel Macron of France, above center, urged the world’s political and business leaders to  . But accomplishments were limited. (Our international climate correspondent looks at a surprising factor in greenhouse gas emissions:   is simply wasted.) Separately, Mr. Macron will host Chancellor Angela Merkel of Germany and other European and African leaders today to   in the vast and lawless Sahel region of Africa. _____  are out for “Star Wars: The Last Jedi,” which hits theaters this weekend. (Above, Mark Hamill as Luke Skywalker.) . “It has visual wit and a human touch, no small achievement for a seemingly indestructible machine that revved up 40 years ago and shows no signs of sputtering out (ever),” she writes. If you’ve forgotten who exactly is fighting whom, or don’t know what a porg is, you can brush up   before watching the new film. _____  by the love and feedback we received in the callout last week to readers of this briefing. We read every message and take all to heart, including this one: “What I would like to read about less? Don’t laugh: Trump.” (You can always reach us at  .) More broadly,   from readers’ comments over the last year, including advice on how not to get hit by a truck and how to stop procrastinating. , including Reddit and Kickstarter, posted calls for action to stop  . But the giants, like Google and Facebook, stayed out of the fray. : Indiegogo, the service that helped take crowdfunding mainstream, is  . deal to swallow most of Rupert Murdoch’s movie and television empire  , according to two people briefed on the matter.  of  .  at a natural gas facility in Austria left one dead and 18 injured. It raised concerns about tightening energy supplies across Europe. [ ]  has presented the White House with a plan that envisions at least two more years of combat against Islamist militants in Somalia. [ ]  filed terrorism charges against Akayed Ullah, the suspect in the attack on the New York City subway on Monday. [ ] is offering many of its at-risk citizens a pill, free of charge, that drastically reduces the risk of contracting H.I.V. [ ]  of Sweden condemned a string of anti-Semitic episodes in Gothenburg and Malmo, the country’s second- and third-largest cities. [ ] , the four-time winner of the Tour de France, was found to have abnormal levels of an asthma drug at the Vuelta, the Spanish race. [ ] What could make a   better? Whiskey. of the  . to get  .  the Cirque Romanès has delighted the French public with   about the Roma community: “It’s our way to build bridges between our culture and other cultures.” Barcelona’s Modelo prison  , and tough detention conditions. , the British designer Thomas Heatherwick   in New York, which was prefabricated in Italy. , the Oscar-winning actor,   in his new production of “Falstaff” for Opera Vlaanderen in Belgium. The holiday season involves many traditions. For Britons and millions of others around the world, one of them is Queen Elizabeth II’s annual Christmas Day message. The speech was first given 85 years ago by King George V, her grandfather. “Distant lands thrill to his ‘God bless you,’ ”  . “Farmers in Brisbane, Australia, listened to it in a Summer heat of 95 degrees in the shade,” a correspondent wrote from London, in apparent awe of the radio technology. “Passengers on Atlantic liners heard it as their ship plowed through Winter storms.” In 1952, the queen gave her first Christmas message, sitting in the chair used by her father and grandfather,  . According to the BBC, 100 million people heard the speech. Five years later, the speech was televised for the first time. ( .) The change occurred,  , after the queen was criticized as being too remote and surrounded by “tweedy” courtiers. “That it is possible for some of you to see me today is just another example of the speed at which things are changing all around us,”  .

Before the financial crisis, bankers were often regarded as greedy and self-­interested. The mortgage melt down ­ratcheted that reputation into something much scarier: an existential threat to the global economy. Since 2008, the banks have seemed to many people like an active volcano does to the villagers below. Americans don’t really understand banks, or know what causes them to blow up, but they’ve seen enough to be afraid. And to hear the public discussion about the issue these days, we still have good reason to be scared. The Republican presidential candidates generally agreed that Wall Street banks remain dangerously too big to fail. On the left, Bernie Sanders built that notion — and demands for a major policy response to it — into the foundation of his campaign. From Hollywood, we got “The Big Short” and its judgment, in the words of Ryan Gosling’s character, that “the banks took the money the American people gave them and used it to lobby the Congress to kill big reform.” I began writing about the industry in early 2010, just after the worst of the crisis passed and right before Congress enacted its landmark effort to clean up Wall Street, what’s now known as Dodd-Frank. I was in Washington when the final version of the law was released. Along with all the discussion about its being the most significant reform of Wall Street since the Great Depression, I remember the confusion as we flipped through the thousands of pages, trying to pick out what would really matter, looking for where the lobbyists had won. Six years later, as I plan a move to the West Coast for a slightly different reporting beat, I keep returning to this question of how much has really changed. Is the system any safer than when I began? Dodd-Frank was designed, in essence, to check the pre-­crisis excesses that ultimately required the government to bail out the largest banks. But upon its unveiling, it did seem as though some of the most consequential efforts to transform the banks had been edited out at the industry’s behest. The law didn’t seem to address many of the risky practices that transmuted a downturn in the subprime-­mortgage market into a global conflagration. Perhaps most consequential, as Sanders has not tired of reminding us, the biggest banks were not broken up. Just a day after the law was passed, a bank analyst made a prediction for me: “After the dust settles and they’ve crossed all the T’s, there’s probably not going to be much difference in how the banking industry looks. That’s the long and short of it.” ­JPMorgan Chase, the nation’s largest bank, has shrunk since 2014, but it entered 2016 with 50 percent more assets than it had in 2007, in great part because of its acquisition (on the cheap) of Bear Stearns and Washington Mutual in 2008. Early this spring, the top banking regulators announced that because of their size and complexity, five of the eight largest banks, including JPMorgan, still didn’t have workable plans to avoid going out of business without taking the economy down with them — suggesting that they would probably need to be bailed out if they began to collapse again. So are they headed toward failure? To judge the likelihood of that, the first thing to consider is what types of risk they’re taking on. And on that front, at least, the changes have been far more notable than most Americans realize. For starters, Dodd-Frank’s “Volcker Rule” forced the banks to get rid of the trading desks where they made enormous speculative bets for their own profit. There was some talk that the banks would find a way around the rule, but almost every bank has disbanded these trading teams or sold them to hedge funds. And this is just one of the risky businesses that the big banks have jettisoned in recent years. The most risky — and profitable — units at all the banks before the crisis were the so-­called fixed-­income divisions, where the banks created and traded bonds and derivatives. In 2006, these departments were the single largest sources of revenue at banks like Goldman Sachs and Morgan Stanley. Today, by contrast, the amount of money the big banks make from their fixed-­income divisions is less than half of what it was at the peak in 2009, and it continues to fall. There are multiple reasons for this evolution, including global economic shocks like the Greek debt crisis and the new trading rules in Dodd-Frank. But the greatest engine of change has been some rather arcane accounting rules, known as capital requirements, set by the central banks of governments around the world. Put most simply, capital requirements force banks to raise a specific amount of money (usually from investors) for every dollar they lend or trade. In 2010, central banks agreed that the large commercial banks needed to double or even triple their capital buffers. Riskier ventures require even more capital. The most immediate impact of these rules has been to serve as a sort of brake on business activity, given the hassle and cost of raising more capital. And indeed, when banks today explain why they are moving into or abandoning certain businesses, they almost always cite capital requirements as their main motivation. The Federal Reserve official in charge of these regulations, Daniel Tarullo, was recently called “the most powerful man in banking” by The Wall Street Journal. Tarullo is now pushing to raise the capital requirements even higher for the very largest banks, like JPMorgan and Citigroup, and there are signs that this could do what Bernie Sanders could not: force the biggest banks to split themselves up. Among the many shrinking banks, one of the most noteworthy is Goldman Sachs, a villain of the crisis and the firm everyone assumed would outsmart the regulators. In large part because of capital requirements and their quieting effect on all sorts of trading, Goldman has slashed staff from the risky, lucrative lines of businesses it used to dominate. Now the firm is focusing its efforts in less risky places, where capital requirements are lower. Its newest products are savings accounts and consumer loans, plebeian products that Goldman would never have deigned to offer before the crisis. The company as a whole has shrunk by nearly a quarter since its peak. Even highly capitalized banks can still suffer unexpected losses. But in addition to discouraging risky activity, capital also serves as money that banks can afford to lose in a crisis. Unlike the debt that banks loaded up on before the crisis, capital does not have to be repaid in the event of a loss. Having this sort of cushion can in turn stop losses from spiraling out into and threatening the rest of the economy. The nation’s eight most important banks now have 66 percent more capital than they did at the end of 2009, and the Fed recently said, after extensive testing, that the nation’s 33 largest banks could survive a two-year depression — and lose hundreds of billions of dollars — and still have more capital than the new rules require. Michael Lewis, the author of “The Big Short,” has been one of many industry critics to complain that the biggest continuing problem in the financial industry is that the incentives haven’t changed: Bankers are encouraged to take short-term risks, without bearing the losses if those risks cause long-term damage. In fact, pay packages have changed more than Lewis lets on. Some traders now receive their bonuses over several years, in case past deals go sour, and regulators are currently codifying those practices. But to focus on pay packages misses how capital requirements have changed incentives for the entire system. I hear constantly from traders who say that the daily work of buying and selling bonds or stocks, and thus the amount of money they can take home, is constrained by the capital limits. This helps explain why at Goldman, for example, the average pay per employee has fallen 24 percent since 2010 and 39 percent since 2007. This also illuminates why Wall Street is in decline as the career path of choice at elite colleges and business schools. People still have other concerns about Wall Street, including cases of fraud and market manipulation, so the banks are unlikely to disappear as political fodder in a presidential campaign between two New Yorkers for whom Wall Street is a recurring issue. Each side is likely to signal its intent to get tough on the industry that nearly wiped out the economy. But if Wall Street remains a volcano, it’s one I now feel far more safe living underneath.
• Comcast is fighting Fox over the British broadcaster Sky. • How will Powell discuss loose fiscal policy? • Delta shows pushing back against the N.R.A. has political costs. • Will the U.S. challenge Broadcom’s bid for Qualcomm on national security grounds? Comcast ’s deal for a large part of 21st Century Fox: make a bid to buy the British satellite broadcaster Sky. The offer,  , leaves Fox with two unappealing options to save its deal with Disney. Rupert Murdoch can either “revise the terms of the Disney sale to exclude Sky, or enter into a bidding war with” Comcast. Sky investors seem to be betting on the latter option. Its stock jumped nearly 20 percent and is now trading above Comcast’s offer. The reason for that may be that “both Fox and Disney have reasons for wanting to possess all of Sky,”  . “Fox may want full ownership as an insurance policy against the sale to Disney failing. And Disney’s desire to buy Fox’s current stake in Sky suggests it likes the asset, wants more of it and would want to prevent Comcast owning it.” In fact, Robert Iger, Disney’s chief executive, has called Sky the crown jewel of his company’s purchase of Fox assets. : “The potential for Fox to return and make a competing bid remains high, in our view, as our European investment team believes Sky is the best-in-class European leader in Pay-TV.” When is an offer an offer can be a fine point under Britain’s complicated takeover rules. On Tuesday, Comcast announced a   to acquire Sky, the British satellite broadcaster, for   . Sky and 21st Century Fox, which has been trying to acquire the 61 percent of Sky that it does not already own for more than year, both responded that   had been made. That may seem like an odd distinction when Comcast, the owner of NBCUniversal, announced publicly how much it is willing to pay for an asset to kick off negotiations. But, that comes down to Britain’s extensive  , which spans more than 400 pages, and can often trip up American companies not used to operating under those rules. The public disclosure of merger talks is triggered under the code when a number of factors occur, such as rumors in the market that a deal is in the works or “untoward movement” in a takeover target’s stock price. Making a public announcement then starts a countdown clock for a potential acquirer to announce a formal offer under the rules, known as a so-called firm intention to make an offer. The rules are intended to make sure all shareholders are treated fairly and have access to the same information about a deal and to establish an orderly framework for takeovers. We’d waited to see if Brian Roberts, Comcast’s chairman and C.E.O., would challenge Walt Disney for control of 21st Century Fox. Instead, he   Mr. Murdoch’s bid for full control of Sky, the British satellite broadcaster.  £12.50, or about $17.50, a share for all of Sky : £10.75 a share for the 61 percent of Sky that it doesn’t own Comcast had worked on its own offer for Fox, with the chance to expand internationally through Sky being a big reason for bidding. But the Murdochs and their advisers believed that it would be difficult for Comcast to win U.S. regulatory approval. However, Fox’s bid for Sky has been held up by questions by British regulators about whether Mr. Murdoch was fit and proper to control a major broadcaster in the U.K. That presented Comcast’s opportunity.  in Comcast’s regulatory statement: “We already have a strong presence in London, and Comcast intends to use Sky as a platform for our growth in Europe.” •   of the media research firm Numis told the FT that Comcast’s bid is a “very strong competitive offer.” •   at Cenkos Securities told Bloomberg, “The market was anticipating another approach and will be pleasantly surprised.” Comcast investors don’t seem pleasantly surprised. Shares of Comcast are down 5.2 percent. Sky’s stock popped nearly 20 percent and is now trading above Comcast’s offer. When Jerome H. Powell, the new chairman of the Federal Reserve, appears before the House Financial Services Committee on Tuesday, we may see if he has mastered the art of stern but subtle disapproval. Congress has recently enacted tax cuts and spending increases that could stimulate the economy at a time when the Fed may want to tamp things down a bit. A tug of war could end up occurring between elected politicians wanting a boom to continue and a central bank that is concerned about government deficits and inflation. It is highly unlikely that Mr. Powell or any other Fed official would want to get drawn into a direct, public fight with members of Congress or the administration of President Donald Trump. So, how might Mr. Powell express concern about loose government fiscal policies? He can talk about Congress’s stimulus as just one of many factors that can have an impact on the Fed’s mission of creating the economic conditions for maximum employment and stable prices. In other words, he could depersonalize any tensions, and imply that concern about spending and deficits is just the Fed doing its job. And   for the hearing, Mr. Powell noted the stimulus from fiscal policy. (F.O.M.C. is the Federal Open Market Committee, the committee that sets monetary policy, while P.C.E. price inflation is the Fed’s preferred measure of prices, derived from a survey of personal consumption expenditures conducted by the Bureau of Economic Analysis.) In this testimony before the House committee on Tuesday, Mr. Powell took some questions about the recent loosening of fiscal policy, and how the Fed might respond. He followed the careful path outlined above. On the one hand, he noted that government finances can have an impact on economic conditions, saying: “Fiscal policy changes can have an effect.” He also said: “We really need to get on a sustainable fiscal path, and the time for doing that is now.” On the other hand, Mr. Powell said the Fed did not want to directly interfere in government spending decisions. “We don’t do fiscal policy at the Fed,” he said. That’s according   and  . • “Ring has raised $209 million so far and was last valued at $760 million, according to Pitchbook.” • Amazon’s Alexa Fund, which invests in startups that make Alexa compatible devices, was an investor. • Amazon plans to have Ring operate as a separate business, much as Zappos and Twitch do. Howard Schultz, the founder and executive chairman of Starbox, said during   that he is not running for president. Here’s the transcript via  Ms. Bartiromo, then, followed up with: Mr. Schultz is one of a number of business executives and celebrities long speculated to be considering a run for president in 2020. The list has included Oprah Winfrey, Mark Cuban, Jamie Dimon of JPMorgan, Bob Iger of Disney and Mark Zuckerberg of Facebook.  “We are robbing from the future of young people in America who ultimately are going to have to pay for a $21 trillion tax deficit,”  .  “Over the last few weeks, I have been in a number of U.S. cities and observed firsthand the abundance of empty storefronts across the country, in prime A1 locations. We are at a major inflection point as landlords across the country will be forced (sooner than later) to permanently lower rent rates to adjust to the ‘new norm,’” Mr. Schultz said. The tweet from Lt. Gov. Casey Cagle of Georgia, Delta’s home state, shows that it isn’t easy for companies to find a balance between those who want corporate America to push for more gun control and those who think conservatives are being unfairly maligned. By eliminating discounted fares for N.R.A. members, the airline has   to a lucrative tax break that had substantial support only days ago. , which is keeping its discounts for N.R.A. members while expressing support for banning assault rifles for civilians. As   put it, “It’s getting harder and harder to find neutral territory in America’s raging gun-control debate.”  If you have a 401(k), you’re probably  . An argument for Silicon Valley to  . And Warren Buffett thinks   for Berkshire Hathaway to boycott gun makers. • Six Republican leaders in Congress say they don’t plan to dig into President Trump’s finances as part of their investigation into Russian election interference. ( ) • The Supreme Court declined the Trump administration’s request to shut down DACA while lower courts explore the issue. ( ) • The European Commission will withdraw its complaint against Ireland for not recovering $16 billion in unpaid taxes from Apple, but only if the country recovers the amount in full. ( ) The government panel known as Cfius, which reviews deals for national security reasons,   of looking at a potential combination before the chip makers have even agreed on a deal, Reuters reported, citing unnamed sources. Senator John Cornyn, Republican of Texas, urged the review. If Cfius intervenes, it would sidestep Broadcom’s move to relocate its headquarters to the U.S., which critics said was aimed in part at preventing such a review. (Broadcom’s C.E.O., Hock Tan, said the redomiciling would happen even if the deal didn’t go through.) More from Diane Bartz of Reuters: Qualcomm says that it’s  , but Broadcom called the outreach “feigned engagement.” Qualcomm reportedly  ; the current offer is $79 a share. • The investment decisions of SoftBank’s Masa Son  . Meanwhile, a senior SoftBank executive confirmed that the company was   of its Japanese mobile phone unit. • Liberty Media has offered to invest $1.16 billion in iHeartMedia, the troubled radio broadcasting giant, in exchange for a 40 percent stake in the company after it reorganizes its debts in bankruptcy court. ( ) • Microchip Technology is reportedly in advanced talks to buy its fellow chip maker Microsemi, whose market value as of yesterday was $7.5 billion. ( ) • The jobs site Glassdoor is interviewing banks to advise on an I.P.O. that could come in the second half of this year, unnamed sources say. ( ) • The activist fund Legion Partners wants the retailer Genesco to sell more more businesses — or face a board fight, unnamed sources say. ( ) • Why your investment banker may not be faithful, as detailed in a court fight over the sale of Aruba Networks to H.P. ( ) That’s what Larry Hutcher, a corporate lawyer at Davidoff Hutcher & Citron, said of the last-minute turmoil that sank an investor group’s bid for The Weinstein Company and led the embattled studio to plan a corporate bankruptcy filing. Brooks Barnes of the NYT traced  , including the investors’ mistake in not holding talks with the New York attorney general, Eric Schneiderman, earlier in the process and the belated firing of the studio’s president, David Glasser. Expect New York officials to   at the Weinstein Company and Wynn Resorts. Beijing’s takeover of the troubled Anbang Insurance Group is another sign that deal making by that country’s moguls is slowing to a halt. It’s not just the Chinese government’s fears of overspending by homegrown businesses, but also growing skepticism from officials in the United States and elsewhere. More from Alexandra Stevenson of  :  Is its takeover China’s  ? And expect Beijing to need to  . • Meet Liu He, the man President Xi Jinping plans to name as overseer of China’s financial and industrial sectors. ( ) • HNA Group is setting up $3.2 billion worth of investment funds to support China’s One Belt, One Road infrastructure campaign. ( ) • Alibaba is in talks to buy Ele.me, a food delivery start-up, at a valuation of more than $9.5 billion, unidentified sources say. ( ) • Why Daimler’s works council wasn’t worried about Geely becoming the carmaker’s biggest investor. ( ) Why is Circle reportedly   for about $400 million? According to Nathaniel Popper of the NYT, it’s to become the U.S.’s first regulated digital money exchange. From his  : • 50 Cent never actually owned Bitcoin. ( ) • Venture capitalists should worry about missing initial coin offerings, according to Tim Draper. ( ) • BlackRock says that investors jumping into digital money should be prepared to lose everything. ( ) • A man who claimed to have invented Bitcoin is accused of stealing more than $5 billion worth of assets from the estate of a late colleague. ( ) • Virtual currencies are making divorces more difficult. ( ) • JD.com of China has founded an accelerator for artificial intelligence and blockchain start-ups. ( ) • G.E. has named three new directors —  , the former C.E.O. of Danaher;  , the former C.E.O. of American Airlines; and  , the former chairman of the Financial Accounting Standards Board — as the conglomerate continues toiling on its self-help plan. ( ) • Rothschild’s chairman,  , is turning over leadership of the investment bank to his 37-year-old son, Alexandre. ( ) • Credit Suisse, Deutsche Bank, UBS and Barclays all added more employees last year amid a turnaround in European investment banking. ( ) • Apple is preparing to start a network of medical clinics for its employees and their families that could help it test out its broader ambitions in health care. ( ) • It is also preparing to release three new smartphones this year: the largest iPhone ever, an upgraded version of the iPhone X and a less expensive model. ( ) • California’s Department of Motor Vehicles said it was eliminating a requirement for autonomous vehicles to have a person in the driver’s seat. ( ) • Netflix spends more on non-sports content than any streaming provider and many traditional TV companies. ( ) • Hundreds of thousands of Puerto Ricans lack power more than five months after a hurricane hit the island, but the federal government has begun scaling back the number of electrical restoration contractors. ( ) • Companies want to know how climate change might disrupt their operations, but with governments slow to make information available, start-ups have tried to fill the gap. ( ) • JPMorgan said its female employees earn 99 percent of what male employees make in Britain, but the number is based on the bank’s methodology for determining what pay is appropriate. ( ) • Goldman Sachs is considering a sale-leaseback of its new European headquarters in London. The building could sell for more than $1.4 billion, according to unidentified sources. ( ) • Deutsche Bank is expanding in Saudi Arabia and the United Arab Emirates as the lender expects sovereign bond sales and initial public offerings to drive deals this year. ( )
Hi, it’s me again. Let’s get to it. The biggest story in tech this week was the  , the smoke-and-mirrors biotech company; its founder, Elizabeth Holmes; and its former president, Ramesh Balwani. As part of a settlement, Holmes has agreed to pay a $500,000 fine; surrender much of her stake in Theranos, which was once valued at $4.5 billion; and accept a decade-long ban on being an officer or a director of a public company. The settlement doesn’t involve any jail time or admission of guilt, although the company is also facing a  . , which you should really read if you’re interested in the anatomy of a corporate downfall, contains stunning accusations. They include: ■ Theranos exaggerated its revenue by 1,000 times, telling at least one potential investor that it had made $108 million in 2014, when its actual revenue was around $100,000. ■ Theranos employees wrote flattering reports about the company’s own products, put the logos of pharmaceutical companies on them and used them to imply that those companies had endorsed Theranos’s technology. ■ Theranos was paid millions of dollars by Walgreens (in the complaint, it’s listed as “Pharmacy A”) to roll out testing services at its stores. When its own diagnostic tools weren’t ready in time, Theranos passed third-party testers off as its own. ■ Theranos repeatedly lied to reporters from publications like Wired, Fortune and The Wall Street Journal about how many tests its proprietary machines were capable of running, and gave those misleading articles to investors as proof of the company’s accomplishments. This is juicy,  , and the complaint makes it clear that Theranos — which was once a legitimate Silicon Valley darling, with more than $700 million in venture capital raised from prominent investors — is one of the biggest scandals to hit the tech industry in years. The complaint also helped explain the precise nature of Theranos’s deception, and how it differed from other Silicon Valley companies that have struggled to bring their products to market. Unlike a shady cryptocurrency initial coin offering, Theranos didn’t start off as a sham. Holmes was trying to create something real and useful, a blood-testing machine that would be able to run hundreds of different tests on a machine roughly the size of a desktop computer, using much smaller samples of blood than a traditional machine. Had it worked, it would have been a legitimately important innovation. The problem is that the miniLab, as Theranos’s testing machine came to be called,   work. Or, at least, it wasn’t capable of handling all the tests Theranos had promised it would, within the time frame it had agreed to. According to the complaint: On its own, this is nothing unusual. Production delays, especially of complex hardware products, are common in Silicon Valley, and overeager marketing and sales departments often get ahead of engineering teams. Apple is notorious for   right up until the factory deadline, and practically every major hardware company has shown off products in onstage demos that weren’t yet shelf-ready. But according to the complaint, instead of asking Walgreens for more time, Theranos decided to lie. Holmes and Balwani told their engineers to modify standard blood-testing machines to make them look like the company’s new miniLabs. They then misled Walgreens executives and potential investors about how their tests were being performed, the regulators said, while furiously trying to get the miniLabs ready. What’s so odd about the Theranos story is that failure and delays are not just common in the tech industry, they’re practically  . Apps routinely die on arrival, hardware doesn’t pan out, partnerships fall through. Ideally, these things happen before you raise hundreds of millions of dollars in venture capital and strike distribution deals with major retail chains, but even if they don’t, they’re generally not the end of the world. (For an example of a company that raised millions of dollars for an overhyped product and then imploded   accusations of fraud, look at  .) It would have been embarrassing, and possibly career-damaging, for Holmes to admit to her investors that the miniLab was not going to work out, renege on the deals she had struck with chains like Walgreens and give back some of the money she had already raised. But it was an option, and one that might have kept her out of the legal mess that followed. Instead, according to the complaint, she constructed an elaborate fiction that she would spend the rest of her tenure trying to keep alive, and that would lead her down the path to this week’s charges. In other words, Holmes’s mistake was that she refused to do what so many other entrepreneurs do every day, and come to terms with failure.
In 1968, as the summer political-convention season approached, ABC News decided to take a gamble. The network seemed permanently stuck in third place, and its news division in particular suffered from the lack of a brand-name on-air authority figure to compete with Chet Huntley and   at   or   at  . Back in those days, the two leading networks covered the conventions live from beginning to end. (Can you imagine?) Instead of comprehensiveness, ABC went for provocation and at least the illusion of intellectual heft, hiring   and   to conduct a series of debates during the Republican circus in   and the subsequent Democratic debacle in  . “ ,” Robert Gordon and  ’s lively new documentary, an accessible assemblage of archival footage and talking-head analysis, mines the Buckley-Vidal skirmishes for nuggets of historical insight. And also — not quite the same thing — for zingers and gotchas and other flashes of that mysterious, you-know-it-when-you-see-it phenomenon called “great television.” The most memorable such moment occurred late in the battle, as the Chicago Police Department rampaged in Grant Park. What looked like law and order to Mayor Richard J. Daley and like   to Senator Abraham A. Ribicoff of Connecticut set off a series of especially nasty personal volleys between ABC’s designated intellectuals. Vidal needled Buckley, calling him a “crypto-Nazi” until Buckley lost his patrician cool and snapped back: “Now listen, you queer. Stop calling me a crypto-Nazi or I’ll sock you in your goddamn face and you’ll stay plastered.” Ratings gold. The filmmakers build to this moment as if it were D-Day or the Rumble in the Jungle, excavating a biographical Before and adumbrating a news media After. The smeary, hot hues of old video — the ’68 conventions were the first to be broadcast in color — add both immediacy and distance. Some protocols and artifacts of network television look quaint: the antenna-bedecked headsets of correspondents on the floor; the scripted prose of their reports. And the two antagonists, with their upper-crust accents and their compulsive displays of erudition, are not the kind of guys you see much on the tube these days, or anywhere else for that matter. Buckley and Vidal were remarkable characters, at once bona fide intellectuals, true-blue aristocrats and knowing caricatures of those very types. Each one had, earlier in the decade, run a losing campaign for elective office in  : Vidal earnestly sought a congressional seat in the   in 1960; Buckley staged a lively protest candidacy in the   mayoral election of 1965. They were scions of powerful, privileged families, prep school graduates (Vidal never went to college), military veterans and tirelessly entrepreneurial men of letters happy to dabble in mass media when it suited their needs. They also genuinely and sincerely hated each other’s guts. This antipathy was only partly a political matter. Buckley, founder and editor of National Review, host of “Firing Line” and a champion of Barry Goldwater and  , was a leading strategist and theoretician of the rising right. Vidal, while temperamentally not a joiner or a leader of movements, was at the time stationed at the respectable left wing of American liberalism, a critic of the nation’s foreign policy and an evangelist for cultural and sexual freedom. His best-selling novel “ ,” a blithe and naughty satire of modern hypocrisy with a gender-fluid heroine (played on screen by  ), can be said to represent nearly everything Buckley loathed and feared about the ’60s. “Best of Enemies” provides adequate biographical portraits of both men, although capturing the full range of their  , in particular as  , lies beyond its modest, compact scope. It’s too bad that both Buckley and Vidal died before this film was made — not that they would have necessarily participated — but Mr. Neville and Mr. Gordon make up for this absence by using Kelsey Grammer to read Buckley’s words about Vidal and   to read Vidal’s reflections on Buckley. This is brilliant casting, and the journalists, biographers, colleagues and kin invited on camera to fill out the story have been judiciously chosen. A few are current or former employees of  , including Sam Tanenhaus, a former editor of The Times Book Review and Buckley’s authorized biographer. Mr. Tanenhaus and others work hard to invest the ABC debates with significance, not always successfully. Part of the occult power of television lies in its ability to collapse the distance between the trivial and the consequential. Vidal and Buckley were authentically important and interesting writers and thinkers, but sitting under the lights they were, above all, celebrities, signifiers of their own distorted individuality. The film provides little evidence that over the course of the 10 debates they said anything of real substance, even as the fabric of the Republic was unraveling and being rewoven before their eyes. To understand their thoughts on what was unfolding around them, you will have to consult their writings. Meanwhile, the spectacle of what Mr. Tanenhaus calls “intellectual debate as blood sport” provides a visceral, slightly vulgar thrill. Is this chronicle of their combat an occasion for nostalgia or a cautionary tale? The film’s perfectly sensible, not entirely satisfying answer is “both.” The Buckley-Vidal dust-ups are seen as a pinnacle of high-mindedness from which we have long since descended, and also as the beginning of a slide from civility into endless belligerence. There’s no doubt that the debates were a harbinger of cable-news shouting matches to come, as television journalism transformed itself from democracy’s buttoned-up superego into its snarling id. The arguments about sex, war, race and culture have hardly quieted since 1968. Buckley and Vidal may rest in peace, but the rest of us have stayed plastered.

   open in South Korea next week under a shadow that rivals any in Olympic history: The threat of nuclear war. Security is already ultratight: The   — including 50,000 soldiers — to protect the 100,000 spectators expected to converge each day on Pyeongchang, just 50 miles from North Korea. Even the arrival of Pyongyang’s athletes hasn’t convinced everyone. “North Korea will cause trouble one way or another,” said one analyst. _____ Across the world, autocratic leaders are engaging in increasingly brazen behavior —  . The global tide is being driven by a bewildering range of factors, among them surging populism, waves of migration crises, economic inequality and the disappearance of rebukes from the U.S. President Trump “has barely paid lip service to the promotion of universal human rights,” our Cairo bureau chief writes. Experts say his embrace of hard-line leaders, like President, Abdel Fattah el-Sisi of Egypt, shown above on a poster, has encouraged their excesses. _____  that has divided Washington could be released as early as today — after  . The memo, written by staffers for Devin Nunes of California, above,   abused their authority to obtain a warrant to spy on a former Trump campaign adviser. The president’s decision came despite a chorus of warnings from national security officials. The F.B.I. warned that   about making the memo public. _____ That was our correspondent on the front lines of the Rohingya crisis, describing how   to compete for relief supplies. The false narratives, while understandable, can buttress Myanmar’s denials of ethnic cleansing, she says. And she emphasizes that the Muslim minority’s collective suffering is all too real. Nearly 700,000 have been driven out of Myanmar in recent months by  . Above, Rohingya children at a refugee camp in Bangladesh. _____ In India, the government says it will   in coverage. No word, however, on where the money would come from. And Amazon and two other U.S. companies caused a stir this week by announcing a plan to   for their employees. But in China,  , often by developing A.I. applications that aid doctors. _____ Wikie, a killer whale,  , like “Amy” “bye-bye” (and a very rude raspberry).  . The research suggests that orcas learn to communicate with one another through a social process, the lead researcher said — and adds to a growing case against capturing them. _____ , the big Chinese conglomerate struggling under an estimated $90 billion in debt after a global shopping spree, appears to be  . We obtained emails in which they were offered big returns — as high as 40 percent — to hand over money.  about the health of  , which was recently subpoenaed by a U.S. regulatory agency. (Our columnist calls Bitcoin “ .”)  rose by  . It was the company’s slowest growth rate in a year, but still better than expected, and its stock more than doubled last year. . Here’s a snapshot of  .  ravaged a wooden housing facility for impoverished citizens, killing eight men and three women. [ ] , the police arrested a top leader of a decades-old Communist insurgency, the latest sign that President Rodrigo Duterte is not interested in resuming peace talks. [ ]  crashed this week during drills in Guizhou province, killing at least 12 crew members and exposing the limits of the air force’s technology. [ ]  nominated Hong Kong’s pro-democracy movement, and its student leader, Joshua Wong, for this year’s Nobel Peace Prize. The move is certain to provoke anger from Beijing. [ ]    in Cape Town, South Africa, is dangerously close to running dry. Officials say taps for the city’s four million residents could be shut off in less than three months if the current drought continues. [ ]  survived after driving into a river in northern Australia that was known to be full of crocodiles. They spent the night on the roof of their car. [ ]  this weekend? Check out the rigorous gym sessions that  .    (without hurting yourself).  for the replacement iPhone battery Apple promised?  . , a photographer in the Indian city of Kolkata, explored the psychological ramifications of India’s anti-L.G.B.T.Q. laws and culture. The result was  . our film critic writes. So if you think that Woody Allen is guilty of sexual abuse,  ? •  Here’s are links to our   and  . Today is Groundhog Day, and if you’re unfamiliar with this annual American event — it’s exactly as strange as it sounds. The groundhog, for its part, is a simple creature. A close  , it digs burrows and can reach a furry 15 pounds. It’s known in some areas as a whistle pig, for its short, sharp cries, but more commonly, as a woodchuck. That’s where the day’s simplicities end. The   by when animals wake from hibernation goes back centuries. It arrived in the U.S. with European immigrants and — though there are many Groundhog Day events — the most celebrated ceremony is in Punxsutawney, Pa. Each Feb. 2, a groundhog named Punxsutawney Phil emerges from his winter’s nap at a place called Gobbler’s Knob. (In fact, he’s looking for a mate.) Tradition holds that if Phil sees his shadow, it means six more weeks of winter. No shadow, and an early spring is on the way. It’s all in fun, of course. And that’s a good thing for the poor groundhog: Since 1887,  , he’s been right only 39 percent of the time.
The share ownership system in the United States is fraying. And while its shortcomings have been largely behind the scenes, now they are going to cost some innocent shareholders money. The problems have become apparent as a result of a Delaware court case over   of Dole Food in 2013. A $115.7 million settlement was reached after a lawsuit that accused David H. Murdock — Dole’s controlling shareholder and chief executive — and his lieutenants of conflicts of interest in taking the company private. Former Dole shareholders will receive $2.74 a share — a nice chunk of change in addition to the $13.50 a share originally paid in the deal. Still, because of the shareholder ownership system, some of those Dole shareholders may not get that money. The reason is that while shareholders think they own the shares they buy, they don’t in a sense. That may come as a surprise to those who check their online brokerage accounts daily or see traders on a floor of an exchange reacting to price movements. A market that in many ways is open and transparent is underpinned by a system of share ownership that can be anything but. Share ownership in the United States is conducted through the Depository Trust Company, which was formed after the back-office scandal of the early 1970s. At that time, trading volume on Wall Street became too much to handle, and brokerage firms were swamped by paperwork, falling months behind. The idea was to freeze ownership of company shares in one place. Now, when Apple or Microsoft look at their share register they see only the Depository Trust Company. When trading occurred, brokers would now transfer shares among accounts at the trust company. The brokers hold the shares on behalf of customers who were the ultimate beneficial owners. The result was that the Wall Street firms could now more easily track shares by having to deal only with themselves and the Depository Trust Company. Companies were taken out of the process. Because shareholders are actually only beneficial owners, lots of odd things can happen. For example, instead of executing a trade in the market, a broker may just transfer shares among clients and mark the trade as a sale. (The broker is still required by the Securities and Exchange Commission to get the best price.) Alternatively, if a person wants to short a stock by borrowing it and selling it in the market — betting that the stock price will drop — the broker may “lend” your shares without you knowing it. These issues have been brought to the forefront by the Dole case. In the settlement, 4,662 people and entities claimed 49,164,415 shares at $2.74 per share. There is just one problem: Dole had only 36,793,758 shares outstanding. These are probably not false claims. They go directly to the problems with the share ownership system. The first problem is that the Depository Trust Company sometimes doesn’t keep track of shares. When this happens, it puts a “chill” on the shares, meaning that it stops tracking them because of established procedures for the final three trading days up to the closing of a merger. Instead, the money in a merger is simply paid to the brokers who are supposed to filter it down to the investors. Usually this works, but apparently in the Dole buyout, there may have been some problems with this process. The bigger problem, however, is the shorting issue. Normally, when someone shorts shares, they borrow them and then sell them. When the short position is closed, the investor buys back the shares and restores them to their lender. In a merger, the shorting party simply pays the merger consideration. There seemed to have been many shorts in Dole. Expectations that the company would obtain a higher sale price lifted Dole’s shares above the terms of the buyout offer. Other investors were apparently skeptical that would happen, and more than 2.9 million shares were shorted on the last day that the trust company tracked the trading of Dole shares. How to deal with this was the subject of   in the Delaware court case. Essentially, the judge threw up his hands, saying that the plaintiffs could pay the brokers their money and be done with it. For good measure, the judge, Vice Chancellor J. Travis Laster of the Delaware Court of Chancery, noted that “it bears noting for future merger cases that the problems raised by short sales and trades during the three days before closing appear endemic to the depository system and hence likely infect every claims process.’’ In other words, this happens every time. It became a problem in the Dole settlement only because with so much money being paid out, more shareholders than usual took the trouble to submit a claim. But there is not enough money. When short sellers borrowed shares they sold them to other shareholders in the market. Under the ruling, those third parties who unknowingly bought shares that were shorted will now not be paid. Instead, the holders of the shares that were lent out will be paid. Those who bought shorted shares will be left to look to the shorters. The investors who shorted the stock did so expecting to make a few cents a share: the difference between where Dole had been trading above the buyout price and the price just before the deal closed. Now, they could be on the hook for millions of dollars —  . And that is a big if. The Dole settlement highlights that as our capital markets become ever more complex, share trading and ownership are getting harder track. But in an age when computing power is cheap, why can’t we keep track of shares? Matt Levine of Bloomberg View, noting that the 40-year-old system “is starting to show its age,” has   could be the answer. But is that really necessary? The system might be fixed just by adding some computing power to better trace shares. Of course, this would require the people who control the plumbing of the markets to invest millions and millions of dollars in improvements. Alas, there is no profit to be made on an upgrade. This is an area where the nation’s chief market regulator, the Securities and Exchange Commission, needs to step in. But even this will not solve the shorting issue. When you sign up with your broker you are signing up to short shares, whether you like it or not. People are then buying shares without your knowledge. This is a problem that the brokerage firms have created, and hopefully they will fix. At a minimum, they need to stand behind the shareholders here. After all, they helped create this mess.

A new report from the   predicts that the underlying technology introduced by the virtual currency Bitcoin will come to occupy a central place in the global financial system. A   released Friday morning by the forum, a convening organization for the global elite, is one of the strongest endorsements yet for a new technology — the blockchain — that has become the talk of the financial industry, despite the   of Bitcoin. “Rather than to stay at the margins of the finance industry blockchain will become the beating heart of it,” the head of financial services industries at the World Economic Forum, Giancarlo Bruno, said in a statement released with the report. The blockchain originally referred to the database where all Bitcoin transactions are recorded and stored. Unlike existing financial ledgers or databases used by banks and other institutions, the blockchain is updated and maintained not by a single company or government. Instead it is run by a network of users. It’s akin to the way Wikipedia is maintained by users around the globe. Initially, bank executives shied away from endorsing Bitcoin because it had been used for drugs and crime. Now, however, many have focused on ways to create blockchains without using Bitcoins for transactions in any way. This is attractive because blockchains — or “distributed ledgers,” as they are often described — could offer a new way to move money and track transactions across borders and other networks in a more secure, transparent and effective way than the current system. Distributed ledgers are often viewed as most attractive to industries with businesses that lack a central institution they can trust to keep their records. The World Economic Forum report notes that most developments are likely to happen behind the scenes. So consumers won’t see the changes to infrastructure, but the changes could lead to cheaper and faster financial services. The report says the technology could help improve both mainstream transactions, like global payments and stock trading, and lesser-known areas like trade finance and contingent convertible bonds. The 130-page report from the forum is the product of a year of research and five gatherings of executives from several major institutions, including JPMorgan Chase, Visa, MasterCard and BlackRock. The report estimates that 80 percent of banks around the world could start distributed ledger projects by next year. Large central banks are also studying how the blockchain will alter the way money moves around the globe. Most banks   blockchain working groups and released research reports hailing the potentially transformative effect of the technology. But few real-world uses of the blockchain have come to fruition, other than  . That has led to some questions about whether the blockchain is the proverbial solution looking for a problem, rather than an innovation that will be used widely. Existing virtual currencies have continued to struggle with security problems. One of the largest Bitcoin exchanges, Bitfinex, recently lost more than $60 million worth of Bitcoin   — the latest of several such incidents. The World Economic Forum report suggests that it will take some time for such problems to be worked out. In addition to the technology issues, the report says that the industry will have to work with governments to create standard rules and laws to govern transactions. The report does not make a single mention of Bitcoin. That mirrors the pronouncements from banks, which have often said that they can harness distributed ledgers without using existing virtual currencies. Rather, these ledgers would be run by groups of institutions that want to keep common records. Just this week, 15 global banks, including Wells Fargo and UBS, said that they had completed a prototype of a distributed ledger that could track trade financing around the globe — providing a single record for a series of scattered, hard-to-track transactions.
Hackers have discovered that one of the most central elements of online security — the mobile phone number — is also one of the easiest to steal. In a growing number of online attacks, hackers have been calling up Verizon, T-Mobile U.S., Sprint and AT&T and asking them to transfer control of a victim’s phone number to a device under the control of the hackers. Once they get control of the phone number, they can reset the passwords on every account that uses the phone number as a security backup — as services like Google, Twitter and Facebook suggest. “My iPad restarted, my phone restarted and my computer restarted, and that’s when I got the cold sweat and was like, ‘O.K., this is really serious,’” said Chris Burniske, a virtual currency investor who lost control of his phone number late last year. A wide array of people have complained about being successfully targeted by this sort of attack, including a Black Lives Matter activist and  . The commission’s own data shows that the number of so-called phone hijackings has been rising. In January 2013, there were 1,038 such incidents reported; by January 2016, that number had increased to 2,658. But a particularly concentrated wave of attacks has hit those with the most obviously valuable online accounts: virtual currency fanatics like Mr. Burniske. Within minutes of getting control of Mr. Burniske’s phone, his attackers had changed the password on his virtual currency wallet and drained the contents — some $150,000 at today’s values. Most victims of these attacks in the virtual currency community have not wanted to acknowledge it publicly for fear of provoking their adversaries. But in interviews, dozens of prominent people in the industry acknowledged that they had been victimized in recent months. “Everybody I know in the cryptocurrency space has gotten their phone number stolen,” said Joby Weeks, a Bitcoin entrepreneur. Mr. Weeks lost his phone number and about a million dollars’ worth of virtual currency late last year, despite having asked his mobile phone provider for additional security after his wife and parents lost control of their phone numbers. The attackers appear to be focusing on anyone who talks on social media about owning virtual currencies or anyone who is known to invest in virtual currency companies, such as venture capitalists. And virtual currency transactions are designed to be irreversible. Accounts with banks and brokerage firms and the like are not as vulnerable to these attacks because these institutions can usually reverse unintended or malicious transactions if they are caught within a few days. But the attacks are exposing a vulnerability that could be exploited against almost anyone with valuable emails or other digital files — including politicians, activists and journalists. Last year,  , a leader of the Black Lives Matters movement, by first getting his phone number. In a number of cases involving digital money aficionados, the attackers have held email files for ransom — threatening to release naked pictures in one case, and details of a victim’s sexual fetishes in another. The vulnerability of even sophisticated programmers and security experts to these attacks sets an unsettling precedent for when the assailants go after less technologically savvy victims. Security experts worry that these types of attacks will become more widespread if mobile phone operators do not make significant changes to their security procedures. “It’s really highlighting the insecurity of using any kind of telephone-based security,” said Michael Perklin, the chief information security officer at the virtual currency exchange ShapeShift, which has seen many of its employees and customers attacked. Mobile phone carriers have said they are taking steps to head off the attacks by making it possible to add more complex personal identification numbers, or PINs, to accounts, among other steps. But these measures have not been enough to stop the spread and success of the culprits. After a first wave of phone porting attacks on the virtual currency community last winter, which was  , their frequency appears to have ticked up, Mr. Perklin and other security experts said. In several recent cases, the hackers have commandeered phone numbers even when the victims knew they were under attack and alerted their cellphone provider. Adam Pokornicky, a managing partner at Cryptochain Capital, asked Verizon to put extra security measures on his account after he learned that an attacker had called in 13 times trying to move his number to a new phone. But just a day later, he said, the attacker persuaded a different Verizon agent to change Mr. Pokornicky’s number without requiring the new PIN. A spokesman for Verizon, Richard Young, said that the company could not comment on specific cases, but that phone porting was not common. “While we work diligently to ensure customer accounts remain secure, on occasion there are instances where automated processes or human performance falls short,” he said. “We strive to correct these issues quickly and look for additional ways to improve security.” Mr. Perklin, who worked at a Canadian mobile phone operator before joining ShapeShift, said most phone companies would write down any additional security requests in the notes of a customer account. But agents can generally act on their own, he said, regardless of what is in the notes, and can easily miss what is in the notes. The vulnerability of phone numbers is the unintended consequence of a broad push in the security industry to institute a practice, known as two-factor authentication, that is supposed to help make accounts more secure. Many email providers and financial firms require customers to tie their online accounts to phone numbers, to verify their identity. But this system also generally allows someone with the phone number to reset the passwords on these accounts without knowing the original passwords. A hacker just hits “forgot password?” and has a new code sent to the commandeered phone. Mr. Pokornicky was online at the time his phone number was taken, and he watched as his assailants seized all his major online accounts within a few minutes. “It felt like they were one step ahead of me the whole time,” he said. The speed with which the attackers move has convinced people who are investigating the hacks that the attacks are generally run by groups of hackers working together. Danny Yang, the founder of the virtual currency security firm BlockSeer, said he had traced several attacks to internet addresses in the Philippines, though other attacks have been tracked to computers in Turkey and the United States. Mr. Perklin and other people who have investigated recent hacks said the assailants generally succeeded by delivering sob stories about an emergency that required the phone number to be moved to a new device — and by trying multiple times until a gullible agent was found. “These guys will sit and call 600 times before they get through and get an agent on the line that’s an idiot,” Mr. Weeks said. Coinbase, one of the most widely used Bitcoin wallets, has encouraged customers to disconnect their mobile phones from their Coinbase accounts. But some customers who have lost money have said the companies need to take more steps by doing things like delaying transfers from accounts on which the password was recently changed. “Coinbase looks like a bank, stores millions of dollars like a bank, but you don’t realize how weak its default protections are until you are robbed of thousands of dollars in minutes,” said Cody Brown a virtual reality developer who was hacked in May. Mr. Brown wrote a   about his experience, in which he lost around $8,000 worth of virtual currency from his Coinbase account, all as he sat online and watched, getting no response from the customer service at either Coinbase or Verizon. A spokesman for Coinbase said the company “has invested significant resources to build internal tools to help protect our customers against hackers and account takeovers, including compromise through phone porting.” The irreversibility of Bitcoin transactions has often been lauded as one of the most important qualities of virtual currency because it makes it harder for banks and governments to intervene in transactions. But Mr. Pokornicky said the virtual currency industry needed to alert new users to the added risk that comes with the new features of the technology. “It’s powerful to be able to control your money and move things without any permission,” he said. “But that privilege requires a clear understanding of the downside.”

(Reuters) - Twitter's ban on cryptocurrency advertising will start on Tuesday, the social media company told Reuters. The prohibition will cover advertising of initial coin offerings (ICOs) - crowdfunding used to raise cash by creating new coins -  as well as token sales, the San-Francisco-based firm said, confirming an earlier Reuters report on Monday. (Reporting by Fanny Potkin. Edited by Mike Dolan)
Puccini’s opera (he died before he could finish it) follows a princess who makes men compete for her affection, and kills those who lose the game. Chen Shi-Zheng directed this   production, which is being performed outdoors on Sydney Harbor, overlooking the opera house, where the company spends most of its Sydney season. Dragana Radakovic and Daria Masiero trade turns in the role of Turandot.    , Gabriel Orozco and Louise Lawler are among the artists participating in this exhibition, a display of highlights from the new contemporary museum’s collection. The show’s curatorial team organized the show around the idea of a “fictional museum,” and the display is meant to challenge viewers’ assumptions about how artworks should be organized in an institutional display. The museum is also showing, “The Barefoot Designer: A Workshop to Unlearn,” a showcase of work by the Mexican fashion designer  , through May 15.    This free exhibition is timed to coincide with London’s two leading flower shows, in Chelsea and at  . It focuses on Dutch artists and their florid, vibrant depictions of flowers. Artists on view include 16th- and 17th-century Dutch masters like Roelandt Savery, Jan Brueghel the Elder and Ambrosius Bosschaert. A major exhibition exploring the painter Delacroix’s legacy is also showing at the museum, through May 22.    Around 100 works by the painter Yasuda Yukihiko (1884–1978) are showing here. Yukihoka worked in nihonga, a traditional Japanese painting style, and many of the pieces in his oeuvre have a historical bent. For example, the show includes a famous depiction of Minamoto Yoritomo, who established the Kamakura Shogunate, a military empire, in the late 1100s, facing off with his brother on the battlefield. The museum is also showing “Spring in Full Bloom: A Nihon-ga Festival,” an exhibition of works from the collection, with a special focus on nihonga painters’ renderings of spring. The display includes several works by the celebrated painter Hishida Shunso.   and  , who, when not acting has a second life as a D.J., are among the musicians who will visit Austria for this mountaintop music festival. Other acts include Jamie Jones, Anja Schneider and the Northern Irish duo Bicep. Some of the performances take place in eclectic, winter-themed venues, like the Arctic Disco, a mountaintop igloo with an open roof.    The French artist Henri Rousseau (1844-1910, known also as the Douanier Rousseau) first gained attention when his surreal work went on view (and was ridiculed) at the Salon des Refusés in Paris in 1885. Since then, his unusual style has gained notoriety and prestige: The Douanier Rousseau has been hailed as a precursor to surrealism and a visionary who saw beyond the Impressionist orthodoxies of his day. This exhibition brings together a series of works by Rousseau, as well as some artists who drew inspiration from him, like Picasso, Kandinsky and Seurat.    This contemporary art festival includes around 40 solo shows and 40 group shows by leading artists from Scotland and beyond, in venues across the city. Exhibitions include “Seat in Shadow,” a show by the Glaswegian artist Henry Coombes, who makes surreal projects that blend film and painting; the installation artist Tessa Lynch; and Nicolas Party, who makes candy-colored paintings and installations. Performances by bands like  , which describes itself as a crypto conceptual science fiction anti-climax band, will also take place.    The artist   — best known for elaborate, painterly firework displays and drawings that he makes by lighting gunpowder on a canvas — curated this exhibition, which features art by 15 contemporary Chinese artists. Those on view include the sculpture artist Xu Zhen, the moviemaker Yang Fudong and Huang Yongping, whose giant, oddball sculpture pieces includea full-sized train car with a gigantic fish protruding from it.  .  Umberto Giordano’s opera had its world premiere at the Teatro Alla Scala in 1924, conducted by Toscanini. A new production is running there starting April 3. The opera traces the conflict between the hapless Giannetto and the Chiaramaentesi brothers, who torture him for sport. The film director Mario Martone staged the production, which is conducted by Carlo Rizzi. 

TO its custodians and admirers, the   is the only force standing between its member states and the age-old perils of chauvinism, nationalism and war. That was the pointed message that the Nobel Committee sent last year, when it awarded the union a Peace Prize for its role in “the advancement of peace and reconciliation, democracy and human rights.” And it is the message hammered home relentlessly by the Continent’s politicians, who believe their citizens face a stark choice, in the words of Chancellor   of  , between continued integration and a return to “centuries of hatred and blood spill.” But right now, the E.U. project isn’t advancing democracy, liberalism and human rights. Instead, it is subjecting its weaker member states to an extraordinary test of their resilience, and conducting an increasingly perverse experiment in seeing how much stress liberal norms can bear. That stress takes the form of mass unemployment unseen in the history of modern  , and mass youth unemployment that is worse still. In the Continent’s sick-man economies, the jobless rate for those under 25 now staggers the imagination: over 40 percent in  , over 50 percent in  , and over 60 percent in  . For these countries, the   is now essentially an economic prison, with Germany as the jailer and the common currency as the bars. No matter what happens, they face a future of stagnation — as aging societies with expensive welfare states whose young people will sit idle for years, unable to find work, build capital or start families. The question is whether they will face ideological upheaval as well. So far, the striking thing about the aftermath of the 2008 financial crisis, both in Europe and the United States, is how successfully the center has held. Power has passed back and forth between left and right, but truly radical movements have found little traction, and political violence has been mercifully rare. In a sense,  ’s post-cold-war declaration of the “end of history” — by which he meant the disappearance of credible alternatives to liberal democracy and mixed-economy capitalism — has held up pretty well in the last five years. Amid the worst economic disaster since  , illiberal societies like   and   have faced political crises, but the developed world has not. There has been no mass turn to fascism, no revival of Marxist economics, no coup d’états in   or jackboots in  . But you have to wonder whether the center can hold permanently, if unemployment remains so extraordinarily high. How must liberal democracy and mixed-economy capitalism look to young people in the south of Europe right now? How stable is a political and ideological settlement that requires the rising generation to go without jobs, homes and children because the European project supposedly depends on it? And for that matter, how well is the Continent’s difficult integration of Muslim immigrants likely to proceed in a world where neither natives nor immigrants can find work? Already, the Greek electorate has been flirting with empowering a crypto-communist “coalition of the radical left,” even as a straightforwardly fascist party gains in the polls as well.  ’s conservative government has tiptoed toward authoritarianism. Spain has seen huge street protests whose organizers aspire to imitate the Arab Spring. And lately,  , outside the euro zone but not immune to its youth unemployment problems, has been coping with unsettling, highly un-Scandinavian riots in immigrant neighborhoods. These perturbations do not threaten democracy in Europe yet, and maybe they never will. Maybe the liberal democratic consensus is so bred into the bone that no amount of elite misgovernment can persuade Europe’s younger generation to turn against it. Maybe nothing can end the end of history. But for the countries facing a youth unemployment crisis, that still seems like an awfully risky bet to make. Yet there’s a Catch-22 facing Greeks and Spaniards and Italians looking for an alternative to just staying the course. As wrenching as it would be, the option that would do the most to defang extremists of the left and the right would probably be to abandon the euro immediately, with each country regaining control of its own fiscal and monetary policy and seeing what options open up. But at the moment, the only people arguing for that course are ... the extremists of the left and the right! For that to change, more of the Continent’s political elites would need to recognize that their beloved integration project may actually be threatening Europe’s long democratic peace. For now, there simply aren’t enough responsible people ready to unwind what should never have been knitted together in the first place. But with every increase in the unemployment rate, the odds get better that irresponsible and illiberal figures will end up unwinding it instead.
Bitcoin has many cousins and competitors. None have grown more popular than Ethereum, a global computer network with its own virtual currency, called Ether. Ethereum is a global computing network operating according to rules defined by Ethereum software. Those rules allow the Ethereum network to be programmed to complete certain types of computing tasks, with every computer on the network completing the task in parallel to ensure it is done correctly. Generally the tasks involve money. The creator of Ethereum, Vitalik Buterin, has likened it to a global smartphone that can be programmed to operate according to the apps built on top of it. The apps are called Dapps because they are run by a decentralized network of computers. Mr. Buterin says he chose the name because it refers to “the hypothetical invisible medium that permeates the universe and allows light to travel.” He announced Ethereum in late 2013, but it didn’t go into operation until 2015. The Ethereum network has its own virtual currency, Ether. In the simplest sense, Ether are needed to pay the other computers on the network to complete tasks. It isn’t free to use the network. People have also decided to buy and hold Ether, betting that it will become more valuable as more people want to use the network and need Ether to pay for the network’s computing power. Mr. Buterin was a Bitcoin aficionado, and he was inspired by its success. But he set out to build something that could do more than Bitcoin: He wanted to build a system that would make it possible to program more complex financial transactions. The shared records of the Ethereum network — of every transaction and computation it has ever performed — are known as a blockchain, just as the shared records of all Bitcoin transactions are known as a blockchain. But Ethereum’s blockchain database is totally independent of Bitcoin’s blockchain. Let’s say two companies want to conduct a complicated financial transaction, like settling a stock option. Neither company trusts the other company to conduct the transaction on its computers. Both companies could hire a third party, like a stock exchange, to conduct the transaction, which is what they generally do today. But that forces them to trust that third company and to pay that company fees. With Ethereum, they can conduct the transaction on a shared computer that allows them both to check the records, ideally saving on fees. As this example suggests, Ethereum has proved attractive to financial companies that have to complete lots of complicated financial transactions with competitors they don’t trust. Many banks are looking at how Ethereum could be used as a central operating system for various trading markets, replacing today’s exchanges and middlemen. JPMorgan Chase has even created its own version of Ethereum, known as Quorum. Other companies, like Samsung and Toyota, have experimented with Ethereum as a way to keep track of products moving through supply chains that involve many players. Dozens of large companies around the world came together this year to create the  . The group is working to develop versions of the Ethereum software that are battle tested enough to be used in a corporate setting. The versions of the Ethereum software that companies are building will most likely be used to set up private networks that would be totally separate from the public Ethereum network and that would not use the Ether currency. Some people, though, are betting that these private networks will eventually be plugged back into the public network. Just as with Bitcoin, you can buy Ether from people who already own them on virtual currency exchanges. Most large countries have exchanges where a variety of virtual currencies can be bought with the local currency. Just as with Bitcoin, Ethereum are “mined,” or created by computers joined into the Ethereum network. These computers are in a race to complete the transactions and computing work on the network. The faster your computers, the more likely you are to win the race and receive a bundle of new Ether. There is generally a new winner every 15 seconds or so. It has not yet been decided how many Ether will ultimately be distributed, but the number is likely to be around 100 million. So far, 94 million have been distributed. As with Bitcoin, Ethereum mining serves a dual process of getting new Ether into the world while providing an incentive for people to join the network and help maintain the Ethereum blockchain.
Frank Yiannas has spent years looking in vain for a better way to track lettuce, steaks and snack cakes from farm and factory to the shelves of  , where he is the vice president for  . When the company dealt with   outbreaks, it often took weeks to trace where the bad ingredients came from. Then, last year,   executives flew to Walmart’s headquarters in Arkansas to propose a solution: the blockchain. As Mr. Yiannas studied their pitch, he said, “I became increasingly convinced that maybe we were onto the holy grail.” The blockchain — the buzzy, bewildering technology behind cryptocurrencies like Bitcoin — is starting to be applied to real-world problems like tracking pork chops, shipping containers and footwear with a speed and security not currently possible. The IBM-Walmart partnership is one of the biggest practical tests to date. At its heart, blockchain simply refers to a bookkeeping method that “chains” together entries so that they are very difficult to modify later. It provides a way for large groups of unrelated companies to jointly keep a secure and reliable record of their transactions. IBM is trying to position itself at the forefront of the heated competition for practical uses of this arcane idea. Walmart is just one of 400 IBM clients testing it out, and IBM now has around 650 employees dedicated to the technology. The most immediate business opportunities are in the financial world as a tool to track and trade stocks, bonds and other assets. But in the next week, Maersk, the global shipping giant, is expected to announce it is using IBM’s version of the blockchain to track the avocados, flowers and machine parts it carries on its enormous cargo ships. Last month, the government of   to trace the goods flowing through its ports. Yet success is far from assured. Rival Microsoft   that it was working with JPMorgan Chase and several other corporate giants on a system that competes against IBM’s, based on the virtual currency network known as Ethereum. Many banks are concerned that IBM could push them into a version of the blockchain that would lock them into IBM’s software. “We believe with 100 percent certainty that it’s going to matter,” Mark Russinovich, the head of Microsoft’s blockchain efforts, said of the technology. “It’s a question of where’s its going to matter and how it’s going to matter.” It was Bitcoin that first caught the attention of IBM researchers, and everyone else. Bitcoin, born in 2009, represented a novel idea in the financial world. Unlike, say, dollars or yen, Bitcoins are virtual tokens, unaffiliated with any nation. Anyone can open a wallet and receive Bitcoins — without providing any identifying information — and transactions are recorded on a universal ledger that is visible to everyone. Drug dealers have embraced its relative anonymity. And people who live in countries that strictly control their financial systems, like China and Venezuela, have used Bitcoin to store their money beyond the watchful eye of the government. But while the public focused on stories like these, geeks became fascinated with Bitcoin’s underlying structure and the communal way in which it was updated. That database was referred to as the blockchain because all the transactions were sorted into “blocks,” and each block was chained, using sophisticated math, to the ones before it, all the way back to the very first transaction — a structure that makes it tough for anyone to change the records after the fact. In 2014, a handful of IBM employees began building their own version of Bitcoin, known as Blue Coin, which could be used to track financial transactions, totally independent of Bitcoin. But it was a small, exploratory project with no real support inside IBM. “I was prepared to tell them to shut it down, that cybercurrency is not our role to play,” said Arvind Krishna, director of research at IBM. But a team kept working on the technology, changing the name to Bluechain and then to Openchain. And Mr. Krishna eventually invited his team to a meeting at IBM’s central lab in Yorktown Heights, N.Y., for one last chance to defend the technology. They explained that this was about more than just a currency — it was a new way of tracking shipments and transactions in supply chains of all kinds, from food to prescription drugs to diamonds. Because all the participants would be keeping their own live version of all the data, without a central authority, they could immediately see everything that was going on and trust that no one else had tampered with it. “That was the ‘aha’ for me,” Mr. Krishna said. “This was not really about digital payments, but establishing trust in transactions in general.” He called it “a technology that can change the world.” There are still many in the industry who are skeptical of the long-term significance of the blockchain concept. Doubters have said that it is, at best, a slightly more reliable way to track data, and at worst, a much less efficient method of keeping data than current ones that rely on central gatekeepers. But blockchain champions like to compare it to the significance of the internet, which provided a universal computing language for communicating seamlessly among networks. The blockchain, they say, could provide that universal language for valuable data and information. A few months after Mr. Krishna’s aha moment, his team presented the idea at an annual gathering where IBM’s top executives consider new technologies that could be major opportunities — or threats — to IBM’s business. Blockchain was the first subject of discussion, and the first that Virginia Rometty, IBM’s chief executive, gave the green light to. She turned to Mr. Krishna, the research chief, and said, “You run with this,” he recalled. She asked for a working version within two months. Her hurry-up response was a reflection, in part, of IBM’s eagerness to find new businesses to make up for the erosion of its traditional hardware, software and services offerings. The company has made progress with new products like data-analysis software and its Watson artificial intelligence software. But growth in new businesses has not yet offset declines in traditional businesses. In January, IBM reported its 19th consecutive quarterly drop in revenue, though some of that sales retreat was because of profit-draining operations the company sold off, like semiconductor manufacturing and industry-standard server computers. IBM has already suffered from being late to one of the biggest trends in technology today, cloud computing, where it moved slowly at first and watched the early market leadership go to Amazon and Microsoft. Today, Mr. Krishna said, “The first-mover advantage is even more important than it used to be.” After getting Ms. Rometty’s push on the blockchain, the IBM team’s first move was to make its software “open source,” meaning that it would be free and available for anyone to review and tinker with. IBM’s bet was that this would establish its technology as a de facto standard, and that it could make money by selling software and services that would sit on top of the technology. It was the chairman of IBM Europe, Erich Clementi, who personally pitched the concept to the top technology executive at Maersk. Like Walmart, Maersk had already been looking for years for a better way to trace the goods it ships around the globe. For Maersk, the problem was not tracking the familiar rectangular shipping containers that sail the world aboard its cargo ships — instead, it was the mountains of paperwork that go with each container. Maersk had found that a single container could require stamps and approvals from as many as 30 people, including customs, tax officials and health authorities. While the containers themselves can be loaded on a ship in a matter of minutes, a container can be held up in port for days because a piece of paper goes missing, while the goods inside spoil. The cost of moving and keeping track of all this paperwork often equals the cost of physically moving the container around the world. What’s more, the system is rife with fraud. The valuable bill of lading is often tampered with or copied to let criminals siphon off goods or circulate counterfeit products, leading to billions of dollars in maritime fraud each year. Maersk and IBM began working on a version of its software that would be open to everyone involved with every container. When customs authorities signed off on a document, they could immediately upload a copy of it, with a digital signature, so that everyone else involved — including Maersk and government authorities — could see that it was complete. If there were disputes later, everyone could go back to the record and be confident that no one had altered it in the meantime. The cryptography involved would make it hard for the virtual signatures to be forged. The first test of the system happened last summer and tracked all of the paperwork related to a container of flowers moving from the Port of Mombasa in Kenya to Rotterdam in the Netherlands. It went well enough that Maersk and IBM followed up by tracking containers with pineapples from Colombia, and mandarin oranges from California. The difficulty of making this work in the real world is that everyone at every step along the way needs to be involved, otherwise it’s unlikely to induce any more confidence than the old system. “You need to have something in it for all stakeholders, in order to get the whole chain going,” said Jakob Stausholm, the chief financial and technology officer at Maersk, who is leading the project. “That’s the difficult part.” IBM and Maersk have recently been seeking cooperation from customs authorities, freight forwarders and the producers that fill the containers. Just last month, Maersk and IBM began running their first trials with these partners involved, on shipping routes between Rotterdam and Newark. Not everyone has been so willing to buy in to the IBM approach. Many technologists who got excited about Bitcoin have said that the newer, corporate-designed blockchains — like the one being built by IBM — are missing one of the main elements of Bitcoin’s success, namely the extremely decentralized structure. Anyone in the world can join Bitcoin and, in effect, study its ledgers. But only a limited set of participants can gain access to ones like IBM’s. That could make them more vulnerable to attack from, say, a hacker who targets a few of the participants. Even though the IBM technology for tracking shipments is more decentralized than previous methods, “it still concentrates power in a handful of entities,” said Emin Gun Sirer, a professor at Cornell who studies distributed systems. The companies working with IBM have been less worried about these security issues. Almost all of them demanded that the system not be open like Bitcoin. While they are giving up some security benefits, the private blockchains can move faster than Bitcoin, which has been  . IBM has faced questions from companies worried that the tech giant has too much control over the system it is building and could make them dependent on IBM software for years to come. IBM tried to fend off this line of attack when it made its software open source in 2015. The foundation that is now in charge of the computer code, the  , has attracted many other companies that are now working on the project alongside IBM.  , the Bank of England, Kaiser Permanente and nine other new members joined. But the director of the Hyperledger Foundation, Brian Behlendorf, acknowledged that IBM is still the single largest contributor to the project. As a result, it has been an uphill battle to convince others that it is not simply an IBM project. “They have such a head start that it can leave the impression that Hyperledger is an IBM product,” Mr. Behlendorf said. “We are trying to tell a story about the other companies building on top of Hyperledger. That is emerging. It will take some time.” Microsoft has fended off this sort of problem by focusing most of its efforts on a blockchain that it had nothing to do with building, the blockchain behind the virtual currency known as Ethereum. This has already helped Microsoft move in on some clients that IBM is also pursuing. Bank of America, for instance, is   that will track the flows of money around trade deals. But IBM has taken an early lead. Its list of collaborators includes the likes of the London Stock Exchange and the Bank of Tokyo, and lots of companies outside the financial world like Maersk and Walmart. “This is the most well-thought-out project in the space,” said Mr. Sirer, the Cornell professor. Now all IBM has to do is get the systems out into the real world and show that they work. At Maersk, Mr. Stausholm said it could take five or even 10 years for that to happen, given all the partners — manufacturers, customs officials and farmers — that need to come together. “I really do believe in it,” he said, “but I don’t know how fast it will be able to take off.” At Walmart, Mr. Yiannas is more optimistic. His company has already completed two pilots with IBM — moving pork from Chinese farms to Chinese stores, and produce from Latin America to the United States — and he is confident a finished version can be put together within a few years. “I think this is our one best hope for getting it right,” he said.
After months of talk and hype, the world’s biggest banks have taken the first steps toward moving a significant piece of financial infrastructure onto a so-called blockchain — the technology introduced to the world by the virtual currency Bitcoin. The company that serves as the back end for much Wall Street trading — the Depository Trust and Clearing Corporation, or   — said on Monday that it would replace one of its central databases, used by the largest banks in the world, with new software inspired by Bitcoin. The organization, based in New York, plays a role in recording and reporting nearly every stock and bond trade in the United States, as well as most valuable derivatives trades. , which has been making a big push into blockchain technology, will be leading the project for the D.T.C.C. and aims to have it fully functioning by early next year. “This is a real tangible step into what could be a very different future for Wall Street,” Michael C. Bodson, the chief executive of the D.T.C.C., said in an interview. The announcement is one of the most advanced steps yet in Wall Street’s continuing effort to harness the technological concepts underlying Bitcoin. Financial institutions around the world have been fascinated by Bitcoin not because of the volatile virtual currency itself, but because it introduced a new way of executing and recording financial transactions without a central authority. All Bitcoin transactions take place on a global financial ledger known as a blockchain, which is maintained and updated by a network of thousands of computers around the world, similar to the way that Wikipedia is kept up by diffuse volunteers rather than by a single company. Wall Street has been drawn to the blockchain concept because it allows information to be recorded in real time without the bottleneck that central authorities generally introduce. The decentralized nature of the technology also makes it harder for attackers, or hackers, to take control of the network. The D.T.C.C. project will not use Bitcoin’s blockchain. Instead it is building something similar to a blockchain, known as a distributed ledger, which multiple financial institutions can update and view at the same time. Unlike Bitcoin’s blockchain, the D.T.C.C. ledger will be open only to invited participants. Mr. Bodson said the basic promise of a distributed ledger is that it provides “one version of the truth that everyone shares and everyone utilizes.” The new ledger will replace an existing database, known as the Trade Information Warehouse, that records information about every   trade that comes through the D.T.C.C. Credit default swaps, which played a major role in the 2008 financial crisis, are essentially bets on the success of bonds. The D.T.C.C. oversaw about $11 trillion in credit default swaps trading last year, or 80 percent of all trades in the global market. Banks rely on the Trade Information Warehouse to determine when payments are due and what size they will be. Because the database will be edited in group fashion, the hope is that it will provide a more streamlined and reliable source of information. Mr. Bodson said that if the database was successful, the D.T.C.C. could use the technology to move money rather than just record information. Over the last few years, most   to explore the potential utility of blockchain technology. This has gone to the highest levels, with some   onto some sort of blockchain. But while there have been endless announcements about tests and proofs of concept, almost no one has disclosed plans to actually use a blockchain or distributed ledger in the real world. Until now, the most discussed announcement came from the Australian stock exchange, which said in early 2016 that it had hired an American software company, Digital Asset Holdings, to build a distributed ledger for its back-end systems. The Australian exchange, though, has said it has not made a final decision on whether it will move to the new technology. The D.T.C.C. has been talking publicly about its interest in the blockchain for a while, and last year it announced that it had successfully completed a test of a distributed ledger database in its credit default swaps trading business. Mr. Bodson said that since then the D.T.C.C. had determined that a distributed ledger would be cheaper to run than its existing system. The D.T.C.C. tests were done using a distributed ledger technology created by a start-up, Axoni, that will also be involved in the project, along with R3, a consulting firm working with dozens of banks on blockchain projects, and IBM. “The fact that they are taking this as seriously as they are is indicative of the broad-felt sense in the financial community that this technology is here to stay,” Charley Cooper, a managing director of R3, said of the D.T.C.C.
Sandra Goeken Martis was never encouraged to go into any one of her father's start-up businesses: not MCI Communications, the computer network for the FTD floral service, Airfone or In-Flight Phone. Not that that stopped her. "In the early days, I would have said he was the most sexist, male chauvinistic pig in the country," said Ms. Martis, 35, who charitably chalks it up to her father's desire to protect her from the unkind business world. Recruited by one of her father's companies, the BTC Corporation, a telecommunications concern, she moved up largely because investors coaxed Mr. Goeken to make better use of his ambitious daughter's talents. "It was only after he saw how when the chips were down, I was always there to pick them up, that he changed his tune," said Ms. Martis, who calls her father Jack to avoid ruffling feathers. Today, she runs the international half of In-Flight Phone while her father handles the domestic end -- and can barely contain his pride. "Over the years she's proved herself," Mr. Goeken said. "She's does things I wouldn't trust anyone else with."  ALEXANDRA LEBANTHAL AND JIM LEBENTHAL Alexandra Lebenthal, 29, the heir apparent to the municipal bond house by the same name in downtown Manhattan, has been accompanying her father, Jim, to work since she was 5. Her grandmother, Sayra, paid her 25 cents to reinforce the pages in binder notebooks. At age 11, Alexandra and her classmates pitched in at the peak of New York City's financial crisis to help her father figure out how many of the city's bonds were held by individuals. "If the bonds were not honored, many people's life savings would be wiped out," said Jim Lebenthal, who is 64. Though she initially considered becoming an actress, Alexandra, who has an older sister and a younger brother, said she was always most interested in the family business. Still is. "I was the only sibling who paid attention at the dinner table when the business was discussed and who worked at Lebenthal during the summers," Alexandra Lebenthal said. After being graduated from Princeton University in 1986 with a degree in history, she joined Kidder, Peabody's municipal bond department. She moved to Lebenthal in 1988 -- a development her father considers quite fitting. Not only was the business started by her 94-year-old grandmother, but half of the sales force is women, unusual on Wall Street. Jim Lebenthal envisions a day when his middle child will be the Lebenthal in Lebenthal & Company.
A great divide exists in the voting power of shareholders in the United States. The majority of American companies have one share, one vote, but more and more companies are going public with a dual-class stock structure. Here, the voting power rests in the hands of the founders or another group of shareholders. It’s time to consider an alternative: “tenure voting,” a system in which shareholders accumulate more votes the longer they hold stock. Dual-class stock, which must be adopted in the initial public offering stage, is all the rage and is not just found at Google and Facebook. Pure Storage, First Data and Square have all gone public with dual-class stock. Last year, some 13.5 percent of I.P.O.s included some type of dual-class stock, according to Dealogic As  , this creates a culture of “haves” and “have-nots.” The haves with dual-class stock are protected from shareholder activism and insulated from shareholder demands. The have-nots are on the run — in constant fear of demands from activist investors. The difference comes down to the value of a vote. In the case of dual-class stock, either your vote is worth nothing or everything. The founders essentially control the company and wield influence more or less with impunity. This insulates the company from shareholder activism and indeed from the other shareholders. The other shareholders, meanwhile, have worthless votes. The idea can work well in principle. Concentrating voting power with the founders allows them to steer the corporate culture and look to the long term. But there are examples where it has gone horribly awry, as with Sumner Redstone at Viacom and CBS. Mr. Redstone has refused to give up control of the companies despite his   at age 92. In the rest of corporate America, shareholders have one vote for every share. This has the same flaws as American democracy. Too often your vote doesn’t count and many shareholders don’t bother to vote. Everyone also has the same kind of voting power, from an index fund that can hold a stock for decades to day traders who care only about the next five minutes. In other words, neither model works in all cases. In addition, this binary world does not reflect an increasingly complicated reality. Today, founders reflexively go about adopting dual-class stock whether it is good or bad for the company. Dual-class stock may work well at Facebook, but whether it does at Fairway Group Holdings, the struggling grocery store chain that appears to be heading for default on its loans, is another story. The one-share, one-vote companies, meanwhile, are vulnerable to being pushed into quick fixes at the expense of the business long term. Activist hedge funds press companies to enact spinoffs, big share buybacks or other financial engineering tricks to generate a pop in the stock price. And then the activists walk away. This can be a real problem. After all, how else can we explain a Rube Goldberg-type transaction like the  , to be followed by a split of the combined company into three different ones? Such a complex and potentially risky transaction would not have happened if the two companies had not been pushed by shareholder activists. The charge is heatedly disputed by the activists, who contend that they are simply making companies more efficient. They have a point: Activists have successfully overhauled many staid companies like Darden Restaurants, owner of Olive Garden, where the chief executive was accused of spending several months a year serving on other boards while his own business declined. There is, however, a potential middle ground in shareholder voting — a system that diverts power from founders while allowing companies to reward longer-term shareholders. Enter tenure voting. In a   with David J. Berger and Aaron J. Benjamin of the law firm Wilson Sonsini Goodrich & Rosati, we outline the potential of this system. In tenure voting, more votes are given to shareholders the longer they hold shares. So for example, if you hold shares for three years at the company you will have three votes per share. The award of more votes for a longer holding period is intended to empower those shareholders who stick with the company. They will presumably have a greater stake in the welfare of the company. It can also provide a counterweight in a dual-class setup. The founders may still have a larger voting bloc, but the power held by long-term institutional investors would grow over time. That would allow some measured shareholder activism, while limiting founder power. The beauty of tenure voting is that it is devised to address short-termism while rewarding all shareholders. Blockchain technology can make it easier to track ownership of everyone’s shares to ensure they are given the right number of votes. (Blockchain technology, which is used by Bitcoin, would create a public ledger of all transactions.) Will long-term shareholders value their new voting power? It is possible that such shareholders may become like sheep, never complaining and never trying to influence the company. They will hold and hold and sell only when the news is very bad. Still, there are some indications that shareholders value the power to vote: Google’s “no vote” shares, for example, trade at a small discount to its one-vote shares. Tenure voting is not a cure-all, to be sure. It may turn out that one share, one vote is best and we should simply reward whoever has the most shares. Yet American companies are in a straitjacket because of the current Wall Street obsession on short-term methods and results. They dare not give shareholders any more voting power if they can help it. Otherwise, though, there are no checks on founders and management. A middle path — tenure voting — seems worth trying.


HONG KONG — The digital currency Bitcoin plunged on Wednesday after Bitfinex, an exchange based in Hong Kong, said it had been hacked and funds stolen. The exchange said it had halted trading, deposits and withdrawals while it investigated which users had been affected. Bitcoin’s trading value fell about 20 percent early on Wednesday, local time in Hong Kong, but had recovered about half the loss by early afternoon. Zane Tackett, Bitfinex’s director of community and product development, did not immediately respond to requests for comment. But he said in a posting on Reddit that  . Before the hacking was made public, that number of Bitcoins would have been worth about $72 million. Now that the currency has slumped, the figure is closer to $65 million. The exchange, one of the world’s largest, said in a   that any outstanding settlements would be made at the price before the hacking. “As we account for individualized customer losses, we may need to settle open margin positions, associated financing, and/or collateral affected by the breach,” Bitfinex said in the post. It added that customers’ losses would be addressed later. Security breaches of this type have raised questions about the viability of Bitcoin. The most notable episode was the collapse in 2014 of  , an exchange based in Tokyo, in which hundreds of thousands of Bitcoins were stolen in a heist that experts and law enforcement officials are still trying to unravel. This past June, a hacker stole more than $50 million worth of Ether, another digital currency, from an experimental virtual currency project called the  . Jack Liu, chief strategy officer at OKCoin, a large digital currency exchange, said he was not concerned about the security of his company because it uses a different system. But he noted that there should be more discussion between exchanges over best practices. “We care about the health of the ecosystem,” he said, although he emphasized that nobody should be dictating how Bitcoins are secured. “Hackers are only getting better and so adoption of the same solution may not be the safest for the industry.” Although some view Bitcoin as the future of finance, allowing for faster and cheaper transactions, the   has been rived with infighting over the development of the technology. The blockchain ledger, part of the coding that underlies the currency, has also gained more  , as banks see an opportunity to use the technology to speed up trades. Bitfinex said the theft had been reported to law enforcement.
SAN FRANCISCO — Indiegogo helped take crowdfunding mainstream. Now the company is hoping it can do the same for  , the popular but unregulated practice of selling custom virtual currencies to raise money for software projects. Indiegogo started a new service on Tuesday to vet coin offerings, also known as I.C.O.s, and then help sell them to small and large investors. The first project to use the service, a start-up known as the  , will begin raising $5 million on Indiegogo this week. The start-up aims to use the money to create a league of football teams that will be guided by people who buy the league’s coins (a crazy-sounding idea that  ). “We want to bring a brand of trust to the entire industry, which we think will bring I.C.O.s to the mainstream,” said Slava Rubin, one of the founders of Indiegogo. Smaller crowdfunding platforms like Republic and AngelList have started their own efforts to legitimize coin offerings. But until now, established companies essentially avoided coin offerings because of the numerous legal risks and uncertainties. It was, however, becoming increasingly hard for Indiegogo to ignore the market. Programmers, entrepreneurs and scammers have   through coin offerings this year, according to Coindesk, after rising out of almost nowhere. That is more than the best-known company in crowdfunding, Kickstarter, has helped companies raise in its entire eight-year history. Initial coin offerings have been so hot — and some say so unhinged — that some companies have found success with them even after failed crowdfunding campaigns. An online art gallery known as Maecenas, which failed to raise 400,000 pounds (currently about $533,000) through crowdfunding this year, raised $15 million a few months later through an I.C.O.,  . Established companies have been left out of the I.C.O. craze, in large part because of the legal uncertainty. The head of the Securities and Exchange Commission, Jay Clayton, has said several times —   — that many coins should be categorized as securities and be registered with the authorities, which almost no projects have done. The agency has   that aren’t legally compliant. Indiegogo will help coin offerings follow the law by registering them as securities in most cases. This approach puts many restrictions on investors and on projects. Small investors will be allowed to invest about $10,000 in most projects, and companies will be able to raise no more than $1 million from these investors, because of   by the 2012 JOBS Act. That is a tiny amount compared with the tens of millions of dollars that many coin offerings have raised this year. Projects going through Indiegogo will be able to raise more money from sophisticated investors. But these investors will also face limitations, such as lockup periods, before they begin selling their tokens to others. These restrictions could make the new service unattractive. Most coin offerings have been able to garner unlimited amounts of money from any investor; the biggest have raised over $200 million. And at least so far, regulators have cracked down on few of them. Several law firms have already been working on creating legally compliant methods of initial coin offerings. Indiegogo is working with one of those firms, Cooley. Sohrob Farudi, the chief executive of the Fan-Controlled Football League, said he was willing to accept the restrictions involved in working with Indiegogo to stay on the right side of the law. “We want to be sure that nobody on our side is going to jail and that when we bring this product to market that it will be done the right way,” Mr. Farudi said. His group previously raised $63,000 in an   to create a minor-league football team guided by fans. Now it is hoping to create a full league with the same principles. The league will begin this week with what is known as a token presale. Early next year, it expects to do a full initial coin offering, and will likely look to raise around $30 million, Mr. Farudi said. At that point, the people who invested in the presale will receive coins, also referred to as tokens, at a discounted rate. When the league opens next summer, people who hold the tokens will be able to vote on everything, from what color the jerseys should be to what plays the coaches should call during a game, with votes taken in real time. The tokens will initially be stored and recorded on the ledger, or blockchain, associated with the  , though recent congestion on the Ethereum system has the league looking at other blockchain alternatives for the long term. Mr. Farudi said having the tokens on a virtual currency blockchain would allow every vote to be recorded for all the participants to see. “The voting mechanism has to be transparent,” he said. “The blockchain is the best example we could find for how to implement that.” When the league does its I.C.O., Indiegogo plans to categorize it as a so-called utility token, rather than a security, because its main purpose will be to allow for voting on league decisions. Utility tokens come with fewer restrictions than securities. Mr. Rubin of Indiegogo said most companies doing coin offerings would probably have to register as securities. For now, he thinks that coin offerings won’t make sense for most companies, given the additional complications. In the long run, though, he has joined the chorus of believers who think that all investments are likely to be done on some sort of blockchain because of the way it allows decisions and changes of ownership to be recorded transparently. “Over time, I don’t think it’s going to be a discussion — I think all of it will be on a blockchain infrastructure,” Mr. Rubin said. “The New York Stock Exchange, or the Nasdaq, 20 years from now will be on blockchain. That’s what we’re talking about.”
For the past year, chief executives have often talked about the new sense of moral responsibility that corporations have to help their communities and confront social challenges even when Washington won’t. In the aftermath of the school shooting in Parkland, Fla., that killed   — and at a time when Washington shows   — there’s a real opportunity for the business community to fill the void and prove that all that talk about moral responsibility isn’t hollow. Here’s an idea. What if the finance industry — credit card companies like Visa, Mastercard and American Express; credit card processors like First Data; and banks like JPMorgan Chase and Wells Fargo — were to effectively set new rules for the sales of guns in America? Collectively, they have more leverage over the gun industry than any lawmaker. And it wouldn’t be hard for them to take a stand. PayPal, Square, Stripe and Apple Pay announced years ago that they would not allow their services to be used for the sale of firearms. “We do not believe permitting the sale of firearms on our platform is consistent with our values or in the best interests of our customers,” a spokesman for Square told me. The big financial firms don’t even have to go that far. For example, Visa, which published   in 2016 espousing its “corporate responsibility,” could easily change its terms of service to say that it won’t do business with retailers that sell assault weapons, high-capacity magazines and bump stocks, which make semiautomatic rifles fire faster. (Even the National Rifle Association has said it would support tighter restrictions on bump stocks.) If Mastercard were to do the same, assault weapons would be eliminated from virtually every firearms store in America because otherwise the sellers would be cut off from the credit card system. There is precedent for credit card issuers to ban the purchase of completely legal products. Just this month, JPMorgan Chase, Citigroup and Bank of America   to buy Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies. To be clear: Those three banks won’t let you use your credit card to buy Bitcoin, but they will happily let you use it to buy an AR-15-style semiautomatic rifle — the same kind of gun used in mass shootings in Parkland; Newtown, Conn.; San Bernardino, Calif.; Las Vegas; and Sutherland Springs, Tex. Visa, oddly enough, is the card of choice of the N.R.A.: There is actually an   issued by First Bankcard, a division of First National Bank of Omaha. And Mastercard proudly announced last year that it was the branded card for Cabela’s, an outdoor gear megastore with a seemingly limitless  . Visa spokesmen did not reply to several emails seeking comment. A spokesman for Mastercard sent a boilerplate statement that expressed “disgust with recent events, including last week in Florida.” “Our payments network is governed by standards that have been established over time,” the statement said. “Chief among these is that we do not and will not permit merchants to engage in unlawful activity on our network.” He said the company would continue to talk to customers and lawmakers about its policies. If Visa and Mastercard are unwilling to act on this issue, the credit card processors and banks that issue credit cards could try. Jamie Dimon, chief executive of JPMorgan Chase, which issues credit cards and owns a payment processor, has talked about how he and his bank have “a moral obligation but also a deeply vested interest” in helping “solve pressing societal challenges.” This is your chance, Mr. Dimon. And here’s a variation on the same theme: What if the payment processing industry’s biggest customers — companies like McDonald’s, Starbucks, Apple, Amazon, AT&T, CVS and others that regularly talk about “social responsibility” — collectively pressured the industry to do it? There’s a chance that some of the payment processors would stop handling gun sales. Perhaps their voices would help push one of the banks to step out and lead? Is all of this a pipe dream? Maybe, but I spent the last 72 hours calling and emailing a handful of chief executives to discuss these ideas. None wanted to speak on the record, because it’s a hot-button topic. But all applauded the idea and some said they had already been thinking about it. A few, I discovered later, called their peers to begin a conversation. At least two executives said a reason that they haven’t been more outspoken yet is that they fear reprisals from the N.R.A. and other gun supporters — not just in the form of boycotts that could affect their bottom line, but also actions that could imperil the safety of their employees. Obviously there would be opposition. When Peter Thiel, the co-founder of PayPal, was asked at a conference about his former company’s decision to not do business with firearms merchants, he made his displeasure clear.   if I was still running it,” said Mr. Thiel, who left the company years ago and is a supporter of President Trump. Perhaps the biggest stumbling block to an approach like this are companies like Walmart, which has huge sway over the financial industry. While Walmart stopped selling assault rifles in 2015, it might look askance at any policy by a bank issuer or credit card company to limit the kinds of products it sells. Critics of using the finance industry to influence gun sales might argue that such a move would be discriminatory against gun retailers. But gun sellers are not a protected class, like age, race, gender, religion or even political affiliation. This would be a strictly commercial decision. Another critique is that it is impossible to prevent every shooting, no matter how guns are restricted. And the banks’ actions would affect millions of their own law-abiding customers, effectively dictating what they can and cannot buy. The most troubling aspect of having the finance industry try to restrict gun sales is that it would push the most dangerous guns into an untraceable world where sales would depend on cash. That’s true. All things considered, though, it would make it considerably harder to even find such guns. There are other sectors of the finance industry that could step up. For example, Lloyd’s of London is the favored insurance company for gun shows. It could pull out. None of this is a panacea. But it’s a start. It takes leadership and courage — exactly what these executives say they have. If they don’t want to back up their words with actions, the next time there’s a school shooting that prompts a conversation about gun companies, it should also include the financial complex that supports them.
There’s much to like about “This Machine Kills Secrets,” Andy Greenberg’s well-reported history of WikiLeaks and the many projects it has inspired, but one unintentionally hilarious quotation stands out in particular. “You can’t run this like a zoo where everyone can go and watch,” is how Daniel Domscheit-­Berg, Julian Assange’s former lieutenant, defends his decision not to release the source code of OpenLeaks, his own challenger to WikiLeaks. Sunlight might be the best disinfectant, but even the most ardent advocates of transparency reach for the sunblock once it gets too bright. Greenberg, a writer for Forbes, has produced an exhaustive prequel to the never-ending WikiLeaks saga. Unlike some recent books on the subject, this one adopts a decidedly historical perspective and situates the ideas behind WikiLeaks in the heady debates about computing, privacy and civil liberties that have dominated many an online conversation in the last three decades. And, as if this challenge were not grand enough, Greenberg also tries to explain the highly complex technologies that have made a project like WikiLeaks possible, introducing such hidden gems of geek cuisine as “salt hashing” and “onion routing.” By and large, he succeeds, and the resulting dish is delicious and not at all too technical. (In the interests of transparency, let me add that Greenberg once interviewed me for Forbes, and he uses some of those quotations in the book.) According to Greenberg, what most observers fail to appreciate about WikiLeaks is the anonymity its document-­submission system provided to would-be leakers. This anonymity was not God-given but hard-earned; it would be impossible without a software tool called Tor, which, in yet another ironic twist, emerged from research financed by the United States Navy. It’s unlikely that tools like Tor would be widely used by today’s whistle-blowers if the geeks did not outwit the government in their most significant policy tussle to date. During the so-called crypto wars that raged for most of the 1990s, the government wanted to keep secure encryption technologies all to itself, arguing that their widespread use would empower drug traffickers and terrorists. Its opponents, by contrast, wanted everyone on the planet to have access to encryption. The geeks won, paving the way for tools like Tor and sites like WikiLeaks. Many of these “crypto” battles were debated on a handful of mailing lists, where Julian Assange was both an avid reader and an occasional contributor. Greenberg, to his credit, has ventured far beyond the online archives of those lists, meeting and interviewing many of the leading figures in those fights and even corresponding with one of them in prison. He’s at his best when on the road — driving through a volcano-­ridden Iceland, flying a decrepit Soviet plane with nine hackers, swimming in the Black Sea with fearless Bulgarian journalists. Even seasoned observers of WikiLeaks will find something new and interesting in this book. Who knew that Assange modeled WikiLeaks on Nicolas Bourbaki — a collective pseudonym for a group of very talented mathematicians active in France since the 1930s? Or that Birgitta Jonsdottir, the Icelandic politician who collaborated with WikiLeaks, used to sell Kirby vacuum cleaners in New Jersey? Alas, as the book unfolds, reportage seems to all but displace analysis, with Greenberg documenting minor squabbles between Assange and just about everyone else, or celebrating yet another innovation in encryption rather than placing his characters and their tools in the broader political context. For all their disruptive potential, encryption technologies have not solved the dilemma that has plagued sites like WikiLeaks. That dilemma is this: To get leaks, a site needs to have a public profile and look trustworthy. Who would want to leak documents to a honey pot run by some secret government agency? Who would want to help analyze them? So trust and prominence are essential — but they are also hard to achieve if the leaking platform itself remains completely anonymous. But once the anonymity cover is blown, the platform becomes vulnerable: its networks could be infiltrated by informers, its staff could be harassed and spied on, its online presence could be stymied by cyberattacks and legal hassles. Allowing whistle-blowers to leak anonymously is a crucial first step — but it might also be the easiest step. In fact, it may even instill the leaking platform with a false sense of invincibility and resilience. One of the few unambiguous lessons of WikiLeaks is that early success can easily devastate the leaking platform, for such success will normally be followed by political trouble. Encryption technologies are of little help here. Their greatest impact is on the leakers, not on those processing the leaks. Even with regards to the leakers, however, the situation is far more complex than Greenberg lets on. He draws elaborate comparisons between the cases of Bradley Manning and Daniel Ellsberg, arguing that digital technologies have expanded the scale and the speed of leaking and made it easier to cover the tracks. But have we entered a truly new era, in which technology provides a robust infrastructure for leaking — a common techno-­optimistic view advanced in many books about WikiLeaks? Or is the whole Cablegate episode just a blip in the long institutional march toward even greater secrecy — perhaps an instanceof governments and corporations not taking their network security seriously but hardly a guarantee that they won’t adapt in due time? While the former view dominated most of the early responses to WikiLeaks, it seems excessively cheerful in retrospect. It’s true that one set of technologies has made it easier to release the leaked documents to the outside world, but another set of technologies is also making it harder to get them off the corporate or government networks. A pertinent recent case that Greenberg doesn’t discuss is that of Joe Muto, a former Fox News employee who, convinced of his anonymity, leaked some internal Fox footage to the popular blog Gawker. It took Fox less than 48 hours to out him — by analyzing who on their network had retrieved the footage in question. Likewise, just this past June, the director of national intelligence, James Clapper, ordered that all employees at federal intelligence agencies who take lie detector tests also answer a specific question about their leaking practices. Very little about the heavily policed contemporary workplace suggests that leaking will become easier. Greenberg does sense that an anti-­leaking backlash might be in the offing: his early revolutionary rhetoric all but disappears as the book progresses. He even documents some recent efforts to automate the process of identifying potential whistle-blowers on government networks. But here the reporter in Greenberg is too attached to the human side of the story — it is, after all, ironic that Julian Assange’s former hacker friends are now employed by the American government to make leaks impossible — to offer a comprehensive picture of the recent technological solutions to leaking. Once all of those technologies are factored into our analysis, it may very well be that the much-lauded revolution in transparency is just a counterrevolution in disguise. For every machine that kills secrets, there are at least two that keep them alive.
 of the memo mattered less than #releasethememo. That’s the word from our Washington correspondent on the document   that was released on Friday. The uproar over the memo may have been more important than its contents, he writes. President Trump, above on his way to Florida, said   in the investigation into Russian election interference. Earlier in the week, he gave his first State of the Union address. We discussed it   our hit podcast, which just celebrated  . Did you keep up with the headlines this week? Test your knowledge  . ____  of young women  , the former doctor for U.S.A. Gymnastics, as the F.B.I. took more than a year to pursue its case against him. “Look at all the people who could’ve stopped him earlier,” said Leslie Miller, above, whose daughter Emma Ann was among the victims. “My goal is to find every single one of them in the haystack — expose them all, so this will never happen again.” In Michigan, where Dr. Nassar is still being sentenced for sex crimes,   in the courtroom. The father, Randall Margraves, was stopped by law enforcement officials. ____  that   against Islamist militants in the northern Sinai Peninsula of Egypt. Above, Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu of Israel at a conference last year. Over the last two years, unmarked Israeli drones, helicopters and jets have conducted more than 100 airstrikes there. Their collaboration is the most dramatic evidence yet of a quiet reconfiguration of the politics of the region, and both countries have gone to great lengths to keep it quiet. ____  was shot down   on Saturday, above. The Russian Defense Ministry said the pilot was killed by fighters on the ground. Farther north, two American-trained forces  . Some of the fighters are Syrians who fled as refugees — and are now going back to fight on Turkey’s behalf. And in Afghanistan, anger is growing about the  , the heavily militarized capital. Many are asking: Why is the government unable to protect us? ____  JPMorgan Chase and Berkshire Hathaway made a big announcement: They’re joining forces to create a new company that will provide health care to their employees in the U.S. Experts say there’s  . Above, Jeff Bezos of Amazon. U.S. stocks have ended their worst week since February 2016, as   after a long market boom. ____  has the worst on-time performance of any major rapid transit system in the world. This video tells the story of  , weaving together archival footage, interviews and an original song by a subway busker that we commissioned to explain bond issuance fees. ____  in Pyeongchang, South Korea, start on Friday. Our Seoul correspondent   is one of the most unlikely hosts of the Games in Olympic history. (It’s also frequently confused with Pyongyang, the capital of North Korea.) The Games are taking place in the shadow of the nuclear standoff with North Korea, and  . We’ll be rolling out full coverage in the days ahead, and some of it will feature augmented reality segments that you can see on an iPhone.  ____  meet the Philadelphia Eagles in   on Sunday. We’ll have live coverage, and until then, here’s our collection of   like wings, nachos and chili (and some healthier options, too). But we’re also mulling this question: After all the revelations about the danger of brain damage from football,  In our Op-Ed pages, Emily Kelly, the wife of the former Saints and Patriots safety Rob Kelly, details   because of brain trauma. ____ got in the Super Bowl spirit by   between New England and Philadelphia in a sketch featuring Natalie Portman, the show’s host, above center, and the former cast members Rachel Dratch and Tina Fey. Alec Baldwin was also back as President Trump, an impression for which he has won rave reviews. But some are offended by the actor’s  , filmmakers who have been accused of sexual assault. ____  is finally ready to talk about Harvey Weinstein. The actress, who said in October that she was waiting to feel “less angry” before addressing Mr. Weinstein’s abuses,   about her encounters with him and a gruesome episode on location for the 2003 film “Kill Bill.” “The complicated feeling I have about Harvey is how bad I feel about all the women that were attacked after I was,” Ms. Thurman said. ____  we have a new guide to help you tidy your finances, optimize your spending and plan for the long term. We’re calling it  , with daily, manageable tasks for just a week. Speaking of financial planning — sort of — our   include the tale of the young men trying to  . They call themselves “benevolent capitalists.” Above, their ringleader.
The 1990s were a boom decade for  Western energy companies tapping into Caspian oil and gas. Three  important oil pipelines were built  —   the Caspian Pipeline Consortium (CPC),  Baku-Supsa to the Black Sea, and the Baku-Tbilisi-Ceyhan (BTC) to the Mediterranean  —  as well as the Baku-Tbilisi-Erzurum (BTE) pipeline transporting  gas to Turkey. How times have changed! A host of factors today are turning proposed Westbound gas pipelines into a Eurasian pipe dream. The United States is focused elsewhere  —  on Iraq, Iran, Afghanistan, Pakistan and the Arab-Israeli diplomatic quagmire  —  and the Obama administration is advocating a massive shift to alternative energy. European energy policy is adrift. In addition, there are powerful economic factors that militate against the multi-billion dollar investments needed to bring the Caspian energy resources to market:  oil at $50 a barrel is considerably less attractive then oil at $75; the global recession and credit crunch have sharply reduced available financing; European energy demand is in decline; and there is no strong Western private-sector champion for such projects. In the meantime, Russia is working to corner energy exports from Azerbaijan and Turkmenistan while China is buying up  hydrocarbon companies in Kazakhstan like hot cakes and  developing Turkmen gas fields. Multiple pipelines from the Caspian region and Central Asia, such as those pumping Turkmen gas and Kazakh oil lines to China and the BTC to the Mediterranean, have increased  the energy exporters’ bargaining capacity. China has turned into a  hungry, 800-pound gorilla in the energy market. The planned construction of  Russia-China oil and gas pipelines from Eastern Siberia may decrease the availability of resources for the West and shift the economic center of gravity in Eurasia further East. In addition, Russia itself has become a more lucrative client for Central Asian and Caspian energy. One reason for building the BTC and the BTE to Turkey was that Russia was grossly underpaying for energy which it re-exported to Europe. Today,  the Russian gas monopoly Gazprom is paying a premium and boasts of pipeline overcapacity. So less gas is left for the Western-controlled pipelines. Despite the recession, Russia is moving with the Blue Stream and South Stream projects across the Black Sea to Turkey and Bulgaria in order to keep  market share. Gazprom is enhancing its influence in Ankara at the highest levels. Much-ignored, the role of Turkey in Eurasian energy transit is also crucial. Turkish intransigence has delayed and reduced in size the development of the Caspian off-shore  Shah Deniz gas project. Ankara has also placed daunting conditions of the construction of the proposed Nabucco gas pipeline from Turkey to Europe, which is meant to provide an alternative to Russian-controlled gas, linking the project with Turkey’s membership in the European Union, acquiring large amounts of Azeri gas for re-export and using the line for Russian and Iranian gas. Despite all these factors,  the United States and Europe should not lose sight of the strategic importance of Eurasian pipelines.   At stake is access to an energy treasure-trove worth up to $4 trillion, and giant fields elsewhere are approaching exhaustion. And the pipelines are  a critical source of revenue for the economic development of newly independent states in  Central Asia and the Caucasus. Ambassador Richard Morningstar, President Barack Obama’s new Eurasian energy czar, has the deck stacked against him. But he successfully promoted the Baku-Tbilisi-Ceyhan oil pipeline  in the 1990s, and may be able to pull it off again. The United States and Europe  should encourage Turkey to become a gas hub for the Caspian, and eventually Iraqi gas, by facilitating Nabucco’s construction. They should encourage a private energy company to become a strong private-sector champion for Nabucco. The West should also end its diplomatic neglect of  Turkmenistan and provide a strong commitment to build a Trans-Caspian gas pipeline to link up with BTE. The Obama administration should quickly appoint an  ambassador to  Turkmenistan  —  the position is vacant for over two years  —  and an invitation to the White House for  President Gurbanguly Berdymukhammedov may be in order. The United States and the Europeans should not miss the  opportunity to receive affordable Caspian energy and support the independence of critical post-Soviet states. Despite the economic slump, it is worth taking the chance now, before Russia and China lock the Caspian countries in the  Sino-Russian “co-prosperity zone.”

• What to expect from Powell’s first Fed meeting. • Trump, tariffs and the G20. • Pressure continues to mount on Facebook. • Facebook had a terrible day. • So did Uber. • Leaders at the G-20 summit are still trying to avert a trade war. Federal Reserve policymakers conclude their March rate-setting meeting on Wednesday. It is the first such session with Jerome H. Powell as the central bank’s new chairman. With the job market tight and inflation picking up only gradually, the Fed is widely expected to raise rates by a quarter of a percentage point in what is likely to be the first of three rate increases this year. After the meeting, Mr. Powell will hold his first news conference in his new role, where observers will be listening closely for any suggestion that the Fed might depart from its anticipated path, and, if so, why. Here’s a look at what economists and money managers are expecting: “Public remarks by Fed officials suggest a broad shift in the committee’s outlook towards a potentially faster pace of tightening, and we expect the median dot to show four hikes in 2018, up from three at the December meeting. Additional hawkish changes—a move to three hikes in 2019 or an increase in the longer-run funds rate estimates—are also possible but not our base case.” ,  : Ms. Meyer says she expects the Fed raise rates this meeting, but “unlike December where there were two dissents, we expect this decision to be unanimous given the shift in voters this year in the hawkish direction. The focus will be on the evolution of the dots: we look for the median to hold at three hikes for this year, but to shift up from two to three hikes in 2019. We also think the long-run dot will edge up to 2.875%. This would show a Fed that is more confident about its ability to deliver rate hikes, but without an urgency to front-load the tightening.” ,  : Mr. Powell “is bound to be faced with questions along the lines of “Why are you not raising the dots in the wake of the substantial, unfunded fiscal easing?”. His reply, we suspect, will be something like: “It’s not our job to tell Congress how to conduct fiscal policy, and it’s too soon to assess the impact of the tax cuts and spending increases. Much of the easing of policy could be saved rather than spent, and there are encouraging signs that productivity is picking up, so any upturn in wage growth as a result of fiscal loosening need not necessarily generate higher inflation. In any event, with inflation well below target, gradual normalization is the best way to balance the risks of both future inflation and the premature ending of the cycle via excessive tightening.”    “The bulk of the interest in this week’s F.O.M.C. meeting will come from the updated dot and economic projections as well as any meaningful tweaks to the key elements of the F.O.M.C. statement. Any changes to the dots and statement language are likely to be in the hawkish direction, though I would expect that the new information will be more evolutionary than a radically different.”  There is “a very strong case for not only raising rates this week, but potentially doing so in a more aggressive manner than previously forecasted at the end of 2017. I think we could see projections get updated to call for four hikes instead of three, with plans for lifting rates more in coming years as well.”   : “Whether we have 3 or 4 rate hikes this year shouldn’t be that big of a difference to the economy, but it WILL have a big impact on market prices and market psychology. Every statement – whether spoken or written – will be highly scrutinized looking for clues as to whether the Fed Funds rate will be 1% higher (or only 75 bps) a year from now.” President Trump’s plan to hit countries around the world with   has dominated a gathering of world economic leaders amid fears that the United States is on the cusp of starting an international trade war. On Monday, Steven Mnuchin, the United States Treasury secretary, was peppered with requests from several countries for exemptions from the tariffs, which are being imposed in the name of national security. In an interview on the sidelines of the meeting, Mr. Mnuchin suggested exemptions to the tariffs could be announced “relatively quickly.” Mr. Mnuchin said: Mr. Trump has already said he would exempt Canada and Mexico from the tariffs upon a successful renegotiation of the North American Free Trade Agreement, and he has indicated that other countries could also get exemptions. But the United States has yet to detail exactly what would qualify a country for an exemption, other than a vague reference to protecting the United States’ national security and reducing bilateral trade deficits. Countries including France, Argentina and South Korea pressed Mr. Mnuchin on Monday about being freed from the metals tariffs, arguing that, as United States allies,  . Mr. Mnuchin said that decisions were being made on a case-by-case basis and that there was not a one-size-fits-all approach to deciding which countries would be exempt. The tariffs go into effect on Friday. The Federal Trade Commission has opened an investigation into whether Facebook violated an agreement with the agency on data privacy,  . The probe comes after reports that information on 50 million users was improperly obtained by the political consulting firm Cambridge Analytica, according to a person with knowledge of the inquiry. The investigation, started in recent days,  against Facebook in the United States and in the United Kingdom about its handling of the data. Cambridge Analytica used the information to help President Trump’s presidential campaign profile voters during the 2016 election. The F.T.C. and Facebook reached a settlement in 2011 after the agency accused the company of deceiving customers “by telling them they could keep their information on Facebook private, and then repeatedly allowing it to be shared and made public,” according to a statement at the time. Facebook could face fines of thousands of dollars a day per violation if the commission finds Facebook violated terms of the settlement,  . Shares of Facebook are down 2.5 percent in early trading. Exhibit A: Its stock closed down nearly 7 percent,  . Exhibit B: Its chief security officer, Alex Stamos,   after disagreements about how much the company should share about misuse of its platform. (He favored disclosure.) The overall problem: Reports about how the data firm Cambridge Analytica improperly harvested information from 50 million Facebook users are highlighting just how much governments itch to regulate the tech giant. And Facebook’s previous laissez-faire attitude toward data collection by apps  , Kevin Roose writes in his latest column. Peter Eavis’s take: Mark Zuckerberg’s unusually powerful position at the company  :  An undercover investigation by Channel 4 News of Britain captured the firm’s C.E.O., Alexander Nix,   of a potential client’s political opponents with women and bribes. Britain’s information commissioner is   to examine the firm’s data. And Facebook has   to audit it. •   writes, “Ten years ago, Zuckerberg hired Sheryl Sandberg to help turn his start-up into a serious corporation. It may be time for more adult supervision.” •   writes, “This wasn’t informed consent. This was the exploitation of user data and user trust.” •   writes, “It would be a mistake to take the fiasco as a reason to keep treasure troves of information out of the hands of people who can provide immensely valuable services with it.” •   writes, “Facebook’s immense scale also has made it virtually impossible for alternatives to catch on. That, in turn, makes abuse of the platform more urgent for lawmakers.”  How to  . Oxford Analytica, an advisory group,  . And   for those steeped in the British university system: Uber has   in four cities after a car in self-driving mode struck and killed a woman in Tempe, Ariz. Until now, regulators had been increasingly open to testing: Just this month, California said it would start letting self-driving cars operate without anyone behind the wheel. Arizona  . The head of Carnegie Mellon’s self-driving car lab has urged a halt to testing, telling Axios, “ .” The White House   in a new round of sanctions. Morgan Stanley analysts said Bitcoin looked like the dot-com boom and bust,  . How Zug, Switzerland, became a  . And the Hong Kong and Australia stock exchanges are working to  . Shares of Oracle are down 9.3 percent this morning The reason? The   that its sales missed Wall Street expectations and its guidance disappointed after the close Monday. The lackluster results led analysts to downgrade the stock. Perhaps more concerning for investors was the slowdown in Oracle’s cloud-computing business last quarter. Here’s a look at Oracle’s slowing cloud computer growth  : • Fiscal fourth-quarter guidance: up 19 percent to 23 percent. • Fiscal third quarter: up 32 percent from a year ago. • Fiscal Second quarter: up 44 percent. • Fiscal first quarter: up 51 percent • Fiscal fourth quarter: up 58 percent • Larry Ellison and David Agus, who was Steve Jobs’s doctor, have unveiled a start-up, Sensei, that promises more nutritious food through hydroponic farming. ( ) • Europe’s plans to change how tech companies are taxed could exacerbate tensions with the U.S. ( ) • Amazon and Snapchat are  . (The big two are still expected to control   in 2018.) • Tech giants ask a lot of Wikipedia — see YouTube’s plans to use its text alongside controversial content — without always giving much back. ( ) • Amazon has reportedly considered buying Toys “R” Us stores, for the real estate. ( ) • The Israeli historian Yuval Noah Harari worries that tech will transform humanity for the worse within decades. ( ) Expect the White House to impose tariffs on   this week over what it says are unfair trade practices. But leaders at the G-20 summit meeting continued to push for free trade. More from Andrea Thomas and Paul Kiernan of  : And some critics say that Mr. Trump is missing the bigger picture, including the  . Lawmakers are still trying to finalize a $1.3 trillion spending bill ahead of Friday’s deadline. T hey disagree on   and  . • Gary Cohn as C.I.A. director? It was  . And the White House named Chris Liddell, the former Microsoft and G.M. executive, as  . • The White House added Joseph diGenova, a lawyer who argued the F.B.I. was out to get President Trump, to  . Mr. Trump has also mused about   another lawyer, Ty Cobb, and a third, John Dowd, has considered resigning. • Exploring why some Democrats voted for a Dodd-Frank rollback. ( ) • The dangers facing the continued boom. ( ) • The Kochs urged Mr. Trump to accept the Democrats’ compromise on immigration. ( ) • The race to find loopholes in the new tax law. ( ) • How that law may end up taxing sports teams’ player trades. ( )  shortly after his release from the Ritz-Carlton, where Saudi Arabia detained hundreds of businessmen in the name of an anti-corruption campaign. Mr. bin Talal wouldn’t comment on the deal for his release, but said that he has “forgiven and forgotten” the process, and continues to talk with Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman, the cousin who jailed him. More from the interview:    between Jared Kushner and the crown prince. Aramco looks increasingly likely to  , focusing on an I.P.O. on its home stock market, the WSJ says. And why the kingdom wants to  . Michael Ferro, who is also the media company’s biggest shareholder,   hours before Fortune published an article in which two women  . Neither worked for him, but both said they had been interacting with him professionally. Mr. Ferro declined to comment on the allegations. A recap of his tenure: Tribune became “Tronc.” Management opposed a newsroom unionization effort. The company sold its crown jewel, The L.A. Times, after controversies led to the replacement of senior executives.  The troubled film studio finally  . And   into how the Manhattan district attorney handled 2015 assault allegations against Harvey Weinstein. A loose coalition of Silicon Valley companies like Airbnb, Dropbox and Stitch Fix are   their ranks. Female employees at Nike   about improper conduct by male colleagues. And a former employee of the celebrity chef Mike Isabella  . • The Long-Term Stock Exchange and IEX took a step to spread new standards for I.P.O.s. ( ) • Boeing dropped its objection to Rockwell Collins’s sale to United Technologies. ( ) • Bloom Energy has reportedly restarted its I.P.O. planning. ( ) • Cheddar, the CNBC for the Snapchat generation, has raised $22 million from Raine Ventures, Liberty Global and the C.E.O. of the N.Y.S.E.’s parent company. ( ) • Greenhill & Company has hired   from Rothschild as vice chairman and co-head of its of North American financing advisory & restructuring. ( ) • Germany has named  , the co-head of Goldman Sachs’s operations in Germany and Austria, as its deputy finance minister. ( ) •  , the former U.S. attorney for New Jersey, has joined the law firm Arnold & Porter as a partner and the head of its crisis management practice. ( ) • The S.E.C.’s chairman pressed exchanges to end a standoff that has delayed a massive database of stock and options trading. ( ) • David Calhoun, a senior managing director at Blackstone, will give $20 million to Virginia Tech. ( ) • Larry Fink finally threw his lot in with the machines. Will BlackRock’s algorithms beat the fund managers? ( ) • The jewelry chain Claire’s has filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection. ( ) • A case being tried before a National Labor Relations Board court could upend McDonald’s franchise business model by letting unions deal directly with the parent company — if it gets to a verdict. ( ) • A court fight in London between two Russian billionaires is testing the Kremlin’s patience. ( ) • Federal prosecutors are investigating the fast-growing business of cash advances to plaintiffs in personal injury and other lawsuits, according to five lawyers. ( ) • British and E.U. negotiators agreed on the terms of a 21-month transition period to keep Britain inside Europe’s economic structures. It depends on a broader agreement on Britain’s withdrawal, which is by no means certain. ( ) • White boys who grow up rich are likely to remain that way. That’s not the case for black boys. ( )


Michael Novogratz, the former Fortress executive,   and said Bitcoin will fall to $8,000. Mr. Novogratz’s Galaxy Digital Assets Fund was due to start on Dec. 15. Bitcoin has fallen more than 40 percent the past four days. It hit a low of $10,776 Friday, down from $19,511 on Monday. The digital currency has since rebounded from its low and was recently at $13,268.  that Federal prosecutors in Brooklyn have sought bank records about entities associated with the family company of Jared Kushner. T  is reporting that Bank of America is handing out $1,000 bonuses to about 145,000 employees who earn up to $150,000. President Trump  . Since Wednesday when the bill passed Congress, a growing list of companies have announced plans to pass some of their tax windfall to employees. AT&T and Comcast both will pay a $1,000 bonus to most of their workers in the United States. Wells Fargo, PNC Financial and Fifth Third are raising their minimum wage to $15. Fifth Third will give $1,000 bonuses to 13,500 of its 18,000 workers, while PNC Financial will pay $1,000 bonuses to about 47,500 employees. Boeing said it will spend $300 million on employee training, workplace infrastructure, and corporate giving. Bitcoin is down more than 30 percent and is approaching $10,000. The biggest cryptocurrency traded at a high of $19,511 on Monday. The selling has spilled over to other digital currencies. Ethereum and litecoin are off more than 35 percent. Such tumbles are hardly unusual for bitcoin, which is still up more than 1,300 percent this year. But the decline has some asking if the top is in. Here are some comments from around the web:   : “Has the bubble finally popped? It’s hard to see the bell tolling just yet. We can easily see this market bounce back in very short order. Whilst there have been some hacks, public infighting in the mining community, lots of rumored forks and regulatory pressure building on some fronts, this is likely to be a simple bout of risk-off selling as investors rebalance towards year-end.”   : “The sharks are beginning to circle here, and the futures markets may give them a venue to strike. Bitcoin’s been heavily driven by retail investors, but there’ll be some aggressive funds looking for the right opportunity to hammer this thing lower.” ,  : “The vast majority of long term holders of bitcoin are still way in the money and have shown no sign of cashing out.” $19,511  $13,577 What Stephen Innes, the head of Asia-Pacific trading for Oannes, told Richard Frost and Eric Lam of  : Maybe like a host of companies   as having something to do with digital currency or blockchain technology. What gained a huge amount of attention yesterday, of course, was the beverage maker Long Island Iced Tea Corp. announcing that it was changing its name to Long Blockchain Corp. and pivoting to virtual money. (It will still maintain a beverage division, of course.) What happened was predictable: But maybe we’re not at a top. Shane Chanel, a wealth adviser at ASR Wealth Advisers, told CNN Money that investors may just pile into other digital currencies, adding, “I feel the cryptocurrency madness  .” The firm is  , according to Bloomberg. The firm already clears Bitcoin futures, one of the few banks on Wall Street to do so. Speaking of a Wall Street firm getting into Bitcoin,   late last month? Michel Temer, the president of Brazil,   the sale of a controlling stake in aircraft maker Embraer. Boeing and Embraer said Thursday that they are discussing potential business combinations after  . A deal that gave Boeing control of Embraer, a crown jewel of Brazilian industry, would need government approval.  The companies now have until June 21 to complete their $85.4 billion transaction, according to  . They pushed the deadline back after   for the Justice Department’s lawsuit to block the deal. The court hearings will begin on March 19, which wouldn’t give the two enough time to complete their transaction before the previous deadline of April 22. Who didn’t see this coming? From  : Expect a lot more fighting between now and March 6, when Qualcomm is scheduled to hold its annual shareholder meeting. Eric Schmidt was more than the adult in the room during the early days of Google. He was the technology giant’s person in Washington, Brussels and Beijing. But does his departure as executive chairman next month mean that his services are no longer vital? It comes as Alphabet, now Google’s parent company, and other tech giants need friends in political capitals around the world — and Mr. Schmidt’s connections to previous administrations like the Obama White House may not be as useful. From Dai Wakabayashi, Katie Benner and Claire Miller of  : There was no mention in Google’s announcement about why Mr. Schmidt left. But one issue that has hung in the air is the executive’s well-known personal life — including the bringing of girlfriends to corporate events, the World Economic Forum in Davos and other occasions.  on how the hiring of Marcy Simon, a marketing expert who was in a relationship with Mr. Schmidt, at the company’s Android division caused some consternation in the unit. • Shira Ovide writes, “Google isn’t in desperate need of more adults. But the rest of the technology industry might be.” ( ) • Jennifer Saba writes, “Hiring a strong, independent chairwoman would reflect well on co-founders and controlling shareholders Larry Page and Sergey Brin in more ways than one.” ( ) Or, put another way, government funding has been extended until Jan. 19. The deadline was today. Yesterday’s votes in Congress to prevent a shutdown prevented Republicans from suffering an embarrassment so soon after passing their tax overhaul. But   when they return to Washington next month: • What to do about the young immigrants known as Dreamers • Long-term funding for the Children’s Health Insurance Program beyond March • The future of the warrantless wiretap program run by the N.S.A. and the F.B.I. • Conservative groups plan to spend millions on advertising extolling what they view as the benefits of the Republican tax cuts to a deeply skeptical public. ( ,  ) • Republicans are scrambling to address political weaknesses ahead the 2018 midterm elections — and that led to a loud dispute at the White House this week. ( ,  ) • A federal judge dismissed a lawsuit accusing President Trump of violating the Constitution by continuing to own and profit from his business empire, arguing that the plaintiffs didn’t have legal standing. ( ) • The bonuses that AT&T is paying employees because of the tax bill appear auspiciously timed: Under the current tax code, they amount to a $70 million deduction for the expense, while the deduction would be $42 million under the new tax rates. ( ) • Ford’s C.E.O., Jim Hackett, publicly apologized for nearly three decades’ worth of harassment by employees at two Chicago plants, an issue that was the subject of a recent NYT investigation. ( ) • Six symphonies have cut ties to the famed classical music conductor Charles Dutoit after four women accused him of sexual assault. ( ) • Major League Baseball had pushed out Bob Bowman, the longtime head of the league’s former digital platform, after knowing about accusations of dating subordinates and shoving and verbally abusing colleagues. ( ) Sure, the iPhone maker’s shares have jumped this year, pushing its market value into uncharted territory above $900 billion. How long can the tech giant continue to breathe that rarefied air? Courtesy of Jeff Sommer and Karl Russell of  : When adjusted for inflation, Apple’s market capitalization just recently surpassed Microsoft’s record high. At the heights of the dot-com bubble in 1999, Microsoft’s market capitalization peaked at $647 billion. • Apple’s share of the total stock market doesn’t even rank in the top 20, going back to 1925.  that the iPhone X is helping stanch the flow of customers defecting from Apple to makers of cheaper smartphones. In a research note, the bank said that Apple has a 57 percent retention rate among iPhone users when they upgrade. That’s 20 percentage points higher than any other brand in China. Why is the country important to Apple? It accounted for nearly 20 percent of iPhone sales last quarter — and the iPhone accounts for more than 55 percent of Apple’s sales during that time. Yes, Apple is   of older iPhones. No, it’s not meant to force customers into  , it says. • Facebook signed a deal with Universal Music Group that lets its platforms carry songs from the music label’s artists, settling a long-running dispute. ( ) • Qualcomm has gotten a permit to test self-driving cars on public roads in California. ( ) • We knew Furbys were trouble: The latest model, as well as other toys, could be vulnerable to hackers and identity thieves. ( ) • Boeing is seeking to buy the Brazilian aircraft maker Embraer to try to gain a bigger foothold in the regional jet market — but is awaiting the blessing of Brazil’s government. Separately, a former Embraer executive pleaded guilty to U.S. charges of bribing a Saudi Aramco official to secure a sale. ( ,  ) • Liberty Global agreed to sell its Austrian unit to Deutsche Telekom for 1.9 billion euros, or $2.25 billion, potentially helping set up a bigger deal with Vodafone down the road. ( ,  ) • Roche agreed to buy Ignyta, a maker of an experimental cancer treatment, for $1.7 billion. ( ) • Royal Dutch Shell has agreed to buy First Utility, a British-based electricity provider, for an undisclosed amount to expand its non-oil business. ( ) • Mark Ein, a Washington-based investor, said that he would buy the Washington City Paper after its current owner put the independent newspaper up for sale. ( ) It did so by completing transactions with the controversy-ridden Malaysian government investment fund that have now gotten the attention of the Swiss financial regulator Finma. The Swiss agency will install a person inside the bank to  , “given the inadequacy of the bank’s controls.” JPMorgan said that the activity had taken place years ago, and that the firm has since improved its staff training and surveillance operations.  Finma said it had referred to case to the U.S. Office of the Comptroller of the Currency. U.S. lawmakers are calling for increased scrutiny of the Chinese conglomerate from the Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States, or Cfius,  . The Treasury Department, the Justice Department and the Defense Department have endorsed a bill that would make it easier for Cfius to reinvestigate past foreign deals. The conglomerate   in Postal Savings Bank of China to borrow money as concerns about its debt load have started to weigh on its finances. And it still does not have approval to buy a controlling stake in SkyBridge Capital, Anthony Scaramucci’s investment firm. • John Schnatter, who blamed the N.F.L.’s handling of the national anthem controversy for Papa’s John’s declining sales, will step down as chief executive. ( ) • Vince McMahon, the chairman and chief executive of World Wrestling Entertainment, filed details with the S.E.C. of a sale of $100 million of shares to fund an exploration of opportunities in other sports, including football. ( ) • MetLife hired a law firm to investigate how it failed find and pay pension benefits to thousands of people. It said it would hire a specialty firm to locate these people. ( ) • AC Milan, the city’s oldest football club, is struggling to find investors willing to refinance its more than $300 million in high-interest loans from Elliott Management. ( ) • Timing is of the essence when making stock donations, as Michael Milken, the former junk-bond financier knows after two gifts to charity just before the shares plunged in value. ( ) • The online gambling company, GVC, will buy the British bookmaker Ladbrokes Coral in a deal worth as much as 4 billion pounds, or nearly $5.4 billion. ( ) • UBS has to pay $903,300 to one of its former senior strategists who accused it of illegally firing him for blowing the whistle on attempts by commercial mortgage-backed securities traders to influence his independent research reports. ( ) • More American universities than ever are sitting on endowments worth at least $1 billion, helped by heavy investments in stocks. ( )
• Jerome Powell won the support of 85 senators. • Three big companies announced their tax-related employee and philanthropic initatives. • Mick Mulvaney tells staff at the C.F.P.B. that there will be no more envelope-pushing. • Airbnb’s C.E.O. and C.F.O. have disagreements on strategy. • White Collar Watch takes a look at the KPMG case. In garnering 85 votes, he enjoyed the broadest margin of approval of any nominee by the Trump administration for office that required Senate approval. Per The Hill, here are some of the lawmakers who  : Mr. Powell is expected to largely continue the policies of his predecessor, Janet Yellen, whose term expires on Feb. 3. Martin Goodfriend, who is a nominee to join the Fed’s board of governors. Mr. Goodfriend had a   after the 2008 financial crisis that government intervention would spur high inflation — which never came. Per  : • More than 125,000 employees will receive a  • The company will spend   to cover hourly employees’ tuition costs for education or vocational training, including for courses unrelated to their current jobs The total is   this fiscal year.  Disney C.E.O. Bob Iger is a Democrat who had previously weighed running for president. He didn’t explicitly link his company’s move to the tax bill, but it’s hard not to read the initatives that way.  as part of the telecom giant’s fourth-quarter earnings rollout (emphasis added): The company said that it expects to reap an additional $3.5 billion to $4 billion in operating cash flow from the tax code change. Here’s what the bank, whose C.E.O. has been   of the tax overhaul,  : • Raising wages by about 10 percent on average, to  , and improving benefits • Expanding branches, at a time when other banks are scaling back • Raising philanthropic giving  , to $1.75 billion, over five years • Increasing lending to small businesses by  • Improving lending to low- to -moderate-income communities and to affordable housing projects All that will cost an estimated  . •   minimum hourly wage to $11, from $9; handing out bonuses; and improving parental benefits. The wage rise and bonuses will cost about  . •   $1,000 bonuses to more than 200,000 employees and increasing capital spending by $1 billion. That’s somewhere north of  . •   about   to corporate giving, “training and education” for its employees and “workplace of the future” initiatives. Arguably the wage raises have as much to do with tight labor markets and the desire of companies to keep existing employees or attract new ones as they do with the tax code change.  that Mr. Mulvaney, who is the acting chief (or one of two,  ) of the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, sent to the agency’s staffers today: And: Mr. Mulvaney, a longtime critic of the C.F.P.B., has been working to  , a longtime target of Republican ire. The home rental company’s C.E.O., Brian Chesky,   with his C.F.O., Laurence Tosi, according to an article in The Information. In one instance, Mr. Chesky thought about starting an airline as Airbnb weighed a move into the air travel business. Mr. Tosi insisted on a lower-key approach of partnering with an existing app, according to the news site.  Mr. Tosi was brought in from Blackstone to help professionalize one of Silicon Valley’s biggest unicorn darlings, much as Ruth Porat joined Alphabet from Morgan Stanley. That was more than likely to foster a clash between Silicon Valley idealism and Wall Street pragmatism. More from Cory Weinberg of The Information:  Airbnb is expected to pursue an I.P.O. as soon as next year. Which vision for the company will win out?  against five former employees of KPMG and a former government accountant show the lengths an accounting firm will go to get a good report from the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board.  is a bit odd, though, because the defendants are accused of defrauding both the S.E.C. and the accounting board. They used confidential information to help deal with potential problems in KPMG’s audits. But did getting a sneak peek at how they would be evaluated constitute theft, or just a form of cheating? Fraud is a type of larceny, and normally the perpetrator obtains something from the victim, who suffers a loss. But in this case, the scheme was to help KPMG clean up its act to get a better grade in pending reviews. In the world of white-collar crime, most fraud prosecutions involve at least some form of tangible gain to the defendants, and not a better report card. Courts have also required prosecutors to show there was at least some harm to the victim from the misuse of their property. One way around this issue would be to charge a breach of  , but that’s not in the indictment. Nor did the Justice Department charged them under  . The S.E.C. did not accuse the accountants of securities fraud, only that they engaged in unethical or improper professional conduct. , the co-director of the S.E.C.’s enforcement division, said that the defendants were “literally stealing the exam.” I’m not sure that’s quite accurate, however, as it was more like learning when the teacher would give a pop quiz. Is that a fraud? At Twitter, Mr. Noto — former Goldman Sachs banker, former N.F.L. finance chief — was the highest-ranking full-time employee. (Jack Dorsey splits his time with Square, remember.) Now he will finally   He’ll have  . The social media network made clear that it has  : Mr. Dorsey offered his own statement on Mr. Noto’s departure: He’ll earn billions of dollars for leading Tesla over the next decade — or nothing. That’s under   that Andrew reported first today. Critics, and there are many, may regard it as yet another publicity stunt by the electric car marker, which has struggled to meet production targets for its Model 3. But Mr. Musk and the head of the Tesla board’s compensation committee said the arrangement would benefit shareholders, since it’s directly linked to company performance. Here’s what Mr. Musk told Andrew: California law requires that Tesla pay Mr. Musk minimum wage, even though he doesn’t want a salary. So it cuts him a check for a little over $37,000 each year, which he never cashes. Here’s what movers and shakers are saying in the Swiss Alps: Dara Khosrowshahi on  : Marc Benioff of Salesforce on why trust has to be   (something he says isn’t always true in Silicon Valley): Michael Corbat of Citigroup on   that has descended upon the global economy: John Studzinski, a Blackstone vice chairman, on  : • Did Emmanuel Macron persuade President Trump to attend? ( ) • PWC’s latest survey of C.E.O.s survey shows record confidence — but also worries about terrorism, climate change and global politics. ( ) • Edelman’s newest trust barometer shows suspicion of public institutions rising fast among Americans — and the opposite in China. ( ) A year ago, the online art auctioneer found itself suddenly on its own, after its merger partner of just under a year filed for bankruptcy. Now the company, best known for selling a Wu Tang Clan album to Martin Shkreli, has struck a new deal.  to The Native, a Swiss tech and ecommerce company, Michael is the first to report. That partnership will help it incorporate blockchain into its services as it seeks to expand into the wider luxury market. (And The Native has the option to buy a majority stake.) “This is a way for us to show we can better align with a new generation of collectors,” Alexander Gilkes, a founder of Paddle8, told Michael. • UBS’s chairman, Axel Weber, warned that Bitcoin is speculative and is not advising clients to invest in it. ( ) • South Korea will ban the use of anonymous bank accounts in virtual currency trading, hoping to clamp down on crimes like money laundering. ( ) • The I.R.S. has similar concerns. ( ) • Investors are desperate to buy into Coinbase, but shareholders aren’t allowed to sell. ( ) • Alphaville parsed recent comments by the S.E.C.’s chief, Jay Clayton, about initial coin offerings. ( ) • Adding “blockchain” to your company’s name still pays off. ( ) Congress   after a three-day impasse. But the fate of the young immigrants known as Dreamers remains unclear. Moderate lawmakers prevailed after a bipartisan meeting that involved a  . Many liberal activists  . : $31 billion in tax cuts, including a temporary delay for three health care taxes. • Read a draft of the White House’s infrastructure plan, including the lack of a higher gas tax. ( ) • The F.B.I. director, Christopher Wray, threatened to resign if Attorney General Jeff Sessions removed his deputy Andrew McCabe, according to unnamed sources. ( ) • The White House’s message for 2018: It’s all about the economy. ( ) • The Trump administration’s energy agenda faces a tougher year. ( ) • Montana became the first state to roll out net neutrality rules after the F.C.C.’s were repealed. ( )  the White House imposed yesterday on imported washing machines and solar energy components appear aimed at countries like China and South Korea. They may respond in kind, as well as by appealing to the W.T.O. Meanwhile, shares in affected companies  . “Investors are not too worried about the news, because these sectors have already discounted possible tariff moves by Trump,” Linus Yip, the chief strategist at First Shanghai Securities, told Bloomberg. Mike Bloomberg, however,  . Britain’s Competition and Markets Authority said in a provisional ruling that 21st Century Fox’s offer was “ .” So where does that leave Rupert Murdoch’s quest for control? Fox said that it still expects to win over the regulator before its final ruling in June. Sky is looking on the bright side, saying the authority suggested potential remedies. (Those included   or protecting it from Murdochian influence.) Mr. Murdoch argued that Facebook and Google should   similar to the carriage payments that cable companies pay to channel operators. (Sky has  .) • Another stellar earnings report from Netflix lifted its stock price, at least in after-hours trading. ( ) • Kevin Roose’s modest proposal for fixing Facebook: Make it more like Instagram. ( ) • How Facebook reckoned with election fallout f and, overall, a not-so-great year. ( ) • Big tech companies set a record for spending on lobbying last year. ( ) • Scott Galloway, a widely followed N.Y.U. professor of marketing, argues that the big four tech companies should be broken up. ( ) • Bacardi will buy the 75 percent of Patron that it doesn’t already own, valuing the tequila maker at $5.1 billion. ( ) • The governor of Puerto Rico said it would sell its highly indebted power company. ( ) • Elliott Management and Bluescape are part of a consortium that has invested $2.5 billion in FirstEnergy, and could end up owning at least 16 percent of the troubled utility company. ( ) • A.I.G. agreed to buy Validus Holdings for $5.56 billion, signaling a return to expansion. ( ) • Dalian Wanda has hired Citigroup, CLSA and UBS to underwrite the I.P.O. of its sports business, according to unnamed sources. ( ) • Dan Loeb’s Third Point has pressed Nestlé to consider selling more brands — and keeping its L’Oréal stake. ( ) • Alexion Pharmaceuticals said it had added Deborah Dunsire, a medical doctor and former C.E.O. of Millennium Pharmaceuticals, to its board, with the consent of Elliott. ( ) • Cerberus Capital Management’s founder,  , is the White House’s top pick to lead Mr. Trump’s Intelligence Advisory Board, according to unnamed sources. ( ) • K.K.R. is opening a new office in Frankfurt, to be led by  , who worked on the proposed acquisition of Unilever’s spread business. ( ) • Six weeks after firing Harold E. Ford Jr. for misconduct, Morgan Stanley clarified that the misbehavior was not sexual. ( ) • Bill Ackman is cutting almost a fifth of staff at Pershing Square and seeking less of a public profile after three years of losses, according to people familiar with the move. ( ) • China is considering adopting a property tax that could reshape and perhaps even destabilize its economy. ( ) • Ando, a meal-delivery enterprise started by the chef David Chang, will be absorbed by Uber Eats. ( ) • The buyout industry is on a tear, but there are alarming signs that the boom could turn to bust. Buyout firms went out of business after a period of similar frenzied activity a decade ago. ( ) • The level of capital being injected into start-ups in China has raised concerns that it is the quantity of money available, rather than the quality of the investments, that will determine the outcomes. ( ) • The owner of an oil refinery rescued from the brink of closure by Carlyle in 2012 has filed for bankruptcy protection to restructure its debts. ( ) • Some of what’s at stake in Nafta negotiations: bacon, jeans and beer. ( ) • To effectively combat misuse of shell companies, the U.S. would need a detailed registry of their owners. The cost of that might be the greatest impediment to real change in how assets can be hidden, writes the White Collar Watch columnist. ( ) • Five former employees of KPMG and a former government accountant have been charged by federal prosecutors with plotting to help the firm get a leg up in a regulatory review of its auditing. ( )
continued against a rebel-held suburb of Damascus where more than 500 civilians have been killed in the past week. There were  , despite a U.N. Security Council resolution on Saturday that called for a 30-day cease-fire. Our correspondents examined two phenomena in the regional turmoil: a Russian effort to   from territory held by the crumbling Islamic State, and   that’s swelling in Kurdish-controlled areas. Separately in Prague, the Czech police  . Turkey is   his extradition. _____ President Xi Jinping’s efforts to  , raised fresh fears of a resurgence of strongman politics and of a new era of hostility and repression. For decades, the prevailing belief was engagement with China would make China more like the West. Instead,  , China appears to have gone in the opposite direction. Predictably, government censors rushed to block criticism of the decision. _____    questions are swirling over whether and when President Trump might answer questions from Robert Mueller, the special counsel. His investigation seems to be racing toward an as-yet-undefined goal,  . New charges accused Paul Manafort, the former Trump campaign chairman, of  , nicknamed the Hapsburg Group, to lobby for the pro-Russian government that then controlled Ukraine. (The politicians were not named, but the focus quickly turned on four former statesmen.  .) _____ the anti-establishment Five Star Movement is leading in polls in part because of its promise to stand apart from the political elite it considers discredited. But some scandals, including the inflated résumé of Alessia D’Alessandro, above, a candidate in the southern region of Campania, drew criticism that the party was,  . On the political fringes, the violent nationalism that fueled Benito Mussolini’s rise   with force. Politically inspired violence, including by anti-fascist activists, has become an almost daily occurrence. _____  wrapped up in Pyeongchang, South Korea, with a rousing closing ceremony that included  . These Games are likely to be most remembered for the scandal over Russian doping and for the   — an extraordinary diplomatic moment that raised the possibility of renewed international talks with the North. Our colleagues at the Games  , reminders that such competitions can bring out the best of the human spirit. Here’s the  . (Norwegians fretted that their medals record  .)  were meant to be great equalizers. Instead, women are finding that  .  said that  . The film studio has been struggling in the wake of sexual misconduct allegations against its co-owner.  is   for help in diversifying its oil-dependent economy. At stake is the future of the Saudi welfare state. the Chinese businessman who owns the Geely automotive group, has amassed a  , the German maker of Mercedes-Benz cars and trucks. unveiled its   at the GSMA World Congress in Barcelona. (It features an upgraded camera.)  of   and a   this week. French officials are screening migrants before they take a perilous trip across the Mediterranean. A few get a plane ticket. For everyone else, the message is: Stay home. [ ]  shooting survivors are increasingly pushing for gun control as a growing number of businesses are  , the country’s chief gun lobby. [ ]    Prime Minister Theresa May and Jeremy Corbyn, the leader of the opposition Labour Party, will outline this week their visions for economic ties with the E.U. after Brexit. Mr. Corbyn is expected to endorse a customs union. [ ] Fidesz, unexpectedly lost a local government by-election, raising slim hopes for the opposition six weeks before a parliamentary election. [ ] Russia’s divided opposition groups united to mourn the third anniversary of the death of Boris Nemtsov, the outspoken Kremlin critic who was killed in 2015. [ ]  quadrupled in Europe last year, and at least 35 children died of the highly infectious disease amid persisting anti-vaccine movements. [ ] is descending on Europe this week. Expect some of the coldest temperatures in years in affected areas. [ ]  Here are   if you don’t know the language.   .    of  .    Out of the 57 restaurants newly honored in France’s latest Guide Michelin,  , raising calls for a reckoning.  Bollywood’s first female superstar,  . She was one of the few actresses in India whoheadlined films without a man in a leading role. “Touch Me Not” unexpectedly  . It had not been considered a front-runner, partly because of the frankness of some of its sex scenes.  Manchester United beat Chelsea,   whether financial strength was all a club needed to satisfy fans in the YouTube age.  your fellow readers’ answers to the question,   (Even some of our journalists piled in.) “Was it really that bad?” That’s what Arthur Bicknell asked years after his play, a mystery-farce called “Moose Murders,” opened and closed on the same night this month in 1983 — setting a punishing new standard for Broadway flops. “The simple answer,” he  , “is yes.”  were brutal. Brendan Gill of The New Yorker said it “would insult the intelligence of an audience consisting entirely of amoebas.” Dennis Cunningham of CBS advised, “If your name is Arthur Bicknell, change it.” (In one account, a woman leaving the theater shouted to a police officer, “Arrest this play!”) Here’s the   by Frank Rich, who years later would call it “the worst play I’ve ever seen on a Broadway stage.” In the years since its ill-fated Feb. 22 debut, “Moose Murders” has gained notoriety, if not respect. In 2011, Mr. Bicknell published “ : How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love My Broadway Bomb.”) In fact, there have been “revivals” of “Moose Murders” around the world — and at least one comical twist. In 2007, the Repertory Philippines misidentified the author of the play in its posters and playbills around Manila. Instead of  .
SAN FRANCISCO — Joe Buttram, a former mixed martial arts fighter and start-up security guard turned cryptocurrency investor, was looking at a new toy called a CryptoKitty. “You can see he wants to sire,” Mr. Buttram, 27, said. For about 20 of the cryptocurrency called ether ($14,000 at the time), the cartoon cat would “mate” with one of Mr. Buttram’s, and he would get a new CryptoKitty. That kitty could inherit its father’s desirable eyes (traits include thicccbrowz) or fur pattern (like totesbasic). Let’s back up. Every new technology gets a game that helps bring it careening into the mainstream. Social networks had FarmVille. Mobile phones had Angry Birds. And, its investors hope,  . Blockchain technology like Bitcoin and Ethereum, ledgers for recording virtual currency transactions, is booming, and CryptoKitties is the first big blockchain game. As they did with baseball cards, people collect CryptoKitties, but these cards can breed. The Ethereum network, whose currency is called ether, is valued at about $70 billion, but not many of the investors really know what their ether can be used to do. And now here’s one thing you can do with it: Ether is the only currency that exists in the CryptoKitties world. Since CryptoKitties was introduced a month ago, 180,000 people have signed up. They’ve spent about $20 million in ether, and more than 10 kitties have sold for over $100,000. Based in Vancouver, British Columbia, CryptoKitties is now a team of 18. Next the company is starting social games like kitty beauty contests and expanding into other “blockchain collectibles.” “We’re just like, man, people want cats,” said the   co-founder Mack Flavelle, who works for AxiomZen product design studio. “We thought it would build slowly, take a few months, but it’s been so fast.” A few years ago, investors talked about cryptocurrencies becoming a mainstream currency, so you would one day buy coffee with your ether. But high transaction fees, slow processing and wildly fluctuating prices make it a tricky replacement for cash. So what to do with $73 billion of digital money? “There’s nothing to do with it, so hey, for a couple bucks now you can get a cat,” Mr. Flavelle said. “Nobody’s even pretending it’s going to be a transactional currency anymore. It’s a stored value.” Industry experts echo Mr. Flavelle’s conception of cryptocurrency as, well, not yet a currency and digital kittens as a pretty good use for it. One of those is Dan Romero, 30, the general manager of Coinbase, the main trading platform for cryptocurrencies. “In 2014, it was more corporate, everyone was just talking about using cryptocurrency for payments,” Mr. Romero said. No longer: “Now we’re all talking about CryptoKitties,” he said. “There’s been a resurgence of playing, and that’s a good sign.” Like Beanie Babies before them, CryptoKitties are collectibles. Each kitty has a core “DNA” on the blockchain, and the game is basically to mate them (the illustrators do not go deep into specifics) and see what kitty results. The progeny tend to have their parents’ traits (an expensive cat will have an expensive kitten) but might surprise or disappoint with more or less valuable traits than either of its parents. There’s a limited number of highly desirably first-generation kitties and four billion possible combinations of cats based on traits the on-staff artists have created (whisker aesthetic, background color, fur type). The company gets a 3.75 percent cut of the breeding and selling auctions. “And the other thing we have are fancy cats, which are hard to unlock, and if you get one of those, it’s fancy,” Mr. Flavelle said. What makes it fancy? “Fancy cat is a specific recipe,” he said. O.K. The activity helps make sense of the strange world of Ethereum, Mr. Flavelle said. "In our lizard brains we have fear of chaos,” he said. “Collecting allows you to bring order.” And the game does seem to be attracting a lot of people who are now willing to go through the byzantine process of getting a digital wallet and acquiring ether. When the company started, there were so many cat-based transactions, it slowed down the Ethereum network, upsetting regular traders. I’m not calling all blockchain people neckbeards,” Mr. Flavelle said. “But when these cartoon cats come through and sit on your network and break it, you’re not happy.” Where there’s $20 million changing hands, there will be brokers. And a new set is cropping up to help manage the market. At an Ethereum cocktail party in San Francisco one recent night, hosts projected CryptoKitties across the wall. Cassandra Shi, 27, quit her job as a product manager at the financial technology firm Enova three months ago, and is going into CryptoKitties, developing a new price evaluation tool. “I’m making a Kelley Blue Book to assess their real value,” Ms. Shi said. “There are a bunch of cattributes” — yes — “and you can do a machine learning model to assess, based on cattributes, how much each should be worth.” Ms. Shi, who lives in Oakland, sees the digital kittens as a way to get mainstream adoption of cryptocurrency beyond the mostly white and mostly male online communities that have been early adopters, she said, gesturing around the party. “A lot of people get into this from  ,” she said, referring to the Reddit group many investors cite as their main source of news. “Which is not a very inclusive community.” “I have three friends who bought ether just for CryptoKitties,” Ms. Shi said. “And those are people who wouldn’t have except the kitties are so adorable.”
• The heads of Citi and Goldman took home healthy pay raises last year. • Qualcomm didn’t categorically say no to Broadcom’s latest offer. • What financial regulation could look like post-Brexit. • Look who bet big on a pick-up in volatility...Peter Thiel. • R.I.P., BTFD? • Kraft Heinz is due for a big deal. • U.S. Bancorp’s big fine. The good times that returned to Wall Street after President Donald Trump got elected are now flowing into the pockets of the big banks’ C.E.Os: •   saw his compensation jump   last year, to  . •   enjoyed a smaller   rise, to  . • JPMorgan Chase’s Jamie Dimon, we already know, received a   increase, to  . • Bank of America’s Brian Moynihan, we also already know, enjoyed a   bump, to  . Let’s take Mr. Corbat. Citigroup’s stock rose 25 percent in 2017, a lot more than the 16 percent posted by the KBW Bank Index. Investors piled into bank stocks because of expectations of stronger economic growth, and also because they expected the Trump administration to loosen banking regulations. Citi’s underlying businesses improved last year. The bank also got through the Federal Reserve’s stress tests in 2017 without objections from the regulator, something it had struggled to do in previous years. The message from Citi’s board seems to be that, since the bank’s performance is now much closer to that of its peers, Mr. Corbat’s pay also needs to be in the vicinity of his counterparts on Wall Street. Citi may be doing better than in the past, but its return on equity, a metric that shows a bank’s return on its capital, was only 6.6 percent last year. Bank of America’s was 6.7 percent. Both are well below the 10 percent earned at JPMorgan. C.E.O.s’ compensation is made up of different types of pay: • Cash salaries and cash bonuses • Stock-based bonuses that are paid out over the coming years, and whose value is, to differing degrees, dependent on how the company performs in the future. The theory: The more performance-related pay, the more accountable the executive is. Investors should keep an eye on the amount of performance share units (P.S.U.s) that are included in a comp package, since these are usually the type of stock award that are most at risk of a decline in value if a bank underperforms by certain yardsticks. • Mr. Dimon’s pay appears most dependent on P.S.U.s. They made up   of his 2017 comp. Mr. Blankfein is close behind with  . • By contrast, Mr. Moynihan had   of his comp in P.S.U.s. Mr. Corbat had just  . Bank of America and Citi would likely assert that the rest of their stock-based awards are also somewhat dependent on the performance of the bank. But shareholders might be happier if all the stock bonus were in P.S.U.s. Median household income in the United States was just shy of $60,000 in 2016. After months of delays, the panel that reviews foreign takeovers of U.S. businesses has agreed to review Anthony Scaramucci’s deal to sell his stake in SkyBridge Capital to China’s HNA Group,  . • Mr. Scaramucci   to sell his investment firm to a subsidiary of HNA Group as he prepared to take a job in the Trump Administration. • The decision starts a maximum 75-day clock for the Committee on Foreign Investment in the U.S., or Cfius, to decide whether to approve or oppose the deal, Bloomberg reports. • Chinese investors have faced heightened scrutiny from Cfius. Since president Trump took office, a half a dozen Chinese deals have fallen apart because of concerns raised by CFIUS, Bloomberg reports. While  , Qualcomm decided after its Valentine’s Day meeting with its unwanted suitor, the chip maker left the door open for potential agreement. • Raising the breakup fee for antitrust reasons beyond $8 billion. That amount, which represents an already high 6.6 percent of the total deal price, still isn’t high enough for Qualcomm. “A breakup fee in the range proposed by Broadcom does not come close to compensating for those risks,” Paul Jacobs, Qualcomm’s chairman, writes in a letter to Broadcom’s chief, Hock Tan. • Make unspecified other commitments meant to assuage antitrust regulators. • Clarify what Broadcom’s intentions are for Qualcomm’s big licensing business. More from Mr. Jacobs’s letter: If the two sides can’t reach an agreement, then matters may come down to a vote on Qualcomm’s board on March 6. Remember that Broadcom is seeking six of 11 board seats, down from its initial target of unseating all directors. Broadcom has said that its second offer of $82 a share is “best and final.” Shares in Qualcomm were little changed, while those in Broadcom were down slightly. Elliott Advisors, which owns about 7.2 percent of NXP Semiconductors,   that Qualcomm should pay more than $110 a share for the smaller chip maker, especially in light of NXP’s recent quarterly earnings. Britain’s government is often criticized for not clearly communicating the type of deal it wants to strike with the European Union as it prepares to leave the bloc. But,  , Britain will soon lay out its post-Brexit vision for financial services, a huge earner for the country. The plan centers on Britain and the E.U. mutually recognizing each other’s financial regulations. Post-Brexit, Britain’s banks and financial firms would lose special rights that allow them to operate in any E.U. country with few restrictions. Britain could fall back on an arrangement that would allow British banks to do business in the E.U. if they operated under regulations that were equivalent to those in the bloc. But this arrangement has drawbacks. It does not cover important types of financial activities, and British banks may have to comply with any changes to regulation that the E.U. introduces. The scheme that Britain may now propose appears designed to address those problems. It would allow both sides leeway to strike their own rules once they’ve agreed on their main objectives. And it suggests that a monitoring regime and mechanism for resolving disputes be set up. The bloc may reject such a proposal because it would risk losing some control over financial regulation. Certain politicians in the E.U. may argue Britain is trying to retain the privileges of the single market while discarding the duties that come with it. Still, some of Europe’s leaders, banks and businesses may support the plan, in the belief that it will minimize disruption and allow the City of London to continue to play a big role in financing the strong economic expansion taking place in Europe. Peter Thiel. that the venture capitalist known for his investments in Facebook and PayPal had a $244 million bet at the end of 2017 tied to the C.B.O.E Volatility index, or VIX. Filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission show Thiel Macro, which invests Mr. Thiel’s fortune, held put options on 1.9 million shares of ProShares Short VIX Short-Term Futures as of Dec. 31. The investment is designed to pay off if the VIX rises. It’s unclear whether the fund had maintained those positions through last week. But if it had, he would have reaped a big windfall. Investors piled into bets that volatility would continue to decline last year. And those wagers paid off as the VIX spent 2017 trading at historically low levels. But volatility has picked up this year. After trading below 10 to start the year, the VIX spiked to above 37 during the selloff last week. It finished Friday at 19. Vice reports that virtual currencies are now becoming an issue in ...  : Off the top of our heads, we’d think that issues would include a) the reporting, or lack thereof, of holdings and b) the value of any digital money portfolios. It’s age-old wisdom. But as investors worry about inflation and central banks raising interest rates unexpectedly quickly,  ? More from Julie Edde, Bei Hu and Suzanne Woolley of Bloomberg: Another investor, Ian Harnett of Absolute Strategy Research, recommends “sell the rallies” instead. Historically, rising inflation hasn’t always meant sinking equity markets. But some people  . The market historian James Stack told Jim Stewart of the NYT that high valuations and years of low interest rates mean “we’re dealing with what might be the most interest rate-sensitive stock market in our lifetime.” Asian indexes rose only slightly, in part because of Lunar New Year celebrations. European stocks rose. S. & P. 500 futures are up strongly. That question’s sure to greet the company’s C.E.O., Bernardo Hees, during earnings discussions this morning. What’s curious is that he hinted at the topic during a pre-earnings presentation yesterday. “With our global presence and financial strength, I think that we’ll continue to generate opportunities for us to expand our portfolio,” he said,  . Why another deal? It’s what Kraft Heinz and its backers at 3G do best. Meanwhile, sales have been declining, and the company’s last big takeover attempt, at Unilever two years ago, fizzed quickly. • The S.E.C. blocked a Chinese company’s takeover of the Chicago Stock Exchange, in part because it couldn’t identify the owners. ( ) • The European Commission will examine whether Linde and Praxair’s $80 billion merger. ( ) • Roche has bought Flatiron Health, an electronic records company with a focus on cancer treatments, for $1.9 billion. ( ) • A lawsuit against CVS raises questions about what its proposed deal with Aetna might do to drug and services prices. ( ) • Standard Life Aberdeen’s loss of a big client has stoked fears about the £11 billion merger that created the giant asset manager. ( ) What had been regarded as one of the best-run regional banks has had to   to settle accusations that it wasn’t doing enough to stop money laundering. More from Emily Flitter of the NYT: The upside: U.S. Bancorp’s actions weren’t as bad as HSBC’s or Standard Charter’s. Dual-class stock structure of the sort that let Mark Zuckerberg and the Ford family control their companies  , according to the Democratic S.E.C. commissioner Robert Jackson Jr. Check out   into how Mick Mulvaney is loosening regulations on Wells Fargo, payday lenders and more at the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau. • The Senate   to protect Dreamers and a much harsher immigration bill backed by President Trump, leaving the fate of the young immigrants uncertain. That raised questions about Congress’s ability to  . • After another school shooting, Congress is   on gun regulation. Meanwhile, the White House’s budget proposal   for school counselors and violence reduction programs. • A second appeals court ruled against the Trump administration’s travel ban. ( ) • A former Trump campaign aide, Rick Gates, is close to a plea agreement with Robert Mueller, unnamed sources say. ( ) • The Trump inaugural committee paid $26 million to a firm set up not long beforehand by a friend of Melania Trump. ( ) Since its founding nearly five years ago, the men’s grooming company has become an competitor to Procter & Gamble’s Gillette. Now its founders want to create what they describe as a next-generation P. & G. , led by Alliance Consumer Growth and Temasek of Singapore, is meant to help it buy stakes in nascent consumer brands. Harry’s has already invested in Hims, which is focused on men’s hair loss prevention. But its founders want to go into products for women, babies and households. More from Michael’s article: : Cellularity, a biotech start-up focused on stem cells,   from Celgene, United Therapeutics and other investors. The goal: turning 100 into the new 60. • The U.S. joined Britain in formally blaming Russia for a huge cyberattack last June that was aimed at Ukraine — but crippled computers worldwide. ( ) • After the school shooting in Parkland, Fla., Russian bots began spreading pro-gun messages. ( ) • Instagram blocked access in Russia to posts referring to an opposition leader’s corruption accusations, as a censor had demanded. ( ) • Salesforce led Fortune’s list of the best companies to work for. ( ) • London  , including shorter shifts and more wheelchair-accessible vehicles. Uber is   to report “bad experiences.” • Evan Spiegel doesn’t regret taking Snap public. ( ) • How allegations of fraud and sexual harassment at Singularity University cost it Google’s support and raised questions about its mission. ( ) • Priceline wants to muscle in on Airbnb’s turf. ( ) Two industry groups will merge to create  , according to people involved in the negotiation. It’s the latest sign that the crackdown investors had feared isn’t happening. So expect  : Just under $10,000, according to  . A crypto miner in Brooklyn was   after causing reception problems for T-Mobile users. Coincheck is   whose assets it froze after a heist last month. •  , Uber’s head of growth, has left to become a general partner at Andreessen Horowitz. ( ) • NBC promoted   and   as co-presidents of scripted entertainment, replacing Jennifer Salke as she heads to Amazon. ( ) • IBM has sued Microsoft over its poaching of   as chief diversity officer, pointing to a noncompete clause in her contract. ( ) • A playboy model’s account of her claimed affair with Donald Trump features hotel-room meetings, payoffs and complex legal agreements. ( ) • SRS Investment Management is seeking to shake up the board at Avis Budget Group, where it’s the largest investor. ( ) • Children’s book publishing is facing a #MeToo moment, with complaints about prominent writers and editors. ( ) • Amazon Studios will continue to make “Transparent” without Jeffrey Tambor, who has been accused of sexual harassment. ( ) • Britain’s proposal for how financial services would operate after Brexit involves staying in line with E.U. rules but ceding authority to a dispute resolution mechanism. ( ) • The James Beard Foundation has advised the people who nominate and vote for winners of its award to consider whether they also possess “the values of respect, transparency, diversity, sustainability and equality.” ( ) • Cyril Ramaphosa, South Africa’s new president, faces a familiar challenge: making the economy into a source of progress for the masses. ( ) • Brian Niccol transformed Taco Bell’s fortunes. Can he do the same at Chipotle? ( ) • The corporate investigator Peter Humphrey gave an account of the nearly two years he spent in prison in China after being hired to look into a former GlaxoSmithKline executive there. ( )
Mike Hearn, a British computer programmer, holed up in his two-bedroom apartment in Zurich over several days and nights last week, writing a cri de coeur. Two years ago, Mr. Hearn quit a cushy programming job at Google’s Swiss headquarters to devote himself full time to what was his great passion: the virtual currency Bitcoin. He was one of a handful of developers around the world dedicated to maintaining the basic software that governs both the creation of new Bitcoins and the network on which the financial transactions take place. But a nasty fight has torn apart the small brotherhood of Bitcoin developers and raised questions about the survival of the virtual currency. Mr. Hearn, until recently one of the most prominent leaders of the Bitcoin project, became so disillusioned that in December he sold the few hundred Bitcoins he had left and quietly took a job at a new start-up. The impassioned   he was working on last week was an announcement that he was leaving Bitcoin behind entirely: “Bitcoin has gone from being a transparent and open community to one that is dominated by rampant censorship and attacks on bitcoiners by other bitcoiners.” The dispute — which grew out of a question about the number of transactions the Bitcoin network can handle — may sound like something of interest only to the most die-hard techies. But it has exposed fundamental differences about the basic aims of the Bitcoin project, and how online communities should be governed. The two camps have broadly painted each other as, on one side, populists who are focused on expanding Bitcoin’s commercial potential and, on the other side, elitists who are more concerned with protecting its status as a radical challenger to existing currencies. The divide has led over the last six months to death threats against Bitcoin developers and hacking attacks that have taken down Internet providers. The sense of betrayal is strong on both sides. One of Mr. Hearn’s primary antagonists, a bearded California-based programmer named Gregory Maxwell, also appears to have pulled back from his work on Bitcoin after receiving anonymous death threats. These internal struggles have surfaced at the same time that the Bitcoin technology is gaining credibility on Wall Street and in Silicon Valley. Throughout the various controversies that have plagued the virtual currency — including many instances of theft and fraud — the basic software has continued working as expected. That consistency has pushed the value of all outstanding Bitcoins above $6 billion and led many venture capitalists to imagine the technology as the future of finance, a cheaper and faster way to carry out financial transactions of all sorts. Part of the   has been its promise to provide a more reliable and trustworthy alternative to existing currencies and financial networks. Unlike the Federal Reserve and Wall Street, institutions that are managed by humans, Bitcoin was supposed to rest on the infallible logic of math and computer code. In this system, programmers like Mr. Hearn, who often volunteered their expertise and effort, were viewed as neutral technicians. The current dispute, though, is a reminder that the Bitcoin software — like all computer code — is an evolving product of the human mind, and its deployment is vulnerable to human frailties and divergent ideals. There may yet be a middle ground on the question that began the fight, but for the moment the sides are deadlocked, and that has left the Bitcoin software — and the virtual currency itself — in a state of limbo. Mr. Hearn is convinced that the stalemate will soon make it hard to complete even simple transactions and will eventually drive away users and lead to a price collapse. Mr. Hearn’s concerns about this impasse have been echoed, often in less strident tones, by a growing number of other developers, as well as by start-ups that buy, sell and hold Bitcoins. Gavin Andresen, a close collaborator of Mr. Hearn’s and one of the longest-standing contributors to the Bitcoin software, said the dispute was likely to cause disruptions in the short term, but   with the notion that it will damage Bitcoin’s long-term prospects. Other Bitcoin leaders have expressed a similar sentiment, and investors have been inclined to believe them: The price of a Bitcoin has actually risen in recent months, to about $430 this week. Some of Mr. Hearn’s allies in the battle are hoping the deadlock can be broken if the largest Bitcoin companies get behind something like  , a new version of the basic Bitcoin software that was announced this week, and that aims to expand the network’s capacity while also introducing new standards of governance. But Mr. Hearn is convinced it is already too late. During nighttime walks in the woods near his apartment in Zurich, he has been trying to figure out where Bitcoin went wrong and what it means for the idealistic beliefs that led him to the project in the first place. “It never occurred to me that the thing could just fall apart because of people getting crazy and having fundamental political disagreements over the goals of the project,” Mr. Hearn said in a Skype interview from his apartment. “It’s really shaken my faith in humanity.” Mr. Hearn, 31, grew up in Manchester, England, where he played music and went rock climbing in his free time. He was one of the first serious programmers to take an interest in Bitcoin, back in April 2009, just a few months after its mysterious founder, known as  , let it loose in the world. At the time, Mr. Hearn was working on mapping software at Google, a job he’d had since graduating from Durham University, in England. He had no professional involvement with finance or currencies, but the financial crisis convinced him that national currencies were vulnerable to politics and bad decision-making. When a web search led him to the primitive website for Bitcoin, he immediately emailed Satoshi, as the founder had become known. “So many questions,” Mr. Hearn wrote. “But it’s rare that I encounter truly revolutionary ideas.” Like many of the programmers who took an early interest, Mr. Hearn admired the rule-bound nature of the system. Only 21 million Bitcoins would ever be created. And the distribution of new Bitcoins was clearly laid out, relying on mathematical algorithms that left no room for human meddling. Satoshi had written the software containing these rules, but after it was released, anyone could see the code and make changes. The people downloading this open-source software essentially voted on which changes to accept based on which version of the software they chose to use. If Satoshi proposed changes that they didn’t like, they didn’t have to download and run it, and anyone could offer an alternative. Bitcoin, like many other open-source projects, was a sort of leaderless democracy — a new way of governing human behavior online. One computer, one vote, with anyone able to propose new laws. It took a while for Bitcoin to catch on, but by late 2010, when Mr. Hearn started contributing to the code, the currency had begun developing a passionate following. The apparently leaderless structure and seamless functioning of the software won Bitcoin renown among libertarians and anarchists, and soon enough, among entrepreneurs and venture capitalists, drawn to the transparent, mathematical foundations of the project. Mr. Hearn joined a small but growing group of volunteers who worked on the basic Bitcoin software from various corners of the globe — the most committed of whom became known as the core developers. They met in person only a handful of times, but they would chat constantly online and send emails discussing potential changes. The leader of this effort, after Satoshi bowed out in 2011 ( ), was Mr. Andresen, a genial father of two from central Massachusetts who kept everyone on the same page. Mr. Hearn was always a bit different from the rest of the core developers. Whereas most of them were classic techies, with patchy facial hair and ill-fitting clothes, the clean-cut Mr. Hearn had a taste for fashionable jeans and skateboard shoes — as well as an easy sociability. Within Google, Mr. Hearn became an informal spokesman for Bitcoin, answering queries from the Google co-founder Sergey Brin and leading an in-house email list discussion group that had attracted 400 employees by the time Mr. Hearn left. Mr. Hearn was also, along with Mr. Andresen, of a practical mind-set, most interested in improving the basic experience of holding and using Bitcoins. He was not given to making the big pronouncements common to the more ideological members of the community, about the currency displacing the dollar or euro. He was more focused on the immediate challenges that could trip it up. When tension cropped up among the developers, Mr. Andresen kept the peace by brokering compromises. The bonhomie began to fall apart last year because of what appeared to be a positive development: the continuing growth in the number of Bitcoin users and transactions. The problem was that, early on, Satoshi established a limit on the number of transactions that could be processed by the network every 10 minutes. The cap was meant to ensure that the computers supporting the network, and processing the transactions, would not be overwhelmed by an enormous quantity of data. But Satoshi had suggested that the limit should be temporary, and as the number of transactions coursing through the network inched closer to the cap, delays started to occur and transactions were not going through. When Mr. Hearn   for changes to the core Bitcoin software to allow for larger blocks of transaction data, he faced immediate resistance. Gregory Maxwell, a largely self-taught programmer who had worked on Wikipedia and the Mozilla web browser, both open-source projects, said that larger blocks of transaction data would be harder for ordinary computers to process. The result, Mr. Maxwell warned, would be to hand control over the network to big companies that could afford powerful computers. For Mr. Maxwell, slower transactions seemed to be a secondary issue to protecting Bitcoin from centralized sources of authority. “It’s far from clear to me that the world will get a second shot at this in the next several decades if Bitcoin lapses into the same-old, same-old,” he  . Mr. Hearn retorted that the technical issue wasn’t such a big deal; ordinary computers could mostly process the larger blocks of transaction data. More important, he argued, was that Bitcoin needed to succeed first as a cheaper, faster payment network, like PayPal or Visa. If Bitcoin wanted to ever compete with mainstream payment systems, which could process tens of thousands of transactions a second, it would have to do away with Bitcoin’s existing limit of fewer than seven transactions a second. The debate was complicated by the financial interests of the people involved. Mr. Maxwell and several of his supporters were then working for a Bitcoin start-up called Blockstream, with $21 million in funding from venture capitalists. Mr. Maxwell’s start-up was trying to make it possible to break off some transactions from the Bitcoin network, making the number of transactions the network could handle less important. After leaving Google, Mr. Hearn had begun taking a salary for his Bitcoin work from the venture capital firm Andreessen Horowitz, one of the most prominent supporters of Bitcoin start-ups in Silicon Valley. As the debate grew increasingly fractious, friendships among the core developers fell apart. In the past, the leader of the Bitcoin software project, Mr. Andresen (no relation to Marc Andreessen of Andreessen Horowitz), would have stepped in to mediate. Mr. Andresen says that as “lead maintainer” he always sought consensus, but on the few occasions when there was irresolvable disagreement, he made the final call, acting as a sort of “benevolent dictator.” But Mr. Andresen stepped back from his day-to-day role in 2014 and gave the job of lead maintainer to another volunteer on the project, Wladimir J. van der Laan, a Dutch programmer, who   he did not intend to follow Mr. Andresen’s lead. “I cannot be the decider for network-level issues,” Mr. van der Laan said via email this week. “No one ‘owns’ Bitcoin. No one can decide over Bitcoin as if it’s some kind of company.” Mr. Hearn and Mr. Andresen ultimately decided late in the summer that the only way forward was to give the vote to the people actually using the Bitcoin software. They put together their own version of the core software — largely the same as the current software, but with an allowance for more transactions — which they called Bitcoin XT. If a clear majority of the system’s users downloaded the software, it would become the new law of the land — what is known in open-source terminology as a fork. Forks are part of the open-source process and had been used to make small, agreed-upon fixes to Bitcoin. But no one had tried the sort of divisive fork that Mr. Hearn and Mr. Andresen devised, largely because of the risk that it could result in two incompatible Bitcoin networks and create questions about the legitimacy and value of existing Bitcoins. “So this is it. Here we are. The community is divided, and Bitcoin is forking,” Mr. Hearn  , announcing the new software. The release of Bitcoin XT was viewed by Mr. van der Laan and Mr. Maxwell as an act of betrayal. Yes, it was democratic, but they said that decisions about the core software should be made by technical experts — not by populist campaigns. In an   a few days after the announcement, Mr. Maxwell compared the Bitcoin XT team to a “guy standing on the sidelines with a beer cup hat.” One of Mr. Maxwell’s confidants   to an attempted coup. Their supporters blocked Mr. Hearn’s announcement of Bitcoin XT — and any discussion of it — from the   website and several other online forums where Bitcoin members met to discuss the project. The fight took on a new dimension when a powerful hacker distributed Bitkiller, malicious software that sought out computers that downloaded the Bitcoin XT software and overwhelmed them with traffic. One Internet provider on Long Island said the Bitkiller attacks brought down service for part of southern Long Island for several hours. The biggest American Bitcoin company, Coinbase, was taken entirely off-line for brief periods after declaring support for XT. Not surprisingly, this scared away many Bitcoin users from downloading the new software or even declaring support for it. The hacker responsible for the attack, who appeared to be based in Russia, told Mr. Hearn in an online exchange that someone “payed me for killing XT” — though he declined to say who was responsible. In the late fall, Mr. Maxwell and his supporters tried to engineer a compromise. They organized meetings in Montreal and Hong Kong where the leading developers met to discuss alternative ways to scale the Bitcoin system. Mr. Andresen went to the first of these, where Mr. Maxwell’s allies announced their own, more gradual plan for increasing the network’s capacity. But Mr. Andresen and Mr. Hearn both felt that the recommendations didn’t go far enough. Mr. Andresen, who is not normally given to sniping, began to harden his position. “It’s likely that the current developers will get fired, and some other team will replace them because they are not listening to their customers,” he said in an interview last week. Mr. Maxwell was equally dismissive of Mr. Hearn’s camp — saying that they had politicized what should have been a technical decision. Then he suddenly dropped out of the conversation in mid-December. He has not explained his absence, but colleagues say he was tired of the rancor. Mr. Andresen said a number of large Bitcoin companies had been asking him to come back in and lead a new version of the Bitcoin software. But if he did return to his old role, he said, he would insist on clear rules about decision-making. Mr. Hearn says he thinks that getting the opposing camps together will now be very difficult. He believes that the dangers of the current impasse have not been reflected in the price of Bitcoin because the full debate has been censored in many of the online forums where Bitcoin is discussed. Despite the discord, Mr. Hearn has not lost faith in all of the ideas behind Bitcoin. The start-up in New York where he has taken a job, R3, is developing Bitcoin-like networks for banks to enable cheaper and faster ways to trade assets of all sorts. The start-up aims to take advantage of the less-centralized record-keeping methods of Bitcoin, but still allow for someone to be in charge, to handle the software and to manage access to the system. This work lacks the purity of Bitcoin, but after months of sleepless nights, fretting about betrayed promises, he said, “I want to be in a professional environment again where people are grounded in some sort of business reality.”

A well-known former   executive, Blythe Masters, has raised $52 million from several big banks for a start-up built on the technology underlying the Bitcoin virtual currency. The start-up Digital Asset Holdings, based in New York, said on Thursday afternoon that it had raised the money from 13 financial institutions, including Ms. Masters’s former employer, JPMorgan, as well as Citi, BNP Paribas and Santander. At the same time, the company also announced that it had signed a deal with Australia’s primary stock exchange, ASX, to provide technology that would speed up the settlement and transfer of money after stock trades. ASX Limited is also making a big investment in Digital Asset Holdings. Digital Asset Holdings has based its technology on the blockchain concept that was introduced by the virtual currency Bitcoin. The blockchain is the database in which all transactions on the Bitcoin network are recorded. Unlike typical databases, the blockchain is maintained by users in a decentralized fashion. That has led many in the financial industry to hail it as a faster — and more reliable — alternative to existing transaction systems. Many financial institutions have been looking at ways to use a blockchain to modernize financial transactions by cutting out various middlemen from the markets. The Nasdaq stock exchange has already integrated blockchain technology to improve stock trading. Ms. Masters gave the technology a big boost when she announced her involvement with Digital Asset Holdings in early 2015. She left JPMorgan the previous year after a career during which she became one of the best-known figures in the financial industry. Big questions remain, however, about how blockchain technology can be used in the real world, and so far talk of its potential has raced ahead of real-world uses. In recent months, this disparity has caused some concern about the companies that are trying to raise money to build start-ups on the blockchain concept, including Digital Asset Holdings. Potential investors said that it took Ms. Masters longer than expected to pull together her funders — and that some big-name banks ultimately declined to participate. But Ms. Masters ended up raising more money than the $35 million that had been previously discussed. This round of fund-raising values Digital Asset Holdings at $100 million. The Australian exchange company said that Digital Asset Holdings would help it develop new technology for the processes that take place after a stock is actually traded. “Distributed Ledger Technology could provide a once-in-a-generation opportunity to reduce cost, time and complexity in the post-trade environment of Australia’s equity market,” the chief executive of ASX, Elmer Funke Kupper, said in a statement. The other investors include CME Ventures, ABN AMRO, Santander’s innovation arm, Deutsche Börse Group, Accenture, Broadridge Financial Solutions, the Depository Trust and Clearing Corporation, and PNC Financial Services.
Bitcoin may save the internet? Celebrity social media feeds are bunk, and reality TV drag queens can unlock the mysteries of gender? Clearly there’s a lot to discuss. And we (that’s our  ) are here to help, with a few fantastic recent stories about the intersection of pop culture and technology — handpicked for Australian readers. When you’re done reading, come on over to our   for more discussion. ______ Some of us are human, some of us are bots. It sounds dystopian, but really: it’s just your social media feed.  shines a light on social media’s murky black market, where politicians, athletes and celebrities are buying millions of fake followers. Even Australia’s politicians have been scrutinized: Tony Abbott reportedly gained 70,000 followers in 12 hours ahead of the 2013 election. Perhaps more alarmingly, these social drones might be borrowing your identity. Tools like  , although not perfect, can tell you how “real” your followers are – or if you’re just tweeting into the bot-o-sphere. ______ If you think Bitcoin is just about money, you’re missing the point. Bitcoin’s foundation, blockchain,  . It sounds lofty, but disrupters have changed the nature of the internet before. And if you still don’t really get what cryptocurrency is, don’t worry: Mr. Johnson, one of Silicon Valley’s most respected tech writers, breaks it down with refreshing clarity. . There have been a few key moments that flung drag queens into the world’s popular consciousness. One is “Priscilla, Queen of the Desert,” Stephen Elliot’s 1994 colorful and vulgar musical, and most recently: “RuPaul’s Drag Race.” The original Times   of “Priscilla” applauds how willing the film’s cross-dressing characters are to “laugh at themselves.” And 24 years later, reality TV host and drag performer  . Stream Season 3 of “RuPaul’s Drag Race: All Stars” on  . ______ Millions of women around the world have said #MeToo, but the impact of those words can depend on your level of celebrity, wealth, skin color, or just where you are in the world.  like “anti-sexual harassment” on social media, effectively muzzling the movement. One professor suggests it’s partly because “people are not encouraged to speak up against superiors” in Chinese culture. As Australia continues to grapple with  , could international students be less likely to report harassment? We’re glad you asked.   to get weekly missives on gender and sexual harassment news in your inbox each week. Who would have thought painstakingly slow, hand-painted messages would be an incredibly effective way to cut through the digital cacophony? Paul Lindahl didn’t. But he pursued the outmoded career path anyway. Now, as brands are searching for new ways to convey “authenticity” and “meaning,”  , Coca-Cola and Spotify from his paint-spattered Brooklyn studio. By hand-painting your advertisement over a well-loved, 20-year-old community mural, like  last year. It didn’t go down well. “Whoever thought that operational security could be wrecked by a Fitbit?” said Nathan Ruser, 20, in an interview from Thailand. Mr. Ruser, who studies international security at Australian National University, recently   his discovery that a fitness app had revealed the locations of military sites in Syria and elsewhere. .  Check out Mr. Ruser’s  , where he’s commenting and sharing smart takes on the security failure (in between tweets about triple j’s Hottest 100 countdown.)
Good morning, readers! It was an interesting week in the tech world. Let’s get to the news. One thread in the yearlong backlash against the tech industry concerns inequality. Many tech giants are built on scale — the idea that they can serve billions of customers while employing far fewer people than corporate giants of yore. Those dynamics are good for business, but they don’t make for great optics. There’s a danger that tech C.E.O.s come to be seen as out-of-touch coastal elites. Well, they want you to know they aren’t. Amazon is so all-in on America that it wants to open another headquarters here; on Thursday,   the 20 cities that made its cut as possible locations. There’s one city in Canada — Toronto — and several coastal enclaves (New York, Washington, Los Angeles), but there’s oh-so-much Middle America here, too. Wherever it ends up is, at this point, almost beside the point; Amazon has won so much positive coverage from the selection process that it can already count the story as a big win. Meanwhile, in its own , Apple announced this week that it would bring a historic pile of cash back to America. The company has about $270 billion in cash, but it had parked most of it overseas for tax reasons. Under the new tax code signed into law last year by President Trump, Apple said, it will pay $38 billion in taxes on that money — the largest tax bill ever paid — and invest billions in new facilities and people  . The company is also giving many of its employees  . Apple’s announcement made  . And the president’s victory lap is, I think, somewhat deserved. Trump and the tech industry have not had the warmest relationship, but it’s clear that his campaign — in which he constantly harangued Apple and Amazon for perceived slights — has shaken the industry from its presumption that everyone in the country loves it. Just a few weeks ago, people brave enough to enter the market for Bitcoin and its many rival electronic currencies looked like lucky geniuses.  , even billions — and you were kicking yourself for overlooking the crypto boom. Well, now you’re the genius (if still poor). Much of the cryptocurrency market  , with Bitcoin falling below $10,000 at one point, more than 50 percent off its December peak.  was flooded with panicked crypto lovers, but, as it usually does, the market leveled off by the end of the week, and crypto-heads were professing to be back on board for the long haul. Godspeed, I guess. There wasn’t so much else in tech news this week, so take some time to read some great magazine stories. In Bloomberg Businessweek, Eric Newcomer and Brad Stone have   at how Travis Kalanick, Uber’s co-founder and former hard-charging C.E.O., fell from grace. Among the details: During one harrowing Kalanick-caused scandal, he fell to “his hands and knees and began squirming on the floor.” Also, Steven Johnson has   about the uses for the blockchain, the technology undergirding cryptocurrencies.  , there’s a lovely ode to blogging and The Awl, a much-beloved Brooklyn web magazine that sadly called it quits this week. Speaking of quits: See you next week!

Initial coin offerings have come out of nowhere in 2017 to become the talk of Silicon Valley and Wall Street. Programmers have raised over $3.2 billion this year by selling their own virtual currencies to investors. That is 3,000 percent more than the amount raised using coin offerings in 2016. Coin offerings are a way for start-ups or online projects to raise money without selling stock or going to venture capitalists — essentially a new form of crowdfunding. The programmers raise money by creating and selling their own virtual currency, generally with rules similar to well-known virtual currencies like Bitcoin. The new tokens are usually designed so that they can be used only on a computing service the programmers are building. Filecoin, which raised $257 million in the largest coin offering to date, is being designed to pay for storage on a global cloud storage network that the creators of Filecoin are promising to build. BET, another coin, is being designed to serve as the chips in an online casino its programmers are promising to build. “Promising to build” is the operative phrase here, because in almost every case the services that will supposedly make these coins valuable have not yet been finished. These coins are generally inspired by older virtual currency systems like Bitcoin or Ethereum, with a cap on the number of coins that will exist — to provide a sense of goldlike scarcity — and a structure that allows them to operate entirely outside the existing financial and regulatory ecosystem. Investors generally buy the new coins by sending the programmers Bitcoin or Ether (the virtual currency inside the Ethereum network). What’s more, many of the coins are stored, moved around and enabled by other Ethereum technology. But the coins sold in coin offerings are meant to exist independent of Bitcoin and Ethereum, with their own free-floating value. (For a more complete explanation of  ,  , and for an   explainer,  .) The name for coin offerings was clearly inspired by the initial public offerings that companies do to sell stock to investors. But unlike stock offerings, coin offerings are generally designed so that investors don’t get an ownership stake in the start-ups. If the coin does provide an ownership stake, the Securities and Exchange Commission has said, the companies must comply with all securities law. A few coins have done this, but most have tried to avoid it. Investors can contribute as much or as little money as they want in these offerings, which are generally more like crowdfunding campaigns that new projects do on Kickstarter or Indiegogo. In principle, people buy these coins because they want to use the services on which the coin will be used. So far, though, almost none of the services have been completed. In the meantime, people are buying coins because they are hoping the value will go up. When the Stratis token was released in July 2016, it was worth seven-tenths of a penny. In the fall of 2017, each of those tokens was trading for around $2.95, a 42,000 percent increase. After the initial coin offering, when the programmers sell their tokens for a set price, coins are traded on third-party exchanges through open-market bidding — similar to the way stocks are traded and priced after an I.P.O. The programmers who created the coins generally keep a large stash of coins so that they also benefit if the price goes up. The people betting on the price of these tokens are generally betting that the services promised by the programmers will be completed, creating demand for the coins in the future. The most obvious reason to do a coin offering is that you can raise more money than you ever could from venture capitalists. The most valuable virtual-currency company that was funded with venture capital, Coinbase, raised $100 million this year, five years after it was founded. The same day that was announced, Filecoin, which doesn’t even have a working product, announced that it had raised over $200 million. Another plus: Start-ups that raise money through coin offerings don’t have to give away ownership of their technology to outside investors. Some programmers look to coin offerings because they can raise money for projects that venture capital won’t fund. Specifically, coin offerings can provide funding to build open-source projects that in the end no one will own, the way that no one owns Bitcoin or Ethereum. Filecoin’s cloud storage network, for instance, would be operated by its users rather than any central company. It is easier than it seems. The software behind Bitcoin and Ethereum is open source, which means that anyone can take the computer code and tweak it to create a virtual currency with slightly different characteristics. There are companies that will do this for you if you are not technologically adept. Convincing people that your new coin will have value is the harder part, and many coins that are released never grow to be worth anything. Some companies have gone the more complicated route of creating their own new software for their coins, with qualities that are very different from Bitcoin and Ethereum. Anyone who has Bitcoin or Ether and is willing to send their money to the creators of a coin offering. China and South Korea have said it is illegal. In the United States and many other countries, regulators have said some coins should be categorized as securities, like stocks and bonds. If a coin is categorized as a security, it has to follow all relevant securities law, such as registering with the authorities and ensuring that people buying the coins are properly accredited and vetted. Suffice to say, essentially no coin offerings have followed these rules. Many people are waiting for regulators to crack down. Some are expecting that the first targets will be the exchanges where the coins are traded. Investors don’t have much recourse. The most likely outcome will be that the investors will lose the money they put into the project, though people may try to sue. A number of prominent Silicon Valley investors have argued that coin offerings could provide a way to build open-source projects that would not have otherwise received support. Some big names think this will lead to a new generation of open-source internet protocols and loosen the control of big companies like Google and Facebook. Chris Dixon, a partner at Andreessen Horowitz,   that “by enabling the development of new open networks, tokens could help reverse the centralization of the internet, thereby keeping it accessible, vibrant and fair, and resulting in greater innovation.” But even sophisticated enthusiasts believe that almost all of the companies currently raising money through coin offerings will fail and lose money for their investors — and probably should not happen in the first place. “Right now, with all of the enthusiasm for crypto assets out there, I am very concerned that nobody is being careful about anything,” Fred Wilson, a partner at Union Square Ventures,  .

• Why Walmart is raising its hourly wage. • South Korea spooks the market for digital money. • Bond market investors feel some fear, but will stock market bulls? • And what will happen next with the Trump administration’s plans to reopen offshore drilling? : • Raising the starting wage for all hourly workers to  , starting next month and costing an extra  • Expanding maternity leave to   and paid parental leave to  • Adding a new benefit for adoption expenses of  • Giving out bonuses of   for eligible workers, determined by tenure, up to a total of  Walmart said in its most recent annual report that it had   That’s much bigger than any other company that has   to date. (AT&T, for instance, has roughly 200,000 employees who will likely benefit from that company’s $1,000-per-worker bonus.) : Walmart said in its most recent annual report that it had   That’s much bigger than any other company that has   to date. (AT&T, for instance, has roughly 200,000 employees who will likely benefit from that company’s $1,000-per-worker bonus.) The retailer’s efforts to keep workers  , which has led companies to fight to keep workers. (The current unemployment rate is at just  .) More from Matthew Boyle of Bloomberg: Dropbox has filed confidentially with the Securities and Exchange Commission to go public,  The closely-held file-sharing company with a valuation of $10 billion is among a group of high-profile tech start-ups that investors have been waiting for to go public. The offering would follow the disappointing debut of another of those companies, Snap, in March. Shares of Snap are down 15 percent from their initial public offering price. Goldman Sachs and JPMorgan will be the lead underwriters on the I.P.O. Dropbox had   of more than $1 billion, its chief executive, Drew Houston, told Bloomberg in January last year.  “A timing quirk in the tax overhaul that President Donald Trump signed last month may be good news for companies such as Apple Inc., Microsoft Corp. and Cisco Systems Inc., all of which began their fiscal years before Jan. 1.” The provision at issue, “in effect, gives a company until the end of its fiscal year to measure what’s cash and what isn’t for tax purposes,” That means companies, which began their fiscal years before Jan. 1, have more time “to reduce foreign cash they’ll accumulate this year.” Apple, for one, “may be able to lop more than $4 billion off a future tax bill,” according to Stephen Shay, a tax and business law professor at Harvard Law School, who wrote the “potential loophole” last month. Shares in the money-transfer services provider were up as much as 8 percent this morning after the company said that it was  . It’s not quite the same as becoming Long Blockchain, but it still reflects the enthusiasm among investors that arises when a company associates itself with the virtual currency industry. From Moneygram’s C.E.O., Alex Holmes: Here’s what the veteran Wall Street consigliere  : As of this morning, Bitcoin was down 4.5 percent, Ethereum was down 9 percent and Ripple was down 13 percent, according to  . Thank the South Korean government, which may   in what has been the third-largest market. Officials have been concerned about  . More from Song Jung-a and Bryan Harris of the FT: A spokesman for President Moon Jae-in played down the comments, saying  . But investors remained spooked. Bitcoin fever shows no other signs of stopping, however. Binance.com, a big virtual currency exchange, said that it had   yesterday. And strategists at Goldman Sachs wrote that virtual currencies may  , particularly in developing countries. • Matt Levine writes that a pump-and-dump mentality that has taken hold of some Bitcoin trading. ( ) • The answer to Bitcoin’s energy-use problem could be a 23-million-digit prime number. ( ) • The North American Bitcoin Conference no longer takes Bitcoin for ticket payments. ( ) The S. & P. 500 closed down slightly yesterday at 2,748.23. The Dow did the same, at 25,369.13. As Barron’s writes, “Stocks slid on Wednesday, because sometimes they do that.” But is there cause for fear? Bond investors appear to think so. The yield for 10-year Treasuries   of almost 2.6 percent yesterday. • Central banks’ continuing withdrawal from crisis-era bond purchases • Investor worry that inflation will edge up • That Bloomberg report about   (although a Chinese government agency   on it) That China will use its central bank to   at the U.S. Here’s what Brad Setser of the Council on Foreign Relations told the NYT: Analysts at the Eurasia Group   in a recent note. • Bill Gross declared that we’re now in a bond bear market. ( ) • Richard Barley asks, “Is the great bond blowout finally happening?” ( ) Interior Secretary Ryan Zinke has already removed Florida from his department’s plan to reopen oil drilling off U.S. coastlines — which pleased the state’s governor, Rick Scott, but  . Here’s  : • South Carolina, New Jersey and Maryland, all led by Republicans • New York, North Carolina, Delaware and California, all led by Democrats , from Timothy Puko of the WSJ: “The Rockefellers vs. the Company that Made Them Rockefellers,”  . • The naming of Ajit Jain and Greg Abel as vice chairmen of Berkshire Hathaway, as part of a dispersal of Warren Buffett’s responsibilities, “might sound like a fudge — but it’s also a sensible division of labor,” John Foley writes. ( ) • Tara Lachapelle appears to be in the “Greg Abel is the next Berkshire C.E.O.” camp. ( ) • The Oracle of Omaha himself said that his health was fine and he was staying as C.E.O. He added of the two men: “They both have Berkshire in their blood. They love the company.” ( ) As President Trump negotiates with lawmakers over a deal to protect the undocumented immigrants known as Dreamers, corporate leaders aren’t letting up. An   from 141 signatories — including   of IBM,   of Amazon,   of Facebook,   of Uber and   of Blackstone — demanded a “permanent bipartisan solution.” More from the letter: Several House Republicans have put forth an immigration proposal   for a bipartisan deal. One of them, Representative Raúl Labrador of Idaho, warned, “This is the only bill that’s going to unify the conference, and it’s going to get us to a majority of the conference.” • Mr. Trump declined to commit to being interviewed by Robert Mueller, backing away from a statement last year. And Mr. Mueller  , a veteran cybercrimes prosecutor. ( ) • Mr. Trump’s companies sold more than $35 million worth of real estate last year, 70 percent of it to shell companies that obscured the buyers’ identities. ( ) • During a meeting about immigration, Mr. Trump suggested bringing back earmarks, the practice of stuffing funding for pet projects into legislation. ( ) • Lawmakers in at least six states have introduced bills to forbid internet providers from blocking or slowing down sites or online services, a response to the F.C.C.’s repeal of net neutrality rules. ( ) • The Trump administration plans to unveil a revision to banking rules that mandate lending to poor borrowers. ( ) The showstopper at the American Economic Association’s conference was a panel stocked with women, presenting research that   arrayed against them in the field — and prompting pledges from leaders to do better. More from Jim Tankersley and Noam Scheiber of the NYT:  of the movie “All the Money in the World,” for which Michelle Williams was paid scale and Mark Wahlberg an additional $1.2 million. • The creator of the anonymous “Shitty Media Men” spreadsheet revealed herself amid controversy over whether Harper’s Magazine would do so. ( ) • James Rosen, a former correspondent for Fox News, and Joel Achenbach, a reporter at the WaPo, face allegations of workplace misconduct. ( ,  ) , who’s living in exile in a penthouse in Central Park after lobbing hard-to-verify accusations at China’s elite. Here’s what he said of the anti-corruption czar Wang Qishan, according to Lauren Hilgers of the NYT Magazine: • Lazard has hired  , most recently the co-head of French investment banking at Credit Suisse,   in Paris, Reuters reports. • HSBC has hired  ,   and   for  , Bloomberg reports. • Uber had a system called Ripley to remotely shut down computers and lock up data when police raided its overseas offices, according to three people with knowledge of the system. ( ) • Ferrero of Italy is close to formalizing a $2.8 billion deal for Nestlé’s U.S. candy business. ( ) • Blackstone agreed to pay about $1.1 billion for a luxury resort on the Hawaiian island of Maui, according to a person with knowledge of the deal. ( ) • Google bought Redux, a British start-up whose technology lets phone displays double as speakers. ( ) • Bain Capital, Blackstone Group and Silver Lake have expressed interest in Li Tong Group, an iPhone recycling business that could be worth as much as $1 billion, according to people familiar with the matter. ( ) • SS & C Technology Holdings, which provides tech infrastructure for finance, is in advanced talks to buy DST Systems, a rival also active in the health care market, for more than $5 billion, according to people familiar with the matter. ( ) • Intel released test results showing that its chip security fixes would slow personal computers by no more than 10 percent. Initial reports suggested a larger impact. ( ) • The Federal Reserve’s economic stimulus campaign turned a big profit again in 2017, but the windfall is showing signs of slowing. ( ) • Chinese-born, U.S.-trained tech talent is increasingly returning to China, drawn by plentiful venture capital and government incentives for research. ( ) • How (and why) the former Disney chairman Michael Eisner won over the fan-owners of a fourth-tier English soccer club. ( ) • Private debt collectors brought the Internal Revenue Service $6.7 million in the last fiscal year — at a cost of $20 million. ( ) • Canada has filed a sweeping World Trade Organization case against U.S. tariffs. ( ) • Advisers at some of the biggest discount brokerage firms make more money if they steer clients toward more expensive products, according to disclosures from the firms and former employees. ( )
Hackers using the name “Mr. Smith” posted a fresh cache on Monday of stolen   files online, and demanded that the network pay a ransom of several million dollars to prevent further such releases. The data dump included what appear to be scripts from five “Game of Thrones” episodes, including one coming episode, and a month’s worth of email from the account of Leslie Cohen, HBO’s vice president for film programming. There were also internal documents, including a report of legal claims against the network and job offer letters to top executives. HBO, which previously   of “proprietary information,” said it was continuing to investigate and was working with the police and security experts. The network said on Monday that it still did not believe that its email system as a whole had been compromised. This is the second data release from the hack. So far, the leaks at HBO have been limited, falling well short of the chaos inflicted on   in 2014. In that attack, hackers   and released personal information, including salaries and   numbers, of nearly 50,000 current and former Sony employees. In the aftermath of the attack, the Sony Pictures chief,  , was ousted. Those behind the HBO theft claim to have more data, including scripts, coming episodes of HBO shows and movies, and information damaging to HBO. “Game of Thrones,” currently in its penultimate season, is   and has long been  . In a video directed to HBO’s chief executive, Richard Plepler, “Mr. Smith” used white text on a black background to threaten further disclosures if HBO did not pay the ransom. To stop the leaks, the hackers demanded “our 6 month salary in bitcoin,” which they implied is at least $6 million.
 in a major subway corridor during New York City’s Monday morning rush, echoing through tunnels just off Times Square.   injured a handful of people, sent floods of   and disrupted the travel of tens of thousands. Here’s what we have  . Officials rapidly identified the suspect as Akayed Ullah, a 27-year-old immigrant from Bangladesh now living in the city. He is in custody and has been hospitalized for burns. Officials said the bomb was strapped to his body with “Velcro and zip ties” — suggesting the troubling possibility of a suicide bombing in a city known for thrumming multicultural energy. _____ pushed back against an exhaustively researched Times article on how the office has and hasn’t changed him. In particular, he insisted via Twitter that he  . “We stand by our reporting,” a Times spokeswoman responded. And in Alabama,   in Tuesday’s too-hard-to-call special Senate election. The race has revolved almost entirely around Mr. Moore’s divisive views and allegations of improper behavior toward teenage girls. _____    are teaming up for a military drill to  . The two-day exercise follows news reports suggesting that North Korea is rapidly progressing toward such launches. Underscoring fears of a possible crisis on the Korean Peninsula, a document possibly leaked from China’s state-owned telecom firm shows that a county along the   that could hold thousands of people. _____    of Russia took a   underscoring the extension of Russia’s influence in the region and the continuing shrinkage of the U.S.’s role. Regional and international anger has greeted President Trump’s unilateral decision to recognize Jerusalem as Israel’s capital. In Brussels,  ’s request for the same endorsement. _____  has come under scrutiny for infiltrating other countries’ social media. German intelligence services said that 10,000 citizens were approached   posing as think-tank leaders and headhunters, but the quest was actually for insights and secrets from the government’s business and foreign policy arms. A Chinese official angrily denounced the findings as “complete hearsay and groundless.” _____    seized territory in Iraq and Syria in 2014, it had the time and space to  . Records and documents viewed by The Times show a system of arms production that combined research and development, mass production and organized distribution to amplify the terrorist group’s power, endurance and cruelty. Mosul, a city left in ruins when the Islamic State was finally driven out in July,  . _____ to drive out rural laborers has also  : educated and ambitious white-collar workers drawn to the city’s new economy of tech, finance and hospitality industries. said its     had been successful and that it expected charges related to lapses on money laundering controls to be dropped. The bank paid a $1.9 billion settlement for the deal five years ago. providers have already pushed the boundaries of internet protections, offering a glimpse at what U.S. consumers may face once  .  is expected to raise interest rates this week.  . our columnists   the Bitcoin boom is. (Bitcoin futures hit $17,540 this morning, from an opening of $15,000.)  begins its   today. . Here’s a snapshot of  . the celebrity chef, apologized and stepped away from his food empire and ABC’s “The Chew” after four unnamed women accused him of sexual harassment. [ ]  of Australia denied that he or his government is anti-Chinese in a televised interview that also included testy exchanges with an asylum-seeker and Indigenous Australians. [ ] the party of President Nicólas Maduro dominated municipal elections, aided by an opposition boycott. [ ]  named Rahul Gandhi as its president, setting up a challenge to Prime Minister Narendra Modi in 2019 polls. [ ] Moon Jae-in, starts a four-day visit to China this week aimed at “recovering mutual trust.” [ ] will allow commercial movie theaters to open for the first time in more than 35 years, the latest transformative move by the crown prince, Mohammed bin Salman. [ ] proved — after a 14-year quest — that a catfish he discovered in remote Myanmar was a new species. [ ] , men need  . got you stressed?  . Hot sauce livens up  .  nominations are out, led by Guillermo del Toro’s fantasy “The Shape of Water,” above, with seven. Here are the   and a look at the  .   highlights the danger extremist Hindu politicians now pose to  . of our most viewed stories at the moment: Amid the racial tensions of the 1970s, an American family decided to return  . This is what happened decades later, when the two met. Long before there were  , there were meatless Tuesdays, wheatless Wednesdays and porkless Saturdays. One hundred years ago, during World War I, the U.S. government   to help its allies in Europe avoid starvation. Americans were already encouraged to give up meat (red meat, preserved meat and lard) on Tuesdays and wheat on Wednesdays. The new instructions also excluded pork on Saturday and recommended one meal without meat or wheat each day. “In this emergency, only the simplest of living is patriotic,” said Herbert Hoover, food administrator and a future president. In that crucial winter, he said, “lies the period when there will be tested in this great free country of ours the question as to whether or not our people are capable of voluntary individual self-sacrifice to save the world.” The guidelines were  , and  . Another plea to help those struggling in Europe came after World War II. President Harry Truman, in the first televised address from the White House, asked Americans  . “We must not fail them,” he said.
• “Build that wall!” — a rallying cry to physically protect the U.S. border with Mexico — was a central message of President Trump’s campaign. But   the White House chief of staff, John Kelly, privately told members of Congress on Wednesday. Mr. Trump  . “The Wall is the Wall, it has never changed or evolved from the first day I conceived of it,” he wrote, conceding that it would not be necessary on all 2,000 miles of the border, as parts are impassable. •     of the Congressional Hispanic Caucus, Mr. Kelly also expressed confidence that a deal could eventually be reached to preserve protections for the immigrants known as Dreamers. • It was a life-or-death call. In 2013, federal agents took a calculated risk and allowed a former C.I.A. officer with classified information in his luggage to return to Hong Kong. The agents,  , hoped that by watching patiently, they could piece together how China had decimated a U.S. spy network. •  , the officer, Jerry Chun Shing Lee, has been arrested on the same charge of possessing classified information that he would originally have faced. But it’s still not clear if he spied for China. • North and South Korea’s agreement on Wednesday to march under one flag at the Winter Olympics next month is a powerful gesture. But it  . Warning that the ultimate goal of the North’s leader is to rid the Korean Peninsula of American troops, the White House welcomed the two countries’ announcement but played down its significance. •   will also   at the Games, which begin Feb. 9. • After Germany opened its doors to more than a million migrants two years ago, crimes involving migrants or asylum seekers have stoked German insecurities.  involving a teenage Afghan migrant and his German former girlfriend has become Exhibit A for those arguing that the migration policy has increased violent crime. •   is still a very safe country, much safer than even a few years ago,” one criminologist said. “But the perception is the opposite.” • Getting clean has become a lucrative business. But the death of a patient in California has raised questions about what it means to prosper from crisis. Listen on  , an   or an  . •   The company  , capitalizing on the new tax law. •   has named . The cities include existing tech hubs, and a few surprises. •  and high prices, a group of hospitals  . •   who have been accused of sexual harassment have stepped away from their empires. But for the companies,  . •   that it would    . Founded nearly 13 years ago as The Huffington Post, the news site is seeking to reduce clutter and minimize unverified stories. •     on Wednesday. The Times “won” two. •  on Wednesday. Here’s a snapshot of   today. •    . •    . • Make   at home. •  The Times editorial board has been sharply critical of the Trump presidency. In the spirit of open debate, it asked his supporters to make their best case for him after his first year in office.  . Tomorrow, we’ll present letters from disillusioned Trump voters and from readers reacting to today’s letters and to The Times’s decision to provide this platform. •  Yes, it’s driven by greed — but the mania for cryptocurrency could build something much more important than wealth.  . The bubble is deflating, however. For a time on Wednesday,  . •  Museum visitors have been seeking their art twins, and  . •  Samantha Bee   against Aziz Ansari: “We know the difference between a rapist, a workplace harasser and an Aziz Ansari,” she said. “That doesn’t mean we have to be happy about any of them.” • “North Korean propaganda is in a category all its own. It is not surprising that North Korea is sending more cheerleaders and musicians than athletes.” •  Here’s  , and links to our   and  . Double your money in just 90 days. That’s what Charles Ponzi,   this week, promised investors. In the end, Ponzi swindled more than $15 million in 1920, the equivalent of about $190 million today. The trickery took Ponzi’s name, as the headlines noted 10 years ago when   defrauded clients of more than $50 billion. But  . Ponzi took advantage of international postal reply coupons, which allowed customers in one country to buy a voucher redeemable for stamps in another country. The idea was that Ponzi’s company would take investors’ dollars, use them to buy foreign postal coupons, convert each coupon into a 5-cent stamp, and convert the stamps into cash. But the plan was a fraud. Instead, Ponzi collected the money and paid off his investors while waiting for another influx of cash. Millions of dollars began arriving every week. Ponzi’s scheme was eventually exposed, and he later died in a charity hospital in Brazil, with only $75 to his name.
On a Wednesday in March, in a narrow trailer somewhere outside  , Dr. Funk and Dr. Dre, two special-effects makeup artists, were busy turning two young men, both named Tyler, into werewolves. Dr. Funk’s real name is Greg Funk; Dr. Dre’s real name is Andre Freitas. My guess is that one of the Tylers started this “Dr. Funk”/“Dr. Dre” thing, probably Tyler Posey, who plays the primary teenage wolf on “ ,” a new   series loosely based on the 1985   film of the same name. He is, at 19, one of the youngest members of the cast and exactly the kind of hyper goofball who’d make up rap names for the makeup artists. It might also have been Tyler Hoechlin, who plays Derek, the older, brooding werewolf who sort of mentors Posey’s character in the way of the lycanthrope, but he’s 23, and calmer, so I doubt it. It was the final day of principal photography on the first season of the show, which has its premiere in early June, and as Posey and Hoechlin had their fierce, sloping, man-wolf foreheads and Hugh-Jackman-as-Wolverine sideburns applied one last time, the prevailing vibe was school’s-out-for-summer. Funk and Freitas had a classic-rock playlist going on Funk’s   —  ,  ,  , the  . Posey in particular seemed barely able to sit still, or resist luring Hoechlin into mock arguments in the “Shut up/No, you shut up” vein. MTV’s “Teen Wolf” was conceived as a darker, sexier reimagining of the “Teen Wolf” story, and also a gorier one. Within the first few minutes of the pilot episode, for example, Posey’s character, Scott McCall, discovers the naked, dismembered body of a young woman in the woods. So it’s clear right away that this will not be a sweet, silly sports comedy, like the old “Teen Wolf.” There will also be brooding! There will probably not be triumphant werewolf-basketball montages! And there will be blood! The supplies at Funk and Freitas’s makeup stations included My Blood brand stage blood in   Red; Reel Body Art Ink in Deep Red #7; and an ominous squirt bottle labeled MOUTH BLACK VOMIT. The pink Post-Its identifying the contents of the cabinets behind their makeup-chair stations read WOLF EARS and LOOSE HAIR and  ’L BURN SCARS. A dry-erase calendar on one wall of the trailer listed several weeks’ worth of unfortunate werewolf-related events, like THROAT RIP. Feb. 28 was apparently a rough Monday — it required Funk and Freitas to simulate MOUTH BLOOD, and also a STOMACH WOUND, and an ARROW IN ARM. The werewolf-face prosthetics, which are delicate, like sleep masks made of pancetta, are stored on plastic molds of the actors’ heads. The prosthetic scars for small wounds — cuts, scratches, bullet wounds — are stored flat in HOT AND DELICIOUS! pizza boxes. Sometimes someone who doesn’t know the deal will tidy the makeup trailer and throw the boxes away, and Funk and Freitas will have to dig through a Dumpster for them. Hoechlin looked into the makeup mirror, bit into a breakfast taco and said, “A werewolf eating a taco,” to his reflection, as if pondering the strangeness of the chain of events that had taken him here. I was pondering the same thing. The horror genre has always been where the culture goes to process the issues of the day via fake-blood-spattered psychodrama. AMC’s zombie-survival serial, “Walking Dead,” is about economic collapse and our sense that we’ve been abandoned by institutions; torture-chamber flicks like “ ” are about our guilty complicity in reality TV’s soft sadism. But the teenage-monster movie works with more evergreen subtextual materials, making metaphorical the weirdness of   — of waking up one morning with uncontrollable urges, new and troubling hair growth and a sense that the whole world hates and fears you. Which is not to say that “Teen Wolf” doesn’t reflect its cultural moment. Obviously no one involved with the making of the show wants to come right out and say it, but MTV’s getting into the teen-horror game because of the world-beating success of Stephenie Meyer’s “ ” novels, which are among the most read borderline-unreadable books of the last decade, and the movie franchise they inspired, which has grossed nearly $1 billion to date and forced an entire generation of girls to pledge allegiance to either Team Edward (the vampire) or Team Jacob (the werewolf). The animating tension of “Twilight” is that the high-school mope-rag, Bella Swan, wants Edward to turn her into a vampire so they can be together forever — symbolically taking her virginity by taking her humanity. While the idea of erotic exchange between human beings and the undead has always appealed to Goths and Fangoria subscribers, Meyer’s story cunningly transformed that racy, quasi-pagan fantasy into a crypto-Christian abstinence parable that good girls could enjoy while twisting their promise rings. By now “Twilight” is effectively a genre of its own. Even if your local chain bookstore doesn’t have a Supernatural Teen Romance table, you can see that something has happened just by walking down the young-adult fiction aisle: everything is about kids with fangs, or claws, or superpowers. With “Teen Wolf,” MTV is actually arriving kind of late to this   party — cable is already crowded with sexy-monster shows, from  ’s “ ” to the CW’s “Vampire Diaries.” (Fun fact: Paramount’s MTV Films division actually had the rights to the first “Twilight” book back in 2004; they commissioned a script in which Bella, portrayed in the novels as freakishly accident-prone, is a star athlete, then put the project into turnaround.) But there is about to be room in the culture for another dark, racy, bloody high-school-horror franchise. We’re approaching what you might call peak “Twilight”: once the last two movies come out — “Breaking Dawn Part I” hits theaters in November, with Part II set to follow in November 2012 — all 2,548 pages of Meyer’s series will have been transferred to the screen. So MTV is banking on two things: First, that the “Twilight” generation wants more of this, and second, that said generation may have had enough of vampires but will, in a kind of moral TKO for Team Jacob, tune in to support a show about werewolves.  werewolves. ME: What is it about girls and werewolves? HOECHLIN: I don’t know. I couldn’t honestly answer that one. Maybe it’s just a guys-being-guys kind of thing. Werewolves have that manly, aggressive thing. They’re like the Red Sox of monsters. Like Johnny Damon, with the beard and everything. Grinders in the dirt. As opposed to the Yankees. Vampires are kind of like the Yankees. ME: Werewolves are, like, a working-class monster. HOECHLIN: That’s right. As it happens, the werewolf myth is one of the most retold stories of all time. There are werewolves in Herodotus, Ovid, Petronius and Virgil; European folklore and Native American legend alike are full of skin walkers, Wendigos and  . Every culture that needs a campfire myth to explain man’s capacity for bestial violence eventually hits on the idea. “It’s a legend that I think grew out of the fear of wolves themselves,” says Jeff Davis, the writer/executive producer of the new “Teen Wolf,” who has become kind of an autodidact werewolf expert. “Because wolves are perfect predators. The other thing is, there were all these cultures that would kill wolves and wear their skins. And the idea that by wearing the skin of an animal you’d take on the personality of that animal led to the idea of shape-shifters.” In pop culture, people have been turning into wolves on screen as far back as 1913’s silent film “ ,” but the teenage-werewolf story really begins in 1953, when the film promoter James H. Nicholson and the entertainment lawyer Samuel Z. Arkoff started the American Releasing Corporation. By the end of the ’50s, the rechristened American International Pictures was a B-movie powerhouse, releasing them as a double feature. A.I.P. invented the practice of selling theater owners a poster and a grabber title first — “Ghost of Dragstrip Hollow,” say, or “ ” — before writing, casting and shooting a movie to go with it. Most important, A.I.P. invented the teen movie. Nicholson and Arkoff recognized that even though television was steadily bleeding away the adult audiences mainstream Hollywood had depended on for decades, teenagers were still flocking to the drive-in, looking for kicks. So A.I.P. started testing movie ideas on focus groups made up of actual teenagers. They identified and met a demand for films full of fast cars and monsters and rock ’n’ roll. They cranked out 50 films a year, essentially pioneering the kind of youthsploitation that would one day make MTV into a cultural force. Then, on June 19, 1957, A.I.P. released “ ,” as part of a double bill with “Invasion of the Saucer-Men.” It was shot in a week for around $80,000. A 20-year-old   starred as Tony Rivers, who’s your basic screwed-up, quick-tempered, sock-hop-ruining ’50s-movie kid until a quack shrink uses hypnosis and experimental drugs to turn him into a you-know-what. It’s sort of a supernatural “ ,” with Landon, in a varsity jacket, approximating  ’s Method scene-gnashing, saying things like “People bug me!” and flinging his after-school milk at the wall — except instead of sneaking off with Natalie Wood and  , Landon’s wolf character ends up hiding in the woods and is eventually gunned down by the cops. “Teenage Werewolf” isn’t a great movie, but you can see why it was such an   movie. It shows kids having unsupervised teenage fun, jumping and jiving and listening to a crazy beatnik playing the bongos at a basement hideout; it metaphorizes ’50s juvenile-delinquency panic; and it none-too-subtly links Tony’s transformations to hormonal eruption. (Watching a female gymnast while she works out on the uneven bars brings on his first on-screen wolf-out, which ends up being seriously bad news for the gymnast.) In its own dumb way, “Teenage Werewolf” had something to say about the raw animal urges simmering within seemingly clean-cut kids. Although Variety dismissed it as “a combo teenager and science-fiction yarn which should do O.K. in the exploitation market,” it went on to gross more than $2 million in 1957 alone and prompted a string of “I Was a Teenage _______” movies (“ ,” “ ,” etc.). And it planted the teenage-werewolf story in pop culture like silver-bullet shrapnel. • 1963: A gravel-throated  -born D.J. named Robert Smith takes a job at the Mexican radio station XERF-AM. Broadcasting from a desert compound just across the border in Ciudad Acuna, via a 250,000-watt transmission tower that blasts the station’s signal onto the AM dial across the  , he plays a wild mix of rock and rhythm and blues, punctuated with his own feral-hipster howls. He calls himself Wolfman Jack; later, he shows up in  ’s archetypal teen movie, “ ,” to offer a Popsicle to a teenager implausibly played by 25-year-old  . • The fourth track on Side 1 of “Songs the Lord Taught Us,” the 1980 debut album by the Cramps —  -via-  rockabilly-punk weirdos geeked out on the seamier side of the drive-in ’50s — is a demented roadhouse stomp called “I Was A Teenage Werewolf.” Lux Interior, the singer, performs it like Elvis fighting off strychnine poisoning, as if he’s growing itchy palm-hair right there in the vocal booth: “Braces on my fangs!/I was a teenage werewolf!/And no one even said THANKS!/And NO ONE MADE ME STOP!” • In  ’s 1986 doorstop novel “ ,” the child-killing spider-clown-monster Pennywise takes the form of Michael Landon-as-werewolf the first time it shows up. (King’s first published story, by the way, was called “I Was a Teenage Grave Robber.” And a working title for 1995’s “ ” was “ .”) In his wood-paneled, personal-decorative-item-free office on the “Teen Wolf” set, Jeff Davis cues up the opening sequence of the show’s third episode on his laptop. In the scene, Posey’s character sneaks onto an abandoned school bus with a girl to make out. Posey gets excited, then becomes the wolf; she screams, and Posey starts tearing the bus apart. “I’m adding some effects into this scene,” Davis says. He likes the way Posey’s werewolf teeth look, but he wants to give him scarier glowing wolf eyes in postproduction. “With C.G.I., you have to decide how real you want it to look, at what cost. The realer it gets, the more man-hours, the more expensive.” Davis grew up reading horror-rack staples like Stephen King and  . He read Thomas Harris’s novel “ ” way before it became a   movie; wrote a bunch of  -profiler movie outlines that went nowhere; then pitched the concept as a TV show about profilers — a kind of psychological “CSI.” That show, “Criminal Minds,” had its premiere on   in September 2005, when Davis was 30, and still draws healthy ratings to this day. Davis has also worked in features. For a while, he was one of those guys who do really well in Hollywood writing movies that never actually get made. He gravitated toward TV because TV has airspace to fill, which means it   to make things in a way movies don’t. And he liked the idea of working with MTV at a moment when the network was trying to build a slate of scripted shows. (MTV seems to shed its skin at least once a decade, as if part of its business model is becoming ever more unrecognizable to viewers fogyish enough to remember the heyday of the   video or even the   days of Carson Daly. The resignation in May of the longtime MTV Networks chairwoman and C.E.O. Judy McGrath, who started with the network as a copywriter in 1981 and was an architect of what it became, is probably the highest-profile change that has taken place at MTV lately. But the more symbolic departure may be that of Tony DiSanto, who as the president of programming oversaw MTV’s late-2000s reality-TV makeover via the debuts of hits like “ ” and “16 and Pregnant.” The network has ordered eight scripted shows during the past year, which indicates that yet another new era of MTV may be upon us: more “Teen Wolf,” less “Teen Mom.”) But Davis says he went into his first meeting with MTV unsure that a “Teen Wolf” TV show could actually work, especially one that replicated the tone of the original. He suggested to the network that they look to another ’80s-baby cult film for inspiration: “ ,”  ’s 1987 movie about a pack of mullet-haired vampires. “That’s an ’80s movie I love,” Davis says. “It’s got horror, it’s got romance, and it’s got humor. There haven’t been many TV shows that really try to go for that.” Davis also cites “ ,” which pulled off that tonal high-wire act brilliantly for seven seasons and remains the greatest work of pop art that the horror-goes-to-high-school subgenre has ever produced. “Not that we can fill that void,” Davis says, “but why not try to go for it?” Davis understands that there are people who object on principle to a darker, sexier “Teen Wolf” reboot: who see it as proof of Hollywood’s cynical, money-grubbing disregard for its audience’s childhood memories. He has been asked, given the degree to which the new show departs from the tone of the original, why they’re calling it “Teen Wolf” at all. There are two answers, he says. “The cynical one is that it’s a brand. This gets announced in the trades, everybody’s talking about it. It’s online everywhere — which is extraordinary to me, that that many people remember ‘Teen Wolf.’ And then the second reason is: It’s a perfect title for this. He’s a teenage werewolf. Teen. Wolf. Hitchcock said a title should be short and tell you exactly what the movie’s about.” Sure: “Strangers on a Train.” “ .” “ .” “Teen Wolf.” When I asked him, sort of jokingly, if Hollywood reboot-mania indicates that we’re running out of culture, his answer was — considering what he’s working on at the moment — pretty impressively honest: “I don’t think we’re running out of culture. I think we’re running out of courage.” Screen werewolves became slasher-film mean by the early ’80s: They menaced   in “ ” and Dee Wallace in “ ” and British pubgoers in  ’s “American Werewolf in  ,” whose grisly transformation scenes won   the first-ever Academy Award for Best Makeup. He would later reteam with Landis on the music video for “ ” (in which Michael Jackson turns into a were-cat). Then in 1984, a kid named Jeph Loeb had this idea. Loeb was 23. He’d graduated from  ’s film school. He and his writing partner, Matthew Weisman, scored a meeting with a studio called Atlantic Releasing, which had recently spent less than a million dollars making “ ,” a teen comedy about a punk (a pre-almost-everything  ) who falls for a girl from the un-punk suburbs. It turned a nice profit, and Atlantic was looking to make another movie with a similar bang-to-buck ratio. Loeb sold the studio a story about a werewolf who plays basketball. Loeb and Weisman wrote the script in three weeks. They secured the participation of Michael J. Fox, whose   sitcom, “ ,” was about to shut down for a while, to accommodate   Birney’s maternity leave. They hired Rod Daniel to direct, even though he’d never made a feature, because every other director they talked to said the script was a metaphor for puberty or a meditation on the dark side within us all, and Daniel was the only one who said it was about the relationship between a father and his son. He identified the key moment as the one when Fox’s character turns into the wolf while locked in the bathroom, with his father is outside asking him to please come out. You’re supposed to think the father thinks his son is masturbating; that’s the joke. Then, when Fox, in wolf form, opens the door, looking like a cross between Chewbacca and a young Leon Russell, there’s his dad, who it turns out is also a werewolf, telling him everything will be O.K. They shot the movie in 21 days. “Family Ties,” meanwhile, assisted by its brand-new lead-in, “The Cosby Show,” became the No. 2-rated show, and Fox became a huge star. At one point, Loeb recalls, the producers of “Back to the Future,” who were looking for a lead actor to replace the miscast  , asked the “Teen Wolf” producers to send over some rough footage of Fox at work. Fox got the part; “Back to the Future” was released in July 1985, a few months before “Teen Wolf,” and by the time “Teen Wolf” hit theaters, Fox was one of the hottest young actors in Hollywood. Loeb went on to become a successful writer of comic books and TV shows (he’s now an executive vice president at Marvel Entertainment), but he’s still proud of “Teen Wolf.” “It’s very simple, and small, and lovely, and very much a fairy tale,” he says. And in its own simple and small and lovely way, “Teen Wolf” has a pretty progressive message. When Fox’s character, Scott Howard, is forced to play a two-minutes-in-heaven-style party game with Boof, his platonic female best friend, he comes close to wolfing out, and they both emerge from the closet sweaty and humiliated, somebody asks him, “What’s it like, coming out of the closet?” and it’s not just a throwaway gag. The movie is about   grappling with the realization that he’s different, and by connecting that different-ness to his sexuality, it basically begs to be read as a homosexual-awakening allegory. When Scott tells his best friend Stiles he has something to confess to him, Stiles makes a crude gay joke, but when he sees the wolf, he immediately says to Scott, “You’re beautiful” — and O.K., it’s because he sees how being friends with the guy who can turn into a werewolf will benefit him socially, and in subsequent scenes we see him organizing a wolf rooting section at basketball games and wearing a T-shirt that says WOLF BUDDY. But what matters is that Stiles, like almost every character in “Teen Wolf,” with the exception of the uptight principal and the jock whose girl Scott-as-wolf steals, is totally cool with Scott when he starts flying his freak flag. It’s a huge departure from the standard monster-movie formula, in which the monster is either an evil force that must be extinguished for normalcy to prevail or a tragic, misunderstood Frankenstein figure who has to die at the hands of a torch-and-pitchfork-wielding mob. It’s only when Scott starts enjoying wolf fame too much that he becomes a monster. He acts like a jerk in public, he becomes an incorrigible ball hog on the court, he opens beer cans with his fangs while people cheer him on and, finally, he attacks a rival jock in a confrontation at a school dance (this after leading the whole gym in synchronized wolf choreography). After he realizes he has been acting like a jackass, he plays the big game as regular old non-fur-bearing Scott Howard, and wins in the end, in a montage scored to a song called “Win in the End.” Which means the moral of the story is confusing — the fact that Scott wins the game without becoming the wolf is obviously supposed to be a message about the importance of being yourself, but it’s really a message about conformity. In order to please his peers, Scott agrees to be ordinary, even though he has the capacity to play superhuman, Globetrotters-level basketball in wolf form.   would have hated “Teen Wolf.” I mean, Scott didn’t become a werewolf as a result of a werewolf bite — his dad was a werewolf, too. It’s genetic. Who’s to say the wolf, with its capacity to dribble circles around the weak, isn’t his true self, or at least as true a self as his nonwolf form? Why should the wolf have to win on passing and defense for fear of hurting everybody else’s feelings? It’s almost as if the makers of “Teen Wolf” did not expect the philosophical subtext of their movie to be scrutinized this carefully. The new “Teen Wolf” show is not as clever or allegorical as “Buffy the Vampire Slayer,” but the comparison is almost unfair; Buffy was about teenagers but didn’t try particularly hard to be   them, whereas “Teen Wolf” is on MTV, which has a bigger   in selling youth to youth. And most of the alterations it makes to the original “Teen Wolf” story work; the fact that Posey’s character develops the ability to pacify dogs (and terrify cats) strains credulity far less than the idea that a werewolf would for some reason be a really good dancer. And it’s legitimately scary, if not as scary as “ ,” MTV’s other new show, which depicts 21st-century teenagers as dead-eyed soulless sex addicts and which might be less depressing if there were a chance that the characters might be eaten by mythical beasts. If “Teen Wolf” builds on the original’s sneakily radical message of self-acceptance instead of fetishizing its characters’ suffering like “Twilight,” there’s a chance “Teen Wolf” 2.0 will look as zeitgeisty in retrospect as some of its adolescent-lycanthrope genre forebears: a no-judgment monster show for the same proudly atypical fan base that   refers to as her “little monsters.” But in the short term, how well it infects a new generation with its werewolf curse will depend in large part on how audiences respond to the young actors in its cast, and specifically to the young,  -esque Tyler Posey, for whom the teen magazines have already come calling. Posey seems to have rejected the MTV media training in a pretty delightful way. When he’s asked about the negative advance buzz on the show, he says, “Since it’s on MTV, people are expecting it to be this not-very-good show.” When he’s asked what would make a girl prefer werewolves over vampires, he says: “Werewolves are very confident. They know nothing can hurt them. Vampires, they’re wimps. They don’t go in the sun. They can die easily.” I ask Posey if it has to do with the more primitive nature of the werewolf — if there’s something about their breed of scariness that appeals. “Girls are just really naughty and love to be thrown around,” he says. You can do that sort of thing on MTV, right? Sure, Posey says. “Have you seen ‘Skins’? Who knows — maybe we’ll do that for Season 2. ‘Sex Wolf.’ ” The one interesting thing I know about Posey is that he was, at one point, close to landing the role of Jacob, the werewolf in the “Twilight” movies. He confirms this, then adds that he was only 16 when it happened, that he was more into hanging out with his friends than acting back then, that he’s not bitter about how it all went down. But when he actually explains how it all went down, another story comes out. Posey is from  , Calif.; for a long time, he thought he was the only actor in town. Then this kid, Taylor Lautner, moved to Valencia. Another actor. (“His name’s Taylor, my name’s Tyler,” Posey says.) Lautner started dating a girl in Posey’s neighborhood, a girl Posey was into. They started running into each other at auditions. And then one day, after Posey was told the “Twilight” job was his to lose, and then lost it, he ran into Lautner again, and Lautner told him he was just back from  . Where he’d been shooting “Twilight.” Come on, I say. It sounds as if he’s your nemesis. You have to hate that guy a little bit. “Just a little bit,” Posey admits. “Yeah, of course.” I say, that’s what this is all about, isn’t it? This is your revenge. You’re doing this show to make people forget Taylor Lautner ever existed. “I’m the new werewolf in town, man,” Posey says. “Watch out.”

 few newsletters ago,  . Could we, together, vanquish Canada? Could we add more new sign-ups to the   than my colleague, Ian Austen, could add to his newsletter, the  ? Since Canada had more than double our subscriber base to pull from, it was an epic challenge. Not quite like trying to reach the third round of the Australian Open when you’re only 15 years old. But sort of. And you did it. Marta Kostyuk   this week; and as of Thursday night, 1,921 people signed up for the Australia Letter since my plea at the end of November, compared to 1,334 for the Canada Letter. A toast goes to all those who signed up or who helped sign up friends. Thank you. (  for those still eager to contribute.) Special thanks also goes to those who supported our effort in Australia by giving the gift of a The New York Times subscription for the holidays. And for those looking to exhibit that famous Aussie competitiveness, Kate Moss is the one to beat. Here’s what she wrote to us in December: Now before some of you get all cross with me for the self-celebratory tone, let me also say this: We’re not yet where we aim to be. The Australia bureau is less than a year old and we still have a lot to learn about how to make sure we’re telling the stories — and sharing the stories beyond this continent — that will add value to your routine. As always, we’re eager to hear from you. If you have a story tip, an investigative lead, or an anecdote for our   email us at  . We’re also pushing forward with brainstorming of our own. I just got back from an annual meeting of New York Times correspondents in the Asia-Pacific region. For three days in Hong Kong, dozens of New York Times journalists huddled together to talk about coverage for the coming year. We discussed how China is changing under Xi Jinping, what “the China model” actually is, and how it is influencing the world at a time of American retreat. We discussed the direction of India and Myanmar. We discussed religion and democracy. We talked about suicide in Japan, protests in Iran, how technology is being used to reshape interaction for us all. We also ate some amazing food. (Peking duck. Lots of it, among other things.) And of course, we talked about Australia and New Zealand. Interest in this part of the world seems to be growing. As a result, you can expect more visitors this year and a wider range of coverage. Truly, The New York Times here and everywhere is an evolving effort. We’re eager to do great work, and eager to engage our (and your) collective curiosity. So let’s get to it. Here’s this week’s roundup of stories, plus a recommendation for what to listen to while you enjoy the summer heat. See you   and in our NYT Australia  ! A former CIA agent was arrested and charged with   inside China — possibly explaining why several informants   in a major collapse of the American spy network in China. President Trump   on Tuesday.  The special counsel, Robert S. Mueller III, has subpoenaed the president’s former chief strategist, Stephen K. Bannon,  investigating links between the President Trump’s associates and Russia. To bitcoin or not to bitcoin? As the price of the behemoth cryptocurrency wavered this week, our reporters dove into the world of virtual currency to examine a tightknit group of friends and enthusiasts who hope to  . If you’re in the mood for a longer read, check out  , where one writer explains why blockchain platforms could make not just money, but history. And have you heard of Ripple, another cryptocurrency that briefly made one of its co-founders   last week? Grab your raquets. These are the players  . This is   of all the most important moments and back stories. And remember that whole same-sex marriage thing? We attended   for a look at the excitement among vendors who are expecting a boom to the tune of $650 million Australian dollars over the next 12 months. In this week’s Australia Diary, we gathered a collection of poetry that   in nature. And Friday means it’s time for another Besha Rodell review. Return   to be the first to read it.  writes editor Bari Weiss, after a story detailing a sexual encounter between an anonymous woman and the comedian went public, adding another layer to the #metoo conversation. “Imagine learning that you have only minutes to live. I texted my family that I loved them because the cell service was overloaded and I couldn’t get a call out,” one reader recalled. Alexander Aciman explores the muddled allegiances and yearnings of his French and Jewish heritage. Via our resident podcast fanatic,  : Check out  , a recently-ended podcast from Brooklyn that looks at all the pieces that make up love — it’s unflinchingly honest, frequently touching. While on my leisurely walk to work, I couldn’t stop listening to   about a mother and daughter going on a cruise.
So Tim Robbins and Donald Trump walk into a bar. Not together. They just happened to be in the same Greenwich Village club one night in the mid-1990s. But given the fact that fame is an irresistible magnet for Mr. Trump, the two men naturally ended up in a picture. “I was throwing a private party for a friend, and he tried to crash it and I wouldn’t let him,” Mr. Robbins recalls. But Mr. Trump is not that easily put off, even when his quarry has disdain for him. “We were in a little roped-off section of the club that I had rented out and I was leaving to go to the bathroom and all of the sudden, there he is. And before I know it, I turn around and there’s photo flashes, and it was weird. He wanted a photo with me because I was famous. He used to do that a lot, by the way. He wanted to be photographed with famous people all the time.” It is strange that this onetime cardboard-cutout celebrity popping up at Gotham parties has turned into a psychic dentist drill, boring into Americans’ deepest, most painful schisms on race, gender and inequality. “Think about this,” Mr. Robbins says, over scallops, fries and espresso in the bar at the Crosby Street Hotel in SoHo. “You pursue celebrities your entire life when you’re a real-estate developer, and then you become the most powerful person in the country and no one wants to be photographed with you. This is the time when most celebrities will go to your side, and no one is going to his.” The Washington traditions that you’d think President Trump would have enjoyed, given his old party-surfing, glitterati-fawning ways — like the White House Correspondents Dinner and the Kennedy Center Honors — he has shunned. “He doesn’t want to be in a situation where anyone has any kind of power over him,” Mr. Robbins theorizes. “And celebrities ultimately have the power to say, ‘No, I don’t want to be photographed with him.’” Like Tom Hanks saying he wouldn’t go to the White House to screen “The Post,” even if he were asked, or Tom Brady deflating President Trump and refusing to go to the Super Bowl ceremony at White House, no doubt because he feared the wrath of Gisele. “He’s that guy at work that you used to ignore, you know?” Mr. Robbins says of the president. “It’s like, ‘Oh, God, he’s at it again. Just leave him alone. Ignore him.’ And then he’s all upset he wasn’t invited to the party. ‘No, you’re an ass. You don’t get invited to the party. I’m sorry.’” I muse that it must be uncomfortable to follow the first African-American president, known for his grace and exemplary family life, into the White House and then have to spend all your time denying that you’re a racist or that you assaulted a string of women and paid off a porn star (whose interview with In Touch contained the startling revelation that the country’s most famous germophobe didn’t wear a condom.) “‘Bob Roberts’ came true,” Mr. Robbins says, referring to the 1992 mockumentary he wrote and starred in. He prefigured the Trump phenomenon in the film, which is about a charismatic television entertainer and rich businessman who runs for office on the Republican ticket, sugarcoating his corrupt ways with an appeal to family values. He is hailed as a savior by his fans and as a crypto-fascist by his critics. When a young woman sends an admiring note to Bob Roberts, he writes back warning her to stay away from crack because “It’s a ghetto drug.” As Vincent Canby said in his New York Times review, “Bob understands the appeal of an ultraconservative political and economic policy even to those who have nothing: anticipating the day when they do have it all, they want to make sure they will be able to keep it.” Bob urges his followers to “take, make and win by any means” and asks them: “Why has your American dream been relegated to the trash heap of history?” When the movie was a big hit in Cannes, Miramax signed on as a co-distributor and Harvey Weinstein began hectoring Mr. Robbins to recut and re-edit the film. “He must have called me 20 times and I just told him, ‘No, I’m not doing it,”’ Mr. Robbins says. “He was so powerful because he had a company that was making movies that the studios weren’t making.” Aside from his monstrous behavior with women, Mr. Weinstein ravaged Hollywood in other ways, Mr. Robbins posits, adding that, though the producer was hailed for his good taste, “you could make the argument that Harvey’s overall impact on cinema was negative. “What happened is, when Miramax became as successful as it became, every studio all of a sudden wanted to have an independent arm,” he says. “So they all set up their little boutique companies that would do ‘independent’ films, quote unquote. And it wasn’t that they were independent or edgy or that the content was risky or provocative. It was more that it was independent of paying people what the studios had to pay them. And so it became this way of making films on the cheap and not committing full studio resources into those kinds of films.” When Mr. Weinstein asked Mr. Robbins to star in an indie called “Smoke,” shortly after the producer had sold Miramax to Disney for some $60 million in 1993, the actor remembers confronting him, saying: “‘Harvey, the talent made your company and you’ve been paying them scale for years. And you just put a fortune in your pocket. When are we going to see some of that?’” He said that Mr. Weinstein called back an hour later to say that he would pay Mr. Robbins a million dollars to do the part but ordered him not to tell the other actors, who would still get scale. “‘You don’t get what I was saying,’” Mr. Robbins recalls telling him. “This wasn’t a shakedown for me to get money. This was about, What are you going to do overall for talented people now that you’ve been monetized in this way?” Mr. Robbins deadpans: “Needless to say, I never worked for him again after that conversation. Also, he was personally transforming the Oscars into an advertising campaign that was about a relentless pursuit of gold.” Mr. Robbins, who loves old Hollywood, is rueful about the dearth of great movies: a decay in Hollywood standards that gave Mr. Weinstein power, and cover, for a long time. “Since I won the Oscar for ‘Mystic River’ in 2004, I think I’ve worked in one studio film as a lead actor, which was ‘Catch a Fire’ at Universal,” Mr. Robbins says. “But I don’t know why that is. The way I look at it is, every movie I have done, I am proud of, other than one I did for money, ‘Green Lantern.’ Is it ‘Green Lantern’ or ‘Green Arrow’? I forget. I do have to pay the bills occasionally. But I’m not broke. I have been wise with my money. I don’t need to be an über-rich person. I’m happy where I am.” He agrees with the philosophy of the San Antonio Spurs coach Gregg Popovich, who explained recently why charitable contributions matter: “Because we’re rich as hell, and we don’t need it all, and other people need it.” And you’re a jerk if you don’t give it. Asked about the tectonic shift for women in Hollywood, Mr. Robbins says he is happy that “the incredibly libidinous atmosphere in Hollywood is changing” so that men will be more afraid “to intimidate women into compliance in horrible, rapey ways.” “Everybody knew,” he says in a disgusted whisper about Harvey Weinstein. “Everybody knew.” He thinks there might actually be a fundamental shift, “not just on the man-woman thing but the male-male thing, too. That’s been happening for a long time.” He knows this is a supercharged moment, given the opprobrium that has descended on stars such as Matt Damon, who said people should acknowledge “a spectrum” of bad behavior among men. “It’s really, really important that women have the floor now to talk about this because it has been so pervasive throughout every industry as long as I’ve been alive,” Mr. Robbins says. But, he adds, “I don’t trust mobs of any kind, even when they’re advocating for things I support. People losing their careers based on innuendo or accusation is troubling for me. There is a process for this: a legal system. Convicting someone on an accusation is really dangerous territory to be living in.” He worries about overreach. “Is it possible for me to do a feminist film or a film about race and speak with any authority, or am I limited to telling stories about white men?” Mr. Robbins is passionate about politics but protests that he is not a radical. He does cop to driving in Santa Monica many years ago with his older son, Jack, when he was about 12, and when Mr. Robbins saw Henry Kissinger coming out of the posh Ivy at the Shore restaurant, he leaned out and yelled, “War criminal!” “And my son was like, ‘What? What? Why are you doing that?’” He does not regret speaking out against our misguided wars, even though, during the Iraq fiasco, he got denounced by conservatives as a “terrorist supporter” and a “Saddam lover.” “My children were young when 9/11 happened, and that was a traumatic experience,” he says. “And they saw how a traumatic experience was turned into using manipulated information to produce another catastrophe, which was the war. So it’s kind of a double trauma. And I don’t think they trust the institutions of power and so they’re looking to create their own. Many of our leaders are no longer on moral high ground. The millennials are living in a society where if you fail you succeed, from the bankers who almost brought down the economy and then got bonuses to Trump and his bankruptcies. It started with Nixon. The degradation of it all. Wouldn’t we be living in a different country right now if Richard Nixon went to jail?” He laughs, noting wryly that “the millennial midlife crisis will be one for the ages.” He avidly supported Bernie Sanders in the primary before switching to Hillary Clinton in the general. (His ex Susan Sarandon, also an independent spirit, got heckled by Hillary supporters for refusing to support Mrs. Clinton; she said, “I don’t vote with my vagina,” and then switched to Jill Stein after Mr. Sanders was out.) “I think the Democratic Party is making a huge mistake right now, trying to caustically marginalize those people that voted for Bernie, because they’re not going to be shamed,” Mr. Robbins says. When he started his career, Mr. Robbins got offered a lot of roles as psycho killers. Then came “The Player.” Now, at 59, he says that “most of the parts I get offered are middle-aged dudes having existential crises.” He’s depicting another in Alan Ball’s new HBO series, “Here and Now,” which has its premiere on Feb. 11. Mr. Robbins’s character is a depressed philosophy professor named Greg Boatwright who plays Candy Crush and cheats on his wife, played by Holly Hunter, with a young hooker. In addition to their biological daughter, the couple, who met at Berkeley, has the “great experiment” of three adopted children (black, Asian and Hispanic), now grown. The show centers on the dynamics of having this pocket of progressivism in Portland, Ore., when white supremacy groups are lurking right outside of town. Mr. Robbins’s gloomy character sees “ignorance, hatred, terror and rage” winning, which makes his wife yearn to “smack him in the face with a big, wet fish.” Mr. Robbins has also been working on a memoir about growing up in a one-bedroom railroad apartment with a dog, two cats, a rabbit and his folk singing family — his father, Gil, was a guitarist and songwriter with the Highwaymen — and meeting a lot of “crazy creative geniuses” in Greenwich Village. (Mr. Robbins lived nearby in Chelsea during his long relationship with Ms. Sarandon.) “My dad’s way of dealing with his depression was to build something, a harpsichord or cabinets or a loom,” he says. “I still have some of the things from his weaving period.” Mr. Robbins says he is “super-proud” of his children. Ms. Sarandon’s daughter with Franco Amurri, Eva — Mr. Robbins refers to Eva as his daughter — has two children and writes a parenting blog called “Happily Eva After.” Mr. Robbins has been producing short films for his oldest son, Jack, who got into Sundance last year and this year. And his younger son, Miles, is going on tour with his band and has roles in the upcoming “X Files” and “Halloween” movies. Perhaps because he got used to wearing the garter belt of Ms. Sarandon’s character in “Bull Durham,” Mr. Robbins was not bothered by Miles’s op-ed in HuffPost talking about how, even though he is “mostly heterosexual” — he has kissed a few men — he likes to wear dresses on stage sometimes or to parties. “He’s a showman,” said his father, adding that he himself wouldn’t do it because “You’ve got to have nice legs for that.” He is still very private about his two-decade romance with Ms. Sarandon, noting that accounts of stars’ personal lives are inevitably “artificial or manufactured because when you’re promoting a movie, you’re trying to tell people what they want to hear. And they’re operating in stereotypes from the past — younger man, older woman, whatever it is — different perceptions that have nothing to do with reality.” After dating for years, he says, “I’m with someone right now that I’ve been with for a while. I like my life right now.” He lives in Venice, Calif., in a charming house, where he has fun art parties and writes poetry and music and plays and screenplays. (His latest, “The Heretic,” is about a trio of Jesuses, one of whom gets waterboarded because his message of love is too radical for Christian consumption.) He is still busy with the Actors’ Gang, which he founded in 1981. Through the Actors’ Gang Prison Project, Mr. Robbins, who starred in “The Shawshank Redemption,” has had some success over the last decade in renewing interest and funding for arts programs in California prisons, which he believes can help change the behavior of criminals and teach social skills. Former Attorney General Eric Holder was a strong supporter, given the soaring incarceration rates, and Mr. Robbins says his prison plays, mingling black gang members and white supremacists, should be a bipartisan project. He says he would meet with Jeff Sessions, if Mr. Sessions were willing. He’s doing a documentary on the project. The latest production of the Actors’ Gang, “The New Colossus,” opens on Feb. 8, with 12 actors from 12 different parts of the world reminiscing about or playing their ancestors in their journeys from oppression to freedom. “All of our ancestors are related in a common desire,” Mr. Robbins says. “The tribalism, dividing us by race, is not who we are. It’s being manipulated for an economic cause. One night we had people from all over the world in our little hundred-seat theater and I was like, ‘This is America right here in this room.’ And it was so powerful. The division that’s happening now is all an illusion.”
Some of my favorite music writing of the last decade has turned up in novels: the precise absurdist riffs and def(t) beats of Paul Beatty’s “Slumberland”; the beatific polluted surf tones of Thomas Pynchon’s “Inherent Vice”; the deceptively quiet way music saturates Mary Gaitskill’s “Veronica” as a fateful promise that turns into a blinding curse; the measured obsessive-compulsiveness traced by Dana Spiotta’s “Eat the Document” and “Stone Arabia,” testaments to how damaged people can use music to map the world and the scars it leaves behind. These books gauge how music penetrates (or reinforces) our defenses. In very different ways, they confirm what a woman I love once told me: the intimacy and raw power of music can be more dangerous than sex. It comes as no surprise then that novelists can be crack music journalists or critics. There’s a small treasure trove of music reportage amid the elysian cultural fields of Jonathan Lethem’s recent essay collection, “The Ecstasy of Influence.” Now Rick Moody has a collection of his own, “On Celestial Music: And Other Adventures in Listening.” I have never warmed to the Purple-American-ice-ages-majesty of Moody’s novels. But his music book is zestier and more fleshed out than I expected. Its prose overcomes Moody’s usual ornate attenuation and, as Van Morrison would say, “gets down to the real soul, people.” The book’s best essays wrestle with performers and songs as if they were Moody’s better angels and personal hellhounds. He plunges in, thoughtful and reckless, psychoanalyzing the sounds and lyrics and singers and his own reactions, caught in a blissful, bleary tug of war between the heights of intoxication and the depths of hangover. He writes with enormous reserves of empathy and grace about the Magnetic Fields (fickle, arty, doubling back on themselves like serpent-shaped licorice), Wilco (a time-exposure wedding photo, Mathew Brady via Diane Arbus), the Pogues (an Alcoholics Unanimous meeting) and the deeply peculiar Danielson Famile (a Christian cult band or a band of Christian cultists or maybe some kind of crypto-born-again art project). This is doubly appealing for me because these happen to be bands I’ve never had time or affinity for. Moody offers a window on their divergent worlds that seems at once exacting and wholly idiosyncratic, grasping their interiority and teasing out its byways and secret passwords. He persuades the reader there’s something worthwhile and even noble there, though it may be pitched at frequencies my calloused ears can’t hear. The strongest essay by far concerns Moody’s epic love/grudge match with Pete Townshend, the brains behind the Who. Negotiating the fine line between Tarkovskian guide and B-side-crazed fan, Moody parses Townshend’s records, both musical and criminal (the episode in which Townshend received a formal police caution for accessing a child porn Web site was torturously ambiguous in any event); he seeks to sort out the autobiographical from the made-up, the technique from the pyrotechnics, the real from the rationalized. Here Townshend might be a sunken character in a sprawling Dickens novel, transported to a post-Victorian world of rock, drugs and child abuse. It’s a tribute to Moody’s enthusiasm for his subjects that his affections so often overcome his affectations. “Some Propositions Concerning the Lounge Lizards” is a stiff way to approach such a limber, erudite group of musical deviants — yet Moody writes with impressive warmth about the chief Lizard, John Lurie, and the band’s bittersweet, luckless career has seldom been more fondly captured. Lurie himself defines the Lizards’ sound in a way that is (as it should be) antic yet inexplicably heartbreaking: “It was like an anthem to a small, insane country that had just gained its independence.” The basic truism of novels holds here as well: the more specificity the better. Moody’s profiles of particular artists succeed more than his casual surveys of entire scenes. “The New York Underground, 1965-1988” turns into a marshmallow round-up-the-usual-suspects exercise, trading “underground” music for “street” music without making a decent case for the transition. I agree in principle with a lot of his examples, but outside of Lou Reed’s unmentioned “Street Hassle” period (the artist as gutter flâneur), the New York punk and post-punk scenes tended toward a tribal colloquialism (the Ramones, Richard Hell, the Contortions) or a nascent utopianism (Television, Talking Heads). The impure genius of Sonic Youth’s breakthrough “Daydream Nation,” which Moody lauds without quite catching on to, was all about bundling that mismatched Velveteen baggage up in Patti Smith’s “Transcend, transcend” mantra and lighting out for parts unknown with it. This may come down to the eternal question of “cool” — who’s got it, who had it but lost it, and who wouldn’t know it if it bit them in their designer posteriors. Moody takes a shaky stand on this gangplank: he places himself squarely “Against Cool,” which is easier to declare than to persuasively articulate. His essay on the subject never rises past its fancy editorial conceit, a laundry list as “provocative” as a Cosmo article supporting the new chastity. While he gets your attention — and it is surely worth arguing whether coolness has outlived its time and usefulness — there’s just this vain hanging assertion, not backed up with polemical muscle. Isn’t “cool” just shorthand for grace under pressure, transmitted through the body politic of pop culture like some whack-a-mole version of Christianity in which no sooner is one form or figure killed than another resurrects in its place? (Also, Moody’s notion of cool is entirely predicated on the moth-eaten male model: how can Anita O’Day, Nina Simone, PJ Harvey and Kim “Kool Thing” Gordon not even appear in this census? I demand a recount.) “On Celestial Music” contains its share of paddle boat rides like “Europe, Forsake Your Drum Machines!” (which at least gets points for inferring that the entire Euro crisis can be blamed on the German robo-­capitalists Kraftwerk). But the title essay redeems the fluff. Hewing closely to Otis Redding’s “Try a Little Tenderness,” as performed live in Paris, Moody testifies with a gospel fervor that allows him to get away with clichés like “music in these troubled times.” (And exclamation points galore!!!) He lets the spirit of the song move through him like a holy ghost, not as a secular critic approaching it from outside-in, but as a firm believer feeling it from inside-out. Moody’s is a complicated, fraught Christianity, where music not only lights the way to a better life (as he unabashedly believes) but also challenges us, puts us to the test. The road to paradise, and paradisiacal music, is paved with all kinds of furtive intentions. I like it that Moody’s road is wide enough to accommodate Cotton Mather (“Their Children dance, and they go down the Grave into Hell” — Sabbath rules, dude!), where “Sister Ray” bumps hips with Funkadelic. The homily could be reduced to: author gets sober, finds devotional music, intakes Arvo Pärt and similarly cleansing sounds — colonics for the soul. But there is a mysterious mixture of generosity and not-so-fast-padre doubt as well. This means not only appreciating something like “Try a Little Tenderness,” but testing yourself against it too. The goal is to become worthy of the object of your affection, if only inside that magic moment. The best parts of “On Celestial Music” are moving, unvarnished attempts to live up to the things Moody passionately loves, in all their contradictions and human imperfections and intimations of things unseen. In its genuinely awe-struck, occasionally funny and partially clubfooted way, it’s one pretty cool book.

• Andrew is in Davos, Switzerland and will file dispatches from the World Economic Forum. • Charles Kushner speaks about his son and the Russia investigation. • Big deals today by A.I.G. and Celgene show a desire for growth. • The government is still shut down. • Facebook is doing some existential thinking. Here’s a preview of Andrew’s column on Davos and Mr. Trump, assuming that the president will still leave Washington for the Swiss Alps: Meanwhile, Davos Men and Women are thinking about  . • Seven cabinet secretaries, led by  •  and the F.D.A. commissioner,  •  ,   and   (if Mr. Trump goes)  for a populist leader to send to a hotbed of global elitism. • Populism — though, Mr. Trump aside, anxiety is on the wane ( ) • How long the world’s economies can continue to expand ( ) • How to respond to cyberwarfare by the likes of North Korea ( ) • How to improve women’s standing in the world, with several top women leaders in attendance ( ) • Big tech companies’ image woes ( ) • France’s efforts to woo business leaders, including a pre-Davos summit at Versailles that will be attended by Jamie Dimon and Sheryl Sandberg ( )  has agreed to buy   for $5.1 billion,  The deal between the two privately held companies ranks as one of the biggest liquor deals in recent years.  “U.S. volumes of super-premium tequila jumped more than 700% from 2002 to 2016, compared with a 121% rise in all tequila volumes over the same period, according to the Distilled Spirits Council.” • Patrón is the premium tequila market leader with U.S. sales of $1.6 billion in 2016, according to Euromonitor, a market research firm. We here at DealBook will forgive if you don’t. It has been a long time. With Monday’s close, the S&P 500 has now gone 395 sessions without a decline of 5% or more from a record high,   That’s the longest streak on record, surpassing the previous record of 394 trading days set in the mid-1990s. So when was the last time the market fell 5 percent from a recent high? The aftermath of Brexit in June 2016.  that six weeks after firing the former congressman Harold E. Ford Jr. for unspecified misconduct, Morgan Stanley has clarified that the misconduct was not sexual in nature. The statement is part of a legal settlement that Mr. Ford reached over the weekend with Morgan Stanley, according to a person who was briefed on the resolution but was not authorized to speak publicly. The broader contours of the settlement were unclear, including whether there was a financial component. Through a spokesman, Mr. Ford declined to comment. Before his firing last month, Mr. Ford had spent seven years at Morgan Stanley recruiting clients. He joined the investment banking industry after losing a United States Senate race in Tennessee as the Democratic nominee in 2006. Mr. Ford, 47, was fired after a female journalist told Morgan Stanley that he had harassed her at a dinner in 2014. At the time, Morgan Stanley said he had been fired “for conduct inconsistent with our values and in violation of our policies.” Some media reports of his firing said it had been triggered by the harassment allegation. Since Mr. Loeb’s Third Point emerged as an investor in the Swiss food giant, Nestlé has sold off its U.S. confectionary business, named new directors and bought Blue Bottle coffee. All of those have been great moves, according to the hedge fund. But there’s more to be done, Third Point wrote in its latest letter to investors. From the investor letter: • Better demonstrate that the company is focused on “nutrition, health and wellness,” with the implication being to divest products like ice cream and frozen pizza. • Buy back more shares. • Again consider selling the L’Oreal stake, something Nestlé has been loath to do historically. The father of Jared Kushner, who is again working at the family real estate business — this time without a title — told the WaPo in an interview that   of the Russia investigation so far and hasn’t had problems getting financing. More from the article by Michael Kranish of the WaPo: The elder Mr. Kushner also lamented the amount of criticism that his son, a senior presidential adviser, has taken: The insurer’s $5.56 billion deal to   signals that the company is increasingly looking outward, instead of inward, as it had done since its bailout during the global financial crisis. Validus is A.I.G.’s biggest acquisition by far over the past decade, according to Standard & Poor’s Global Market Intelligence. The transaction is expected to bolster the A.I.G.’s general insurance business, by adding a reinsurance platform, an insurance-linked securities asset manager and “a meaningful presence” at the Lloyd’s of London marketplace. Here’s what Brian Duperreault, A.I.G.’s chief executive, said: • Validus shareholders would receive   in cash. • Shares of Validus closed Friday at $46.72, meaning the deal represents a  . • The transaction is expected to close in  . For A.I.G.:  ,   and the law firm  For Validus:   and the law firm  In offering to buy the Juno shares that it doesn’t already own for  , Celgene is adding a maker of blood disease treatments. Perhaps more notably, it shows that the biopharmaceutical company is still on the hunt for more acquisitions. Remember that earlier this month, Celgene agreed to pay up to $7 billion for Impact Biomedicines, which also makes a treatment for a kind of blood cancer. Celgene, which is based in Summit, N.J., already owns about 9.7 percent of Juno’s shares. Here’s what Mark Alles, Celgene’s C.E.O., said: “The acquisition of Juno builds on our shared vision to discover and develop transformative medicines for patients with incurable blood cancers.” • Celgene would pay   for each share of Juno. • Juno’s shares closed on Friday at $67.81, meaning the deal is at a  . • The transaction is expected to close in  . For Celgene:   and the law firms   and  For Juno:   and the law firm  From a recent note by analysts at Pantheon Macroeconomics: Here’s more on   from the NYT. A group of moderate lawmakers is  . The Senate majority leader, Mitch McConnell, has scheduled   for noon E.T. today, though it’s unclear whether it will pass. • Wilbur Ross has fallen from Mr. Trump’s graces because of a perceived inability to strike good trade deals and a propensity to sleep in meetings. ( ) • How Jared Kushner became a focal point for China’s diplomatic outreach to the U.S. — and stirred up the worries of U.S. officials. ( ) • Deutsche Bank has flagged bank accounts tied to the Kushner family for “suspicious transactions” and referred the matter to German authorities — and may send its information to Robert Mueller as well, according to Manager Magazin of Germany. ( ,  ) The tax overhaul signed into law last month is muddying the fourth-quarter earnings picture. Improving corporate profit have been a pillar of the current rally, and analysts have forecast robust earnings growth in the coming months as the global economy gained momentum. Yet with 11 percent of S&P 500 companies having reported four-quarter results, profits have slipped 0.2 percent from a year ago. That’s well below the 10 percent analysts expected ahead of earnings season. So what gives? The tax law. Large financial firms, which have made up the bulk of companies reporting thus far, have taken big one-time, tax-related charges. Profits for financial firms in the S&P 500 fell $29.2 billion, or 57 percent. Citigroup accounted for 73 percent of that decline. John Butters, a senior earnings analyst at FactSet, writes: Exclude Citi, and the earnings growth rate for the S&P 500 would improve to 7.9 percent from -0.2 percent.  “While some of the biggest banks are reporting fourth-quarter earnings hits stemming from the new tax law, they see rich benefits over the long term, including effective tax rates that are even lower than the new 21 percent corporate rate,”  .  As the fourth-quarter earnings growth rate has fallen over the last week for S&P 500 companies, profit expectations for 2018 have risen. Here’s what Samidh Chakrabarti, a product manager at the tech giant, wrote  : Mr. Chakrabarti added that while the company was slow to address Russian interference in the 2016 presidential election, it’s working to prevent it happening again. • It spooked some publishers again by saying it would let users rank the trustworthiness of news outlets. ( ) • And its recent News Feed changes may reflect its video ambitions, some ad agencies said. ( ) • SoFi is courting Anthony Noto, Twitter’s chief operating officer, who is its most senior full-time employee. ( ,  ) • Inside Amazon Go, the e-commerce giant’s cashierless Seattle store, where our colleague tried unsuccessfully to shoplift in the name of journalism. ( ) • Marc Benioff of Salesforce said of noxious cultures at start-ups, “When I see that product is the number-one thing, the only thing that matters, that’s a real red flag.” ( ) • Tim Cook, visiting a school in Britain, told pupils he wouldn’t let his nephew use social media. ( ) • The luxury goods maker Richemont offered as much as $3.4 billion to buy the rest of Yoox Net-a-Porter. ( ) • Archer Daniels Midland has made a takeover approach to the agriculture trader Bunge, potentially creating a showdown with Glencore, according to unidentified sources. ( ) • Elliott Management is pushing for a higher takeover price for Starz than the $4.4 billion Lionsgate agreed last year. ( ) • The French drug maker Sanofi will buy Bioverativ, which makes a hemophilia drug, for more than $11.5 billion. ( ) • Carl Icahn has teamed up with Xerox’s third-biggest investor, Darwin Deason, to push for a sale, according to unidentified sources. ( ) • Ferrero’s $2.8 billion deal to buy Nestlé’s U.S. confectionary brands is a clear sign of a generational and cultural change at the Italian company. ( ) It’s Tiger Global. The American hedge fund has quietly  , worth more than $1 billion, according to the FT. More from the FT’s Martin Arnold and Miles Johnson: The Swiss bank reported 488 million Swiss francs ($508 million) in fourth-quarter pretax income,  . Omeed Malik, one of Bank of America’s top liaisons to the hedge fund world and a confidant of Jon Corzine,   after an internal investigation into a young female analyst’s accusation of inappropriate sexual conduct. More from Jessica Silver-Greenberg and Matt Goldstein of the NYT: Arbitration, primarily. But a discrimination lawyer told the WSJ, “  ever since Harvey Weinstein.” • How to practice so-called gender-lens investing and support women in the workplace. ( ) • The Sundance Film Festival, Harvey Weinstein’s old stomping ground, is now a showcase for women. ( ) • Representative Patrick Meehan, a Pennsylvania Republican who has taken a leading role in fighting sexual harassment in Congress, used taxpayer money to settle a misconduct complaint of his own. ( ) Right now, the computation to “produce” a new Bitcoin   as an American household consumes in two years, according to analysts at Morgan Stanley and the economist Alex de Vries. Some in the virtual currency community are looking for ways to reduce that figure. Here’s what Vitalik Buterin, the creator of Ethereum, told Nathaniel Popper of the NYT: Some, however, say an independent, decentralized monetary system is worth the cost. • Louis Dreyfus has teamed up with ING and ABN Amro of the Netherlands and Société Générale of France to create a blockchain platform for agricultural trading. ( ) • Bitcoin could lose 90 percent of its current value, predicts Peter Boockvar, a veteran Wall Street investor. ( ) to to sale
(Reuters) - Atlanta is still struggling with its ability to collect online payments of bills and fees, officials said on Monday, four days after a ransomware attack snarled the computer system of Georgia's capital city. Hackers caused outages of services offered through the city's website and broader computer system while demanding a ransom of $51,000 paid in bitcoin to unlock the system. "This is much bigger than a ransomware attack, this really is an attack on our government," Mayor Keisha Lance Bottoms told a news conference. "We are dealing with a (cyber) hostage situation." She did not say whether Atlanta would pay the ransom. Atlanta officials said they have determined the hackers' identity but declined to elaborate. City representatives were not immediately available for further comment. Bottoms said only that the hackers entered the city's digital system remotely as opposed having had internal access. Ransomware is a type of malware that infects computers or computer networks and then freezes them, with the attackers demanding a ransom in order to restore services. The initial assault often comes via a phishing link that someone within the network opens on their email. As the disruption in Atlanta persists, the city is losing out financially, Bottoms told an earlier news conference on Friday. It was unclear how much it stands to lose or when the city expects to get its computer system fully operational again. (Reporting by Laila Kearney in New York; Editing by Matthew Lewis)
ALMATY —  Kazakhstan's central bank has launched a blockchain-based mobile securities trading application which it hopes will allow locals to become more involved in the capital markets by simplifying access to it. The oil-rich Central Asian nation's stock and bond markets are dominated by a handful of institutional investors, with only 109,000 retail investor accounts in the nation of 18 million. The Astana government hopes to change that by selling stakes in some of the biggest state-controlled companies on the local market, and the central bank said in a statement this week its "Invest Online" app could be used for buying such stocks. At the moment though, app users can only buy the central bank's own one-year discount notes denominated in the local tenge currency and yielding 8.5 percent. Tenge deposits at local banks offer returns of 10 to 14 percent. Within a day after launch, the central bank has sold about $2,300 in notes, it said on Wednesday, and some 200 people registered as application users. (Reporting by Mariya Gordeyeva; Writing by Olzhas Auyezov; Editing by Peter Graff and Louise Heavens)
• How to kill off a bank quietly. • Snap just lost nearly $2 billion in market value. • The new tax law is having implications beyond America’s borders. • The Supreme Court helps define what a whistle-blower must do. • Newell Brands named three new directors as it fights with Starboard Value. • Broadcom and Qualcomm are getting feistier in their deal fight. The Trump administration has mostly taken a softer stance toward Wall Street, but on Wednesday, it suggested a regulatory change designed to make life harder for the big banks. The change,   the Treasury Department, is arcane, but in a financial crisis, it could be hugely consequential.  The tweak aims to increase the likelihood that a failing bank would be forced into bankruptcy, rather than into a resolution process overseen by the government. The difference might seem insignificant, especially since the current regulatory procedures for winding down a bank, introduced by the Dodd-Frank Act of 2010, are stringent and mimic bankruptcy. But the Treasury Department believes that an actual bankruptcy would be preferable. It would make the process of restructuring a failed bank more evenhanded and predictable, according to the Treasury. In turn, investors in the big Wall Street firms, and anyone doing business with them, would become more aware of the losses they could suffer if those firms crashed. The disorderly collapse of Lehman Brothers into bankruptcy set off a panic across the global financial system, according to most analyses of the period. And that is why the Dodd-Frank Act set up a way for regulators to seize a large bank and restructure it in a controlled manner, known as the orderly liquidation authority. As with bankruptcy, it envisions making creditors the new owners of a restructured firm. But it added a feature to limit panic. Under Dodd-Frank, regulators can lend to the failed bank. Such a backstop could prevent a further run on the bank. Its customers and creditors would see that the seized bank had sufficient funds to pay them. The government lending mimics the loans that banks make to bankrupt companies.  Not much at all. It recommends using the Dodd-Frank resolution framework “as an emergency tool for use in extraordinary circumstances.” But that’s how the backers of Dodd-Frank saw the process, too. Crucially, the Treasury also wants to keep the emergency government loan. But the Treasury’s proposal does introduce an important and innovative change. It calls for a special type of bankruptcy regime for large financial firms, called Chapter 14. This new regime envisions having a set of specialist judges, working with regulators in the United States and around the world, who could plan for and oversee the bankruptcies of large banks. Much depends on whether the customers and creditors of the failing bank yank their money, intensifying the run and spreading fear through the system. The Treasury argues that changes since the crisis mean banks have more cash on hand, and banks can now hold off for a short time on paying claims on financial instruments called derivatives (recall, such claims were particularly debilitating for Lehman.) Also, banks must now have detailed plans to put themselves into bankruptcy, though the Treasury last year suggested changes that might make that planning less stringent. Notably, the Treasury hopes to make Chapter 14 effective by deploying a method for restructuring a failed bank that regulators already expect to use under the orderly liquidation authority. This approach rests on turning pre-existing debt owed by a bank’s holding company into new equity at the subsidiaries where the bank does all its business. The theory: If a reassuringly large amount of new equity were created at the subsidiaries, the banks’ creditors and trading partners would feel protected and not withdraw. Indeed, the Treasury says this would eliminate the incentive for counterparties to run. In the heat of a crisis, when the scale of a bank’s losses is not known, making it hard to know how much new equity is needed, creditors and trading partners may just head for the exits, crippling the bank. Even so, Aaron Klein, a fellow at the Brookings Institution, said it made a lot of sense to enshrine this formal wind-down procedure in bankruptcy. “Why wouldn’t you want to make bankruptcy better?” he said. Under post-crisis rules, banks must earmark billions of dollars of debt that would be used for creating new equity in a resolution. Put another way, Dodd-Frank has made it possible for the Trump administration to pursue a favored policy goal. Shares of   Thursday after Kylie Jenner tweeted that she no longer opens Snapchat. The tweet comes as Snap faces growing criticism from users over the redesign of its app. So far nearly 1.5 million people have retweeted a petition asking Snap to revert to the old version,  . Earlier this week analysts at Citi became the latest to downgrade the stock over the negative reaction. Mark May of Citi wrote: European banks with significant operations in New York and other parts of the United States have seen multi-billion dollar hits on their results in the fourth quarter as a result. Changes in corporate tax rates have forced European lenders – and their American counterparts – to recognize so-called deferred tax assets at the end of last year. But, the pain is expected to be short term as most banks, including Barclays and UBS, anticipate the tax rate for their United States operations will be lower future. As earnings season edges toward a close, here is the impact on some of Europe’s largest lenders: • Barclays reported an annual loss of 1.9 billion pounds, or about $2.7 billion after it took a series of charges, including £900 million related to tax changes in the United States. “Given the group’s substantial U.S. operations, this is expected to result in a reduction of the group’s effective tax rate in 2018 and future periods to mid-20 percent,” the bank said on Thursday. • Credit Suisse reported a loss of 2.13 billion Swiss francs, or about $2.3 billion, in the fourth quarter, driven primarily by 2.23 billion francs in income tax expenses related to the reassessment of its deferred tax assets. • Deutsche Bank reported a full-year loss of 497 million euros, or about $612 million. John Cryan, the Deutsche Bank chief executive, said: “Only a charge related to US tax reform at the end of the year meant that we had to post a full-year after-tax loss.” • HSBC reported a pretax profit of $17.2 billion for 2017, but took a charge of $1.3 billion to reflect a reevaluation of its deferred tax balances. • Société Générale said its profit was dragged down in the quarter after it was hit by restructuring charges related to its French retail banking network and the impact of tax reforms in France and in the United States. • UBS fell to a loss in the fourth quarter as a result of a writedown of 2.87 billion francs on deferred tax assets. Keep an eye out for Standard Chartered when it reports its annual results next week. The bank, which is based in Britain, but makes most of its money in Asia, has been recently touting its ability to serve the North American market. According to the Supreme Court, in an opinion written by Ruth Bader Ginsburg, it requires  , not just your bosses. More from Andrew Ackerman of the WSJ: The Supreme Court, in an opinion by Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg, rejected that reading of the statute. It applied a simple analysis: “Courts are not at liberty to dispense with the condition — tell the S.E.C. — Congress imposed.” By not reporting his suspicions to the S.E.C., he lost the protection afforded whistle-blowers. The maker of Sharpie markers and Elmer’s glue said today that it was   amid its fight with Starboard. They are: •  , the chairman and former C.E.O. of Church & Dwight, the maker of Arm & Hammer •  , the former C.E.O. of Reynolds American, the tobacco company •  , a former C.E.O. of Transora, a services provider for packaged goods companies (who will be nominated at the company’s upcoming annual meeting)  That this was a response to Starboard, which has criticized Newell’s management team — and is seeking to  . Ray Dalio, the founder of Bridgewater Associates, the world’s biggest hedge fund, thinks so. Last week, Mr. Dalio said: “The risks of a recession in the next 18-24 months are rising.” Now he says there is a 70 percent chance of one before the next presidential election in 2020,  . During an appearance Wednesday at the Harvard Kennedy School’s Institute of Politics, Mr. Dalio said: Broadcom didn’t walk away after Qualcomm raised its takeover bid for NXP Semiconductor, but it did   by $3 a share, to $79. Why? Because the new NXP offer transferred $4.10 per Qualcomm share to NXP investors.  that the move “made an inadequate offer even worse,” and argued that the NXP deal couldn’t have gotten done at the original price of $110 a share. Looks like we’re headed to a showdown at Qualcomm’s annual meeting on March 6. • As online streaming booms and 5G gets closer, is now the time for Charlie Ergen to sell Dish Networks? ( ) • Hedge funds like Verition Partners are trying to save the shareholder appraisal process, meant to wring more money from mergers, from a series of adverse court rulings. ( ) • Britain might block Melrose Industries’s hostile takeover of the aerospace supplier GKN on national security grounds. ( ) • Two big U.S. hospital networks, Bon Secours Health System and Mercy Health, have agreed to merge, amid a surge in deal-making in the industry. ( ) Why has its growth slowed? A   suggests that rising consumer demand, as well as what companies produce and which tech they use, drives productivity improvements. More from   with Jaana Remes of McKinsey, one of the study’s authors:  Prepare for  , Jay Powell said.  , Randal Quarles added. The saving rate is at  . And no one knows why the markets  . • Mississippi granted a tax break worth up to $6 million to a hotel tied to the Trump family business. So could that violate the emoluments clause? ( ) • Sam Nunberg, a Trump campaign adviser, is   with Robert Mueller. And t he special counsel has   — under seal — against Paul Manafort and Rick Gates. • Congress’s next fight over Dreamers may come with   to avert a government shutdown on March 23. Meanwhile, Melania Trump’s parents have become lawful U.S. residents, perhaps  • Senators James Inhofe, Republican of Oklahoma, and Sheldon Whitehouse, Democrat of Rhode Island, called for a bipartisan infrastructure bill. ( ) • Survivors of school shootings shared their stories with President Trump and pleaded for action. ( ) • Representative Trey Gowdy of the House Oversight Committee demanded documents relating to first-class travel by Scott Pruitt, the head of the E.P.A. ( ) The bank’s employees are scattered across Midtown Manhattan. So it’s  , which could be  , to house 15,000 workers. (Its current H.Q. — which, fun fact, is where the pistols from Alexander Hamilton and Aaron Burr’s duel reside — was designed for about 3,500.)  The forthcoming JPMorgan skyscraper is the first major project under New York City’s Midtown East rezoning plan. The bank dropped plans for Manhattan’s Far West Side after failing to secure subsidies from the city.    last year, hit by the U.S. tax overhaul, but promised to  . And José Manuel Barroso, chairman of Goldman Sachs International, has been criticized for  , which he led until 2014. The carmaker didn’t specify what Raj Nair, the head of its North American operations,  , only that his ouster arose out of  . But the move adds to turmoil at the struggling company. The context: Ford already apologized to its workers after the NYT investigated longstanding abuses of women at two of its plants in Chicago. And its operations chief in China left earlier this year for pre-Ford “personal reasons.” • The Dallas Mavericks franchise   to investigate   against its former team president. • A national online survey found sexual harassment and assault to be much more common than previous studies had suggested. ( ) • The former NPR executive Michael Oreskes was warned repeatedly that he was acting inappropriately toward women, and kept doing it, according to an independent investigation. ( ) • Tom Schumacher, the Disney executive who took “Frozen” to Broadway, has been accused of workplace harassment. ( ) • An anonymous chat app is helping lift the lid on sexual harassment in South Korea. ( ) The secure messaging service is holding   before its highly anticipated (and record-breaking) initial coin offering. More from Adrianne Jeffries of The Verge: • The S.E.C. charged the virtual currency exchange BitFunder and its founder with fraud. ( ) • The Justice Department has made gains on a seized Bitcoin hoard, but has had trouble cashing out. ( ) • Some new ways of selling shovels to Bitcoin miners. ( ) • Lawmakers in Britain are examining sympathetic ways to regulate digital currencies. ( ) • New software at big cryptocurrency exchanges could make Bitcoin transactions cheaper. ( ) And Bitcoin’s at   today, according to  . • The latest chatbots are impressive. But they might be even better if their inventors weren’t scared of them saying something vile in public. ( ) • Airbnb is trying to promote its Experiences business as it heads toward an I.P.O., with little success. ( ) • Amazon’s Alexa could be the next great consumer computing platform, says Farhad Manjoo. ( ) • Roger McNamee, an early investor in Facebook, says it could be fixed by charging users for a better News Feed, arranged in cable-style bundles. ( ) • Uber will keep investing in Southeast Asia, despite losing money to local rivals. ( ) • A former Google engineer has sued the company for discrimination and wrongful termination, saying he fired for responding to racist and sexist encounters. ( ) • Naspers of South Africa has become an under-the-radar e-commerce giant and global tech investor. ( ) • One of Twitter’s solutions for bot accounts: limiting automated tweets. ( ) • Facebook is using algorithms to flag expressions of suicidal thoughts. ( ) • Apple wants to patent a way to count calories burned during yoga. ( ) •  , one of Citigroup’s co-heads of M. & A., is leaving. ( ) •   and   are the finalists to become Cisco’s global sales chief and No. 2 executive, unnamed sources say. ( ) • Glassdoor has hired   from Lithium Technologies as its C.F.O. It also named   as its first C.O.O. and   as its vice president of global corporate communications. ( ) • Coinbase is hiring a C.F.O. ( ) “There is a credibility gap between what they say and the reality of what is to come.” • Toys “R” Us plans to close another 200 stores and lay off many of its corporate staff after disappointing holiday sales, unnamed sources say. ( ) • British officials have been holding talks with Unilever amid fears that the Anglo-Dutch consumer group could choose to have one unified headquarters in Rotterdam, not London. ( ) • Hedge funds are buying planes and leasing them to airlines. ( ) • A fund managed directly by Alan Howard, who made his name with impressive profits during the financial crisis in 2008, lost nearly 9 percent net of fees from May through December. ( ) • Greece’s Parliament voted to investigate politicians over allegations of bribery by the Swiss drugmaker Novartis. ( )
• What’s at stake in Alabama • Will Republicans enact their tax plan by year’s end? • What does Apple spend its cash on? Not acquisitions. • Is Broadcom making a jobs promise it can’t fulfill? As Alabamians  , here’s the context: • Republicans have a two-seat majority in the Senate. Alabama hasn’t had a Democratic senator in 25 years, but the controversy around Roy Moore has made a once-safe seat potentially up for grabs. • Even if the tax legislation is signed into law this year — we’ll get to the state of play in a moment, though there’s a chance things don’t get wrapped up before the holidays — Republicans still have plenty of other issues, from health care to infrastructure spending, that will have to get through the Senate. Having Doug Jones, Mr. Moore’s Democratic opponent, in the Senate would make that effort more difficult. (So could having a Republican senator who feuds with Mitch McConnell and other G.O.P. leaders.) Pre-election polls have been incredibly volatile, though   Mr. Moore is in the lead. Polling stations close at 8 p.m. E.T. Odds on prediction markets have slipped to around 66 percent, Goldman noted. The firm, however, put a   by the end of the year. That point was one of six observations that Goldman’s economic team put out Tuesday. Here are a few others:  Goldman thinks the corporate tax rate will be cut to 20 percent, but will not take effect until 2019. That would give companies a reason to move up capital expenditures, or capex. “Given the incentive for companies to pull forward deductible expenses into 2018, the one-year delay combined with full expensing of equipment capex would create a more important incentive for capex in 2018 than prior capex incentives enacted by Congress over the last 15 years.”  Goldman expects limits on interest expense to resemble the Senate’s plan. “Along with limits on the US share of worldwide interest expense and the indirect effects of a 20 percent rate and changes to taxation of foreign profits, companies will have a greater incentive to issue debt abroad than they do under current law.” “  by around 3 percentage points on average over the next ten years.”  “It is difficult to predict how and when states will adapt to the changes, but they have an incentive to do so. As the limitation of SALT deductibility is one of the largest sources of new revenue in the tax reform legislation, the proposed tax cut could turn out to be much larger than expected if states successfully adapt to the changes.” Apple’s purchase of Shazam  , got us to wondering: How acquisitive has Apple been? The answer? Not very, especially for a company with more than $250 billion in cash on its balance sheet and a market value within spitting distance of $1 trillion. Apple has disclosed only 11 acquisitions valued at $4.5 billion in its history, according to Thomson Reuters. To put that into perspective, we asked Thomson Reuters to pull some numbers. (One note on the data below, deal values include completed acquisitions and ones that are currently pending.) • The most acquisitive company? General Electric, which has made 1,206 acquisitions valued at $311 billion. Of course, G.E. has been around for more than a century, while Apple went public in 1980. So how does Apple compare with other tech companies? • Microsoft, Oracle, Cisco, HP and Intel each have made acquisitions valued at more than $50 billion. • Google’s parent, Alphabet, which was founded in 1998, has done 223 deals valued at $29 billion. Facebook? The social media giant, which has been around since 2004, has pulled the trigger on 65 deals with a value of $23 billion. • Apple, in fact, doesn’t even rank in the top 100 most acquisitive tech companies.  What have been the two most acquisitive tech companies? AOL — now a part of Verizon — and Broadcom. Both have been in the news lately. Broadcom made a $105 billion unsolicited offer for Qualcomm last month. Meanwhile, deals for Time Warner and Time Inc. has brought renewed attention to AOL’s $165 billion acquisition of Time Warner. So argues Andrew in  , citing the $1.5 billion in “synergies” — read, “cost-saving layoffs” — that the analysts think the chip maker could reap by buying Qualcomm. Based on Broadcom’s moves with previous takeovers, that could translate into about 5,400 jobs being cut. That runs contrary to what Broadcom’s C.E.O., Hock Tan, told President Trump at a news conference last month announcing that the company would   to the U.S. from Singapore. More from Andrew’s column: With   the $110 a share price that the company agreed to pay for NXP Semiconductors, the chip maker must now wage two deal battles at once. While some analysts and investors think Qualcomm might raise its bid for NXP as a way to deter Broadcom — which doesn’t want the NXP deal to become any more expensive — Qualcomm says that for now it’s sticking by its $110-a-share offer. Under the terms, Interstate will become the exclusive supplier of car batteries to Advance, one of the biggest auto parts sellers in the United States starting this spring. Interstate believes that the partnership could bolster its sales significantly, while Advance is hoping that a product alliance with a well-regarded parts maker would help stanch a 43 percent drop in its stock price over the past year.  The companies view this as a way to help guard against Amazon, which has been moving (among many, many product lines) into the aftermarket car parts business. From a statement by Scott Miller, Interstate’s C.E.O.:   , which is reckoning with e-commerce’s effect on inflation as it decides how quickly to raise interest rates. The department’s long-awaited study of the Senate Republicans’ proposed overhaul runs to about 489 words in length (including the title and footnotes) and, in the reckoning of even conservative commentators, does not actually detail the legislation’s economic effects.  Will the Treasury Department’s paper change any lawmaker’s mind? The NYT quoted a senior Senate aide who said that congressional Republicans were  , especially since it came out so close to the start of formal talks between House and Senate negotiators to reconcile their tax bills. • It’s “an odd way to analyze a tax bill,” said Scott Greenberg at the Tax Foundation. • “I don’t believe in magic,” said David Brockway, a staff director of the Joint Committee on Taxation during the Reagan administration. • Of a 1-percentage-point difference between the Treasury’s economic growth assumptions and that of the Congressional Budget Office, Mark Mazur, an economist who worked for the Obama administration,  , “It’s the equivalent of me being one foot taller and able to dunk a basketball.” • Small investors remain unhappy about the Senate bill’s “first-in-first-out” stock-selling rule. ( ) • Finance ministers from Europe’s largest economies wrote to the White House and the Treasury Department saying that tax cut plans would flout international agreements and undermine trade. ( ) • The proposed tax code changes could make the United States far less friendly than financial centers abroad like Hong Kong and London, write Cliff Asness and Michael Mendelson of the hedge fund AQR Capital Management. ( ) Comcast acknowledged publicly yesterday that  . “We never got the level of engagement needed to make a definitive offer,” the cable giant said in a statement. That clears the path for Disney to buy the Fox television and movie studios, stakes in the international broadcasters Sky and Star and other significant divisions. As we said yesterday, a deal could be struck this week, though it’s unclear whether an announcement would specify a role at Disney for James Murdoch. (If he does get one, it probably would involve overseeing the international broadcast businesses.) , formerly DealBook’s “Jack Flack” columnist. • The FT named Susan Fowler, the former Uber engineer whose blog post helped kick off a reckoning about sexual misconduct by men in the workplace, as its person of the year. ( ) • NFL Network suspended three analysts, including the Hall of Fame running back Marshall Faulk, after a former employee accused the men of sexually harassing and assaulting her. ( ) • Four women who had publicly accused Mr. Trump of sexual misconduct renewed their allegations publicly yesterday, demanding that Congress investigate the president’s actions. ( ) • Representative Blake Farenthold, Republican of Texas, is under scrutiny by the House Ethics Committee amid new allegations of a “frat house” atmosphere in his congressional office. ( ) • Mario Batali has stepped away from his restaurant empire after four women spoke with Eater about being groped and harassed by the celebrity chef. ( ,  ) • The New Yorker fired a prominent political journalist, Ryan Lizza, over what a representative called “improper sexual misconduct.” ( ) • The kind of sexual harassment training that is increasingly spreading in corporate America doesn’t work. ( ) That’s what Chamath Palihapitiya, the former Facebook executive turned venture capitalist said at   last month. Mr. Palihapitiya, who was a vice president of growth at the tech juggernaut, recommended that users take a “hard break” from social media. :  Kevin Roose of the NYT delved into the world of the   and found design that’s reminiscent of the 1990s — and growth prospects that appear similar to the post-dotcom-bust 2000s, since these companies are largely shut off from mainstream sources of funding. As Bitcoin continues its rocket-like ascent — “I don’t think anyone wants to go in and fight the trend,” a brokerage executive   — both the Securities and Exchange Commission and the Commodities Futures Trading Commission are   the frenzy over digital currency. Regulators have already tightened the reins on at least one digital currency matter: The food review app Munchee canceled its initial coin offering yesterday after the S.E.C. issued a warning about the forthcoming deal. • The gap between the futures price and the Bitcoin price has caused some concern. ( ) • Futures tied to Bitcoin are a big deal, but a bigger one would be the emergence of options, according to Andy Mukherjee. ( ) • Jessica Verrilli, the Twitter executive who oversaw the company’s mergers strategy, is leaving at the end of the year. ( ) • Mr. Trump has boasted of cutting more regulations than have other presidents, but government records tell a different story. ( ) • Jim Simons, the billionaire founder of Renaissance Technologies, shares the key to his investing success: He says he “never overrode the model.” ( ) • Carl Icahn has picked another board fight with Xerox. ( ) • SoftBank has agreed to invest another $500 million in the satellite broadband provider OneWeb, according to a person familiar with the matter. ( ) • The French IT services firm Atos is making an unsolicited bid to buy the smartcard maker Gemalto for about $5 billion, adding to a series of deals in the payments sector. ( ) • Westfield, the mall operator based in Australia, agreed to a takeover by the European property company Unibail-Rodamco, which valued it at $15.7 billion. ( ) • The boom in special-purpose acquisition companies is driven by huge sums of money trying to find a home and any half-decent return, which gives it all a peak-of-the-markets feel. ( ) • K.K.R. will replace Blackstone as the manager of a credit vehicle focused on small and medium companies with below-investment-grade credit ratings. ( ) • Steve Cohen’s Point72 Ventures has invested a fraction of his $13 billion fortune in early-stage fintech start-ups, but he’s not looking for VC returns. ( ) • Apple made less than $100 million by selling stock in Dec. 1980. Massachusetts regulators wouldn’t let individual investors touch it because they deemed it “too risky” under rules “aimed at wedding out highfliers that don’t have solid earnings foundations.” ( ) • HSBC said that American authorities were preparing to dismiss criminal charges against the bank, five years after it reached an agreement to avoid prosecution related to lapses in its money-laundering controls. ( )
WASHINGTON — Nearly $800 million worth of fentanyl pills were illegally sold to online customers in the United States over two years by Chinese distributors who took advantage of internet anonymity and an explosive growth in e-commerce, according to a Senate report released on Wednesday. A yearlong Senate investigation found that American buyers of the illegal drugs lived mostly in Ohio, Pennsylvania and Florida. The Chinese sellers primarily used Bitcoin, the digital currency, as their preferred method of payment and shipped the drugs through other countries to reduce the risk of the opioids being seized by customs officials, Senate investigators said. The 104-page bipartisan report was produced by the Senate Homeland Security Committee’s investigations arm. It was requested by Senators Rob Portman, Republican of Ohio and the panel’s chairman, and Tom Carper of Delaware, the committee’s top Democrat. They will discuss the report’s findings in a hearing set for Thursday and are expected to press law enforcement and Postal Service officials for details on plans to combat the growing opioid shipments. China has a large pharmaceutical industry and hosts thousands of illegal labs that manufacture counterfeit and illicit drugs, Senate investigators said. The country has long been identified by American officials as the source of much of the illegal opioids flowing into the United States. The report, Senate investigators say, shows how easy it is for Americans to buy the drugs online, and why officials at the post office and Customs and Border Protection has struggled to track and stop the shipments. The Senate investigators said drugs traffickers are exploiting a loophole in the international mail system to send hundreds of pounds of deadly opioids into the United States each year. Commercial shippers such as UPS and FedEx are required by law to supply Customs and Border Protection with advanced data about packages before they are shipped. The information includes names, addresses and the contents of the packages. That information is matched against intelligence and other enforcement data to flag suspicious parcels. But customs officials say they currently do not receive advanced shipping data from all packages shipped through Postal Service that can help the agency spot opioids hidden in international packages. The service is not required to obtain advanced data from foreign postal organizations; mailed packages are inspected manually by customs officers at nine mail facilities in the United States that receive international mail. Congress is considering legislation that would require foreign post offices to provide that electronic information, but the Postal Service said many poor countries are unable to produce the data. But even with the advance data, some drugs get through, federal law enforcement officials said. Drug trafficking organizations continue to use FedEx and UPS to send heroin and opioids into the country, according to investigators with Homeland Security Investigations, a division of Immigration and Customs Enforcement. Investigators said synthetic drug traffickers are getting more creative in how they ship drugs through the postal system, exploiting the sheer volume of international mail and sending smaller packages. According to federal investigators, the use of illegal fentanyl and other opioids in the United States has exploded since 2014. Nearly 43,000 Americans died from opioid overdoses in 2016, the most recent data available, according to the Centers for Disease Control. Last October,     but did not make any new funding available to combat it. On Monday, Patrick Kennedy, a former Democratic representative from Rhode Island and a member of Mr. Trump’s commission to address the opioid crisis, said the administration’s efforts were “essentially a sham.” Nearly two weeks ago, Mr. Trump signed legislation to provide Customs and Border Protection officers with additional screening devices and other tools to detect illicit drugs. The legislation provides $9 million to the agency to buy portable chemical screening devices and new laboratory equipment at land-based ports of entry, airports and international mail facilities.

A young man stands inside a hole sheathed in dense forest, shoveling dirt, as two women — one young, the other middle-aged — silently watch. The older woman sinks down, taking off her glove to accept a small object just beyond the shot. As the young man bends over, his hat respectfully removed, the woman takes off her scarf to wrap the object — a tiny skull. In two new films, the now-familiar narrative of the Holocaust is reframed by telling the story from the perspective of gentiles. Two filmmakers from countries with fraught relationships with their Jewish pasts have sought to explore the meaning, and impact, of the Holocaust on their own, primarily non-Jewish, societies. In both  ’s “Ida” and Lucía Puenzo’s   non-Jews — or those who believe themselves to be so — stumble across reminders of the genocide of the Jews. In “Ida,” set in 1960s Poland, a novice nun named Anna (Agata Trzebuchowska) on the cusp of taking her vows, not only discovers that she has a Communist-firebrand aunt named Wanda (Agata Kulesza), but also uncovers a far more unsettling secret: though she was raised an orphan in a Roman Catholic convent, she is Jewish by birth. On a journey in search of their family’s tragic fate, which culminates in that dense forest, they encounter a country intent on denying and evading its guilt all at once: I didn’t do it, and you can’t prove it, anyway. The director of the lush teenage romance “ ,” Mr. Pawlikowski is particularly interested in stories of young women on the verge of momentous change. “ ,” opening Friday, reflects the awakening — moral, ethnic (if not religious), and sensual — of a sheltered young woman. Instead of being drawn toward Judaism, as Anna might be in another kind of film, she literally lets down her hair, removing her wimple and befriending a good-looking saxophonist. “I didn’t want the film to be about Jewish identity, per se,” Mr. Pawlikowski said in an interview in New York in January. “I wanted it slightly more universal, about identity, full stop.” He is attracted to neither/nor characters in part because of his own buried family history. “My grandmother was Jewish, and died in Auschwitz, although I wasn’t aware of it” growing up, Mr. Pawlikowski said. “I always felt I was able to encompass all sorts of things, and I resent having to define myself. That’s why I make art, I suppose.” “Ida” revisits the silent years of the postwar Communist era, when the Holocaust was rarely discussed in Poland, and the country’s Jewish history was played down. The director chose to shoot the film in black and white, a tribute to his stash of childhood photographs. The Poland of “Ida” is not only beautiful, but also scarred — the walls and buildings here seem to speak silently to the terrors of the war — and unpredictable. “You take the wrong turning, and it really changes,” he said. “I have nostalgia for that kind of situation, I suppose. God forbid I should live in that situation, needless to say, but in art!” Mr. Pawlikowski chose 1960s Poland as his subject partly for its resonances with his childhood — he fled to England at 14 with his parents on what he thought was a vacation — and for the sense of moral agency he believes is not found elsewhere. “There’s a kind of total virtual reality and virtual morality” in the West, he said. “We are all liberal moral people, but we’ve never been tested. And Poland still has a feeling that good and evil, and all the in between, is played out in a more visceral way.” “ ,” which opened Friday, seems to take place under the same vast, empty skies as “Ida.” A family of Patagonian hoteliers in late 1950s Argentina, including the undersized 12-year-old Lilith (Florencia Bado), make the acquaintance of a physician who introduces himself as Helmut Gregor (Alex Brendemühl). He befriends Lilith, who is naïvely attracted to his air of dashing vigor, and woos her parents with the promise of human perfectibility — a growth spurt for Lilith — and a boost to her father’s doll-making business. “That for me was the most terrifying idea of evil,” Ms. Puenzo said in an interview in New York this month. “How somebody can manage to get to each member of that family and make them fall in love with him, trust him.” The doctor, of course, is the notorious Auschwitz physician Josef Mengele, hiding in Argentina shortly before his flight to Paraguay in 1959, and his ministrations are accompanied by secret experiments on his unknowing victims. Ms. Puenzo’s film, adapted from her own novel, is posed as a question, directed at the citizens of all countries that allowed in Nazi criminals after the war: How did you let it happen? “I didn’t want this story to be only about a German meeting a Jewish family,” Ms. Puenzo said. “I think we should also be implicated in this story.” “The German Doctor” is structured as a crypto-horror film, its unsuspecting family charmed, and ultimately menaced, by the beast Mengele. “We were working with the idea and the structure and the climate of terror films, but we wanted to disguise this,” Ms. Puenzo said. She sought to balance the vast Patagonian landscape, glimpsed through doors and windows, and in outdoor scenes, with the crabbed interior world of the film, providing a “contrast with all the world of details — of the body, of experimentation” in Mengele’s notebooks. Mengele is the beast, but his adult victims in “The German Doctor” are not blameless, either: Tempted by the same Aryan ideology rampant in postwar Argentina, they expose their children to unimaginable risk. Ultimately, this nondescript couple must confront the reflected horror of the Holocaust as it threatens their children. “I don’t care who he is,” Eva (Natalia Oreiro) ultimately decides, and her husband, Enzo (Diego Peretti), begs to differ: “I do. I care who he is.” For Ms. Puenzo, the moral blindness endemic to “The German Doctor” inevitably paves the way for the horrors of the Dirty War. Ignoring the torture centers on your block was just the same as ignoring the Nazis on your block. Echoing the relation between its interior and exterior landscapes, “The German Doctor” is a small story — family threatened by a mysterious stranger — posed against a vast historical landscape, much of which remains deliberately hidden from its characters. “I could be able to make a Mengele that is enchanting because we know he is a monster from the outside,” Ms. Puenzo said. “All the tension of the film is because we know something that they don’t know.”
Two former banking stars are joining forces.  , a former top wealth management executive on Wall Street, joined the board of the software start-up Digital Asset Holdings, which is run by Blythe Masters, a former investment banker. Last month, Digital Asset Holdings announced that it had raised $60 million from a group of banks and other investors, including Goldman Sachs, IBMand JPMorgan Chase, and said it would expand its board. The company develops software to speed up trade settlement, money transfer and other behind-the-scenes transactional activities in the global financial markets. It is based on the blockchain concept that underpins the virtual currency Bitcoin. Ms. Krawcheck is the chief executive and a co-founder of Ellevest, an online investment firm that caters to women, and she is the chairwoman of Ellevate Network, a professional women’s network. Earlier in her career, she was the head of Bank of America Merrill Lynch’s wealth management division, as well as head of Citigroup’s wealth management unit and its chief financial officer. Ms. Masters is a former top banker from JPMorgan Chase, where she was head of commodities before leaving in 2014. She was part of the team of bankers who developed the   in the 1990s. Financial institutions are studying blockchain technology as a promising way to modernize markets, and Ms. Masters added to its legitimacy when she joined Digital Asset Holdings last year. Other board members include Donald R. Wilson Jr., the chief executive of the proprietary trading firm the DRW Trading Group; Cristobal Conde, the former chief executive of the financial software firm SunGard; and Catherine Flax, the head of commodities in the Americas for the French bank BNP Paribas.
A growing number of virtual currency investors are worried that the prices of Bitcoin and other digital tokens have been artificially propped up by a widely used exchange called Bitfinex, which has a checkered history of hacks and opaque business practices. In December, Bitfinex was subpoenaed by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission, a United States regulatory agency. The news, first reported by Bloomberg on Tuesday and confirmed by a source familiar with the subpoena but not allowed to publicly discuss an ongoing investigation, led to a sell-off in most virtual currencies. The people behind Bitfinex issue a virtual currency called Tether. Unlike most digitals tokens, every Tether is supposed to be backed by traditional money — the United States dollar. New Tether tokens are issued when investors give them dollars. One dollar is worth one token. Because of the credibility that comes with that tie to the dollar, Tether are often used to buy other virtual currencies like Bitcoin. In recent months, however, many investors have been raising alarm bells about Tether. Hundreds of millions of dollars worth of new Tether were created; almost always when the prices of other virtual currencies were heading down. The Tether were used on the Bitfinex exchange to make big purchases of Bitcoin and other tokens, helping push their prices back up, according to multiple analyses of data from Bitfinex. “This became more and more concerning, because every time the markets went down, you have seen the same thing happen,” said Joey Krug, the co-chief investment officer at Pantera Capital, which runs several virtual currency hedge funds. “It could mean that a lot of the rally over December and January might not have been real.” Long before news of the subpoena, Bitfinex, which is believed to host more trading than any other Bitcoin exchange in the world, had gained a reputation for a  , with European executives, offices in Asia and registration in the Caribbean. It is not yet clear what information the regulators are seeking. Technically, the Tether tokens are issued by a separate company (called Tether) that is owned and operated by the same people who run Bitfinex. The C.F.T.C. subpoenaed that company at the same time that it subpoenaed Bitfinex, according to a person familiar with the matter. Bitfinex has not commented on the subpoena or recent reports about Tether, and company officials did not respond to repeated requests for comment. In the past, the exchange’s executives and spokesman   that its customers are simply using Tether to buy virtual currencies as they might otherwise use United States dollars. Bitfinex had contracted with an American firm, Friedman, to audit its records and prove that its operation of Tether is above board. But last week,   with Friedman, after waiting months for it to finish the audit. That news generated more suspicion. “It’s a signal to the market of what those who have scrutinized the situation already believe: There is a problem here,” said Jill Carlson, a former trader at Goldman Sachs who now consults with a variety of virtual currency companies. “The dissolution of a relationship between an auditor and a company is very rarely a good sign that the company is behaving in accordance with market best practices.” The concern about Bitfinex is one of several issues that have helped depress the value of virtual currencies over the last month, after a roaring, yearlong rally. Regulators in several countries, like South Korea and the United States, have expressed concerns about manipulation and fraud, and hinted at a crackdown. In Japan, a large virtual currency exchange, Coincheck, was hacked in late January and lost nearly $500 million worth of a virtual currency known as NEM, raising questions about the relatively untested security practices of virtual currency exchanges. Still, Japan is one of the few places where virtual currency exchanges are overseen by regulators. Many of the largest virtual currency exchanges, including Bitfinex, operate with essentially no regulatory oversight. Bitfinex was hacked in 2015 and again in 2016, and Tether was hacked at the end of last year — with the combined losses totaling more than $100 million. The company shared few details about these hacks. But after the biggest theft, in 2016, it was cut off by Wells Fargo and its banks in Taiwan. The banking problems have made it hard for customers to get money in and out of Bitfinex, but traders have continued to use the exchange, in part because of Tether. Tether   last year from Friedman, the accounting firm, suggesting that it had bank accounts with dollars corresponding to all the Tether that had been issued. But the report was far from conclusive and Tether has never produced a real audit, leading to suspicions that Bitfinex may be printing virtual money backed by nothing. The Tether currency has been valuable to traders because it allows them to hold a stable token, tied to the value of the dollar, and move it quickly between virtual currency exchanges. But there is a downside. Because the identity of Tether holders is not always clear, the movement of the virtual token between exchanges — and across national borders — has raised concerns among lawyers about money laundering. The spread of Tether beyond Bitfinex has also spread the risk of its failure to other exchanges. Market analysts have grown particularly concerned with the rapid pace at which new Tether have been issued and their timing. In a single week in mid-January, $450 million new Tether were created, bringing the total amount of Tether to more than $2 billion. Several anonymous reports circulating among traders, including  , have pointed to data from Bitfinex itself, showing that the price of Bitcoin has frequently gone up soon after new Tether were created, generally as a result of big trades on Bitfinex. “This absolutely reeks of price manipulation,” a security researcher and market analyst, Tony Arcieri,   in mid-January. Many investors and traders have pushed back against that criticism, noting that smart traders simply may be looking to buy when the markets are down. “My personal biases make me inclined to believe that Bitfinex is not using Tether to manipulate the price of Bitcoin,” said Jeremy Gardner, a managing partner at the investment firm Ausum Ventures. “If they have attempted to do so, which would be deeply concerning, it’s hard to imagine that such fraudulent issuance at its current volume could single-handedly buoy the price of Bitcoin.” But Mr. Krug, at Pantera Capital, said that if Tether were really being used by investors, they would probably also want to buy new Tether when the markets were going up, which has not been the case. Also, they would not always want it in exact increments of $100 million, as has been the case. “After you see this enough times, you just start to wonder what’s really going on here,” Mr. Krug said. The Bitcoin community is sensitive to the possibility of price manipulation because a team of academics   suggesting that the price of Bitcoin was artificially inflated in 2013 by a single player operating on the largest exchange at the time, Mt. Gox. One of the authors of that paper, Tyler Moore, said it could be hard to tell if similar price manipulation were going on today, though he noted that a lack of transparency made it hard for anyone to be certain of anything. “Greater assurances are needed that the trades taking place are in fact legitimate and reflect buying and selling by independent actors,” said Mr. Moore, an assistant professor at the University of Tulsa. “Unless and until such oversight is implemented, we cannot trust the exchange rate to reflect only legitimate sources of supply and demand.”
SAN FRANCISCO — As the price of Bitcoin has soared, the virtual currency has edged toward the mainstream. Square, the fast-growing payments company run by the Twitter co-founder Jack Dorsey, has begun selling Bitcoins to ordinary consumers, and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange will soon allow banks to trade on the value of Bitcoin. But if you want to see where the price of Bitcoin is actually determined in round-the-clock bidding, you have to go to a number of unregulated exchanges that often fly in the face of American and European laws. These days, no exchange is bigger than Bitfinex, an opaque operation that provides no information on its website about where it is or who operates the company. Bitfinex, which is officially incorporated in the British Virgin Islands, has been fined by regulators in the United States and cut off by American banks, and it has lost millions of dollars of customer money in two separate hackings, leading critics to question whether it even has the money it claims to hold. In the latest blow, on Tuesday, an alternative virtual currency that is owned and operated by the same people as Bitfinex, known as Tether, announced that it had been hacked and lost around $30 million worth of digital tokens. None of that has been enough to stop customers from pumping billions of dollars worth of virtual currency trades through Bitfinex in recent weeks — on some days, the exchange claimed to be doing more trades, by dollar value, than some stock exchanges in the United States. Even many people who believe in virtual currencies worry that the mixture of loose controls and booming trading at the world’s largest exchange is likely to cause trouble for all the investors piling into virtual currencies, even those who don’t go near Bitfinex. “I’m worried about the systemic risk that this centralized company poses, and I’m worried that if they go down, they will take down the space with them,” said Emin Gün Sirer, an associate professor of computer science at Cornell University, who has a track record of   in the growing virtual currency industry. The chief executive of Bitfinex and Tether, Jan Ludovicus van der Velde, said in an email on Tuesday that “the financial position of the company has never been stronger.” Concerns over virtual currency exchanges are nothing new. The first and largest Bitcoin exchange, Mt. Gox, collapsed in 2014 after losing $500 million of customer money to hackers. This year, law enforcement took down another large Bitcoin exchange, BTC-E, which was accused of being a way station for many of the Bitcoin flowing through online black markets and ransomware attacks. Regulators in the United States and a few other countries have tried to tame the business, and the largest exchanges in the United States and Japan are now under official oversight. Those regulated exchanges, though, are dwarfed by unregulated ones like Bitfinex and several that have popped up in South Korea, where regulators have been slow to act. The liquid nature of the Bitcoin markets, flowing around national borders and laws, is a product of the virtual currency’s unusual structure. Bitcoin is stored and moved through a decentralized network of computers that are not under the control of any single company or government. This structure means that the virtual currency continues to be an easy target for people who want to manipulate its price or use it to launder money. “Unregulated, unregistered exchanges are a very big concern for the industry and the community broadly,” said Kathryn Haun, a former federal prosecutor who is on the board of the American virtual currency company Coinbase. The most frequent face of Bitfinex is its chief strategy officer, Phil Potter. Mr. Potter worked for Morgan Stanley in New York in the 1990s but lost his job after   about his $3,500 Rolex, his opulent lifestyle and his aggressive tactics for making money. Mr. Potter, 45, runs Bitfinex alongside Mr. Van der Velde, a Dutch-speaking man living in Hong Kong, and Giancarlo Devasini, an Italian man who lives on the French Riviera, according to company filings in Hong Kong. The company lost 1,500 Bitcoin, worth around $400,000, to a hacker in 2015. But the most damaging incident happened in August 2016 when a thief got almost 120,000 Bitcoin, worth around $75 million at the time. The company spread out the losses to all customers — even those who were not holding Bitcoin at the time of the hacking — by forcing customers to take a 36 percent haircut or loss on any money at the exchange. The lack of detail that Bitfinex provided about the hacking drove away some large customers like Arthur Hayes, the founder of Bitmex, a Hong Kong-based virtual currency exchange. “There are so many questions about them,” Mr. Hayes said. “All of this could be easily rectified by just showing all the figures.” Mr. van der Velde said the company had “been as public and transparent as possible about the security incident in August 2016 given the ongoing criminal investigations.” Banks have also been put off by Bitfinex’s operations. Wells Fargo said this year that it would no longer move money from Bitfinex accounts. Shortly after, Bitfinex said its main banks in Taiwan were shutting it off. Since then, it has moved between a series of banks in other countries, without telling customers where the exchange’s money is stored. But nothing has drawn more criticism than the operation of Tether, a virtual currency that is supposed to be tied — or tethered — to the value of a dollar. Customers can buy Tether coins on Bitfinex and then transfer them to other virtual currency exchanges, providing a way to move dollars between countries without going through banks. Tether has also become a very popular way to buy Bitcoin. In recent weeks, a few hundred millions dollars’ worth of Tether has changed hands on a daily basis across several exchanges, according to   on CoinMarketCap.com. Tether and Bitfinex have insisted that the two operations are separate. But  , which were made public this month, show that Appleby, an offshore law firm, helped Mr. Potter and Mr. Devasini, the Bitfinex operators, set up Tether in the British Virgin Islands in late 2014. One persistent online critic, going by the screen name Bitfinex’ed, has written   arguing that Bitfinex appears to be creating Tether coins out of thin air and then using them to buy Bitcoin and push the price up. Tether and Bitfinex have countered this criticism in statements on the companies’ websites and promised that every Tether is backed up by a dollar sitting in a bank account. In September, the companies   intended to prove that Tether is financed with real money. Lewis Cohen, a lawyer at the law firm Hogan Lovells who advises many virtual currency projects, said the document, because of the careful way it was phrased, did not prove that the Tether coins are backed by dollars. Even if they are, he said, Tether and Bitfinex appear to be violating laws in the United States and Europe that govern investments like Tether, which has qualities very similar to a money market mutual fund. “There are a long list of reasons that you don’t want to deal with them,” Mr. Cohen said of Tether. On Tuesday, Tether announced that an “external attacker” had taken $30 million worth of Tether from the company’s online wallets. The company said it was working to recover the coins.
WASHINGTON — The Trump administration announced on Monday that it was broadening sanctions against Venezuela, blacklisting four government officials and banning a digital currency President Nicolás Maduro created last month to circumvent financial sanctions on his economically strapped nation. The White House said the new measures were intended to send a message to Mr. Maduro’s government, which it has accused of corruption and repression, that the United States remains focused on the economic devastation in Venezuela, and holds the president and his associates directly responsible for creating the conditions there. The nation is in the throes of food and medicine shortages and a collapse of the health system as well as other government services, circumstances that have prompted hundreds of thousands of Venezuelans to flee. The intensification of sanctions comes as President Trump prepares to attend the Summit of the Americas next month in Lima, Peru, where the crisis in Venezuela will be a central issue. Vice President Mike Pence is scheduled to deliver a speech this week at the Organization of American States in Washington, where he plans to call out “the Maduro regime’s lawless actions,” according to a spokeswoman, and urge swift action to address the humanitarian situation and restore political order. The sanctions also come just two months before Mr. Maduro is to stand for re-election in a race he is expected to win given his control of Venezuela’s political and judicial machinery. The United States is among the countries that have declared they will not recognize the results. “President Maduro decimated the Venezuelan economy and spurred a humanitarian crisis,” Steven Mnuchin, the Treasury secretary, said in a statement announcing the newly blacklisted individuals. Mr. Mnuchin cited the individuals for “economic mismanagement and corruption” and blasted an attempt by the Maduro government to evade sanctions  . “Instead of correcting course to avoid further catastrophe, the Maduro regime is attempting to circumvent sanctions through the Petro digital currency — a ploy that Venezuela’s democratically elected National Assembly has denounced and Treasury has cautioned U.S. persons to avoid,” he said. The sanctions brought an angry response from Mr. Maduro, who issued a statement that the Venezuelan Embassy in Washington “rejects and strongly condemns the alleged and unilateral new sanctions of the Donald Trump regime against the Venezuelan people and our financial and economic system.” The administration’s announcement came a few hours after Mr. Trump signed an executive order barring the use of any digital currency issued by the Maduro government since Jan. 9. Mr. Maduro announced last month that his country had begun a presale of the Petro, backed by the nation’s vast petroleum reserves. The Venezuelan government called the launch a response to a financial crisis that has prompted a profound devaluation of the national currency, the bolívar, and quadruple-digit inflation. Senior Trump administration officials said the sanctions were meant to apply to the Petro or any other currency issued by or on behalf of Venezuela. One official said the Petro should be viewed as directly supporting the Maduro dictatorship and its attempts to undermine democratic order in Venezuela, calling it a scam to defraud international investors. The officials spoke on the condition of anonymity to describe the sanctions and their purpose. Whether the sanctions will achieve their intended effect of destabilizing the government remains to be seen, but some experts cautioned that the moves could actually hurt Venezuelans in the short term. “It’s part of a pattern of escalating sanctions on the Maduro government in advance of the presidential elections later this year, with the idea that that will produce the collapse of the government,” said Cynthia J. Arnson, the director of the Wilson Center’s Latin American Program. “But it’s usually the case that governments dig in their heels all the more when they feel that sanctions are aimed at removing them from power instead of producing a change in behavior, and what this will do is certainly increase the suffering and the shortages that are happening now.” Mr. Mnuchin, who is attending a gathering of finance ministers in Argentina, said he and his counterparts had discussed “how to achieve our shared objectives of restoring Venezuelan democracy, combating the kleptocracy of the Maduro regime, and responding to the humanitarian crisis caused by Maduro’s economic policy.” “We urge Maduro to distribute humanitarian aid and stop blocking much-needed foreign assistance to the suffering people of Venezuela, and we again call upon the Venezuelan military to respect and uphold the Constitution,” Mr. Mnuchin said. The four people sanctioned by the Treasury Department on Monday are current and former officials who played key roles in Mr. Maduro’s government and political network. Américo Alex Mata García is a Venezuelan state bank director who allegedly solicited and funneled $35 million from Odebrecht, a Brazilian construction company involved in a worldwide corruption scandal, to Mr. Maduro’s presidential campaign in 2013, the department said. Willian Antonio Contreras heads the agency responsible for imposing price controls in Venezuela. Nelson Reinaldo Lepaje Salazar is the acting chief of the Office of the National Treasury of Venezuela, which has been the subject of previous corruption allegations, including that Mr. Maduro stole nearly $10 million from the agency. The department also designated Carlos Alberto Rotondaro Cova, the former president of the board of directors of the Venezuelan Institute of Social Security, the government agency in charge of providing patients with drugs for chronic conditions. The four will have any assets subject to United States jurisdiction frozen, and Americans are generally barred from engaging in financial transactions with the individuals. The sanctions announced on Monday notably did not include any restrictions on the oil sector in Venezuela, a drastic step that senior Trump administration officials say is still under consideration. Rex W. Tillerson, the departing secretary of state, has suggested that Mr. Trump is considering a ban on imports of Venezuelan crude to American refineries. That would be a crippling blow to the national oil company, Petróleos de Venezuela, or PDVSA, since the United States is its biggest customer and few refineries outside the United States have the capacity to process Venezuelan heavy crude. One Trump administration official said on Monday that the step required further study because it would have serious ramifications not only for the Maduro government, but for the people of Venezuela and the American economy. The official said the administration was exploring both broad and surgical sanctions against Venezuelan oil interests. Venezuela is the first country to issue its own digital currency, and the government appears to view the Petro as its best hope for reaching the international markets at a time when most investors have turned their back on the country. The Treasury Department had already warned that buying the Petro could “expose U.S. persons to legal risk.” The executive order, with its explicit ban, is likely to serve as a warning for other countries that have been looking at issuing virtual currencies to work around international sanctions. Russian government officials   for similar purposes, but have not moved ahead with the plan so far. Risa Grais-Targow, the director for Latin America at the Eurasia Group, a political risk analysis consultancy, said given that the Petro has not yielded significant benefits in Venezuela — the currency has not proved profitable despite Mr. Maduro’s grandiose claims, she said — the sanctions are unlikely to have a major economic impact. “It’s more symbolic,” Ms. Grais-Targow said of Monday’s measures. “The Trump administration’s desire here is to continue to gradually ratchet up sanctions on the Maduro government, and this is something that is lighter, maybe lower-hanging fruit as they consider sanctions on the oil sector that would be more politically controversial and produce a sharper economic bite,” both in Venezuela and in the United States.
A hacker on Friday siphoned more than $50 million of digital money away from an   that had been billed as the most successful crowdfunding venture ever — taking with him not just a third of the venture’s money but also the hopes and dreams of thousands of participants who wanted to prove the safety and security of digital currency. The attack most likely puts an end to the project, known as the Decentralized Autonomous Organization, which had raised $160 million in the form of Ether, an alternative to the digital currency Bitcoin. While the computer scientists involved in the project are aiming to tweak the code that underpins Ether in a way that will recover the money, the theft is nevertheless prompting a bigger debate about the viability and principles of virtual currencies like Bitcoin and Ether. “This is one of the nightmare scenarios everyone was worried about: Someone exploited a weakness in the code of the D.A.O. to empty out a large sum,” Emin Gün Sirer, a computer science professor at Cornell who co-wrote a paper pointing out problems with the project, said on Friday. Central banks and financial firms have been exploring how to use the technology underlying virtual currencies — known as blockchain — to improve their own internal systems. The technology is considered to have advantages in terms of transparency and security. Just last week, Janet L. Yellen, the Federal Reserve chairwoman, told central bankers at a trade industry conference that they should accelerate their efforts to explore blockchain. But the incident on Friday provided another reminder of how the code can be just as vulnerable to human greed and mistakes as paper bills. The D.A.O. was meant to be a standard-bearer for online currency ventures. It was funded by investors from around the world using Ether, which has become popular over the last year. But just before the project stopped raising money in late May, computer scientists p in its underlying code — effectively warning that what happened to the experimental consortium would be possible or even likely. “The D.A.O. is being attacked,” Griff Green, a community organizer with the company that wrote the project’s software,  , wrote on a chat channel for the project Friday morning. “This is not a drill.” The money that the hacker moved appeared to be frozen on Friday as a result of a safeguard previously built into the code. The thief was caught in what might be thought of as a digital version of the airtight double doors that sometimes protect valuable sites (known in security circles as man traps). Programmers working on the Ethereum network, which hosts Ether, were debating on Friday whether to make a one-time change to the code to recover the frozen money. That faced immediate opposition from many virtual currency purists who were attracted to the technology because of its ostensible freedom from human meddling. “The strength of blockchain tech is that it is a ledger, a statement of truth,” Bruce Fenton, a board member with the Bitcoin Foundation,  . “That ledger is only as good as its resistance to censorship, change, demands or attack.” If the leaders of the Ethereum project decide to move forward with a change to the code — known as a fork — they will need to win the support of the people who lend their computing power to the network, and who have what amounts to a vote over any changes to the Ethereum software. The hacking on Friday underscored the complicated governance structure employed by so-called cryptocurrencies. These currencies are not run by any company or individual but by the computers of anyone who chooses to support the network. The D.A.O. was supposed to be a further extension of this concept of group decision-making. Thousands of people around the world financed the project by sending in Ether. The D.A.O. was supposed to act as a sort of venture capital fund, investing in projects that were voted upon by people who contributed money. The attack on Friday took place before any projects had been funded. The specific mechanism the hackers used is known as a recursive call vulnerability, — essentially a malicious transaction that moves money away from the D.A.O. into a side fund in an endlessly repeating loop. The attack led to chaos on the online message boards where D.A.O. investors and Ether users gather. “How can we help and protect our funds?” one user wrote on the Slack chat channel for D.A.O. investors. The programmers who wrote the D.A.O. code immediately suggested that investors vote to move their money to another, unrelated project known as Congo Split, primarily to protect their investments. “The community needs to spam the network so that it can mount a counterattack,” Stephan Tual, an employee with Slock.it, wrote on that company’s website. Programmers with Slock.it wrote the code for the D.A.O. but said they had no formal continuing role with the project. By the time it was over, the hacker had managed to gain control of 3.6 million Ether — more than a third of the 11.5 million that were there at the beginning of the day. “The D.A.O.’s journey is over,” Mr. Tual said in an email on Friday. The incident on Friday was a reminder of the dozens of hacking attacks and thefts that have rattled Bitcoin since it was released in early 2009. In 2014, Mt. Gox, which was previously the largest Bitcoin exchange, announced that it had lost nearly half a billion dollars worth of Bitcoin. The attacks on Bitcoin have generally led to a temporary lull in public interest in virtual currencies. But Bitcoin has bounced back each time. Over the last week, the price of Bitcoin has risen swiftly to the highest level since the Mt. Gox fiasco; it stood at $770 on Thursday night. Some of the recent demand for Bitcoin has come from anticipation of a coming event known as halving. Currently, the Bitcoin software releases 25 new coins — a block — every 10 minutes or so to computers helping support the network. In mid-July, the blocks will shrink to 12.5 coins. The shrinking supply has led some to assume that the price will go up. The price of Ether had been rising alongside Bitcoin over the last month, in part because of the interest generated by the D.A.O. On Thursday, both were up more than 60 percent over the previous month. But the attack Friday morning sent the price of Ether into a downward spiral. By Friday afternoon, the price of Ether had fallen 33 percent from its high a day earlier, to around $13. Bitcoin had also fallen, though less sharply, to around $750. The founder and lead programmer on the Ethereum project, Vitalik Buterin, wrote on Friday that he supported a change to the code that would reclaim the money from the hacker. But he said he recognized that he might not win the argument. “I recognize that there are very heavy arguments on both sides, and that either direction would have seen very heavy opposition,” Mr. Buterin  . Mr. Sirer, the Cornell professor, wrote: “There is no good solution here.”
Banks that have been pooling resources on blockchain technology should apply their camaraderie in a different field: computer security. The hacking of an unnamed commercial lender, revealed by the financial messaging system Swift on Thursday, came after an $81 million digital heist from Bangladesh’s central bank in February. An industry utility — or at least better-coordinated defenses — is needed. Increased regulatory requirements and low interest rates, both legacies of the financial crisis of the last decade, have made it hard for banks to make an economic return. The distributed ledger technology that underpins bitcoin may help cut industry costs. That’s why more than 40 banks have joined the blockchain development group R3. Cybersecurity should be next on the list. It’s likely to be banks’ biggest cost in terms of financial crime prevention this year and next, according to LexisNexis Risk Solutions. Weak digital defenses might prompt a credit rating downgrade, says Standard & Poor’s. Lenders may feel worried about sharing confidential data with rivals. But the aviation industry, long teetering on the edge of profitability, improved efficiency by sharing accident information via black box technology. And greater teamwork would help keep tabs on would-be criminals. Companies’ own employees represent a huge threat: the business investigations company Kroll said in its latest annual global fraud report that insiders were 81 percent of the wrongdoers. A shared database of suspects might be a safeguard. Regulators and governments could play a bigger role, too. The European Central Bank’s plan for a database of serious incidents,   by the Financial Times on Thursday, appears to be no more than a first step. The United States Financial Services Information Sharing and Analysis Center has had limited success: only 5 percent of the digital threats that   finds are the subject of warnings from other institutions, the company’s chief executive, Kenneth Chenault, said last year. But lenders right now seem to be doing too little. Europe’s private sector-led Cyber Defense Alliance consists of just four banks. Financial institutions have demonstrated an unusual level of esprit de corps when it comes to new technology. Given that digital security could hit their finances more painfully, cooperation makes even more sense.
Motion pictures and jazz were both born around the dawn of the 20th century. But did Hollywood ever get the music right? Take “Syncopation” (1942), a snappily titled, wildly ambitious jazz chronicle that might be the last thing you’d expect from Warner Bros.’ German-born workhorse, William Dieterle (1893-1972). Best remembered for plodding prestige pictures like “The Life of Emile Zola” (1937), movies James Agee characterized in The Nation as a “high-minded, high-polished mélange of heavy ‘touches’ and ‘intelligent’ performances,” Dieterle has been typecast as a snobbish martinet. Still, he has a few surprises in his lengthy résumé, and   out on Blu-ray and DVD in a beautiful digital restoration from Cohen Media, is one. Filmed during Dieterle’s brief period as an independent producer at RKO (when his anti-fascist politics and friendship with German refugees made him a person of interest for the F.B.I.), “Syncopation” belongs to a cycle of movies — begun just before the United States entered   — that sought to integrate jazz into mainstream American culture. What sets “Syncopation” apart from “Blues in the Night” and “Birth of the Blues” (both 1941) is its emphasis on jazz as an intrinsically African-American art form and what Sidney Finkelstein, who wrote on jazz for Daily Worker, would call “a people’s music.” Thus, “Syncopation” begins with a vivid montage that segues from a West African village to 1906 New Orleans by way of the slave trade, the Middle Passage and the cotton fields. Well-meaning, if condescending, the movie establishes a particular lineage. The music’s founding father is modeled on King Oliver and played by an uncredited Rex Stewart (a cornetist with the Duke Ellington orchestra); his hot solos inspire a young boy (who grows into Todd Duncan, Porgy in the original Broadway production of “Porgy and Bess”) and, through him, the inevitable white protagonists, Jackie Cooper and Bonita Granville. Jazz is America singing. Granville’s character, who establishes her intellectual bona fides, as well as Dieterle’s, by her oft-cited appreciation for Walt Whitman, is busted for playing boogie-woogie piano at a Chicago rent party. In the movie’s nuttiest scene, she’s put on trial and, managing to have her piano introduced as evidence, soon has the court doing the time step. Although “Syncopation” tries to inoculate itself by mocking a society orchestra modeled on Paul Whiteman’s, it abruptly abandons its black musicians before jazz reaches New York’s 52nd Street and mutates into swing or what, writing on jazz in Partisan Review, Agee would term “pseudo-folk.” The final sequence features the singer Connie Boswell and winds up with a frantic cameo by a combo of white all-stars (Benny Goodman, Harry James and Gene Krupa among them). The finale is doubly depressing in that Dieterle hoped to justify his title with a genuinely offbeat (and it would seem far longer) movie. Philip Yordan, who worked on the screenplay, remembered Dieterle’s seeking to twin “the rise of modern architecture and the rise of jazz.” The writer found the idea nonsensical, although it was commonplace in the 1920s. (John Alden Carpenter’s 1927 jazz ballet “Skyscrapers” is only one example.) Even so, a few heroic montages aside, no such thinking remains in the movie. Two months before “Syncopation” was released, Dieterle screened it for his friend Bertolt Brecht, then in Hollywood. According to Brecht’s journal, Dieterle bemoaned the power of his financial backers, “forcing him to cut out as many negroes [sic] as possible” in favor of more “boy meets girl.” Although “Syncopation” eventually de-emphasizes the African-American centrality of jazz, the disc redresses the situation somewhat with nine vintage shorts, three starring Ellington. Treated with relative dignity, Ellington plays himself as a working composer. “A Bundle of Blues” (1933) and “Symphony in Black: A Rhapsody of Negro Life” (1935), both made by Paramount, include performances by Ivie Anderson and Billie Holiday. The independently produced “Black and Tan Fantasy” (1929) is a mini-melodrama featuring Fredi Washington as a doomed nightclub dancer. Artier than the Paramount shorts, it was directed by Dudley Murphy, who several years earlier collaborated on “Ballet Mécanique” with the French painter Fernand Léger, and also directed the majestic Bessie Smith in “St. Louis Blues” (1929) — an essential artifact despite the unpleasant spectacle of her being forced to dramatize her own humiliation. No less offensive but also more astonishing, Paramount’s “Rhapsody in Black and Blue” (1932) is a showcase for the young Louis Armstrong, bare-chested and cloaked in leopard skin on a Deco set representing the Kingdom of Jazzmania. Through sheer force of personality and musical genius, he triumphs over the degrading premise and dubious quality of his material — one way to characterize the power of jazz. Another artifact, reveling in a later form of jazz exoticism, “The Connection” —  ’s 1962 adaptation of Jack Gelber’s Off   — has been released by Milestone on Blu-ray and DVD. Clarke’s notably self-assured and elaborately self-conscious first feature made a splash at the   and became a cause célèbre back home, banned for using an obscenity, here as a term for heroin. As originally staged by the Living Theater, “The Connection” was a hip “Waiting for Godot” in which a group of histrionic heroin addicts and a rehearsing jazz combo hang around a cold-water loft anticipating the arrival of their daily fix. Ms. Clarke framed her movie as a fictional documentary of the scene, complete with clueless filmmaker; it’s notable both for documenting the original production and the quartet assembled by the pianist-composer Freddie Redd. Interviewed at length for one of the disc’s bonus supplements, Mr. Redd gives a pithy account of the movie’s making and his own life as a jazz artist. Combining backstage interviews with onstage performances, the downtown director Beth B documents the New Burlesque as a liberating form of performance art. “There is also a great deal of joy, and while these lubricious entertainers are making political points by pulling American flags from unlikely locations, or dancing a beautiful dark ballet with a severed hand, they’re mostly just interested in showing us a really good time,” Jeannette Catsoulis wrote in The New York Times  . Available on DVD. (Zeitgeist) One of William Dieterle’s last Hollywood movies (and possibly the craziest) is a   from 1949 set in the Kalahari desert. Burt Lancaster heads a cast that includes three veterans of “Casablanca”: Peter Lorre, Claude Rains and Paul Henreid, outstanding as the movie’s crypto-fascist villain. On Blu-ray, DVD and Amazon Instant Video. (Olive)  Sean Gullette’s  , shown at film festivals but never released here, concerns the leader of an all-female punk-rock band who finances her recording session by bringing a shipment of drugs from the Rif mountains to Tangier. On DVD and Amazon Instant Video. (Film Movement) Thomas Allen Harris’s history of African-American photography is both a chronicle of and testament to the power of self-representation. “Mr. Harris’s   is a family memoir, a tribute to unsung artists and a lyrical, at times heartbroken, meditation on imagery and identity,” A. O. Scott wrote in The Times  . On DVD, iTunes and Netflix. (First Run Features) The title of the writer-director Damien Chazelle’s dynamic second feature might describe J. K. Simmons’s Oscar-winning performance as the scariest instructor in a Juilliard-like music conservatory. “The long, intricate final scene transcends psychological drama with a surge of pure musical inspiration, pushing the audience’s response from curiosity to empathy to awe,” Mr. Scott wrote in The Times  . On Blu-ray, DVD and Amazon Instant Video. (Sony Pictures Classics)
MOSCOW — The Russian spam kingpin had long been in the cross hairs of the F.B.I., and agents finally got their shot when the man scheduled a vacation in Spain. At the agency’s request, Spanish security officers in April arrested the man, Pyotr Y. Levashov, who is accused of stuffing untold millions of inboxes with ads for pornography, pills and penny stocks. But then the Russian authorities sprang a trap of their own, filing an extradition request with the Spanish authorities for a crime they said Mr. Levashov had committed in Russia years ago. Currently, he is languishing in a Spanish jail, but soon the authorities will have to decide which extradition request to honor: the United States’ or Russia’s. This was by no means the first time that Russia had filed a competing extradition request. Far-fetched as it may seem, the Russians’ tactic has in several instances prevented Russians suspected of being computer criminals from being deported to the United States while detained in Europe. The tactic has raised suspicions that the Russian authorities are more interested in derailing American investigations and possibly protecting criminals they find useful than they are in fighting cybercrime. “People always ask me about this,” Timofey S. Musatov, a Moscow lawyer whose Russian client is the subject of competing extradition requests. “It’s the most common question.” In Mr. Levashov’s case, Russian prosecutors sought his extradition after his detention in Spain when they   in August that he had hacked the computers of a hospital in St. Petersburg, Russia, in 2014. Three similar cases are pending in courts in Greece, Spain and the Czech Republic. In two of the three, either the defendants’ lawyers or relatives have said that their cases have some bearing on the investigation into Russian meddling in the 2016 election in the United States. While that may be true, they have not provided any proof. Their theory is that with the politically charged atmosphere in the United States over the election meddling, the accused could not possibly get a fair trial there, so they should be returned to Russia. In accordance with extradition treaties in all three countries, Russian lawyers say, the decision about where to send the accused resides with a government minister. That opens the prospect of the United States’ being powerless to stop the return to Russia of a suspect who may be able to offer valuable information on Russian meddling in the election. The Greek police detained Mr. Musatov’s client, Aleksandr V. Vinnik, on an   that accuses him of running a Moscow-based Bitcoin exchange, BTC-e, that laundered as much as $4 billion in illegal funds. Russian prosecutors filed an extradition request on a fraud charge. The Russian case, Mr. Musatov said, surfaced soon after Mr. Vinnik’s detention in Athens, possibly because the Russian police had read about his client in news reports and decided to investigate him. “I’m a procedural lawyer who works with documents and law,” he said. “I don’t work in the category of conspiracy theories.” Mr. Vinnik has no known links to election hacking, he said. Another of Mr. Musatov’s clients, Dmitry O. Zubakha, who at the request of the United States was detained in Cyprus in 2012 on suspicion of  , was successfully extradited to Russia. “This norm is in effect everywhere,” said Vladimir V. Makeyev, a lawyer for another Russian cybercrime suspect, Yevgeny A. Nikulin, who was detained in Prague while on vacation with his girlfriend. The United States   Mr. Nikulin of hacking the computers of LinkedIn, Dropbox and Formspring. Russia filed an extradition request after a computer intrusion and online theft that occurred in 2010 but came to light only after his detention in the Czech Republic. Mr. Makeyev argues that the United States is seeking Mr. Nikulin’s cooperation in the election-hacking investigation and that an F.B.I. agent from the San Francisco field office, Jeffrey Miller, traveled to Prague to offer asylum in exchange for testimony. The F.B.I. has said the agent was there only to read Mr. Nikulin his rights, and it remains unclear how he may have been connected to election hacking. Why Russians suspected of hacking travel to countries that may detain them on United States extradition warrants is something of a mystery. “Once the money starts coming in, they enjoy a good lifestyle,” said John Reid, a senior researcher with  , a spam tracking group based in London. Perhaps impunity at home creates a false sense of security. “We’ll see pictures of them sitting around with gold and fancy Western cars and guns. That kind of gives a profile” of  , he said. One theory for the travel, he said, is the “girlfriend effect”: “You are a little hacking nerd and now you have a good-looking girlfriend, and it gets cold in Russia, and she says, ‘It’s cold; I hate it here,’ and it wears him down, so he goes somewhere sunny, and that’s it.” Mr. Levashov, too, has claimed a political motivation for his arrest in Barcelona last spring, though a   unsealed in Connecticut charges him only with eight counts of computer-related crime and fraud. Mr. Levashov’s wife, Maria, said in an interview that the Spanish police had told her the arrest was “related to the election.” The American indictment asserts that Mr. Levashov, using the nickname Peter Severa, or Peter of the North, ran a spam operation powered by a sophisticated, evolving family of computer viruses called Waledac, and later Kelihos. Mr. Levashov’s nickname may be derived from his northern hometown, St. Petersburg, or the name of a porn movie star, referring to the pornography promoted by spam email. Mr. Levashov told a Spanish court that the case should be viewed politically because he had worked for United Russia, a political party that backs President Vladimir V. Putin, and he is an army officer with access to Russian classified information. “I collected different information about opposition parties and delivered it to the necessary people at the necessary time,” Mr. Levashov told the court, referring to Russian opposition parties, according to the  . In an online chat room for hackers years earlier, using the nickname Peter Severa, Mr. Levashov had gone further, suggesting that he had enlisted in a broad recruitment effort by the Russian government, begun about four years ago, to engage students, computer professionals and criminals in government hacking teams, sometimes called science squadrons. “Good day,” he wrote. “My name is Peter Severa. Many people know me for my service distributing email.” But “everything is in flux, everything changes, and the time has come for me to change the direction of my work.” He said he had a new role: The Federal Security Service, known as the F.S.B., had appointed him to lead a group of hackers who would work for the security service, which he called a “special battalion for information security.”
• Theranos shows private companies can be held to account t.oo • Was Bear a bad deal for JPMorgan? • The failed Qualcomm bid portends a new front in potential global trade wars. • How Boeing has the most to lose from the metals tariffs. • Bear Stearns was a decade ago. Could it happen again? • And R.I.P.  . The Securities and Exchange Commission on Wednesday  , the founder of Theranos, with fraud for raising money from investors on the back of false claims about the company’s blood-testing technology. One of Theranos’s main products, called a miniLab, could not perform all the tests the company said it could, the commission asserted. That, according to  , didn’t stop Theranos from claiming that it had a bright future ahead. Here are some of the things the commission says Theranos, a private company, did to pull the wool over investors’ eyes. There is an old adage that if it sounds too good to be true, it isn’t. The case filed by the Securities and Exchange Commission against Theranos and Elizabeth Holmes   about a claimed revolutionary method to conduct blood tests that turned out to be pure fiction. Ms. Holmes and the company settled the case, although the former president, Ramesh “Sunny” Balwani,  . She will pay a $500,000 penalty, return her shares in Theranos, and agreed to a ban on serving as an officer or director of a public company for 10 years. What makes this case interesting is that Theranos was one of the original unicorns, a private company with a value of more than $1 billion. We usually see the S.E.C. pursue charges against public companies and their executives, while private firms operate largely free from scrutiny – at least until they prepare for an I.P.O. The antifraud provisions of  , however, apply to any transaction in a security in which there is a misstatement of material fact. Thus, when Theranos raised millions of dollars by selling shares to hedge funds and venture capitalists, the false claims about the viability of its blood-testing labs ended up being a scheme to defraud. For Ms. Holmes, the settlement means that she will be cut off from raising money for any new venture for a long time. The complaint shows a systemic effort to deceive investors over a number of years, no doubt in a desperate hope that somehow the technology could be made to work. It is unlikely anyone in Silicon Valley or on Wall Street will trust her again. Mr. Kudlow,  , said that Mr. Trump offered him the job as director of the National Economic Council and that he immediately accepted. Mr. Kudlow told The Journal that an announcement could come as early as Thursday. Mark Hamrick,  ’s senior economic analyst: Ten year’s ago almost to the day, JPMorgan Chase acquired Bear Stearns, a troubled investment bank, for what looked like a steal. But Jamie Dimon, JPMorgan’s C.E.O.,   said   like it again, citing the high legal costs that came later. While we don’t have all the numbers necessary for a full accounting, there is much in the public domain that can help answer this question. And this information suggests that, while the Bear Stearns acquisition probably wasn’t as profitable as expected in March 2008, JPMorgan may still have benefited from it — even after taking into account the legal expenses.  The payouts were made mostly to settle allegations that Wall Street firms had stuffed loans into mortgage-backed bonds that did not meet agreed upon standards. How big were those costs? In his 2015 letter to shareholders, Mr. Dimon said that some 70 percent of JPMorgan’s nearly $19 billion in mortgage-related legal costs were related to Bear Stearns and Washington Mutual, the thrift JPMorgan also bought during the crisis. For the sake of argument, let’s assume that 35 percent of that $19 billion stemmed from Bear Stearns’ mortgages. The cost to JPMorgan then would be around $6.7 billion. That’s a lot, but when JPMorgan did the deal, it agreed to terms that gave it a lot of financial protection against nasty surprises like this. , far below the $11.8 billion of shareholders’ equity that Bear Stearns reported on its balance sheet at the end of 2007. This wide margin for error would have helped the bank absorb the $6 billion of merger-related costs that  in March 2008. True, JPMorgan almost certainly ended up marking down Bear Stearns’ riskier assets by more than expected in the months after the deal, when market conditions got even worse. But many of these assets could have recovered in the next few years as the financial system stabilized. After 2008, “principal transactions” at JPMorgan’s investment bank, the business line that included the performance of many of Bear Stearns’ assets,  , far more than the $4.4 billion that JPMorgan on its own generated in 2007. Let’s also not forget that the Federal Reserve took a large slug of the risk in the deal. The Fed made an extraordinary loan to a special entity that bought some $30 billion of Bear Stearns’ assets. According to Kate Kelly’s book on  , JPMorgan was reluctant to buy Bear Stearns without assistance from the Fed. JPMorgan did provide a $1.2 billion loan to the Fed’s entity, in theory exposing it to some losses on the assets. But in the end, that   for JPMorgan in 2012. The Bear Stearns deal also came with some straightforward positives. JPMorgan, for instance, got Bear Stearns’ leading prime brokerage unit, a business that provided brokerage services to hedge funds. That and other Bear Stearns operations were expected  , the bank’s executives said at the time. And, of course, JPMorgan scooped up Bear Stearns’ trophy tower in Midtown Manhattan. At the time of the deal, the building, at 383 Madison Ave., . According to the estimates of developers in the New York real estate market, the building is now worth at least $1.8 billion. Jun Ying, the former chief information officer of Equifax’s core United States consumer reporting division,   on Wednesday with insider trading for selling nearly $1 million in company stock after he learned about a major data breach in 2017 but before it was publicly announced. The commission’s   against Mr. Ying describes a step he took to estimate what he might lose on his Equifax stock. He took to the internet to find out what had happened to the shares of Experian, a rival credit bureau, after it revealed that hackers had breached its system. When he killed Broadcom’s pursuit of Qualcomm, President Trump put his administration in uncharted territory. The White House has made no secret of its concerns about Beijing, and seems to have been motivated by the prospect of Qualcomm losing its lead in 5G. Some now worry that this could be   in a potential global trade war. Here’s Jason Furman, a senior economic adviser in the Obama White House, talking to  : Of note: Qualcomm  . Broadcom   this morning. What’s next for Qualcomm: The chip maker’s   — petitioning the government for a national-security review of Broadcom’s bid — paid off handsomely. But now it   that it can fix its business. Peter Eavis’s take: National champions have to deliver. Will Qualcomm become less efficient under the government’s protection? If so, U.S. tax payers may feel taken advantage of. The industry largely ignored a short seller’s report on purported security flaws in AMD chips. ( ) President Trump announced his metals tariffs to protect American makers of aluminum and steel. But that could   — America’s top exporter, which employs nearly as many people as the U.S. steel and aluminum industries combined. More from Natalie Kitroeff of the NYT: And Mr. Trump’s attacks on Chinese metal production are in some ways  , as Beijing moves away from basic commodities.  Marco Rubio argues in an NYT Op-Ed that the U.S. should   to punish China for unfair trade practices. And our columnist Eduardo Porter explains the ways countries — and companies like Ford — have  . • With Mike Pompeo due to replace Rex Tillerson at the State Department, the future of the Iran nuclear deal is in doubt, and renewed sanctions are more likely. ( ) • The Democrat Conor Lamb   in the congressional special election in Pennsylvania; here’s the  . • Elizabeth Warren’s attacks on fellow Democrats who support a loosening of Dodd-Frank regulations are annoying   and  . • The Republican leader of the House Intelligence Committee’s inquiry into Russian electoral meddling   that Russia did not work to undermine Hillary Clinton. Representative Trey Gowdy  . Today is the 10-year anniversary of the investment bank, on the verge of bankruptcy,  . These days, however, there’s little appetite for an extraordinary government-assisted of a bailout of a troubled financial firm — and post-crisis regulations are meant to eliminate the need for one. Here’s what Rodge Cohen, Wall Street’s longtime favorite consigliere, told Justin Baer and Ryan Tracy of  : The problem: Wall Street’s new defenses haven’t been tested. And today’s algorithm-dominated markets give embattled firms far less time to work out their problems, as the WSJ points out. More trivia: Yesterday was the 10-year anniversary of David Solomon of Goldman Sachs  . Mr. Solomon is now the heir apparent at Goldman. A deregulation-minded businessman in the White House was supposed to be a huge positive for the M. & A. community. Yet investment banks have already  . And then consider: • The blocking of the Qualcomm bid has raised uncertainty over cross-border acquisitions. • The battle between the Justice Department and AT&T over the $85.4 billion takeover of Time Warner is heating up, with the first day of the trial set for Monday. As   in Bloomberg View, “One area where Donald Trump is more economically populist than I had expected is: He really does seem interested in blocking big mergers.” Announced deals so far this year are up 55 percent from the same time a year ago, according to Thomson Reuters. And the Republican tax overhaul has led other deal makers to feel better about opening their wallets. A   by EY found that 42 percent of respondents intended to use their tax savings on M.&A., and 73 percent said that they planned to accelerate their deal strategies this year. “At the end of the day, tax is not a driver of M. & A., but it certainly is a key element,” Bill Casey, EY’s Americas vice chair of transaction advisory services, told Michael. • China’s sovereign wealth fund has sold out of Blackstone, severing a longstanding relationship as tensions rise between the U.S. and China. ( ) • Elliott Management will use Prosperity Life, which it bought for just over $500 million, to strike more life insurance deals. ( ) • Two months after Jared Kushner joined the White House, Kushner Companies sold a stake in a Brooklyn building to a company controlled by the Japanese government. ( ) • Bill Ackman sold about $125 million worth of ADP shares as its stock rose. ( ) • Prince Alwaleed bin Talal sold his stake in the Four Seasons hotel in Damascus to a businessman linked to President Bashar al-Assad, unnamed sources said. ( ) • The Finnish government has acquired a stake in Nokia. ( ) • The real estate investment trust SL Green has been selling real estate assets into the private market at high values and using the proceeds to buy back its own shares at a discount. ( ) • HNA Group is selling its 25 percent stake in Hilton Grand Vacations. ( ) • K.K.R. is considering a sale or an I.P.O. for Cognita schools, which could be valued at about $2.8 billion, according to unnamed sources. ( ) The ad giant has joined Facebook in  . (Together the two companies account for most internet advertising.) One problem: “crypto-jacking,” in which scammers   of those who view their ads and use it to mine digital money. Google removed 130 million such ads last year.  Blythe Masters of Digital Asset Holdings   that gender diversity in the sector is even worse than in banking (she used to be at JPMorgan). And Coinbase has a  , which will simplify things for British customers. • U.N. human rights experts investigating the possible genocide in Myanmar said that hate speech  . The investor Roger McNamee, a Facebook shareholder,   about fighting misinformation. • YouTube is trying to combat misinformation by   and other “fact-based websites” on videos that promote conspiracy theories. Its announcement  . • Amazon is recalling about 260,000 AmazonBasics battery packs because of potential fire and chemical burn risks. ( ) • Walmart promises delivery groceries in 100 cities this year, using companies like Uber and Deliv. ( ) • Companies that use A.I. are trying to set ethical standards, but skeptics say they’re just trying to pre-empt regulation. ( ) • How Walmart and Google are challenging Amazon’s Audible. ( ) • G.M. is planning a pilot program letting car owners rent out their vehicles, unnamed sources said. ( ) • The architect Richard Meier has taken a six-month work leave after the NYT contacted him about accusations of sexual misconduct by five women. ( ) • Producers of “The Crown” conceded that Claire Foy, its Queen Elizabeth II, was paid less than Matt Smith, playing her husband. ( ) • Anti-harassment training videos are a booming business. ( ) •  , the former GlaxoSmithKline C.E.O., will head UnitedHealth’s Optum division, which focuses on pharmacy benefit management. ( ) •  , Tesla’s corporate treasurer and V.P. of finance, has left to become C.F.O. at another company, an unnamed source said. ( ) • Remington Outdoor, the gun maker that Cerberus spent more than a decade building into an industry giant, is planning to file for bankruptcy protection as early as March 18. ( ) • Dick’s Sporting Goods said its stance on guns  , but it faces  . • Former staffers for The Onion, which once published “Elon Musk Offering $1.2 Billion in Grants to Any Project That Promises to Make Him Feel Complete,” are working on a secret project financed by Mr. Musk. ( ) • A commodity investor backed by a Russian billionaire is stockpiling cobalt. ( ) • The political compromise that kept Angela Merkel in power could end Germany’s boom. ( ) • Britain’s M. & A. watchdog is celebrating its 50th birthday. ( ) • More than half the fresh fruit and almost a third of the fresh vegetables Americans buy now come from other countries. ( )

(Reuters) - The European Union's securities watchdog said it will ban 'binary' options sales to retail clients and restrict the sales of Contract for Differences (CFDs) to protect investors from significant losses, knocking shares in Britain's spreadbetters. The European Securities and Markets Authority (ESMA)said on Tuesday it was prohibiting the marketing, distribution and sale of binary options to retail investors, while its restrictions on CFDs would affect the marketing, sale and distribution of them. Binary options and CFDs are financial products that give an investor exposure to price movements in securities without actually owning the underlying assets such as a currency, commodity or stock. "ESMA, along with National Competent Authorities (NCAs), concluded that there exists a significant investor protection concern in relation to CFDs and binary options offered to retail investors," it said in a statement. "This is due to their complexity and lack of transparency." ESMA has said it has been concerned about how these inherently high-risk speculative products are offered to retail investors, potentially leading to significant losses and in December flagged plans to ban their sale, sending shares of spreadbetting firms tumbling. Analysis on trading in the EU showed 74-89 percent of retail accounts typically lose money on their investments, with average losses per client ranging from 1,600-29,000 euros (1,407-25,507 pounds), ESMA said. Shares in IG Group were down 3.2 percent, Plus500 up 3.3 percent, while CMC Markets stock was down 3.4 percent by 0942 GMT. (GRAPHIC - UK spread betters, CFD providers navigate regulation: https://reut.rs/2pJbD1m) IG, which was founded in 1974 as the world's first spread-betting firm, said it was "disappointed" that ESMA had imposed leverage restrictions, adding that this would risk pushing retail clients to providers based outside of the EU, resulting in poor client outcomes. It said, however, that while the measures announced by ESMA only relate to retail clients, IG's client base was dominated by sophisticated traders. IG expects its revenue in the 2019 financial year would be lower than that expected in 2018, primarily reflecting the impact of the regulatory changes in the UK and EU. Despite facing uncertainty from proposed regulation on these products, IG and its rivals have reported revenue growth recently as they signed up record numbers of customers, partly due to the boom in digital currencies such as bitcoin. Investec, which rates IG as a 'Buy', said the changes would imply a cut to 2019 revenue estimates of about 2 percent, with a 5 percent reduction in pretax profit. Liberum analysts expect downgrades to consensus estimates for IG's pretax profit of over 10 percent. CMC said binary products generated 2.1 million pounds ($2.97 million) of revenue from the UK and Europe in the first half of the financial year 2018, and a reduction in revenue would be immaterial for the group. However, the firm, which was founded by Chief Executive Peter Cruddas as a foreign exchange broker with a 10,000-pound investment in 1989, said margin changes were likely to impact on how clients trade, although at this stage it was not possible to quantify the impact. Plus500 has never offered binary options to its customers, and has always offered negative balance protection, a spokesman for the company told Reuters via email, adding Plus500 would issue a statement later on Tuesday. (Reporting by Noor Zainab Hussain and Marc Jones, Editing by Louise Heavens)
Boeing said on Wednesday that it was hit by a cyberattack that some Boeing executives identified as the same WannaCry computer virus that struck thousands of computer systems in more than 70 countries around the world last year. In an internal memo, Mike VanderWel, chief engineer of Boeing Commercial Airplane production engineering, said the attack was “metastasizing” and he worried it could spread to Boeing’s production systems and airline software. “We are on a call with just about every VP in Boeing,” Mr. VanderWel wrote. The memo called for “All hands on deck.” WannaCry is a particularly vicious form of what is known as ransomware — malware that locks up victims’ computers and data with encryption, until attackers’ extortion demands are met, often in the form of the virtual currency Bitcoin. Even for victims who agree to pay, decryption is not always guaranteed. The   was hit with a different form of ransomware last week and was still reeling from the fallout on Wednesday. In a statement Wednesday evening, Boeing played down the attack and said it was limited in scope and that it had not affected the company’s production lines. “A number of articles on a malware disruption are overstated and inaccurate,” Boeing’s statement said. “Our cybersecurity operations center detected a limited intrusion of malware that affected a small number of systems. Remediations were applied and this is not a production or delivery issue.” Charles Bickers, a Boeing spokesman, declined to elaborate or confirm whether the attack was indeed WannaCry, the computer virus United States officials officially  . What made WannaCry so much more destructive, security experts discovered during last year’s outbreak, was that it employed an automated tool that was first developed at the National Security Agency and later dumped online in 2016 by mysterious hackers called the “Shadow Brokers.” That tool, which the N.S.A. code-named Eternal Blue, exploited a vulnerability in Microsoft Windows software that allowed attackers to spread their malware automatically through vulnerable machines. In other cases, ransomware attackers had to manually encrypt victim’s systems. By incorporating the N.S.A.’s tool into their ransomware last May, hackers ensured their attack would encrypt as many vulnerable machines as possible, causing maximum disruption. White House officials said North Korea was “directly responsible” for the attack. The WannaCry attacks paralyzed computers and business operations in more than 74 countries, forcing Britain’s public health system to turn patients away and freezing computers at government agencies in Russia and FedEx in the United States, in what was the largest known ransomware assault. Microsoft offered an emergency “patch” that effectively neutralized the vulnerability WannaCry’s attackers used to spread, but unpatched systems remain vulnerable.
ante Castiglione stalked through the doors of a glass-walled office tower on the edge of downtown Buenos Aires, just a few hundred feet from the old port district. In the crowded elevator, he shook his head and muttered under his breath about the stresses of the day and his profession. “I swear, this job can kill me,” he said, his eyes cast downward. On the 20th floor, he hustled into an impersonal, windowless office and quickly removed the tools of his trade from his backpack and set them on the desk: locked blue cash box, cellphone and clunky Dell laptop with the same yellow smiley-face sticker that he puts on all his electronics. Then he unbuckled the fanny pack from around his waist, which contained the most important part of his business: bricks of $100 bills and 100-peso notes. This room, rented for the day, was not one of Castiglione’s regular haunts. He mostly drifts among the old cafes in Buenos Aires, where the bow-tie-wearing waiters serve small glasses of seltzer water with each coffee. In his line of business as a money-changer, temporary meeting places are preferred; they make things harder for would-be thieves, whom he has so far avoided. On this Friday in late February, Castiglione had run around the city in his camouflage-patterned sandals, trying to distribute cash to some clients and pick it up from others. Once back in his temporary office, his outdated LG phone alternately chirped, buzzed and sang with incoming text messages and emails. Ordinarily, Castiglione would have help. His 18-year-old daughter, Fiona, often deals with customers, but she was about to give birth to her first child. Her twin brother, Marco, who used to make cash runs, was now focusing on school. So Castiglione was alone, his stress evident in the sweat on his forehead and the agitation on his face. When his business partner, who lives in Rosario, Argentina’s third-largest city, called to ask why he hadn’t taken care of one particularly insistent client, Castiglione erupted in frustration. “If you want it done faster, you pick up the phone and call her yourself,” he growled in Spanish, before switching to another call. After hanging up, he told me in English: “Everybody wants everything now, and I am just trying to do it. I’m not magical, as people think.” Magical, no, yet something new all the same. His occupation is one of the world’s oldest, but it remains a conspicuous part of modern life in Argentina: Calle Florida, one of the main streets in downtown Buenos Aires, is crowded day and night with men and women singing out “ ,” to serve local residents who want to trade volatile pesos for more stable and transportable currencies like the dollar. For Castiglione, however, money-changing means converting pesos and dollars into Bitcoin, a virtual currency, and vice versa. That afternoon, a plump 48-year-old musician was one of several customers to drop by the rented room. A German customer had paid the musician in Bitcoin for some freelance compositions, and the musician needed to turn them into dollars. Castiglione joked about the corruption of Argentine politics as he peeled off five $100 bills, which he was trading for a little more than 1.5 Bitcoins, and gave them to his client. The musician did not hand over anything in return; before showing up, he had transferred the Bitcoins — in essence, digital tokens that exist only as entries in a digital ledger — from his Bitcoin address to Castiglione’s. Had the German client instead sent euros to a bank in Argentina, the musician would have been required to fill out a form to receive payment and, as a result of the country’s currency controls, sacrificed roughly 30 percent of his earnings to change his euros into pesos. Bitcoin makes it easier to move money the other way too. The day before, the owner of a small manufacturing company bought $20,000 worth of Bitcoin from Castiglione in order to get his money to the United States, where he needed to pay a vendor, a transaction far easier and less expensive than moving funds through Argentine banks. The last client to visit the office that Friday was Alberto Vega, a stout 37-year-old in a neatly cut suit who heads the Argentine offices of the American Bitcoin company BitPay, whose technology enables merchants to accept Bitcoin payments. Like other BitPay employees — there is a staff of six in Buenos Aires — Vega receives his entire salary in Bitcoin and lives outside the traditional financial system. He orders what he can from websites that accept Bitcoin and goes to Castiglione when he needs cash. On this occasion, he needed 10,000 pesos to pay a roofer who was working on his house. Commerce of this sort has proved useful enough to Argentines that Castiglione has made a living buying and selling Bitcoin for the last year and a half. “We are trying to give a service,” he said. That mundane service — harnessing Bitcoin’s workaday utility — is what so excites some investors and entrepreneurs about Argentina. Banks everywhere hold money and move it around; they help make it possible for money to function as both a store of value and a medium of exchange. But thanks in large part to their country’s history of financial instability, a small yet growing number of Argentines are now using Bitcoin instead to fill those roles. They keep the currency in their Bitcoin “wallets,” digital accounts they access with a password, and use its network when they need to send or spend money, because even with Castiglione or one of his competitors serving as middlemen between the traditional economy and the Bitcoin marketplace, Bitcoin can be cheaper and more convenient than Argentina’s financial establishment. In effect, Argentines are conducting an ambitious experiment, one that threatens ultimately to spread to the United States and disrupt some of the most basic services its banks have to offer.  in early 2009, introduced by a shadowy figure known as Satoshi Nakamoto. The software underlying its creation established that Bitcoins would be released slowly and steadily until there are 21 million of them; at that point, more than 12 decades from now, no more Bitcoins will be generated. These rules produced two somewhat predictable results, especially coming in the immediate wake of the financial crisis and the government bailouts of the big banks. The limited and regular release of Bitcoins appealed to libertarians, who have been skeptical of currencies that governments can print in unlimited quantities. (When Rand Paul announced his candidacy for president last month, his campaign’s website began accepting donations in Bitcoin.) The built-in sense of scarcity also led people to regard Bitcoin as a kind of digital gold, its value likely to increase over time — in other words, something to buy and sell as a speculative investment. The millions of traders, many of them in China, who have bet on the price of the virtual currency have kept the cumulative value of all outstanding Bitcoins well above $2 billion since late 2013. At the same time, that speculative activity has left much of the general public wondering why these virtual coins should be worth anything at all. But the wild fluctuations in price — the value of a Bitcoin has bounced between $70 and $1,200 over the last two years — have obscured a significant aspect of the currency’s broader potential. Bitcoin digital tokens are part of a new kind of online financial network, which runs on the computers of those who use the virtual currency. People who join and support the network — hosting its open-source software, serving as record-keepers of sorts — receive new Bitcoins as they are released in a kind of recurring lottery, thus encouraging user participation. The details of how the network operates can be mind-numbingly complicated, involving lots of advanced math and cryptography, but at the most basic level, the network makes it possible for the first time to send valuable digital money around the world almost instantly, without moving through an intermediary like a bank or credit-card company or a service like PayPal. In a sense, the Bitcoin network was designed to be a financial version of email, which enables messages to be delivered without passing through a national postal service, or like the broader Internet itself, which allows people to publish news and essays without going through a media company. Instead of just delivering words, though, the Bitcoin network makes it possible to deliver money from New York to Shanghai in a matter of minutes without paying any financial institution. The number of Bitcoin users in Argentina is relatively small; it barely registers on most charts of global Bitcoin usage. But Argentina has been quietly gaining renown in technology circles as the first, and almost only, place where Bitcoins are being regularly used by ordinary people for real commercial transactions. A number of large American companies have started accepting Bitcoin payments, but so far there has been little economic incentive for their customers to pay with Bitcoins. In contrast, the best-known Bitcoin start-up in Argentina, BitPagos, is helping more than 200 hotels, both cheap and boutique, take credit-card payments from foreign tourists. The money brought to Argentina using Bitcoin circumvents the onerous government restrictions on receiving money from abroad. Castiglione has some hotel clients, but he says that many of his 800 or so registered customers are freelancers who use Bitcoin to get paid by overseas clients, or companies that want to move money in and out of Argentina. A popular new online retailer, Avalancha, began accepting Bitcoin last summer and has seen the volume of Bitcoin transactions grow steadily since then. Avalancha offers customers a 10 percent discount when they use the virtual currency, because accepting credit cards generally ends up costing Avalancha more than 10 percent as a result of the vagaries of the Argentine financial system. The Bitcoin community in Buenos Aires has been vibrant enough to produce what’s known as the Bitcoin Embassy in the center of the city, a four-story building that serves as the home to eight start-ups whose businesses depends on the Bitcoin network. Bitcoin proponents like to say that the currency first became popular in the places that needed it least, like Europe and the United States, given how smoothly the currencies and financial services work there. It makes sense that a place like Argentina would be fertile ground for a virtual currency. Inflation is constant: At the end of 2014, for example, the peso was worth 25 percent less than it was at the beginning of the year. And that adversity pales in comparison with past bouts of hyperinflation, defaults on national debts and currency revaluations. Less than half of the population use Argentine banks and credit cards. Even wealthy Argentines fear keeping their money in the country’s banks.  up on a remote sheep ranch in Patagonia and now lives on an estate looking out over Silicon Valley. He is, as much as anyone, responsible for making Bitcoin known in both Argentina and the United States. In 2001, he sold his first major start-up, a sort of ETrade for South Americans, to the Spanish bank Santander for $750 million. He sold his next big company, an online bank, to Banco Brasil. By the time he first heard about Bitcoin, in late 2011, he was in his first year of his latest start-up, Lemon, a mobile wallet for smartphones, not unlike Apple Pay, which came out three years later. His fascination with Bitcoin had less to do with professional experience, however, than a childhood spent in a country whose financial system seems to be terminally broken. There was rarely a time during Casares’s youth when Argentina was not enduring some sort of financial crisis. In 1983, after years of inflation, the government created the new peso: each new one was worth 10,000 old pesos. In 1985, the new peso, its value eroded by inflation, was in turn supplanted by the austral, worth 1,000 new pesos. Eventually the government went back to the peso, this time pegged to the dollar, an effort that also failed. “I think I understand economics better than most people because I grew up in Argentina,” Casares, now 41, told me. “I’ve seen every single monetary experiment you can imagine. This is the street-smart economics. Not the complex Ph.D. economics.” One particular episode is seared in Casares’s memory. In 1984, during the first significant episode of Argentine hyperinflation following the military junta’s loss of power, Casares’s mother came to get him and his two sisters from school one day. His mother carried two grocery bags filled with cash — the salary she had just been paid. She rushed with Casares and his sisters to the grocery store and made them run through the aisles, grabbing as much food as they could before the prices changed. (An employee walked through the store all day doing nothing but re-pricing the goods on the shelves to keep up with the rapidly changing value of the peso.) After paying at the register, Casares and his sisters ran back for more food to spend the leftover money on. In this hyperinflationary environment, holding on to pesos was the same thing as losing money. Casares is descended from one of Argentina’s old landholding families — a town called Carlos Casares, near Buenos Aires, is named after one of his ancestors — but his branch of the family went through hard times and ended up ranching sheep. When his father sold wool and the buyer’s check took a month to clear, that income could be halved by inflation, forcing yet more household cutbacks. Whatever savings accumulated were quickly exchanged for dollars, which held their value better than pesos. In 2003, Casares and five friends bought a school bus and drove it on a three-week road trip from Buenos Aires, the capital, to Tierra del Fuego, at the southern end of South America. After the vehicle was stolen upon their return, the friends vowed to buy a second bus for another trip. In December 2011, one of them, Jorge Restelli, finally found a bus for 60,000 pesos, or $14,000, in the classified ads. The friends who lived in Argentina quickly paid their shares to purchase and fix it up, but Casares stalled, knowing how much it cost in time and fees to move money from the United States to Argentina. Then Restelli told him that Bitcoin might be just the answer. At the time, the virtual currency had a small cult following in the United States and was essentially unheard-of in Argentina, but Restelli had read about it on an American tech blog. The same day Casares heard about Bitcoin, he found someone online who agreed to meet him at a cafe in Palo Alto and sell him 2,700 or so Bitcoins for about $8,000 in cash. Casares sent Restelli the Bitcoins that evening. Casares was fascinated by the transaction. Here was money that anyone could buy online and that promised to hold its value better than the peso. (That promise would later be tested by extreme price swings.) It also seemed to offer access to the financial system for those who couldn’t open bank accounts or secure credit cards. Even Casares, who created his first start-up in the country, had never held an Argentine bank account. He sent articles about Bitcoin to his bus-trip friends and explained how easy it was to move thousands of dollars in and out of Argentina. One friend went on to found the central Bitcoin advocacy group in Argentina and opened the Bitcoin Embassy in Buenos Aires. Casares began stockpiling Bitcoins, and when he visited Argentina during 2012, he posted offers to sell them on an Internet message board that was becoming a small, impromptu national marketplace for the virtual currency. He organized the first Bitcoin Meetup in Argentina in December 2012, though only a handful of people besides Restelli showed up at the whiskey bar where it was held. By then, Casares was proclaiming Bitcoin’s promise to any Silicon Valley friend who would listen. He had come to believe that the advantages of its network would push the value of each Bitcoin to astronomical values, just as slivers of the airwave spectrum increased in worth as more communication companies sought to use it. In the meantime, each Bitcoin could serve as an easy, secure place to store money, comparable to gold. Many of Casares’s friends in the United States were initially skeptical: What could Bitcoin do that their credit cards couldn’t? But Casares explained how places like Argentina were different. His first big convert among his friends, and the one whose opinion in this area mattered the most, was David Marcus, who had recently become the president of PayPal. Marcus’s light-bulb moment came in the fall of 2012, when the Argentine government ordered PayPal to bar direct payments between Argentines, part of the government’s effort to slow the exchange of pesos into other currencies. As the policy went into effect, and Marcus watched the price of Bitcoin rise against the peso, he figured that Argentines were using Bitcoin to circumvent the government’s restrictions. Marcus began buying Bitcoins himself and also pushed PayPal to start investigating the currency’s use. In March 2013 Casares attended an exclusive technology conference near Tucson hosted by the investment bank Allen & Company. At dinner the first night, Casares won the attention of a table full of investors by describing his childhood experiences in Argentina and how Bitcoin equipped people to avoid similar situations. He demonstrated the capabilities of the Bitcoin network by sending $250,000 worth of the virtual currency to the phone of a table mate, who was then directed to pass the money along to the man next to him with no more than a few taps of his iPhone keypad. During the next two days of the conference, a steady stream of attendees who had seen or heard about the Sunday-evening conversation approached Casares, including Reid Hoffman, the co-founder of LinkedIn. On a hike Wednesday afternoon, Casares spent the entire time explaining the concept to Charlie Songhurst, Microsoft’s head of corporate strategy. At the time, Casares was still running his mobile-wallet start-up and had no business stake connected to Bitcoin beyond his own holdings of the virtual currency, which had become substantial. He urged his friends to make their own purchases. On Monday, the first full day of the conference, the price of a Bitcoin jumped more than $2, to $36, and on Tuesday it rose more than $4, its sharpest rise in months, to more than $40. After everyone flew home from the conference, Songhurst wrote a paper and distributed it privately to some of the most powerful investors in Silicon Valley. “We foresee a real possibility that all currencies go digital, and competition eliminates all currencies from noneffective governments,” it said, channeling Casares’s arguments. “The power of friction-free transactions over the Internet will unleash the typical forces of consolidation and globalization, and we will end up with six digital currencies: US Dollar, euro, Yen, Pound, Renminbi and Bitcoin.” The buzz generated by the conference was not the only factor that pushed up the price of Bitcoin in March 2013. A financial crisis in Cyprus came to a head in the middle of the month; the closure of some bank accounts there led to conjecture that Russians were seeking refuge from the Cypriot banking system in Bitcoin. But Casares noticed that every time he helped another one of his wealthy friends start buying Bitcoins, prices rose, suggesting to him that they were responsible for much of the increase. Over the course of March, the price of a single Bitcoin nearly tripled, to around $100, and that surge generated the first widespread media coverage in the United States and Argentina (some of it, not coincidentally, from journalists cultivated by Casares). The crowd at the next Bitcoin Meetup in Argentina, hosted in April by one of Casares’s friends, was about five times larger than the first one organized by Casares just a few months earlier.  heard about Bitcoin that same March. A Canadian who hired him to do some software consulting asked if he could pay him in Bitcoin. Castiglione, who grew up in a small apartment in downtown Buenos Aires, ran his own consulting firm, the latest in a long line of jobs after he dropped out of college. He is a successful version of what Argentines refer to as a  , a person who gets by finding opportunities on the fringes of society, a more expansive career option in Argentina than in most countries. When it came to working for overseas clients, the biggest issue for Castiglione, like many Argentines, was the government-set exchange rate between dollars and pesos. In an attempt to tamp down inflation, the government has long forced banks to sell dollars at artificially low rates. In March 2013, the government said a dollar was worth around 5 pesos. But anyone could go to one of the money changers on Calle Florida and trade a dollar bill for about 8 pesos, the black-market rate, also known as the  . (Economists and people outside Argentina often regard the   as the real exchange rate, a closer reflection of the peso’s actual worth.) The official exchange rate was costly for businessmen like Castiglione. When dollars from foreign customers came in through traditional means, banks automatically converted them at the mandated rate, and Castiglione ended up with three fewer pesos for each dollar than he would have gotten by exchanging them on the street. Castiglione had to sacrifice nearly 40 percent of a foreign payment to turn it into pesos. When the Canadian customer paid Castiglione in Bitcoins, Castiglione found someone online willing to meet him in Buenos Aires and pay him in pesos at something close to the   rate. The demand for his Bitcoins was, in fact, so great that Castiglione, whose company was limping along, began to think there might be a business opportunity there. If he bought Bitcoins for slightly less than he sold them, he could make a profit on every trade, even if the price of Bitcoin didn’t go up. By September 2013, he had become a full-time Bitcoin broker. In-person Bitcoin trading, as Castiglione does it, happens in many other cities around the world. But if this were the only way to procure Bitcoins, the interest in trading them would not have exploded as it has in the United States and China, where exchanging money directly with strangers — without a trusted middleman, in other words — is not a routine part of business. In most places where Bitcoin has become popular, there have been ways to buy the virtual currency online. This, of course, requires cooperation with banks or other payment networks, which happened in the United States and Europe. The American company Coinbase, for instance, allows customers to transfer money from their bank to a Coinbase account and buy Bitcoins online. In Argentina, the banks refuse to work with Bitcoin companies like Coinbase, which isn’t surprising, given the government’s tight control over banks. This hasn’t deterred Argentines, long accustomed to changing money outside official channels. For Castiglione and his company, DigiCoins, this means operating at the edge of the law, but he takes comfort from the fact that, at least for now, the Argentine government has bigger problems to deal with. Instead of bank tellers and branches, Bitcoin users in Argentina have come to rely on Castiglione and his competitors, some of whom are even willing to make house calls. This financial system developed much more slowly than it has in the United States, where American companies could take deposits from banks anywhere in the country. But as a result, Argentina’s Bitcoin economy is much more resistant to bank policies, government regulations and full-service companies like Coinbase that undermine Bitcoin’s decentralizing spirit.  when I visited Buenos Aires in June 2014. At the time, he was working downtown, out of a stuffy single room in the same building as a Berlitz language-school office. A joker playing card was lodged in the corner of the whiteboard on the wall. A friend of Castiglione’s son was at a desk, working on the DigiCoins website. His daughter, Fiona, was in touch with customers by phone and online. His son, Marco, was in and out, taking cash to clients, which he carried in his backpack. Sitting behind his own desk next to the door, Castiglione was describing the life of a money-changer, especially when it comes to matters of security. He spoke with tough confidence: “Not many people will like to mess with us.” But he acknowledged that he and his children remained safe largely because they successfully kept their clients ignorant of their location by switching offices frequently: “Right now, maybe God is on our side.” One of Castiglione’s main competitors was another Bitcoin broker named Brenda Fernández. Originally from the Buenos Aires suburbs and a college dropout, she previously smuggled electronics into the country and sold them on the local equivalent of eBay. She talked in loud bursts, punctuated with high-pitched laughs, and proudly made provocative statements about breaking the law and ignoring standard business practices when I met her at an event at the Bitcoin Embassy. “I find a way to market myself as the crazy Bitcoin girl,” she told me. In a more serious moment, Fernández, who is 24, attributed both her attitude and her embrace of Bitcoin in part to the gender transition she made in her early 20s, after years of struggling with traditional gender categories. “It feels good, doing things that you are not supposed to, saying to the structures of power that they don’t have power over you,” she said. After the event at the embassy, Fernández took a small black-and-yellow taxi to a hostel near the National Congress that wanted to exchange about $1,000 worth of Bitcoins. The Rock Hostel, with band-themed rooms, caters to a young clientele. A number of people were drinking beer in the common area when Fernández showed up. The owner, a tattooed 29-year-old named Soledad Rodriguez Pons, had already transferred the Bitcoins to Fernández online, so after a bit of flirting, Fernández quickly handed over the cash; the transaction took place at the reception desk, where a sign offered customers a 10 percent discount if they paid by credit card. On top of the desk, under glass, were paper currencies from around the world. The Rock Hostel is one of hundreds of hotels in the country using the Argentine start-up BitPagos to collect credit-card payments from foreign customers. If Rodriguez Pons accepted credit-card payments from American customers through the usual financial channels, customers would be billed in dollars, and when those dollars came to Rodriguez Pons’s Argentine bank account, they would be converted at the official rate, about 30 percent lower than the black-market rate. It would also take 20 days for Rodriguez Pons to get her pesos. BitPagos helped counter these drawbacks by taking the credit-card payment in the United States and then using the dollars to buy Bitcoins, generally from Coinbase, before sending them to Rodriguez Pons immediately. When Rodriguez Pons needed to pay the rent or laundry bills, she called Fernández or Castiglione — her two standbys — to sell the Bitcoins for pesos at a rate close to the  . Rodriguez Pons saved so much money this way that she could offer the 10 percent discount for credit cards and still easily come out ahead. In June 2014, BitPagos moved about $150,000 for the Rock Hostel and other tourist establishments, nearly twice what it handled three months earlier. Rodriguez Pons, like many BitPagos clients, knew little about how Bitcoin worked and hadn’t tried hard to figure it out. She once, somewhat accidentally, held onto her Bitcoins at a time when the price was rising, and ended up with a small windfall when she sold. She used the proceeds to build a rooftop bar and a music-rehearsal space. Beyond those extras, Rodriguez Pons credited the savings from using BitPagos with keeping her business alive in Argentina’s very difficult business environment. The hardest part was often reaching Fernández and Castiglione. “I had to call Brenda four times today,” she said with a smile.  has dealt with Western Union or wired money abroad already knows, Argentina is not the only place that could benefit from Bitcoin’s easier and cheaper way of moving money across international borders. A Hong Kong firm called Bitspark recently opened a shop in a mall popular with Filipino domestic workers, through which they can send money back home using Bitcoin. Another firm, BitPesa, allows customers to convert Bitcoins into Kenyan shillings and deliver them into mobile wallets within Kenya. Transactions of this sort inevitably stir up fears of money laundering and terrorist financing. Banks currently serve as the front line in stopping illicit money transfers. If these regulated institutions are cut out of the business of moving money, the banks and government officials say, who will ensure that terrorists and organized crime are not using the network to move millions across borders? The fact that there is no single authority responsible for supervising the Bitcoin system has also made it easier for con men and thieves to defraud companies holding Bitcoins for customers — something that became clear last year when Mt. Gox, once the largest Bitcoin exchange in the world, declared bankruptcy after nearly half a billion dollars of clients’ Bitcoins were fraudulently transferred out of their accounts. (A hacker generally needs only an owner’s password to steal his or her Bitcoins.) Oddly enough, American regulators have actually been friendlier than banks toward the new technology. Even before the advent of Bitcoin, the Federal Reserve was looking into ways to update the relatively antiquated American payment networks, which often take two or three days to complete a simple money transfer. Several different branches of the Federal Reserve have released research papers over the last few years praising the improvements that Bitcoin might spur, even if Bitcoin itself isn’t adopted by the mainstream as a virtual currency. In 2013, when he was chairman of the Fed, Ben Bernanke wrote a letter to a Senate committee studying Bitcoin in which he praised its “long-term promise, particularly if the innovations promote a faster, more secure and more efficient payment system.” Banks are aware that this is an area in which they will likely have to adapt or lose business, perhaps even be made irrelevant. While most of the major banks have criticized Bitcoin and refused to work with virtual-currency companies, many of them are nonetheless spending a lot of time and energy behind the scenes studying the technology. JPMorgan Chase, the nation’s largest bank, decided in early 2014 not to conduct business with Bitcoin companies. But it did form its own Bitcoin Working Group, which consists of about two dozen executives throughout the bank who have been meeting fortnightly or monthly to discuss how the technology could change their business. Banks are captivated, in particular, by the ledger on which all Bitcoins and Bitcoin transactions are recorded: what is known as the blockchain. Unlike traditional financial ledgers, kept by a central institution, the Bitcoin ledger is updated and maintained by everyone on the network, not unlike how Wikipedia is written and monitored by its users. One virtue of this approach is that the network has no central point subject to failure, like Visa and the New York Stock Exchange in their financial realms. It also means there is no middleman collecting fees with each transaction. And because the bookkeeping is publicly accessible, records can’t be manipulated in secret or after the fact. JPMorgan belongs to an association of big banks, the Clearing House, that has been confidentially putting together a “proof of concept” for a decentralized ledger, or blockchain, that would run on the computers of all the participating banks. According to people involved, this network, which is still in the conceptual phase, could allow instant transfers between accounts at all the member banks and eliminate the current risks involved in having billions of dollars in limbo for days at a time. For many bankers, the most valuable potential use of the blockchain is not small payments but very large ones, which account for the vast majority of the money moving around the world each day. The banks, though, are moving slowly, even as several start-ups are trying to use the Bitcoin blockchain to do the same thing on a global basis, cutting out the banks altogether. One of the most recent entrants into this area is a start-up led by a former top executive from JPMorgan. The Federal Reserve has had its own people looking at how to utilize the blockchain technology and potentially even Bitcoin itself. If someone can find a way to minimize the volatility of Bitcoin prices — as many are trying to do — it would be much easier for people to keep their savings in Bitcoin instead of a bank account. “In the long run, Bitcoin will be very disruptive to the developed world,” Dan Morehead, a former Goldman Sachs executive who now runs a hedge fund focused on Bitcoin, told me. Things are happening sooner in Argentina, he said, because its financial system creates hassles for the people there. But, he added, “Argentina is just a more extreme example of the situation in every country.”  to Argentina in February this year, the price of Bitcoin had been falling for some time, scaring off many speculators in the United States. There was no sign of waning interest in Argentina, however. Several new companies were trying to provide a more seamless and reliable version of Castiglione’s service. BitPagos had recently started a service allowing its users to buy and sell small quantities of Bitcoin online and was closing in on a million-dollar fund-raising round with Silicon Valley venture capitalists, including Dan Morehead’s firm. A new company, Bitex, which had its own office down the street from the Bitcoin Embassy, was focused on using Bitcoin to transfer money among Latin American countries. All of the Argentine Bitcoin companies were working on expanding into Venezuela, where inflation is an even greater problem. Castiglione was so busy running around the city, trying to keep up with the competition, that he was hard to pin down. When we finally met near the Bitcoin Embassy, late at night, he was with a tough-looking friend who was joining DigiCoins to help with the physical deliveries of cash, bringing with him a motorcycle and experience handling large amounts of money. The men had just come back from a trip to a town three hours west of Buenos Aires, where they had sold $20,000 worth of Bitcoins. They had been forced to make the trip at the last minute because another big sale had fallen through, and they did not otherwise have enough dollars to conduct business for the next few days. “If I hadn’t gotten that cash, I was done,” Castiglione told me, before heading out for a last trade just before midnight. Earlier that day, as I sat with Fernández in a Subway sandwich shop, which was her temporary office, chosen for its free Wi-Fi, she did not try to hide her difficulty in adapting to the more competitive environment with her “crazy Bitcoin girl” routine, which was making it hard to keep big customers. She did have one business in the United States that sent her about $5,000 worth of Bitcoins each month and had her exchange the money and deposit the pesos into the company’s Argentine bank account, in order to make payroll. But a lot of her customers were young people who wanted to buy a few hundred pesos worth of a Bitcoin so that they could pay online for a Netflix subscription or a video game. “The market moved in another direction,” she said, “and I didn’t move in that direction.” She had come to have serious doubts about whether Bitcoin would end up being any better than the old system if it was dominated by the ruling class, which would be immune to any popular backlash, thanks to the lack of a central Bitcoin authority. “The key turning point is when the rich elite see it as a way to safeguard their wealth,” she said. Among the people Fernández and Castiglione were both contending with was Wences Casares. He decided in late 2013 that he cared too much about Bitcoin to leave its development to others. He quickly sold his digital-wallet start-up and started his own Bitcoin-centric company with one of the friends from the bus trip, Federico Murrone, an Argentine who was the head programmer on Casares’s past start-ups. Within two months of selling their old company, Casares and Murrone had secured $40 million in funding from investors like Reid Hoffman, the LinkedIn co-founder. The office that Casares’s new company, Xapo (pronounced “zappo”), opened in Buenos Aires has none of the scrappiness of other virtual-currency players in the country. It occupies a full floor of a building in a fashionable part of the city; amenities included table tennis, glass walls and large, wall-mounted televisions. Xapo initially concentrated on ultrasecure storage for customers who own lots of Bitcoins — it holds the Bitcoins of many of the wealthy tech moguls who followed Casares’s advice. But Casares has ambitions to turn the company into a one-stop financial provider for the virtual-currency industry. The global aspirations were evident from the Hindi-language site that I saw his staff creating. Casares spent months establishing a partnership with Taringa, the most popular Argentine social network. This month, millions of Taringa members in Argentina and the rest of Latin America automatically had a Xapo Bitcoin wallet opened for them. Users will be able to put Bitcoins or fractions of Bitcoins in their wallets by depositing cash at local drugstores, in the same way they pay utility bills. From those accounts, Argentines can pay for things online without a credit card or make online micropayments of 5 or 10 cents for video games and other digital goods (credit cards usually charge a minimum of 25 or 30 cents for each purchase). When I asked Castiglione what he thought about a global venture like Xapo, he evinced a workingman’s skepticism. “We might not be as big as Wences, but the real thing happens here,” Castiglione said, as we sat in his temporary office between client visits. “People get the cash to spend.” Whether his endeavors would help Bitcoin live up to its grand promise — supplanting Wall Street and central banks — was something Castiglione would consider only in the most pragmatic terms. “If people don’t use it, it will go to trash, like anything that isn’t used in this world,” he told me. “If people use it, then it has a future.”
• So you want to be Deutsche Bank’s next C.E.O... • Investors are selling tech again. • Will Wall Street’s top regulator keep going after bad bankers? • More potential limits on gun sales • Facebook’s growing political troubles • Uber’s self-driving travails Imagine you are applying to be the C.E.O. of Deutsche Bank now that   a successor to John Cryan, the bank’s current chief. You survey the bank’s numbers to get a sense of the opportunities and challenges you’d face. Staring you in the face is the stock price, down nearly 30 percent this year. Ugly, but it could be a good entry point. It gives you time to try out some tough measures aimed at improving Deutsche Bank’s performance. Even if those moves produce near-term losses, the stock may not dive, given how far it’s already fallen. Then you look at the strength of Deutsche Bank’s capital, as expressed by a regulatory measure called the common equity tier 1 capital ratio. That’s at 14 percent, a solid-looking level, achieved in part by an €8 billion equity raise last year. In theory, you have something to spend on your chosen plans. But then you realize that Deutsche Bank’s share price is now back at the level at which the bank sold those shares. Shareholders must be livid. Not only that, Deutsche Bank’s stock market value is less than 40 percent of its net worth as stated on its balance sheet (its stock price is €11.30 and its book value per share is €30.16.) When a company trades at a hefty discount to its net worth, it either needs to raise a lot of new capital, which doesn’t seem to be the case at Deutsche Bank, or investors have serious doubts about the company’s business model. “So, I’ll rejig the bank’s business model,” you say to yourself, “that’s what new C.E.O.’s do!” You look for ways and stumble upon an unavoidable obstacle. Deutsche Bank is heavily dependent on Wall Street revenue, which can be far more unpredictable than revenue from other businesses. Last year, revenue from Deutsche Bank’s corporate and investment bank, which has struggled to keep up with its peers, accounted for 54 percent of the bank’s overall revenue. Compare that with JPMorgan Chase, whose investment bank accounted for a third of its revenue last year. And you are stuck with the Wall Street operations; no one wants to buy an investment bank with €1.2 trillion in assets. Maybe you can cut costs, another go-to tactic of an incoming C.E.O. Indeed, Deutsche Bank’s investment bank employees seem better paid than their counterparts at other firms. Going by a back of the envelope calculation, the unit’s compensation expense is equivalent to 44 percent of its revenue (excluding the interest the investment bank earns on its assets.) That’s higher than the 39 percent ratio for JPMorgan’s investment bank last year, and 41 percent for Goldman Sachs. Maybe you could slash the pay of bankers and traders. Sorry, Mr. Cryan  . The roller coaster ride in tech continues. The tech-heavy Nasdaq Composite tumbled nearly 3 percent, while the Dow Jones industrial average and the S.&P. 500 fell 1.4 percent and 1.7 percent. Tech companies in the S.&P. 500 tech sector slid 3.4 percent, the steepest decline among the index’s 11 main sectors. Chip makers were among the hardest hit on the day. Shares of Nvidia dropped 7.8 percent after it said it was halting tests on self-driving cars. Nvidia’s slide weighed on the shares of rival chip makers. Micron Technologies fell 5.7 percent, and AMD dropped 4.2 percent. But semiconductor companies were hardly the only ones getting pummeled. The famed FANG stocks, among the biggest gainers over the past year, tumbled Tuesday. Facebook, Amazon, Netflix and Google-parent Alphabet all finished down more than 4.5 percent. Tesla tumbled 8.2 percent on news that the National Transportation Safety Board   this year into a Tesla car crash. The stock is off nearly 20 percent since March 12 on increasing concerns that the electric-car maker will fall short of its production goals for the Model 3. Twitter dropped 12 percent after  it was shorting the social media company. Tuesday’s fall continued the recent volatility in American stocks, and specifically, the shares of tech companies. Enthusiasm about the technology sector had long propelled stock markets to new heights. But the specter of intensifying regulation of the industry has taken the sheen off. Last week tech stocks dragged the broader markets to their worst week in more than two years. The selling took a break on Monday as the S.&P. 500’s tech sector rose 4 percent pushing the index to its best day in almost three years. A vigorous   is taking place over who should become the next head of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, a powerful regulator on Wall Street’s front lines. Contenders for the post should address one question: What will you do to clean up the culture at banks? William C. Dudley, the outgoing president of the New York Fed, had made improving the culture at the firms he oversaw a key initiative of his tenure of at the institution. When Mr. Dudley took the helm in 2009, the financial crisis had left the New York Fed’s reputation as a regulator damaged. The institution had not done enough to address the severe weaknesses at the banks it oversaw, like  . Early on, Mr. Dudley commissioned a review of the New York Fed’s bank supervision department and then  . But in 2012, JPMorgan Chase, also overseen by the New York Fed, suffered huge trading losses in what was known as the London Whale scandal. The New York Fed was  . Following the embarrassing London Whale imbroglio, Mr. Dudley used his bully pulpit to focus on bankers’ ethics. Banks were stronger financially, but recent scandals showed that the culture of their firms still needed to improve, he observed. And if a cleanup didn’t occur, it may be a sign that they needed to be reduced in size, Mr. Dudley said in a 2014   that rattled Wall Street. The next big banking scandal — Wells Fargo’s widespread mistreatment of customers, which came to light in 2016 – strongly supported Mr. Dudley’s arguments. Wells Fargo was considered one of the most stable “too big to fail” banks, with its focus on plain vanilla lending, but in fact, its retail sales culture had degraded. The Fed earlier this year slapped relatively harsh   on the bank, including a limit on its size. The example of Wells Fargo is pertinent for John C. Williams, a   to replace Mr. Dudley. Mr. Williams is head of the San Francisco Fed, which oversees Wells Fargo. And there is still work to do to fulfill Mr. Dudley’s initiative. He proposed a “database of banker misconduct,” similar to the one for brokers, that would track a banker’s record on ethics and compliance. Banks could consult it before hiring. But this idea has not taken off. In   at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce on Monday, Mr. Dudley explained why: “Understandably, firms are concerned about legal risk if they share information about banker misconduct, but there may be ways to address these concerns through legislation.” Mr. Dudley had also pressed banks’ boards of directors to focus on ethical culture. On Monday, he said the boards had set up separate committees to focus on culture and conduct. “We’ve made part of the journey but I think more could be done,” Mr. Dudley said. Whether it will, depends on who steps into his shoes. The yield curve is near its flattest level since the financial crisis. The difference between the yields on the two-year and 10-year Treasury notes is at 0.52 percentage points, not far off its post-crisis low of 0.50 percentage points hit in January. That has some asking if the nine-year-old economic recovery is at risk. Since the end of World War II, no barometer has done a better job of predicting a recession than the yield curve. A flattening yield curve tends to indicate slowing economic growth in the near future. But what is more worrisome is if the yield curve goes beyond flattening and into outright inversion. The chances of a recession when the yield curve is flattening is just 20 percent, according to the calculations of Jim Paulsen, the chief investment strategist at the Leuthold Group. That jumps to 72 percent when the curve inverts. There is another reason not to be too concerned about a flattening yield curve, and it has to do with the actions of central banks around the world. The unprecedented stimulus from the Fed, Bank of Japan and E.C.B. have brought down long-term rates. That means the yield curve might not be the predictor it once was. A week after a self-driving Uber vehicle hit and killed a woman in Arizona, the fallout continues to spread. Nvidia on Tuesday n New Jersey, Santa Clara, Japan and Germany.    , using A.V. as an abbreviation for automated vehicles : Nvidia’s artificial intelligence platform is the autonomous industry’s leader. The chip maker has partnered with auto makers such as Volkswagen, Tesla and Audi. Around 320 firms - from software developers, automakers and their suppliers, sensor and mapping companies - use Nvidia’s platform,  . Nvidia is just the latest company to halt tests on self-driving cars in the wake of the accident in Arizona. Toyota, nuTonomy and Uber have all already done so. Citigroup became the biggest Wall Street firm thus far to take actions to limit gun sales. Others, like JPMorgan Chase, Bank of America, Visa and Mastercard, are studying options. (Bank of America and JPMorgan are   to Remington Outdoor, along with Wells Fargo, which is the N.R.A.’s bank of choice.) In  , Andrew suggests these new tactics: • Credit-card issuers and banks could give gun sellers who have announced restrictions on sales, like Walmart and Dick’s Sporting Goods, a special merchant category code. That could help financial firms decide with whom they want to do business. • Payment processors could geofence gun shows and enforce restrictions on transactions coming from those GPS coordinates. Here’s what Citi’s C.E.O., Mike Corbat, told Andrew about his firm’s actions: Where to begin? The company   from the Federal Trade Commission, the Senate Judiciary Committee, several state attorneys general and the watchdog group Common Cause. And Britain’s Parliament asked Mark Zuckerberg to testify ( ). Facebook’s stock overall is headed for its worst monthly performance in nearly five years. Yet the company’s shares recovered from another beating, closing up slightly yesterday. And just two analysts have “sell” ratings on the stock, compared to 44 who have “buy” ratings.  Did a Brexit campaign group violate election laws by  , a digital marketer with ties to Cambridge Analytica?  thinks that the big question is how many users value privacy more than having a Facebook account.   argues the Cambridge Analytica scandal could lead to “a full-scale personal and public reckoning that looks at the way we’ve used the internet for the last decade.” Bankers and deal lawyers may want to send some of their bonus to Amazon this year. M.&A. activity is running at record levels and concerns about the e-commerce giant have played a role in driving a number of the largest deals. The latest? GlaxoSmithKline’s   in their consumer health joint venture, which includes Sensodyne toothpaste, for $13 billion. Amazon may not have been the main reason, but its impact on the pricing of consumer health products likely played a role. Historically, such products  , but customers that keep coming back. Sales, though, are slowing, up just 3 percent over the past two years, half the rate of the previous two, according to Morgan Stanley. Price competition from online retailers like Amazon has some worried it could decelerate further. That partly helps explain why Novartis was willing to exit the business. So why was Glaxo willing to pay up for the business? 1) Starting this month Novartis  in the joint venture. Doing the deal now removes uncertainty. 2) The deal will allow its new chief executive to “get on with fixing GSK’s pharmaceutical division, which suffers from a relatively lackluster pipeline of new drugs,” writes  Shares of Glaxo have gained 6.3 percent. The S.&P. 500 rose 2.7 percent yesterday, its best day in nearly three years (as President Trump would be  ). Maybe it’s because, as Peter Eavis writes, the president’s threats of a trade war with China might be merely negotiating tactics. : According to this view, the tariff proposal was a jarring move partly aimed at getting China to see that the U.S. was serious about shifting trade terms. If China doesn’t show real signs that it will do more to open its markets, Mr. Trump could up the ante — roiling the markets again. But the White House’s more conciliatory tone yesterday after last week’s sell-off suggests there is not a strong desire for a full trade war. But remember that Beijing is firmly committed to  , while the U.S. is equally adamant about letting American companies  . (Even if G.M. and Ford, who have joint ventures with Chinese companies,   on U.S. car imports.) And Stephen Roach of Yale thinks that the U.S.-China trade deficit  .  The U.S. is near  , after winning concessions on steel exports and imports of U.S. cars.   is risky. Hedge funds are taking refuge in  . And the Western world’s economic institutions are being attacked  . • White House lawyers are examining whether more than $500 million of loans to Kushner Companies may have violated criminal laws or federal ethics regulations. ( ) • Democrats and progressive groups aren’t happy with the possibility of John C. Williams taking over the New York Fed. ( ) • Stormy Daniels’s interview with “60 Minutes” drew  , the program’s highest ratings in almost a decade. She’s suing President Trump’s personal attorney, Michael Cohen,  . • The White House’s criterion for judicial nominees: favor shrinking the federal government. ( ) The state’s governor, Doug Ducey, ordered Uber to   there after the death of a pedestrian in Tempe. Uber’s repeated problems — even after a change in leadership — have led the journalist Steven Hill to argue that   on the company, including caps on the number of vehicles and rules against subsidizing rides. • Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman and Masa Son of SoftBank met in New York. ( ) • The F.C.C. is another regulator wary of Huawei. ( ) • Google, Tesla and Qualcomm are banding together to challenge SoftBank’s ARM Holdings. ( ) • Bitcoin fell below $8,000 after Twitter banned some cryptocurrency ads. ( ) • A.I. is now coming for Hollywood special-effects producers. ( ) • IBM faces accusations of age discrimination. ( ) Third Point: Dan Loeb’s hedge fund has built a position in  , according to  , following Pershing Square Capital Management. They’re both betting that the industrial conglomerate will split up. Elliott: The firm has reportedly taken a stake in   and plans to push the company to  . D.E. Shaw: The hedge fund scored another win yesterday when   said that  . D.E. Shaw has been pressuring the retailer to expand sales more quickly and will have a say in choosing the new C.E.O. . Barington Capital: To settle a proxy fight, the embattled cosmetics company   gave the activist fund  . The fund has been pushing for a sale. • Meet HNA’s quiet power broker: Wang Wei, younger brother of the Chinese conglomerate’s chairman. ( ) • Akzo Nobel has reached a deal to sell its specialty chemicals unit to the Carlyle Group and GIC of Singapore for €10.1 billion, including debt, or $12.6 billion. ( ) • Brookfield Property Partners agreed to buy the 66 percent of GGP that it doesn’t already own for about $9.25 billion. ( ) •   is paying I.P.O.-level fees for its non-I.P.O.  , a cloud-based business software company, reportedly plans to go public. Both  , the maker of upscale coolers, and  , the Swiss airline catering business owned by HNA, have pulled their offerings. • Lightspeed Venture Partners is   for new funds. Lerer Hippeau is   of the embattled Binary Capital. • How Alibaba and Tencent became Asia’s biggest deal makers. ( ) • Why private equity hasn’t helped smaller grocery chains struggling against Walmart and Amazon. ( ) • Deutsche Bank is reportedly seeking to replace its C.E.O.,  , according to   and  . •  , the Coutts & Company banker accused of sexual harassment, has resigned. ( ) • JPMorgan Chase has named   as the co-head of its global diversified industrials investment banking team. ( ) • Shell Oil plans to name Gretchen Watkins, the former C.E.O. of Maersk Oil, as president and U.S. country chair. ( ) • Nickelodeon has cut ties with  , the producer of “iCarly” and “Kenan and Kel.” ( ) • Goldman Sachs began an investigation after a former employee wrote to Lloyd Blankfein saying that a group of colleagues attempted to rape her in 1994. ( ) • Goldman is deploying investment banking partners to hubs like Atlanta, Dallas, Seattle and Toronto. ( ) • The average Wall Street banker’s bonus last year was the highest since before the financial crisis. ( ) • How a tiny Latvian bank became a haven for the world’s dirty money. ( ) • Cisco Systems promised to donate $50 million over five years to fight homelessness in Santa Clara County, Calif. ( ) • Royal Dutch Shell has set out what it thinks it would take for the world to control climate change — including using far less oil by 2070. ( ) • G.M. said its South Korean unit would file for bankruptcy if a labor union rejected a restructuring plan. ( ) • Imagine if Gordon Gekko bought news empires. Heath Freeman is like that, only worse, writes Joe Nocera. ( )
SAN FRANCISCO — The virtual currency boom has gotten so heated that it is throwing the list of the world’s richest people into disarray. Consider what has happened to the founders of an upstart virtual currency known as Ripple, which has seen its value skyrocket in recent weeks. At one point on Thursday, Chris Larsen, a Ripple co-founder who is also the largest holder of Ripple tokens, was worth more than $59 billion,  . That would have briefly vaulted Mr. Larsen ahead of Facebook chief executive Mark Zuckerberg into fifth place on the Forbes list of the world’s richest people. Other top Ripple holders would have also zoomed up that list as the value of their tokens soared more than 100 percent during the last week — and more than 30,000 percent in the last year. The boom has turned Ripple into the second largest virtual currency, within striking distance of the original behemoth, Bitcoin. The explosion in Ripple’s value over the past month is the starkest illustration yet of how   has spilled over into a broader universe of virtual currencies. These coins — with names like Cardano, Stellar, and Iota — are generally new twists on the Bitcoin technology, which uses a decentralized network of volunteer computers to keep a record, known as a blockchain, of all transactions. While most of these currencies were worth nearly nothing a year ago, many are now responsible for creating billionaires — albeit with rapidly fluctuating fortunes. If this is a tulip fever, the fever has spread to chrysanthemums and poppies. Mr. Larsen’s soaring wealth sparked a few congratulatory messages on Twitter on Thursday, even if the value of Ripple — and his Forbes ranking — dropped later in the day. But his net worth, and the ballooning value of Ripple tokens, mostly drew comments about the irrationality of the virtual currency markets, which appear to be largely driven these days by the fear of missing out, or FOMO. “This is beyond insane,” said Jeremy Gardner, an investor who previously worked at the virtual currency hedge fund Blockchain Capital, which invested in Ripple. “There’s absolutely nothing driving this rally except rampant FOMO, misinformation, and speculation.” Ripple, whose tokens are known as XRP, is far from the only virtual currency being fueled by the hysteria. In 2017, there were 29 tokens — including Einsteinium and Byteball — that rose more than Bitcoin’s remarkable 1,600 percent jump, according to OnChainFx, a data provider. Nearly 40 virtual currencies are worth more than $1 billion — when all the outstanding tokens are counted at their current value — despite many of them not having been used in any sort of transaction other than speculative trading. Against this backdrop, Ripple could be considered a staid institution, though one with a colorful history. Ripple was invented in 2012 by Jed McCaleb, a programmer who had created Mt. Gox, a Bitcoin exchange that later  . Mr. McCaleb designed Ripple as a faster and more efficient version of Bitcoin, without the mining process that Bitcoin uses to distribute new coins and secure the network. Mr. Larsen joined Mr. McCaleb early on to create a company, also known as Ripple. The company helped develop an open source Ripple software that makes it possible to move money between digital wallets. The Ripple token is one of the currencies that can be transferred with the software. Mr. McCaleb later left Ripple in an acrimonious divorce, though he retained a sizable number of Ripple tokens. His holdings were worth around $20 billion at Thursday’s prices, putting him close to 40th on the Forbes list. (The actual list is only published once a year, and no big virtual currency holders have been officially added.) Mr. McCaleb has since created a competitor to Ripple, known as Stellar. Stellar has risen even faster than Ripple in recent weeks, with all outstanding Stellar tokens — known as Lumens — worth around $14 billion on Thursday, making it the seventh largest virtual currency. In contrast, all the outstanding Ripple tokens were worth $140 billion on Thursday, while all Bitcoin were worth $250 billion. Yet the fortunes of Mr. McCaleb and Mr. Larsen are not nearly as durable as those of other people on the Forbes list given that the value of virtual currencies fluctuates wildly. If Mr. Larsen wanted to access his wealth by selling Ripple tokens for dollars, it would likely drive down the value of Ripple tokens — and his riches. Mr. McCaleb and Mr. Larsen did not respond to questions about the recent price increases. Mr. Larsen was Ripple’s chief executive from 2012 until he stepped down last year to become the company’s executive chairman. During his tenure, Ripple focused on helping banks use its software to shift money between different foreign currencies, something that most banks currently do through a cumbersome process involving separate accounts in every country where they operate. Ripple has said it has signed up more than 100 banks to use the company’s technology, including American Express and Banco Santander. But banks do not need to use Ripple tokens for Ripple’s software to transfer dollars, euros and yen. That point appears to be lost on many small time investors who are buying Ripple tokens. Most of the buying and selling of Ripple tokens is happening in South Korea, according to data providers that track virtual currency exchanges, where   at a wide array of virtual currencies. Several virtual currency hedge fund investors said that they have talked to banks and heard about interest in Ripple’s software, but not its tokens. “I’m not aware of banks using or planning to use the XRP token at the scale of tens of billions of dollars necessary to support XRP’s valuation,” said Ari Paul, a co-founder of the hedge fund BlockTower Capital. Ripple has so far   is planning to use the Ripple token. Brad Garlinghouse, who took over as Ripple’s chief executive last year, said in an interview this week that other institutions are also using — or looking at using — XRP, but the company could not name them because of confidentiality agreements. Mr. Garlinghouse said he thought the rising value of Ripple tokens was justified, given the company’s growth and the size of the foreign currency markets that Ripple wants to tackle. “It’s clear that people increasingly understand that we are solving a very large problem,” he said. Ripple has attracted the ire of Bitcoin fans because Ripple has a greater degree of centralized authority in Mr. Garlinghouse’s company, even though the Ripple software is open source. Bitcoin and other virtual currencies were designed to operate without companies or governments in charge. But the company Ripple, if not the XRP token, has won a following among top figures in government and finance who are interested in bringing the ideas introduced by Bitcoin into the traditional financial system. The company’s board includes the former top financial regulator in New York state, Benjamin M. Lawsky, and Gene Sperling, who was the director of the National Economic Council under Presidents Barack Obama and Bill Clinton. Still, even virtual currency analysts who believe in Ripple’s software have said there is a big difference between Ripple the company being successful, and Ripple the token gaining enough traction to justify current prices. “An impossibly long list of things already needs to go right for XRP to become a reserve currency for banks,” Ryan Selkis, a virtual currency analyst,  . But, Mr. Selkis added, that doesn’t mean Ripple’s price won’t keep ascending. Why? “Because this is crypto, and everyone in the industry is now slinging crack crypto cocaine to retail addicts,” he wrote.
SAN FRANCISCO — Google is joining Facebook in banning advertising for Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies. Google, the largest provider of digital advertising on the internet,   that it plans to change its advertising policy for certain financial services, including cryptocurrencies, starting in June. The new restriction would apply both to space on Google’s platforms, like YouTube, and to third-party websites where Google sells advertising space. Facebook announced in January that   and other cryptocurrencies in order to stop misleading and deceptive promotions. Together, Google and Facebook account for the majority of advertising on the internet in terms of revenue. The short announcement on Google’s advertising policies page did not specify why Google planned to turn away that advertising. The company said the ban also applied to content related to cryptocurrencies “including but not limited to initial coin offerings, cryptocurrency exchanges, cryptocurrency wallets and cryptocurrency trading advice.” The frenzy around Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies has raised concerns about scammers using online advertisements to recruit potential marks enticed by  . Advertising for new virtual currencies exploded late last year when prices jumped. Some of that activity drew skepticism from regulators. Many start-ups sold their own custom virtual currencies in so-called  , which became a popular way to raise money to fund new software projects. Online advertising was a popular way to market the coins to new customers. In recent months, American regulators have made it clear that many of the coin offerings were most likely illegal. That has pushed down the prices of most virtual currencies and dampened the market for the ads. The restrictions on cryptocurrency advertising are similar to limits Google places on other forms of ads, including the promotion of counterfeit items or sexually explicit content.
• Harry’s wants to take on P.&G. • Are rising rates good or bad for stocks? • How Mick Mulvaney is softening the C.F.P.B • Steven Mnuchin is promising to quickly shut down hedge funds’ latest tax dodge. • Why is Peter Thiel abandoning the Bay Area? U.S. Bancorp, based in Minneapolis, has long had a reputation for being one of the best-run large regional banks in the country. But because the bank’s anti-money laundering controls were inadequate, it failed to spot and investigate a large number of suspicious transactions, federal prosecutors for the Southern District of New York  . U.S. Bancorp   it would pay   to settle the missteps with the Department of Justice and other agencies. The prosecutors highlighted the bank’s handling of a high-profile customer who, they asserted, should have set off alarm bells: U.S. Bancorp said on Thursday that it had put in place measure to improve its anti-money laundering controls. The missteps under scrutiny took place between 2009 and 2014. The founders of Harry’s turned their company into a fast-growing competitor to established giants like Gillette in the $2.4 billion shaving industry. Now they want to take on Gillette’s parent company, Procter & Gamble. Harry’s   in a new round of financing, money that its leaders said would help the company develop brands beyond men’s grooming. “We’ve built a lot of infrastructure at Harry’s that we think we can leverage into new categories,” Jeff Raider, one of Harry’s founders, said in a telephone interview. “It’s something that we’ve been excited about for a long time, and we’re now at a point in our business where we can act on it.” A week ago the major United States indexes fell into a correction, defined as a 10 percent decline from a recent high. The cause? Fears the economy was heating up, which would lead to a pickup in inflation and Federal Reserve raising rates faster than anticipated. But in the week since the S.&P. 500 has stage a comeback. The index is up 7.6 percent and on pace for best week since 2014, according to Bloomberg. In fact, the S.&P. 500 and Dow Jones industrial average rose more than 2 percent the past two days despite the latest inflation data coming in much higher than expected. One explanation for why stock investors shrugged off the inflation data was a very weak report on retail sales. Investors seemed to take that as evidence the economy is not overheating and that the Fed will continue to raise rates at a very slow pace. Two weeks ago when the sell-off started, the Atlanta Fed’s GDPNow forecast for first-quarter G.D.P. fell to 3.25 percent from 5.4 percent two weeks ago. “While it does appear that inflation is accelerating, it appears much less likely that the economy is really taking off and forcing the Fed into a more aggressive rate hiking cycle,” write the strategists over at Bank of America Merrill Lynch. A rising rate environment is not necessarily a bad thing for stocks. Jodie Gunzberg, the head of United States equities at S&P Dow Jones Indices, points out that since 1971 the S&P 500: • has returned   in rising rate periods • has  of 9 times • has   twice • loss   once  on Thursday provides new insight into what’s going on under Mick Mulvaney at the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, the agency set up after the financial crisis to stamp out lending abuses. Since President Trump appointed Mr. Mulvaney as temporary head in November, his critics say he has taken steps to soften the bureau’s oversight of banks and other financial firms. ProPublica’s article centers on the bureau’s handling of investigations into Wells Fargo. It reports that Mr. Mulvaney ordered restrictions on the accessing of personal data of Wells Fargo customers, a move that hampered the bureau’s investigations. An exemption on the freeze was later granted to enforcement staff looking into Wells Fargo’s auto insurance business. But ProPublica added: Hedge funds have been   to get around new restrictions on carried interest payouts, which are taxed at 20 percent instead of the higher individual rate. The tax overhaul requires funds to hold onto investments for three years to qualify for the lower rate. They’ve been getting around it by creating single-member LLCs in Delaware to receive carried interest payouts. More from Miles Weiss of Bloomberg: Steven Mnuchin has promised   within two weeks.  President Trump   in gas taxes for infrastructure spending. Cisco will   in overseas profits after the tax overhaul. Yesterday was 13F day: Here’s  . Why is Peter Thiel — the PayPal co-founder, early Facebook backer and notable Trump backer —   for Los Angeles, as the WSJ reports, citing unnamed sources? The headline reason is his belief that Silicon Valley is too intolerant of conservatives and libertarians. But there’s an interesting second reason in the article (emphasis added): The WSJ reports that Mr. Thiel will spend at least a bit more time working on a non-tech endeavor: a right-leaning media organization. He will still be involved in Founders Fund, the V.C. firm he co-founded, as well as stay on the boards of Facebook, the data consultancy Palantir and other tech companies. The New Jersey-based start-up co-founded by Dr. Peter Diamandis, the founder of  , and Dr. Bob Hariri, a former Celgene executive, announced that it has raised $250 million. The company  for diseases from cancer to autoimmune disorders using stem cells from the placenta. “My goal is to make it so the next generation grows up in a world where cancer is managed just like the common cold, and the body’s natural regenerative engine remains empowered throughout our lives,” said Dr. Hariri. Celgene, United Therapeutics, Sorrento Therapeutics, Human Longevity, the Dreyfus Family Office and Section 32 took part in the series-A funding. • Roche is buying Flatiron Health, an Alphabet-backed cancer-focused start-up founded by two former Google employees,   citing according to sources familiar with the matter. The company will pay $1.9 billion, adding to its existing stake, for a total value of $2.1 billion. Asian and European stock indexes are  . So are S. & P. 500 futures, indicating a strong open. And in the bond markets? Ten-year Treasury yields are at  . Why? The Bureau of Labor Statistics’ inflation report was higher than expected. But weaker retail sales tempered those fears — at least for equity investors. What economists think: “The risk is now that the Federal Reserve pencils in four rate hikes [for this year] when it meets in March,” Peter Hooper, the chief economist at Deutsche Bank,  . To some, the bond market is a particularly prescient predictor of economic trends. So is it picking up on an inflationary surge that the Federal Reserve likely will take too long to recognize? But the overheating fears may be overdone. Yesterday’s January inflation report was hardly conclusive. Michael Feroli, an economist at JPMorgan Chase, said that the January increase “probably overstates the underlying trend.” Still, even though there are reasons to believe that while the U.S. economy is breaking out of its recent rut — thanks to big tax cuts and a revival of the global economy — it may not be as vibrant as it looks. • Reasons for doubt about the Trump administration’s economic optimism. ( ) • How Harvard and others bet on markets staying calm. ( ) • The stock market should be cheaper, argues Eduardo Porter. ( ) If Nestlé   in the cosmetics giant beyond 23 percent, as its C.E.O. said during an earnings report today, that leaves one logical place to go. (Caveat: Selling might make Third Point’s Dan Loeb happy, but Nestlé doesn’t want to rush and lose out on L’Oréal’s sales growth.) Nestlé added that its future is likely to contain more deals in the several-hundred-million range of the Blue Bottle Coffee takeover. “The sweet spot is in small to mid-sized deals, but we don’t want to rule out anything,” its C.E.O., Mark Schneider, said. • The Goldman Sachs bankers who helped Amazon buy Whole Foods Market feared that the Trump administration would squash the deal to spite Jeff Bezos. ( ) • Fox’s bid for control of Sky may hinge on Rupert Murdoch’s character. ( ) • Thomson Reuters’ chairman has reservations about his company’s $17 billion deal with the Blackstone Group. ( ) • Was Broadcom wise to offer a big antitrust breakup fee in its Qualcomm bid? ( ) • Tax authorities have requested documents from lenders and investors in real estate projects managed by Jared Kushner’s family, an unnamed source says. ( ) • Rebekah Mercer wrote in an op-ed that Steve Bannon had taken Breitbart in the wrong direction, and it could expand its influence without him. ( ) • The F.C.C.’s inspector general is investigating whether its chairman, Ajit Pal, timed deregulatory moves to benefit Sinclair Broadcasting. ( ) • Senators agreed on an immigration proposal, one of a sort that President Trump has threatened to veto. ( ) • After Mr. Trump’s personal lawyer declared that he himself had paid $130,000 to the pornographic actress Stormy Daniels, he faces questions about ethics and breach of contract. ( ) • More than 130 administration officials — including Ivanka Trump, Jared Kushner and the White House counsel, Don McGahn — lacked permanent security clearance as recently as November. ( ) • Fannie Mae is seeking $3.7 billion from the Treasury Department after reporting a $6.5 billion loss for the fourth quarter. ( ) • The E.P.A.’s chief, Scott Pruitt, said he had traveled in first class and on military jets  . And   in emissions regulations for trucks favored by backers of the Trump administration. Here’s what Dara Khosrowshahi said of the company’s deep-pocketed new backer yesterday at Goldman Sachs’s annual tech conference: “Rather than having their capital cannon facing me, I’d rather have  , all right?” He added that SoftBank’s Masa Son “is a visionary — if a visionary wants to make a bet on you,  .” He also offered this ambition: “I want you to be able to take an Uber and get into the subway — if the trains are running on time, you’ve got real-time data — get in the subway, get out and have an Uber waiting for you for right now. Or know that there’s a bike right there for you that gets you where you’re going in the fastest manner.” • Amazon will   on small-business lending, unnamed sources say. Its Washington lobbying operation  . And it’s planning  . • Mark Zuckerberg has accelerated sales of his Facebook stocks to fund the philanthropic Chan Zuckerberg Initiative. ( ) • Google’s Chrome browser will block some online ads. Critics say the choice of which types to block is self-serving. ( ) • Snapchat said it would let creators of “Official Stories” see analytics about the performance of their work. ( ) In the latest White Collar Watch column, Peter Henning considers the potential benefits of  :  Charlie Munger thinks Bitcoin is “ .” And Bitcoin’s up 12 percent over the last 24 hours, at $9,972, according to  . • Elizabeth Warren has written to Wells Fargo about its botched efforts to repay wronged customers. ( ) • Goldman may be having some success in turning around its fixed-income trading unit, but it might do even better by buying Bank of New York Mellon. ( ) • Some senior Credit Suisse executives had their secretaries complete compliance training for them. ( ) • Citigroup has won its first local mandate in Saudi Arabia since returning to the kingdom, advising a budget airline owned by Kingdom Holding on its I.P.O. ( ) • One of India’s largest commercial lenders said it had detected fraudulent transactions worth $1.77 billion at just one of its branches, raising fears of a potential ripple effect across Indian banking. ( ) • Goldman Sachs named   as a co-head of its global M. & A. team, joining Michael Carr and Gilberto Pozzi.  , currently a co-head of Americas M. & A., will replace Mr. Philip as co-head of the global industrials team. ( ) •   is stepping down as G.E.’s chief communications officer next month. Linda Boff, the company’s chief marketing officer, will be her interim replacement. ( ) —   of Fox, on Ryan Murphy’s blockbuster five-year, $300 million deal with Netflix • State financial regulators in New York said that they would investigate reports that gay men had been denied insurance because they were taking H.I.V.-prevention medication. ( ) • Private equity firms are doing more of their own capital markets work, bringing new risks as well as new fees. ( ) • Bridgewater has made a $22 billion bet against some of Europe’s biggest companies, according to filings. ( ) • Lucio Lanza, a longtime venture capital investor, is being sued by the founder of a medical start-up, who accuses him of sexually assaulting her on a plane. ( )
SYDNEY, Australia —  The Australian authorities on Wednesday raided the home of a computer expert and entrepreneur in suburban Sydney, just hours after two news outlets identified the man as a likely creator of the digital currency Bitcoin. The Australian Federal Police said the raid on the residence of the man, Craig Steven Wright, was for a tax investigation, and a spokesman said it had no connection to the Bitcoin reports. The Australian Taxation Office, which asked the police to carry out the raid, declined to comment on “any individual’s or entity’s tax affairs.” The raid, in the leafy suburb of Gordon on Sydney’s upper north shore, came hours after reports in   and   drew strong links between Mr. Wright and Satoshi Nakamoto, the pseudonymous creator of the virtual currency that has grown to billions of dollars in total value. The identity of Mr. Nakamoto has been a mystery since the currency’s computer code was released in 2009, with several false leads having been aired and debunked. The growing value of Bitcoin, which is managed by computers that run its peer-to-peer software, has driven the search for its creator or creators. Wired, which was first to identify Mr. Wright as a possible inventor of the currency, cited old blog posts as well as leaked documents and emails. The magazine acknowledged that the trail of clues could be a hoax, but it added: “If Wright is seeking to fake his Nakamoto connection, his hoax would be practically as ambitious as Bitcoin itself.” The Gizmodo report said that Mr. Wright and Dave Kleiman, an American who died in 2013, “were involved in the development of the digital currency.” Both outlets cited what was described as a transcript of a 2014 meeting among Mr. Wright, lawyers and tax officials, in which he is quoted as saying, “I did my best to try and hide the fact that I’ve been running Bitcoin since 2009.” “By the end of this, I think half the world is going to bloody know,” he added, according to the transcript. Efforts to reach Mr. Wright on Wednesday were unsuccessful. A Newsweek investigation in 2014   as Dorian Satoshi Nakamoto, a physicist living with his mother in Southern California. He denied the report, saying he had only learned of Bitcoin weeks earlier after a reporter contacted his son.
 is becoming the first major bank to make a significant investment in a Bitcoin-focused company, giving a vote of confidence to the embattled virtual currency. The Wall Street bank announced late Wednesday that it had struck a partnership with a major Chinese investment firm, IDG Capital Partners, to lead a $50 million investment into  , a start-up that aims to use the technology underlying Bitcoin to improve consumer payments.  Since first grabbing widespread attention in 2013, Bitcoin has been dented by criminal activity tied to the virtual currency and by flurries of speculative buying and selling. The price of one Bitcoin on Wednesday  , far below the high above $1,200 that it hit in late 2013.  Even as public interest has waned, however, major financial institutions have been quietly but seriously examining the opportunities offered by the technology, and particularly the new financial network that hosts the Bitcoin digital tokens and allows them to be sent around the world securely, cheaply and almost instantly. A few other Bitcoin companies have recently announced small investments from European banks, and several bank executives have spoken of their interest recently. But Goldman is the first major bank to make such a prominent investment. “Having a franchise like Goldman Sachs as an investor, who has done due diligence, is a vote of confidence,” said Jeremy Allaire, the co-founder and chief executive of Circle.  The investment is coming from Goldman’s principal strategic investments group, which generally puts money into projects that could have some relevance for the bank’s own business.   Goldman did not comment on the investment beyond a statement from the head of the principal strategic group, Thomas F. Jessop. The statement did not mention Bitcoin, but did say that the firm sees “significant opportunities in companies and solutions that have the promise to transform global markets through technical innovation.” Circle, which does not generate Bitcoin, had previously received investments from venture capital firms like General Catalyst Partners and Breyer Capital.   Unlike most big Bitcoin companies, which have focused on making it easier to buy and sell Bitcoins, Circle is hoping to use the virtual currency primarily as a way to cheaply and quickly move money both domestically and internationally.  Circle customers who want to buy and hold Bitcoin will be able to. But for those who do not want to deal with the volatile price of the virtual currency, Circle is preparing to make it possible for customers to keep balances in dollars in an insured bank account. For these customers, Bitcoin will be used only as a means of moving money, to avoid the fees charged by payment processors and money transmitters.   The network underlying Bitcoin is generally a cheaper alternative because it is powered by a decentralized network of computers rather than a single company, like Visa or PayPal, that can extract fees.   The founders of Circle are aiming to use Bitcoin to move into the burgeoning industry of peer-to-peer payments. The industry is currently led by companies  , a PayPal-owned application that allows friends to quickly send one another money rather than using a check or a bank transfer, which can take days to go through.   While Circle will, in the near future, offer much the same services as Venmo — including free, instant money transfers — the company hopes that Bitcoin will allow it to move money with same ease across international borders, something Venmo cannot do.   The international ambitions should eventually be helped by the participation of IDG Capital, a firm that has backed some of China’s biggest start-ups.   Bitcoin gained popularity as a speculative investment in China in late 2013, but the government there shut down much of the excitement by barring payment processors and banks from dealing with Bitcoin companies. Mr. Allaire said that IDG should help Circle navigate the tricky regulatory landscape in China.   While Circle did not provide the size of Goldman’s investment, Mr. Allaire said that Goldman and IDG had provided the majority of the $50 million.  Circle already had a tie to Goldman through M. Michele Burns, the former chief executive of Mercer who serves on the boards of both companies.   Goldman is one of several banks that have recently written research reports about Bitcoin’s potential. A   in March listed Bitcoin among the four “megatrends” that are likely to transform payments, which it called a $1.2 trillion industry.   “Although Bitcoin and other crypto-currencies are still in the early stages of development, they could gain traction once clear use cases become more established,” the report said.   In the United States, many Bitcoin start-ups have been hampered by the unwillingness of banks to open accounts for virtual currency companies. So far, Silicon Valley Bank has been almost the only American bank willing to deal with companies that hold Bitcoins for customers.   While Goldman will not be Circle’s bank, and will not hold any Bitcoins itself, its investment in Circle should help solidify Bitcoin’s reputation as a technology that serious financial firms can work with.   Many banks have been waiting for more clarity on how bank regulators view Bitcoin companies. New York state’s top financial regulator, Benjamin M. Lawsky, is completing a BitLicense for virtual currency companies that is expected to be out in late May.  Circle intends to apply for a BitLicense, and already holds ordinary money-transmitter licenses from many other states.   “Up until now Bitcoin has really been driven by the speculative value phase,” Mr. Allaire said. “We’ve said it needs to move to the utility value phase.” 
IN 1954, the American government committed one of the most reprehensible acts in its history when it authorized the C.I.A. to overthrow the democratically elected leader of Guatemala, President Jacobo Arbenz. It did so secretly but later rationalized the coup on the ground that the country was about to fall into communist hands. Guatemalan society has only recently recovered from the suffering that this intervention caused, including brutal military dictatorships and a genocidal civil war against its Indian population, which led to the deaths of an estimated 200,000 people. Only in the 1980s, when a peace process commenced, did democratic governance resume. But a silence about the Arbenz era continued. Now, after 25 years of increasingly vibrant democratic rule,   of their deposed leader by incorporating his achievements into the national school curriculum, naming a highway after him, and preparing an official biography. America should follow suit by owning up to its own ignoble deed and recognizing Arbenz as the genuine social progressive that he was. Washington feared Arbenz because he tried to institute agrarian reforms that would hand over fallow land to dispossessed peasants, thereby creating a middle class in a country where 2 percent of the population owned 72 percent of the land. Unfortunately for him, most of that territory belonged to the largest landowner and most powerful body in the state: the American-owned United Fruit Company. Though Arbenz was willing to compensate United Fruit for its losses, it tried to persuade Washington that Arbenz was a crypto-communist who must be ousted. Dwight D. Eisenhower, along with Secretary of State John Foster Dulles and his brother, Allen, the C.I.A.’s director, were a receptive audience. In the cold war fervor of the times, Eisenhower and the Dulles brothers believed a strike against Arbenz would roll back communism. And the Dulleses had their own personal sympathies for United Fruit: they had done legal work for the company, and counted executives there among their close friends. It is true that Arbenz’s supporters in the Guatemalan Legislature did include the Communist Party, but it was the smallest part of his coalition. Arbenz had also appointed a few communists to lower-level jobs in his administration. But there was no evidence that Arbenz himself was anything more than a European-style democratic socialist. And Arbenz’s land reform program was less generous to peasants than a similar venture pushed by the Reagan administration in El Salvador several decades later. Eisenhower’s attack on Guatemala was brilliantly executed. A faux invasion force consisting of a handful of right-wing Guatemalans used fake radio broadcasts and a few bombing runs flown by American pilots to terrorize the fledgling democracy into surrender. Arbenz stepped down from the presidency and left the country. Soon afterward, a Guatemalan colonel named Carlos Castillo Armas took power and handed back United Fruit’s lands. For three decades, military strongmen ruled Guatemala. The covert American assault destroyed any possibility that Guatemala’s fragile political and civic institutions might grow. It permanently stunted political life. And the destruction of Guatemala’s democracy also set back the cause of free elections in Nicaragua, El Salvador and Honduras — all of which drew the lesson that Washington was more interested in unquestioning allies than democratic ones. It was only after the cold war and a United Nations-negotiated peace deal with leftist guerrillas in 1996 that genuine democracy began to take hold in Guatemala. And even since then, the cycle of violence and lawlessness unleashed by the 1954 coup has continued. In 1998, an assassin bludgeoned to death the Catholic bishop Juan Gerardi shortly after he issued a damning report blaming the army for widespread massacres. In 2007, Guatemala had the world’s third-highest homicide rate, according to a United Nations-World Bank study. In 2009, more civilians were murdered in Guatemala than were killed in the war zones of Iraq. Washington took the first step toward making amends when President Bill Clinton visited Guatemala in 1999 and offered a vague apology for America’s support of violent and repressive forces there. This year is an opportunity for Washington to fully own up to its shameful role in destabilizing Guatemala and honor Arbenz for having the courage to lead one of Central America’s first democracies — and send a signal that America has learned to stop placing its ideological concerns and business interests ahead of its ideals.
 many Hawaiians thought they were under attack. The state’s emergency management office sent an   from a ballistic missile. Thankfully, it was a false alarm. Not surprisingly, the alert caused widespread panic, coming at a time of heightened tensions with North Korea. Security experts called it a   could set off an unintended conflict. Since the dawn of the nuclear age, there have been no shortage of erroneous alarms.  . _____  rejected  , saying the deal was “not renegotiable.” Mr. Trump on Friday reluctantly signed waivers to keep the agreement in place, but he demanded that European allies agree to rewrite the nuclear deal within 120 days or else he would kill it. Separately, the   off the coast of China for more than a week sank on Sunday. “There is no hope of finding survivors,” an Iranian official said. _____ . You have nations watching.” That was just one of the many shocked reactions after   from “shithole” countries. It came from Senator Ron Johnson, Republican of Wisconsin. But another senator who attended the meeting  , saying a Democratic colleague’s account of the session was “a gross misrepresentation.” The president’s vulgar comments,  , were a sad reminder of racist attitudes that once shaped American policy. _____  proposed that North Korea join it in fielding a   next month. It would be a first for the Games and a dramatic emblem of the recent warming of relations on the Korean Peninsula. The North’s Olympic representative said it was “under discussion.” And in South Korea, there’s a  . Activists say it puts women at risk and creates a culture of shame. _____    and assistants are  . Both are huge names: Mr. Weber is best known for his racy advertisements for Calvin Klein and Abercrombie & Fitch, while Mr. Testino is a favorite of the British royal family and Vogue. Above from left, Ryan Locke, Robyn Sinclair and Terron Wood. Each said he had experienced sexual harassment during his time modeling. Mark Wahlberg and his talent agency, meanwhile, will donate   and harassment of women in Hollywood. The donation comes after an outcry about pay discrepancy in his recent film. _____  over cryptocurrencies has sent their value soaring and investors scrambling. But the leading player, Bitcoin, was rattled last week by word that   on trading in virtual currencies. But it isn’t clear whether, or how quickly, it will follow through. And we went   and found a tightknit group of friends — developers, libertarians, Redditors and cypherpunks — who talk about decentralizing power and wealth, and changing the world order. (They also remember who laughed at them.) _____ once paid a hacker $100,000 over a security breach that exposed the  . Our team took a close look at its continuing fallout. for   has bargain hunters turning to emerging markets.  that same-sex marriage in Australia could help   in a year. . Now he’s shedding some of his mystery.  of  .  skidded off a runway in Turkey, ending up stuck on a steep slope feet from the Black Sea. No one was hurt. [ ] firebombs exploded outside three churches, apparently to highlight the plight of an indigenous group and the issue of sex abuse before Pope Francis’ visit. [ ]  of the Philippines rejected calls from his allies to extend his six-year term and to cancel elections next year. [ ] forced the evacuation of 1,500 people from an island off the northern coast of Papua New Guinea. [ ]  of Japan could miss the opening ceremony of the Winter Olympics as tensions with South Korea flared over World War II-era sex slaves. [ ]  off Peru’s coast early Sunday killed at least one person and injured dozens. [ ] used explosives and heavy machinery to destroy a Christian megachurch in part of what critics called a national effort to control the country’s spiritual life. [ ] arrived in New Delhi for the first visit by an Israeli leader to India in 15 years. [ ] your  . Begin the week with a big bowl of  . is what China’s state media calls him. The image of an 8-year-old with icicles in his hair trekking miles to school has underscored the  . Among the private details   about her  : The crown was too big. begins today in Melbourne. Some tennis stars will not be on hand, so  The headquarters for the U.S. military has always stood out. The Pentagon building was already in use when it was dedicated 75 years ago today, at the height of World War II. Built just across the Potomac River from Washington in less than two years, the Pentagon was home to 22,000 workers  . It remains one of the world’s largest office buildings, with  . The distinctive design came from the shape of the first proposed site, which was hemmed in by streets on five sides. When President Franklin Roosevelt decided on  , the shape stayed, but the sides were made even. The first architectural reviews were not glowing, but they improved over time. “Called too big, too barren and too expensive when it was completed for $83-million in 1943, the Pentagon is a thriving, functional success in 1968,”  , which it extolled as a place of community: “Everyman, or Littleman, triumphed over all. Thousands of secretaries and office workers have turned the Pentagon into a cluttered, cosy, home-away-from-home.”
 Why, hello there, new newsletter partner! It’s everyone’s favorite Bitcoin reporter, Nathaniel Popper! Thanks so much for subbing in for Farhad this week, sir, while he’s off doing whatever it is he does when he’s not being wrong about technology in this newsletter.  It’s good to be here to share some of my own wrong thoughts, Mike. I’ll see if I can do my best Farhad imitation, but with the added bonus of lots of tangents about Bitcoin and fintech.  Indeed. Well, it’s nice to have a finance expert join the tech pod and tell us all the ways that technology is changing how we bank and pay for things and all that stuff I barely comprehend.  Anyway, let’s get on to talking about the week in tech! And with that, why don’t we start off with Bitcoin? Square, the micropayments processing company co-founded by Jack Dorsey, recently started letting   using one of the company’s consumer-facing apps, Square Cash. It’s primarily a peer-to-peer money transfer service, but Square is dabbling in ways to make money from the app. Now, you’ve written a bit about Square over the past year, including how the company was set to  , Dorsey’s other beloved company. What should I make of this move? Is it something significant for the business or, alternately, is it a significant moment for Bitcoin? With all the daily vacillations in Bitcoin value, it’s hard for me to know if the currency is in a stable, real place with normal people or if it’s still a flight of fancy.  Square’s stock jumped after this Bitcoin news got out. It reminds me a bit of the British company that   after it simply added the word “blockchain” to its name. (For those tech readers who have successfully ignored all of this craziness, blockchain is the database technology that Bitcoin introduced.) It seems hard to dispute that this is a very bubble-y moment for Bitcoin and all the blockchain and virtual currency stuff that have spun off it. A lot of the people buying right now probably don’t have a terribly strong thesis about why the technology matters — they just see it going up and want to get in on the action. Bitcoin’s position as a new kind of global online gambling parlor has been particularly apparent in South Korea and Japan, which have risen out of nowhere over the last six months to become the largest markets for virtual currency trading. When I was  , I kept hearing how virtual currency trading fit neatly in countries where ordinary people have long speculated on foreign currencies. It’s worth keeping this in mind for anyone thinking of buying a Bitcoin through Square Cash. Even the speculation, though, points to one of the things that has gotten real technology people so excited about Bitcoin. Here is a new kind of digital investment that anyone in the world can access and buy and that can cross global borders without needing to go through banks. Jack Dorsey hasn’t hidden his interest in this. Back in August, he used an   to reveal his fascination with Bitcoin and the blockchain and his belief that it’s going to lead to some fundamental changes in how money works. I would bet that this trial on Square Cash is just the first baby steps in some bigger moves the company has planned.  I should probably try to find that random Bitcoin I purchased a few years ago on a whim. If only I remembered where I put that wallet.  Moving on, let’s head over to the world of Twitter, everybody’s favorite dysfunctional social network. First, it spent a  used social media to influence the 2016 presidential election. Then, a   for 10 minutes, sending the internet into a fit. Now, Twitter is making some changes to its verification program. You know that little blue badge that some people have on Twitter, signifying that they have been “verified” to be who they say they are? Well, Twitter thinks it needs an overhaul. The badge had become something of a status symbol. But then people started pointing out that avowed white supremacists had become verified, and people argued that Twitter was giving a tacit seal of approval to racist speech or the people behind it. This week, the company   though Twitter didn’t go into detail. Now, some prominent white supremacists are up in arms about being targeted on the service. I imagine they’ll have another few days of furor over this one. The company says it is also rethinking how verification should work in the future. I always thought being verified was sort of silly, even though I admit I have a little blue badge as well. It seems like the whole program really isn’t worth the headache to me.  It really seems like a bit of a no-win situation for Twitter to me — like so many of the battles around the social media sites these days. For much of the last year, they’ve been getting in trouble for not doing enough to stop bot accounts and fake news. Then they have this one program where they are actually trying to verify things, and that gets them in trouble as well. Didn’t Facebook confront something similar when they took on the fake news problem by adding human editors to their news feed? For Twitter, though, I have to imagine that part of the problem comes from how unevenly it applied those blue badges. You are a New York Times reporter with a badge; I am one without. I can appreciate why you have one, with your vast following and groupies — but the whole thing does feel a bit haphazard and unevenly applied. It does seem like you’d want some sort of guidelines around how the system works. The whole thing made me think that if I were Jack Dorsey, I’d want to leave my job at Twitter and just go sell Bitcoin at Square. What a headache. And only the latest of many for Twitter.  Indeed. Though on a positive note, Twitter is  , an area of the company’s revenue that historically hasn’t gotten much attention. Perhaps they’ll be in luck for this one. Anyway, thanks for coming on and making me smarter about fintech and Twitter! Please come back any time, especially when I start buying large quantities of Dogecoin.  I’ll only come back if you promise you won’t do that.
Like many Americans, Brad Hines spent much of September watching hours of hurricane coverage on television. For Mr. Hines, a digital marketing strategist in Boston, the storms hit close to home: Several family members in Florida were affected by Hurricane Irma. As the devastation unfolded, he opened his computer and donated money to the Red Cross, but it was not in cash. He gave in Bitcoin, which the Red Cross has been accepting since late 2014. He could have donated dollars, but, he said, the more he can use the cryptocurrency for buying goods and giving to charity, the more it will be used by others. “I want to pitch in and help get the currency adopted,” he said. “And it’s also fun to use.” It was his first donation with Bitcoin, the virtual currency that was created in 2008, but it will not be his last. As more charities accept digital currency, the more likely he will open his virtual wallet instead of his physical one, he said. Few people are donating to the Red Cross with Bitcoin, with the group receiving just $2,000 worth of the currency in 2017, but the numbers are rising elsewhere. Fidelity Charitable, a $16 billion donor-advised fund, has received $13.5 million in Bitcoin donations this year, up from the $4.1 million it received from November 2015, when the fund started accepting the cryptocurrency, to December 2016. Why would someone donate with Bitcoin over dollars? There are two reasons: It can be tax advantageous, and the technology the currency is built on could make it easier to see how a donation is being used, forcing charities to become more transparent. For many Bitcoin holders, the main impetus for donating their cryptocurrency is taxes. In 2014, the Internal Revenue Service classified cryptocurrencies, which includes Bitcoin and other digital dollars like Ethereum, Litecoin and Ripple, as an asset, like a stock, which means that sales are subject to capital gains. With a unit of Bitcoin rising to just over $7,000 this month from about $340 in early November 2014, sellers could be subject to hefty taxes depending on when they bought and sold. If they give those coins to charity, the asset is not subject to capital gains and donors still get to deduct the asset’s value from their taxes as a charitable donation. That’s partly why Fidelity Charitable began accepting Bitcoin donations. Its donors were asking about it, and the fund saw an opportunity after the I.R.S. clarified the rules. “We didn’t do anything until the I.R.S. determined that it was going to be treated as an asset,” said Matt Nash, Fidelity Charitable’s senior vice president of donor engagement. “If you look at an overall mix of a portfolio and one asset is gaining value much faster than another, then it’s strategic to donate that asset to charity. You’re getting better overall value for the dollar.” Mr. Nash said that the fund did not accept Bitcoin directly and that it did not hold any cryptocurrencies in its own portfolio. The fund uses Coinbase, a digital asset exchange company, to accept donations and convert them into dollars as soon as they come in. It’s a similar process with stocks. Fidelity Charitable turns assets it receives into cash right away, but it’s even more important that the fund transfers Bitcoins into dollars because of its volatility. Bitcoin fell by nearly 20 percent from Aug 28 to Sept. 11, for instance. Fidelity does not want to be caught holding something that can decline so quickly. Some technology entrepreneurs and cryptocurrency enthusiasts say that the system these currencies are built on can alter how people give and track their donations. Cryptocurrencies use a blockchain, a digital ledger that records transactions. Normally, when someone pays cash for an item in a store, the transaction is seen by only the buyer and the seller. With a blockchain, the transaction is recorded in a digital ledger in near real time that anyone can see. It is also impossible for transaction details to be changed. Because everything is tracked, donors can easily see that their payments have gone from their digital wallets into a charity’s hands. It’s this tracking mechanism that has many in the nonprofit sector excited. If everyone who touches a donation accepts Bitcoin, like the charity and the store providing the supplies, then donors can see how their donations are being used. “Having that tracking mechanism would certainly be something that donors would be interested in,” said Steve MacLaughlin, vice president of data and analytics at Blackbaud, which develops software for nonprofits. “The nonprofit that creates the shortest distance between gift and outcome wins.” Ideally, if donations can be better tracked, organizations will have to be more upfront about how they are spending their money, including how much goes toward overhead, said Andreas Antonopoulos, a Bitcoin expert and author of “The Internet of Money.” “You’ve seen numerous scandals where charitable donations end up being used for operating costs,” he said. “It’s very difficult to see where a donation is going, but this could change that.” Raphaël Mazet, a founder of Alice, a London-based software company that helps charities accept donations, said that end-to-end transparency was a long way off. Most of the organizations that charities give their money to do not accept digital currencies, so tracking stops when a cryptocurrency is converted into cash. Currency volatility is also holding tracking back, Mr. Mazet said. If the value of the currency strikingly drops before it is used, that donation will be worth a lot less than initially planned. His company transfers digital donations into a proprietary coin that’s essentially worth one British pound to avoid those ups and downs. “There is the potential for currencies to be sent around the world, but these issues make it difficult to work with blockchain right now,” he said. Still, technology companies like Alice, and Toronto-based Grace Token, are hoping to revolutionize giving. Both operate on the Ethereum blockchain, which Mr. Mazet said was more sophisticated than the Bitcoin blockchain. It allows people to use smart contracts, which give funders greater flexibility over how their donations are spent. With Alice, which is working with the homeless shelter St. Mungo’s in London, donations are released once the charity meets its goals, like finding a place for someone to stay and receiving mental health care. Those milestones are verified by the Greater London Authority. “Once those goals are validated, payment is triggered and then reported to the funders,” Mr. Mazet said. “So you know that your money has gone to help a person find a flat.” Grace Token, which is still building its software, will work in a similar way. It will allow donors to distribute funds at different times and only if certain goals are met. Funders will also be able to take back unused portions of donations if they feel their money is not being spent properly. “Traditionally, you can’t get your money back or determine how it’s being used,” said Michael Yeung, a founder of Grace Token. “Now we can specify a time or conditions to each donation.” Mr. Mazet will not go as far as to call his technology disruptive, but he does say it is bringing “massive innovation” to how charities track, measure and report gifts. It is likely that as more people start using digital money, the more cryptocurrency donations will be made. If these currencies keep rising, then it will continue to make sense to donate in Bitcoin purely for the tax advantage, said Mr. Nash of Fidelity Charitable. For Mr. Hines, who gave money to the Red Cross using Bitcoin, donating with the cryptocurrency is no different from donating anything else. “It’s easy to do,” he said. “And it lends credence to the currency.”

BUKHARA, Uzbekistan — In the scrub brush desert south of this ancient Silk Road town, the natural gas wellheads are built on modest concrete platforms about the size of basketball courts. Because the gas is naturally pressurized, pumps are not needed to bring it to the surface. Pipes simply kiss the ground and gas pours through them. The issue is where the gas goes from there. After the breakup of the Soviet Union, the United States and its European allies sought to ensure that Central Asia’s enormous oil and gas wealth would flow through pipelines bypassing Russia. It was the latest version of the Great Game, the 19th-century contest between Imperial Britain and Czarist Russia for dominance in the region. Lately, however, the West is falling behind, as a torch lighting ceremony last month made clear. Executives from  , the Russian oil company, and government officials from Moscow had come to inaugurate the latest Central Asia gas field to come online. Developed by Lukoil, the Khauzak field is estimated to hold 400 billion cubic meters of natural gas, which Lukoil has sold in advance for the next 32 years to  , the Russian natural gas giant. Coming as some political developments in the region had renewed Western companies’ hopes of doing business in Central Asia, the Nov. 29 ceremony — held before a planeload of Moscow-based journalists flown in for the occasion — seemed tailored to remind the world of Russia’s  lead in the new Great Game. “We have a good head start and we will use it,” Russia’s first deputy prime minister, Sergei B. Ivanov, said from a makeshift podium above the red sands of the Kyzylkum desert. The Bush administration has identified Central Asia as a promising alternative to the volatile Middle East as a source for oil and natural gas. As American officials pursue a policy of encouraging energy exports that bypass Russia, they are also trying to pry open Central Asia to Western oil investment. Russia is countering by raising its investment in Central Asian fields and pipelines. Much is at stake. Russia is the world’s largest natural gas producer and a major supplier to Europe. It relies on Central Asian supplies to meet these commitments. “The Russians are very keen to fight their corner in Central Asia,” Jonathan Stern, a natural gas expert at the Oxford Institute for Energy Studies, said in a telephone interview. “The Russians are not just cozying up” to Central Asia’s autocratic leaders to achieve their aims, Mr. Stern said. “Russian companies have put their money where their mouth is.” Flush with cash from their own oil boom, the Russians are investing heavily in new development, posing a challenge to Western companies like Exxon Mobil, Chevron and ConocoPhillips that are eager to expand their Central Asian operations. After an investment of $3.5 billion, the Lukoil project will tie together three natural gas and gas condensate fields by 2011 to produce 11 billion cubic meters of natural gas a year for export. In the three years since Lukoil signed the production sharing agreement with the Uzbek government for Khauzak, Uzbek politics have taken a sharp turn in Russia’s favor, shutting Western oil majors out of Uzbekistan. In May 2005, President Islam A. Karimov’s troops opened fire on a mixed crowd of escaped prisoners, gunmen and antigovernment demonstrators in a square in the Fergana Valley town of Andijon, killing hundreds in what human rights groups say was the worst massacre of street protesters since Tiananmen Square in 1989. The episode led to deep strains in diplomatic relations with the United States. Even before the shooting, human rights groups accused Uzbek authorities of abuses, including two incidents in which political prisoners were reportedly boiled to death in an Uzbek prison. Prospects for a Western role in the country’s natural gas industry waned. In contrast, Russian President Vladimir V. Putin visited Mr. Karimov in Uzbekistan after the Andijon shootings and endorsed his justification. In 2006, Lukoil expanded its presence here in a consortium with the China National Petroleum Corporation, Petronas of Malaysia and the Korea National Oil Company to explore a natural gas deposit beneath the dry bed of the Aral Sea estimated to hold more than one trillion cubic meters of gas. And in neighboring Turkmenistan, Mr. Putin secured an agreement in May to expand natural gas exports via a branch of the Central Asia-Center natural gas pipeline, which runs along the eastern shore of the Caspian Sea, north toward Russia. It was the most significant energy deal in that country this year. And this summer, crews from China, another country ascendant in Central Asia, began exploration drilling for gas on the eastern bank of the Amu Darya river, according to Mr. Stern, the Oxford Energy analyst. To be sure, in the 1990s European and American companies made great gains in Kazakhstan — which has emerged as the leading commercial power in Central Asia. Chief among those gains was Kashagan, the largest oil find in the world since the discovery of Alaska’s Prudhoe Bay in the 1970s. But the deal has been mired in dispute, with Kazakh authorities forcing a renegotiation of terms with consortium partners Eni of Italy, Exxon Mobil and ConocoPhillips of the United States, Royal Dutch Shell and Inpex Holdings of Japan. Kazakhstan has also turned its attention to the east, planning a natural gas pipeline over the Tian Shan mountains to the neighboring Chinese province of Xinjiang, a snub to American and European companies and governments. The West supports a western route under the Caspian Sea, via Azerbaijan, Georgia and Turkey, and on to world markets — threading the pipes through a narrow corridor between Russia and Iran to plug into the Central Asian oil and gas fields. The BP-operated BTC oil pipeline and a parallel gas pipeline now stop in Azerbaijan, on the western shore of the Caspian, and the grand project seems to be stalled there for now. The next step is to build the trans-Caspian leg, which Russia is blocking through a mix of political and business strategy. The Russians are buying up much of the natural gas production capacity to make the Western plan commercially nonviable because of a lack of available gas. With the help of Iran, they are also contesting the legal status of the Caspian Sea that the oil and gas pipelines would pass under. Moscow is also offering guarantees of support to the Central Asian potentates if a Ukrainian-style domestic uprising should take place, leading to a change in government, something the United States and Europe cannot do. In one encouraging sign for the Western majors, the death last spring of the longtime leader of Turkmenistan, Saparmurat Niyazov, has brought a modest political thaw and heightened expectations of new oil and gas concessions. During the rule of Mr. Niyazov, who gave himself the name Turkmenbashi, or Father of all Turkmens, and who had commissioned golden statues in his likeness, Turkmenistan had mostly dropped off the agenda of Western oil companies. So it was no surprise that Western companies rushed to sponsor this year’s Turkmenistan Oil and Gas Conference in Ashgabat last month; Chevron, ConocoPhillips, Baker Hughes, Schlumberger and Statoil were among the sponsors, though no deals were signed. Sharing the upbeat mood, Samuel Bodman, the United States secretary of energy, delivered a speech on Nov. 15, noting “opportunities are opening that could not have been imagined even a year ago,” according to an Energy Department transcript. Still, as Mr. Bodman spoke, a few hundred miles away, across the Kyzylkum desert in Uzbekistan, Russian engineers were welding the last pipes into place at Lukoil’s field. At the Nov. 29 opening ceremony, the pipes glistened with fresh paint and hissed with natural gas flowing northward toward Russia.
Finance is where they built their careers. Now some of banking’s former stars are pouring millions of dollars — and in some cases staking their careers — into new technologies that are shaking up everything from lending to payments to investing. The list of investors is practically a Wall Street who’s who:  , former chairman and chief executive of Citigroup;  , a former chief executive of Morgan Stanley and Credit Suisse First Boston; Jon Winkelried, former president of Goldman Sachs; and J. Christopher Flowers, a former Goldman Partner. From the payments industry, Hans Morris and Joseph W. Saunders, both former chief executives of Visa, are among the prominent names. They are part of a wave of investors who sank $17.8 billion into financial technology, or fintech, in the first nine months of 2015, an 88 percent increase from the same period in 2014, according to a new report by Accenture. The three top technologies were cloud, mobile and analytics, the report said. A separate analysis by Citigroup put total fintech investing for all of last year at $19 billion, up from $1.8 billion in 2010. In many ways, the investors are filling a void where the financial industry left off. Traditionally banks have invested heavily in technology, but that activity fluctuates with the fortunes of the industry. Bank tech investing dropped off immediately after the 2008 financial crisis because the banks had to focus on other issues. Regulatory changes since then have forced banks to cut back on riskier ventures, such as trading, as well as the technology investments, like data analytics and electronic systems, that go with those activities. That opened the door to start-up development and the creation of products and services that threaten to upend the way traditional banks work. Former finance executives say that they are bringing their experience to start-ups to steer them on the right path. “We’re not trying to ruin the banking system,” said Mr. Morris, the former Visa chief and ex-Citi executive, who is now a managing partner at the fintech investment firm Nyca Partners and a board member of Lending Club, Payoneer and CardWorks. “We help some of the new tech companies understand exactly what the opportunities are and what they aren’t.” Today’s generation of fintech companies are different in that many of the start-ups aren’t developing technology to sell to the financial services industry — as has been the pattern in past fintech booms — they are taking their products directly to consumers through easy-to-use mobile apps. The public, particularly younger Americans, has taken to these technologies after the financial crisis eroded its trust in the traditional banking system, says Bruce Wallace, chief digital officer at Silicon Valley Bank. Millennials, especially, are “more receptive to buying a financial product or service directly from a tech company.” One concept that has captured a lot of attention is peer-to-peer lending, popularized by online sites like Prosper and Lending Club, which connect ordinary people who want to borrow money with ordinary people who are willing to lend it to them, cutting banks out of the process. The lending sites flourished as banks curtailed unsecured and riskier lending. Sophisticated investors, including banks and hedge funds, however, quickly caught on that there was money to be made by investing in these peer-to-peer loans. Mr. Morris, along with Messrs. Pandit, Mack and Winkelried, all back the relatively new online firm  , which helps those institutions make those investments. Mr. Pandit has also backed the   platform  , the small-business lender  , and   and  , services that help consumers sniff out bargains and hidden fees in their financial dealings. Another site that specializes in educational, personal and home lending,  , or Social Finance, got the biggest fintech investment to date last September, raising $1 billion from the SoftBank Group of Japan as well as previous investors, including the hedge fund manager Daniel S. Loeb’s technology investment arm, Third Point Ventures. SoFi brought in Anshu Jain, the former Deutsche Bank co-chief executive, as a board adviser this year and Arthur Levitt, the former chairman of the Securities and Exchange Commission, last year. Communication and payments are another area of development and investor interest. Mr. Pandit and Mr. Mack back  , which analyzes posts on Twitter for information that could be useful to investors seeking an edge in the market. Other Dataminr investors include Goldman Sachs and Fidelity Management and Research, the fund company; the hedge fund manager Noam Gottesman; and the billionaire Nicolas Berggruen. Mr. Mack also sits on the board of Lending Club. Mr. Saunders, the former Visa chief executive, joined a San Francisco fintech investment firm,   in 2013. He sits on the board of  , which makes technology that enables people to use their mobile phones to buy items in stores. The firm also invests in Simpl, which makes technology to ease the checkout process for online shoppers, and Two Tap, another online shopping tool that allows users to buy items outside a retailer’s website, by tapping twice on an image of the product on their device. Silicon Valley’s edgy appeal also attracted the former Morgan Stanley finance chief Ruth Porat, now chief financial officer of Alphabet (formerly known as Google). The former Goldman executive J. Michael Evans joined the Chinese e-commerce firm Alibaba in 2014, and a fellow former Goldman banker, Anthony Noto, became finance chief of Twitter earlier that year. More recently, the former JPMorgan Chase commodities head Blythe Masters went to the blockchain technology firm Digital Asset Holdings, which just announced a $50 million investment from Goldman, JPMorgan and other banks. And the former card company executives Amit Parikh (Discover) and Gail Hodges (HSBC) joined Apple Pay. Traditional banking isn’t likely to be completely displaced by fintech disrupters, however, said Mr. Wallace of Silicon Valley Bank; the industry is large enough to have room for more firms. “There can be multiple winners,” he said.

An eon or two ago, Eastman Kodak was a bleeding-edge technology company. It hired the smartest engineers and put them to work racking up patents, pioneering new chemical processes and building a globe-spanning camera and film business that, at its peak, employed 145,000 people. But the digital photo age passed Kodak by, and today, the Rochester, N.Y., company exists mostly in the past tense. Many of the patents have been  , buildings have been rented out or  , and the company has continued to shrink since it filed for bankruptcy in 2012. Now, the 130-year-old company is trying an unlikely sort of comeback — one built by betting on cryptocurrency. It’s a bold gamble that has excited some investors, perplexed others and raised questions about how closely Kodak vetted its cryptocurrency business partners, who now include a paparazzi photo agency, a penny-stock promoter and a company offering what has been called a “magic money making machine.” This month, Kodak lent its name to a digital currency called KodakCoin, which is billed as “  to empower photographers and agencies to take greater control in image rights management.” The basic idea behind KodakCoin is to use the blockchain to help photographers manage their collections by creating permanent, immutable records of ownership. The company also struck a licensing deal for a Bitcoin-mining computer called the  , which allows users to generate their own cryptocurrency. Kodak’s stock rose more than 200 percent following the announcements, and has not fallen much since. That’s partly because the blockchain — the mathematical ledger system that forms the basis of digital currencies — has a kind of talismanic effect in today’s stock market. As investors seek to capitalize on the popularity of currencies like Bitcoin and Ethereum, a number of struggling companies have  , at least temporarily, simply by adding “blockchain” to their names or announcing a new cryptocurrency venture unrelated to their previous line of work. (The most notorious example is Long Island Iced Tea Corp., a beverage company that   after it rebranded itself “Long Blockchain Corp.”) These sudden, brazen moves have also attracted the attention of regulators. In a  , Jay Clayton, the chairman of the Securities and Exchange Commission, said that the agency was “looking closely at the disclosures of public companies that shift their business models to capitalize on the perceived promise of distributed ledger technology.” Kodak is the most prominent old-line company to enter the cryptocurrency game so far, and maybe the most controversial. Almost immediately, critics pounced on the company’s plans, characterizing them as a desperate money grab. “It feels like a publicly traded company issuing a token to raise its stock price from the grave,” said Kyle Samani, a partner at the cryptocurrency trading firm Multicoin Capital. “I would not be sleeping very well if I was involved in this,” said Jill Carlson, a blockchain consultant. In an interview, Jeff Clarke, Kodak’s chief executive, said that the company’s blockchain ambitions were genuine. He began looking into blockchain technology last summer, he said, and realized that it could solve a perennial problem for photographers — proving ownership of their images, tracking down copyright violators, and getting paid. “This is not a dog food company that’s creating a currency,” Mr. Clarke said. “This is a real solution around digital rights management that Kodak has been involved in for many years.” In theory, photographers will be able to upload their images to a platform called KodakOne, create a blockchain-based license for each image, and use web-crawling software to scour the internet looking for copyright violations. Instead of using dollars, photographers can have clients pay them in KodakCoins. KodakCoin’s initial offering, scheduled for Wednesday, is expected to raise as much as $20 million. (On Tuesday night, KodakCoin’s website said that it would delay the offering by “several weeks” to verify the credentials of potential investors.) But there are few details about what that money will be used for, or why a similar system could not be built without the blockchain. There is also a more obvious question: Why would photographers want to be paid in digital tokens, rather than cash? In several calls with KodakCoin leaders, I couldn’t get straight answers to these questions. And KodakCoin’s white paper, a technical document that details the plans for the currency, is a 40-page mishmash of marketing buzzwords and vague diagrams, like the one below: Make no mistake: Digital rights management is a real issue for photographers, and the blockchain does, in theory, offer a compelling solution. But the specific attributes of KodakCoin present some red flags. First, despite the name, KodakCoin is not actually a Kodak project. The company behind the offering, WENN Digital, is a California-based affiliate of a British photo agency that specializes in paparazzi photo licensing. Under their licensing agreement, Kodak will not receive any direct revenue from the public offering. It will receive a minority stake in WENN Digital, 3 percent of all KodakCoins issued and a royalty on future revenue. Cameron Chell, a lead adviser to the KodakCoin project, told me that the initial offering represented a “seminal moment” for Kodak, and that the company’s interest in blockchain technology was a savvy long-term investment. “The real story is that it’s about to be a renaissance,” he said. But Mr. Chell, a Canadian entrepreneur and motivational speaker who once opened for Tony Robbins, has a troubled track record. In 1998,   from the Alberta Stock Exchange in Canada and paid a $25,000 fine in connection with a violation of the exchange’s rules. A previous company of his ended in ignominy after its   charged with fraud. Asked about these incidents, Mr. Chell said that he was “young, inexperienced and was irresponsible in my actions,” and that he had “learned a lot since 1998 and work hard to conduct myself in a manner that does not reflect that poor judgment.” A Kodak spokesman did not return a request for comment about Mr. Chell and whether it knew about the ban. Mr. Chell has refashioned himself as a blockchain expert in recent years, and KodakCoin is his biggest project so far. He is the chairman of Appcoin Innovations, which was registered as a literary agency — Redstone Literary Agents — until last year, when it became a consulting firm that provides “a turnkey set of services for companies to develop and integrate blockchain and cryptocurrency technologies,” according to securities filings. The company, which trades over the counter as a penny stock, earned no revenue in 2015 or 2016, according to S.E.C. filings. Appcoin Innovations is slated to receive 20 percent of all KodakCoins issued and a portion of the offering proceeds, a stake that could amount to millions if the offering is successful. “Once formally launched,” Mr. Chell wrote to me in an email, “the company will hopefully provide shareholders a traditional and transparent place to participate in the crypto space with projects that are regulatory compliant.” Now, about those coins. You might think that a digital currency that is trying to “democratize photography and make licensing fair to artists,” in Mr. Clarke’s words, would be easily accessible. But because of regulatory requirements, KodakCoins will be available only to so-called accredited investors in the United States. An accredited investor is defined as a person with a net worth of $1 million or more, or an annual income above $200,000. How many cryptocurrency-obsessed millionaire photographers do you know? Even if photographers do meet the requirements to participate, they could have a hard time spending their KodakCoins, or redeeming them for cash. The S.E.C. has   that securities sold in private offerings, such as KodakCoins, may be difficult to resell — and that investors may be required to hold on to them “indefinitely.” A KodakCoin representative told me that the company believes its tokens will eventually be freely traded, and that it may issue other types of tokens in the future that will not be subject to the same restrictions. KodakCoin’s white paper says that token holders may receive other benefits, such as a share of KodakOne’s revenue and access to a “marketplace” that will allow them to spend their KodakCoins on camera equipment, studios for photo shoots, and travel expenses. But these benefits could fail to materialize. Cryptocurrency experts also do not seem impressed with the Kodak KashMiner, a Bitcoin-mining machine advertised at this year’s CES electronics trade show. According to the  , users will pay $3,400 to rent the machine, a Kodak-branded computer that solves complex math equations to unlock new Bitcoin, for two years. Half the Bitcoins successfully mined with the Kashminer will go back to Spotlite, the company licensing Kodak’s name, and the user will keep the other half. Kodak hasn’t shared many details about its KashMiner deal. But renting the machines could be a hard sell. In its CES advertisement, KashMiner estimates that each renter will earn $9,000 from mining Bitcoin over the two-year contract window. Experts told me that figure was most likely inflated, because Bitcoin mining gets harder over time. And they   that the KashMiner itself appears to simply be a rebranded version of a popular Bitcoin-mining machine that can be purchased outright for less than the rental cost. All of this — the origins of KodakCoin, the currency itself and the lofty claims about the KashMiner’s moneymaking potential — adds up to a big question mark, and points to the possibility that Kodak may be in over its head. “The best-case scenario is that they believe that the technology will eventually be able to deliver what they’ve pitched,” said Ms. Carlson, the blockchain consultant. “The worst-case scenario is that they are just being very opportunistic.” Mr. Clarke, Kodak’s chief executive, characterized the blockchain projects as a small part of the company’s overall strategy, and said it was “ironic” that critics were faulting Kodak for embracing a young technology like cryptocurrency, given that its past problems were caused by a failure to innovate. “This isn’t speculative,” Mr. Clarke said. “We’re taking an emerging new technology in blockchain, and we’re using it to solve a real problem.”
In an interview that appeared   last year, Nicholson ­Baker was asked about the importance of realism in his work. “It becomes interesting,” he observed, “to come up with words that wrap around reality’s utility pole.” There’s something nice about that sentence. When you squint, it’s actually doing what it describes. And it’s deeply Bakerian (Bakeresque?) in more than one respect: in its sheer oddity, for starters (befitting a 6-foot-4 former bassoonist who cycles around in a big Quaker beard); in its blending of high ideas with a certain insouciance of tone (“interesting to come up with words that . . . ”); and finally in the downright pornyness of its entendre — not even “the utility pole of reality,” but “reality’s utility pole” — which, coming from the author of some of our culture’s most explicit literary sex, can’t help calling to mind a scene in his 1992 novel “Vox,” in which a character reads, “very slowly,” the memorable phrase “up . . . and . . . down . . . on . . . his . . . pole.” There isn’t much sex in “The Way the World Works,” Baker’s charmingly miscellaneous new volume of essays. That’s not a profound act of critical noticing, perhaps, but the absence jumps out if you know his work. Fiction, with its lowered inhibitions, seems to free that part of his mind. Apart from a single stray memory of self-abuse in someone’s empty, arty house, this new collection contains only one piece with an explicitly sexual theme — “Sex and the City, Circa 1840” — and it’s superb. A book review (from this newspaper), it considers the so-called flash press in mid-19th-century New York, erotic newspapers for “sporting” gentlemen, which kept a “watchful eye on all brothels and their frail inmates, . . . interviewing half-naked women in the park, excoriating sodomites” (escort reviews, they’re called today). Baker lets us peek “through a tiny, smudged window” onto this world of nymphs and fancy men and their lecherous clients. But what’s so moving about the essay is that, as Baker titillates us with details, he’s quietly turning his review into a tribute to archival restoration itself, and beneath that, to old newspapers as objects. Baker is notably passionate on that subject — his nonfiction book   published a decade ago, was largely about the destruction of such papers by libraries bent on digitization at any cost, and at various times he has even been a kind of activist in that world, fighting alongside like-minded librarians against discard-happy administrators. He seems to have recognized in this review a chance to point at something concrete by way of argument — here, in newspapers like The Flash and The Whip, is precisely the kind of thing that disappears when you don’t take pains to preserve it. Not just information but past lives. Little ghosts of men and women walking through the columns of type. He writes of going to the American Antiquarian Society in Worcester, Mass., and (in a passage that channels Hawthorne’s great triptych-essay, “Old News”) approaching the “acid-free folders, stored on cool shelves with brass rollers — full of strange lost scandal.” This ability of Baker’s — to snatch little impressions in the chopsticks of his prose — is on good display in these essays. Several times he returned to me some sensation from childhood, a feeling I’d forgotten I remembered, like how, back when phones had rotary dials, one sometimes “hurried it back around and felt the center gear strain slightly,” or how Bazooka Joe bubble gum “had a comic on an inner sheet that we read with great interest but never laughed at,” or how, on a sewing machine, “the down-darting lever in the side . . . rose and fell so fast that it became two ghost levers.” Among the best essays here is one Baker wrote for The Washington Post Magazine, a gently experimental thing, somewhere between a diary and a list, titled   Every paragraph begins, “One summer. . . . ” The topics range from childhood to the recent past. “One summer I got a crush on a girl who was 11. I was 11 at the time as well.” “One summer my daughter learned how to read the word  .” “One summer I read an old copy of ‘Confessions of an English Opium-Eater’ with great fascination.” Baker is a natural essayist, in the sense that the form hews to his habit of mind. He’s a guy who’ll happily, or at least helplessly, sit and think for 20 pages about, say, the Kindle (in “Kindle 2”) and what it means. He procures one of the things. He reads De Quincey’s “Confessions” on it. He calls its name “cute and sinister at the same time” — a nice little nested bon mot that forces you to think about burning libraries to figure out what he means. But Baker defied my expectation of a reassuringly crypto-Luddite ending by at last, after many attempts,   a novel on the machine (Michael Connelly’s “Lincoln Lawyer”). The matter of the text — the story itself and the sound of it in his head — emerged through the medium, as they always will, through infinite technological changes. “Poof, the Kindle disappeared,” Baker writes, “just as Jeff Bezos had promised it would.” There are times when Baker’s relentlessly even and likable tone, his for the most part refreshing unwillingness to try too hard, lend a slightly phoned-in feeling. If I were collecting 15 years of my best nonfiction, I might be tempted to leave out the pieces that begin, “Wikipedia is just an incredible thing,” or “I’m fond of Google, I have to say,” or one (on the death of Steve Jobs) that ends, “You have to love him.” At the very least he could have, you know,   on those lines, pre-pub. But Baker’s little moments of slackness (very rare, and noticeable only for that, really) seem to go hand in hand with his greatest strength, namely the confidence of his own mind, the quality that makes him, for me, a fiction writer whose work will always be of the highest interest. He has what Rousseau and, yes, De Quincey had, and what Joan Didion has, the bravery of self-exploration — the reason he’s one of the only people around writing in an open, artistically serious way about sex. (Granted, this has partly to do with the psychologically dubious idea we have in America that sex doesn’t represent fully mature terrain for the artist, unless it’s delivered with sufficient Updike-Rothian darkness, whereas Baker’s handling tends toward playfulness, as in his recent fantasy of utopian sexuality, “House of Holes.”) One essay here seems likely to draw more comment than the others: “Why I’m a Pacifist,” first published in 2011 in Harper’s Magazine. This is Baker’s answer to the storm of opprobrium he endured after publishing his last nonfiction volume, “Human Smoke,” a book-length argument that the United States was wrong to get involved militarily in World War II, and that we, along with the other Allies, only increased the overall number of dead by refusing to support a “dignified peace” with Germany. That’s a simplistic but I don’t think inaccurate version. In this essay, Baker concentrates his defense (some would say restatement) on the idea that we may have hastened the Holocaust by joining the fight, or worsened it, or even helped to bring it about. There’s an entry in Goebbels’s diary in which he paraphrases a speech Hitler gave in December 1941, just after America’s entry into the war: “The world war is here,” Hitler supposedly said. “The annihilation of the Jews must be the necessary consequence.” Baker quotes one historian’s theory that when we chose to engage, Jews living under the Germans “lost their potential value as hostages.” Some of Baker’s critics have claimed to find his argument historically vapid. They drive right past the fact that he was thinking along completely different lines, reading history not as a pragmatist but as a moralist, and asserting as he did so that this is a legitimate way to read history. He moves forward from the position that it’s wrong to kill people, to take life, and that wars are first and foremost large, organized killings of human beings, to be avoided whenever it’s in our power to do so. Thus far we don’t fault him. But the logic of Baker’s claim that we acted   those principles in responding with force to Hitler’s prior aggression, that we succeeded only in increasing the planet’s suffering, depends too much on an attempt to predict the thoughts of a Hitler — the behavior of a psychopath, in other words. Perhaps it’s true that Hitler unleashed the Final Solution, in its full horror, only out of desperation, but perhaps it’s the case that he would have done it later, and that he would have gone even further, once he’d entrenched his power, and that he would have killed people we don’t even know he had an interest in killing. To say that we have more than a guess at which of those hypotheticals is right amounts to sheer hubris. And when you are writing about the attempted massacre of an entire people, survivors of which are still living, more intellectual caution is in order. “War never works,” Baker might say (and writes here). And he’s right — war brings suffering; to say that it “works” is glib to the point of obscenity. But we lack the variables to play the alternative-­history game. We don’t get to find out how the world would look otherwise, if some dictator or madman had been left alone instead. (All the more reason not to go to war, Baker might reply.) Whatever its merits, the essay is far from the most stimulating in this book. I acknowledge Baker’s sincere attempt to bring his reading of history into line with his ethical views, while respectfully preferring him on Defoe (revealed as a “truthteller” for perhaps the first time since that famous liar was born), or on mowing the lawn (which turns out to be like thinking), or on playing hyper-­violent video games with his son: “We were very considerate of each other in the beginning,” he writes. “My son could have shot me many times, but he didn’t. . . . We carried on this peculiar chivalry for 15 minutes.” Then they started killing each other.

, President Trump’s former chief strategist,   — the latest twist in the investigation into Russian meddling in the 2016 presidential election. This is the first time the special counsel, Robert Mueller, is known to have used a grand jury subpoena to question a member of Mr. Trump’s inner circle. It could be a negotiating tactic, or a sign that Mr. Bannon is not the focus of the investigation.  meant to be a long-awaited discussion of border walls turned into an impromptu interrogation   — or did not use — last week to describe African countries. “I don’t dispute that the president was using tough language,” said Kirstjen Nielsen, the Homeland Security secretary, above, but she denied hearing Mr. Trump call African nations “shithole countries.” The Trump administration, meanwhile,   with a report that concluded that three out of four convicted terrorists in the U.S. were foreign-born. Ms. Nielsen called the data “truly chilling.” But the statistics were notable as much for what they did not contain as for what they did. overall health was “excellent,”   after a medical exam. But the president’s weight is 239 pounds and, according to the doctor, he does not get enough exercise. “I’ve found no reason whatsoever to think the president has any issues whatsoever with his thought processes,” the physician said. And Mr. Trump will need that mental stamina: A government shutdown could come at the end of this week if Congress doesn’t reach a deal on a spending bill.   for lawmakers in both parties. _____ , this time in Japan. Just days after the state government of Hawaii accidentally sent a cellphone alert that North Korea had launched a missile and that citizens should take shelter —  . One big difference: It took Hawaii nearly 40 minutes to correct the mistake; in Japan it took five. _____  emerged from Southern California, where the police reported  , some in chains, by their own parents, above. The discovery came after one sibling, a girl, escaped and called the police, who rescued her 12 brothers and sisters, some shackled to their beds. The officers did not immediately realize that seven of the siblings were adults because they were emaciated. In fact, they range in age from 2 to 29. The girl who called the police, officials said, looked to be 10, but was actually 17. _____   An article published by a feminist website that accuses the actor and comedian Aziz Ansari of sexual misconduct is “arguably the worst thing that has happened to the #MeToo movement,”  . To lump a lousy romantic encounter in with the same movement that brought down men who abused their power “trivializes what #MeToo first stood for,” she said. _____    and there is no shortage of reasons for the prices to climb higher. And   in the $1.5 trillion tax overhaul. And in another win for banks,   that were put in place after the 2008 financial crisis. Separately, it was a  , which took on a $6.2 billion charge to pay for problems in its finance unit. _____  is driven by greed — but the fever for cryptocurrency could eventually  . (Even if it’s a bit complicated.) To investigate, we went inside the  . We found a tightknit group of friends — developers, libertarians, Redditors and cypherpunks — who talk about changing the world order. _____ , our literary critic wondered what the author of “American Pastoral,” “I Married a Communist” and “The Plot Against America” makes of this strange period we are living in now. Here,  , the (former) novelist shares his thoughts on President Trump, #MeToo and retirement. And here’s another tribute to  , above, the lead singer of the Irish rock band the Cranberries who died on Monday in London. _____  late night hosts like Stephen Colbert, above, and Jimmy Fallon weren’t about to let President Trump’s reported remarks about Haiti and certain African countries go away. : “Former White House communications director Anthony Scaramucci defended Trump, saying, ‘At the end of the day, he’s not a racist.’ Then he said, ‘During the day, it’s a different story.’” Have a great night. _____

For five and a half years, nearly the entire tenure of its chief executive, Virginia M. Rometty, IBM has reported a steady erosion of revenue. Selling off its chip manufacturing and smaller data-center computer businesses contributed to the decline. So, too, did the fact that new businesses like cloud computing, data analytics and artificial intelligence had not yet grown big enough to make up for the downturn in IBM’s traditional hardware and software products. But IBM’s half-decade losing streak will most likely end on Thursday, analysts predict, when the company reports its quarterly performance. The crossover to growth would be a long-awaited bright spot for Ms. Rometty and IBM, a challenged giant that has been overshadowed in recent years by the younger technology giants on the West Coast. Even if IBM delivers a revenue gain, however, the bigger question facing the company remains: Has Ms. Rometty turned it around? Skeptics abound. IBM is expected to have gotten an extra lift in the most recent quarter from currency gains and strong sales of a new line of mainframe computers. Without that help, the company’s revenue would decline by 2 percent or so, according to an estimate from A. M. Sacconaghi, a financial analyst for Sanford C. Bernstein. “Is a turnaround afoot? I don’t see it yet,” Mr. Sacconaghi said. There is no doubt, though, that there are signs of progress at IBM, which would not comment on its financial picture before the release of the earning report. So much attention is focused on the company’s top line because revenue is the broadest measure of the headway IBM is making in a difficult transformation toward cloud computing, data handling and A.I. offerings for corporate customers. The new businesses — “strategic imperatives,” IBM calls them — now account for 45 percent of the company’s revenue. And though it still has a ways to go, IBM has steadily built up those operations — and gained converts. The number of software developers using its cloud technology has doubled in the last year, IBM says, though it would not provide numbers. On Wednesday, Barclays upgraded IBM’s stock to a buy and noted its long-term opportunity in the cloud market. IBM’s stock price, a notable laggard as markets have surged in recent years, has climbed nearly 10 percent so far this year. IBM was slow to recognize the significance of cloud computing and software tools delivered as Internet-style services. In artificial intelligence, the company scored a research and public relations triumph in 2011, when its Watson system defeated human champions in the question-and-answer game, “Jeopardy!” But IBM first applied the Watson technology to the daunting realm of cancer research, a lengthy struggle with little short-term financial reward. Today, IBM trails well behind Amazon Web Services and Microsoft in the cloud market, according to analysts. Yet IBM has invested heavily in more than 60 cloud data centers in 19 countries in the past three years. And the most recent analysis by IDC, a technology research firm, and a report last month by Jefferies, a Wall Street firm, ranked IBM third in the category, ahead of Google. The Watson technology has been retooled as dozens of different services including text understanding, language translation, image recognition and sentiment analysis — all delivered via the cloud and available à la carte. IBM’s strategy is to offer businesses cloud computing, A.I. technology and industry expertise tailored for each customer. Big companies, said David Kenny, senior vice president for IBM’s Watson and cloud businesses, are adapting cloud and A.I. technology to make their businesses faster and smarter. “We start from our strength in knowing how enterprises operate,” Mr. Kenny said. “We’re a trusted partner for companies in this data and A.I. wave.” Companies want to move quickly, Mr. Kenny said, but they often want to exploit the speed and flexibility of cloud technology from within their own computer centers, where they figure their vital business data is more secure. AT&T began a project with IBM last fall to accelerate the use of cloud technology in developing and updating the telecommunications giant’s 2,200 in-house software applications. IBM — a longtime technology supplier to AT&T — was chosen both for its cloud expertise and its industry knowledge, said Sorabh Saxena, AT&T’s president of business operations. The AT&T-IBM collaboration involves breaking down programs into cloud-based building blocks of code called microservices, each of which handles a certain task. So a new feature for mobile payments, for example, can be adopted quickly by updating a few lines of code rather than having to rewrite an entire program. Most of this business software uses cloud technology that runs inside AT&T data centers — in a so-called private cloud, in contrast to a public cloud in which computing services are delivered from remote data centers owned by another company. Many corporations opt for private clouds to house their most sensitive customer and business data. “For certain parts of our business, IBM was the ideal partner,” Mr. Saxena said. IBM emphasizes its hybrid stance in the cloud market, offering both private and public cloud technology to its corporate clients. In its financial reporting, IBM also includes all the hardware, software and services it sells to companies to build private clouds in its total cloud revenue, which would put it on a par with Amazon. Most industry analysts focus on the public cloud market, assuming it will grow faster as companies build fewer data centers themselves. In the public cloud market, IBM has revenue of about $2 billion a year, growing at 30 percent, according to the most recent estimate by IDC. By contrast, Amazon generates more than $12 billion a year and Microsoft about $6.5 billion. Yet for IBM, its underlying cloud software is crucial to building a big A.I. business with Watson. “IBM has a strong set of assets in A.I.,” said Ed Anderson, an analyst at Gartner. “And cloud is the answer to getting Watson in the hands of developers.” That was the appeal for Opentopic, a start-up that uses A.I. technology to mine online and corporate data for marketing insights. Opentopic switched from Amazon Web Services to the IBM cloud in 2015, largely to tap Watson’s code modules for text, image and sentiment analysis, so the Opentopic developers had to write less code themselves. “It allows us to prototype rapidly,” said Andre Konig, a co-founder of Opentopic. “And Watson is the artificial intelligence layer that makes that possible.” The start-up’s clients include Unilever, Abbott Laboratories and The Economist. Today, Opentopic does all its software development on the IBM cloud, but that will most likely change soon. It is working with a new company that runs its business on the Amazon cloud. “We need to be where our customers are,” Mr. Konig said. “The future is going to be multi-cloud,” meaning businesses will use various services. His comment points to a brewing issue for IBM — and perhaps one that will help determine the resilience of Ms. Rometty’s turnaround campaign. IBM is putting all its advanced technology on the cloud — not just artificial intelligence, but also blockchain and quantum computing. If others are leaders in the underlying cloud layers, why not focus higher up and distribute its leading-edge technology on other clouds as well? IBM says its Watson software, for example, is fine-tuned down to the chip level for the IBM cloud. But some analysts suggest that IBM may eventually take another path, working with Amazon, Microsoft and Google. “If IBM does that,” said Frank Gens, IDC’s chief analyst, “its chance of being a cloud leader goes way up.”
$2,411,412,137,427. That figure — $2.4 trillion for those with an untrained eye for very large numbers — is in the same ballpark as the annual economic output of France. It is also exactly the amount that people around the world claim they lost when Mt. Gox, the Tokyo-based virtual currency exchange, collapsed into bankruptcy in 2014, after huge, unexplained losses of the volatile digital currency Bitcoin. As with most of the people who lost money with Bernard L. Madoff, the investment manager who was convicted of running a  , most of those who put their Bitcoin in Mt. Gox will be disappointed: The Japanese trustee overseeing the case  that only $91 million in assets has been tracked down to distribute to claimants — a small portion of the more than $500 million in assets that Mt. Gox claimed it had in the weeks before   in February 2014, and a tiny portion of the amount that claimants have requested. The giant gaps between those numbers are an indication, if nothing else, of the sheer number of dishonest people who have been drawn to the fiasco around Mt. Gox and Bitcoin. They are also the latest reminders of the topsy-turvy nature of the digital-currency realm. A currency designed to bring computer precision and traceability to money has been marked by multiple unsolved mysteries swirling around it. Journalists and others have made many unsuccessful attempts to determine the true identity of the creator of the Bitcoin technology,   going by the name Satoshi Nakamoto. Bitcoin experts and law enforcement officials have spent over two years trying to figure out how hundreds of thousands of Bitcoins disappeared from the Mt. Gox exchange. There have been lots of conspiracy theories but few solid answers. The amount that claimants have requested from the Mt. Gox bankruptcy estate is absurd on its face, given that all the Bitcoins in the world today are worth about $7 billion, or 0.3 percent of the $2.4 trillion being claimed. Most of that huge number is an outsize claim by one individual — but even after that is taken out, the rest of the claimants said they lost some $27 billion, or 54 times what the exchange claimed it held before it went under. The trustee said on Wednesday at a meeting with creditors that $414 million of the claims appeared to be legitimate and have been approved. Each of those claimants will get some portion of the $91 million. It is not yet clear how much because of outstanding lawsuits and investigations. Bitcoin investors have complained about how long it has taken to work through the claims, not to mention the legal and accounting costs. The trustee reports that those costs have added up to about $5.5 million so far. “I am disturbed by the amount of money which the bankruptcy process has burned through,” Kolin Burges,  , said on Wednesday. “We have seen very poor results from the investigations, and the details have been constantly shrouded from the creditors.” Mt. Gox’s collapse in 2014 threatened to destroy the cottage industry that was built around Bitcoin in the years after it was released in early 2009. The price that people were willing to pay for Bitcoin steadily declined for over a year after the bankruptcy. But the problems in Tokyo also led to a professionalization of the virtual currency world, with established entrepreneurs and venture capitalists getting involved and regulators establishing basic rules for businesses in the industry. These days, many banks are examining how to harness the technology underlying Bitcoin, known as the blockchain, though   among the developers working on the technology. Mt. Gox was the most prominent company during Bitcoin’s early, Wild West years, as it became one of the first widely used places to exchange dollars or euros for Bitcoin. The company was run from Tokyo by a young Frenchman named Mark Karpeles, who had essentially no experience working with financial software. The exchange suffered several breakdowns and attacks, but many customers still kept their money there. Mr. Karpeles filed for bankruptcy after months of unexplained behavior. While he initially said the exchange could not locate 850,000 Bitcoins — worth about $450 million at the time — he later   in misplaced digital wallets. Those 200,000 Bitcoins form the bulk of the money that the bankruptcy trustee will return to Mt. Gox customers. In an unusual step, the trustee has indicated that he will allow valid claimants to be paid in Bitcoin rather than yen or dollars. Mr. Karpeles   on suspicion of illegally adding money to an account under his control, though not on charges directly related to the missing Bitcoins. This week, the trustee said he was helping with the “ongoing criminal investigation” of Mr. Karpeles. Japanese government officials have still given few indications of what they think happened to the missing money. A Tokyo computer security company, WizSec, has published reports on its own private investigation of the money using the blockchain ledger on which all Bitcoin transactions are recorded. WizSec has said it appears that Bitcoins began disappearing from Mt. Gox back in 2011 and continued being transferred out of the exchange in small amounts over time. The researchers believe that the thief altered Mt. Gox’s internal records so that Mr. Karpeles did not realize the money was gone. “The unfortunate reality of Bitcoin is that it’s just so tempting to steal it digitally,” Kim Nilsson, a researcher with WizSec, said on Wednesday. Mr. Nilsson says he lost a few thousand dollars with Mt. Gox, some of which he hopes to recover from the estate. Mr. Nilsson said he no longer trusted his Bitcoin to anyone other than himself. But he says he is as excited as ever about the virtual currency, in part because of the way that the blockchain made it possible for individuals like him to do their own investigation of the Mt. Gox collapse. “Thanks to the blockchain, everyone has an equal starting point,” he said. “It’s possible to crowdsource forensic investigations.”
BANKING INDUSTRY John S. Varley, the former Barclays chief executive, and three other former top managers are expected back in court on Monday to answer charges that they, along with the bank, misrepresented arrangements with the Persian Gulf nation of Qatar when the bank raised money to weather the financial crisis in 2008. British authorities brought   last month, representing the first criminal case in Britain against a bank for actions taken during the financial crisis. The men are among the most senior bank managers to be charged anywhere in a crisis-era case. The bank raised a total of $15 billion with two capital infusions from Qatar and other investors in June and October 2008, allowing it to avoid a government bailout. The executives are expected to enter not-guilty pleas on Monday at a hearing in Southwark Crown Court in London, after making   in Westminster Magistrates’ Court and having bail set earlier this month.  JPMorgan Chase, Citigroup and Wells Fargo all posted higher-than-expected second-quarter  , even though they had weak trading revenue. That trend is expected to continue this week when   posts its second-quarter results on Monday, followed by   and   on Tuesday, and   on Wednesday. Bank of America has already predicted that its trading results will be down by double digits this quarter. With trading soft recently, banks have had to raise profits with other arms of their business, like commercial banking.  ECONOMY Construction of new homes fell for the third month in a row  , weighing on economic growth and adding to a long-run shortage of houses for sale. How long can this last? Mortgage rates are low,   and household balance sheets are as strong as they’ve been in 15 years. The data on housing starts is notoriously choppy from month to month, but economists expect the June number to show an increase when it is released on Wednesday. If not then, then eventually: Construction seems poised to move upward this year, but it is likely to be a grind.  Mario Draghi, the president of the European Central Bank, will have to watch his words even more carefully than usual when he holds a news conference on Thursday in Frankfurt after a   on monetary policy. Recent weeks have shown that even   can unleash havoc in bond markets. Investors are hypersensitive to any signals about when the central bank will begin to reduce its stimulus to the eurozone economy, which is   than it has in a decade. Mr. Draghi will be walking a verbal tightrope as he tries to prepare markets for what is coming without provoking an overreaction.  TECHNOLOGY Cloud computing is likely to again be the preoccupation of investors when Microsoft   on Thursday. The company has come back into favor on Wall Street, sending its stock to new highs, as it has   behind Amazon in the cloud business. Double-digit revenue growth in Microsoft’s commercial cloud business is expected. The company may also see a lift in sales in hardware from new models in its Surface family of computers.  MEDIA It’s sunny and warm in California, but make no mistake: Winter is here.   in San Diego, and for the first time, it coincides with a season of “Game of Thrones.” HBO is taking advantage of the timing, descending on the fan convention with a marketing onslaught, including a “winterized” journey through Westeros, a panel in the enormous Hall H, exclusive merchandise, wine and beer sampling and a cast appearance on “Conan” on TBS. USA Network will be on hand to promote “Mr. Robot” by unveiling a mystery to unravel and opening the Bank of E, which will give away cards loaded with cryptocurrency. Fans can also celebrate new beginnings at the Syfy Geek Love Chapel, where Orlando Jones will officiate weddings, or say farewell at a funeral procession for History’s “Vikings,” which wends its way to the waterfront, where a “corpse” will be placed on a 45-foot long ship and set ablaze at sundown for its journey to Valhalla.  INDUSTRIALS General Electric   on Friday with a different script than usual. Jeffrey R. Immelt, who was  , will be making his last appearance in the quarterly ritual after 16 years. He will be joined by his replacement, John Flannery, who doesn’t formally take the top post until August. “There’s drama, and it’s the end of an era,” said Deane Dray, an analyst at RBC Capital Markets. Mr. Flannery is conducting a top-to-bottom review of G.E.’s many industrial businesses. The quarterly results may provide early clues to his plans for the company, which he will announce in the fall. 
JERSEY CITY, June 2 (AP) — A bus rear-ended another bus in the Holland Tunnel on Saturday morning, injuring 17 people and sending 13 of them to hospitals with minor injuries, the authorities said. The other four injured passengers were treated at the scene, said Steve Coleman, a spokesman for the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey. Mr. Coleman said the buses — one from Atlantic Express and one from the BTC Transportation Corporation — crashed about 8:40 a.m. in a Manhattan-bound lane of the tunnel. The BTC bus hit the Atlantic Express bus after the Atlantic Express driver braked to avoid a car that had swerved into his lane, the authorities said. All of the injured were aboard the BTC bus, which was headed to Chinatown from Atlantic City. “It’s all bumps and bruises and bloody noses,” Mr. Coleman said, “all minor injuries.” The tunnel was closed for about 40 minutes after the accident.
• There have been far blacker Mondays. • Kenneth C. Griffin is growing concerned about inflation. • The Fed’s regulatory action against Wells may have some bite. • Broadcom puts more pressure on Qualcomm • How worried should JPMorgan clients be about health care? • How much more will Wells Fargo have to do? The Dow Jones industrial average   1,175.21 points, or 4.6 percent, to 24,345.75 on Monday, while the Standard & Poor’s tumbled 113.19 points, or 4.1 percent, to 2,648.94. Measured by points, those are steep drops — the biggest on record for the indexes. The previous largest point declines for each benchmark came in 2008, at the height of the financial crisis. But Monday’s plunge was far less impressive on a percentage basis. The Dow’s fall ranked as its 100th biggest, while the S. & P. 500’s slide was the 127th biggest in the index’s history, according to S & P Dow Jones Indices. Here is how Monday’s sell-off stacks up against two other major tumbles. Down 777.78 points, or 6.98 percent    Down 106 points, or 8.81 percent Just weeks after Lehman Brothers failed in September 2008,   President George W. Bush and rejected a $700 billion economic rescue plan. The vote sent markets tumbling to what was the biggest point loss in either index’s history. But points are not the best way to compare the magnitude of a stock index’s declines across eras. As the stock market has risen, big point moves have translated into increasingly smaller percentage changes. The Dow and the S. & P. 500 have more than doubled from their closes on Sept. 29, 2008. : Down 507.99, or 22.61 percent  Down 57.86, or 20.47 percent “Black Monday” was a petrifying moment — an even bigger decline in both points and percentage than the stock market crash of 1929. But unlike the 1929 crash, the slide in 1987 did not contribute to a wider economic slump. The stock market recovered its losses by early 1989. But the plunge did prompt regulators to introduce special brakes that kick in when the market falls too far, too fast. Stock markets, though, remain vulnerable to the sort of confusion and fear that one prominent economist   was a potent force in 1987. — Stephen Grocer and Peter Eavis As the U.S. stock markets look wobbly for the first time in nearly two years, at least one major investor is sounding a bearish tone. In a Jan. 31 letter to investors, Kenneth C. Griffin, founder of the Chicago hedge-fund firm Citadel, wrote that even though the broader economic backdrop continues to be positive, he sees several warning signs that could turn stock prices downward. The end of the Federal Reserve’s efforts to stimulate the U.S. economy is one factor, Mr. Griffin wrote, that could pressure stocks. But the prospect of inflation, or a rapid rise in the prices of goods and services, is making him especially nervous. “We are particularly concerned about the nascent signs” of rising inflation in a variety of countries, he wrote. As a result, he added, money managers at Citadel, which runs a variety of hedge funds, are “carefully positioning” for a surprise, sharp upturn in inflation. Mr. Griffin added that he is also concerned about geopolitical risks, writing that his money managers need to be able to handle negative events if they do occur, “including a trade policy misstep or a military conflict.” He did not elaborate. In an interview with CNBC in November, Mr. Griffin said the stock market was in the “seventh inning” of a rally. He said through a spokesman on Monday that he still thinks there are several innings to go before a downturn begins and that he is more bearish on bond prices than stocks at the moment. With 50 percent of the companies in the S.&P. 500 having reported results, profits are on pace to grow 13.4 percent, according to FactSet. If that growth rate holds through the end of earnings, it would mark the third quarter in the past four that S.&P. 500 companies have reported a double-digit profits increase. •75 percent of companies are reporting earnings above estimates, above the five-year average. • Companies that are beating estimates are doing so by a 4 percent margin, below the five year average. •80 percent of companies have reported revenue above estimates, a record high. • All 11 sectors are reporting earnings growth. A Federal Reserve regulatory action, announced Friday evening,  (loans and securities) that Wells Fargo can hold. The Fed took this action in response to misconduct at the bank that involved deceiving its customers. The cap will be in place until the Fed is satisfied that the bank has made sufficient improvements in its operations and corporate governance. Wells Fargo’s stock is down more than 7 percent Monday, suggesting that investors believe the growth cap will have some bite. With the economy strengthening and interest rates rising, banks can expect to earn higher profits as they make more loans and suffer fewer losses from defaults. Indeed, this optimistic scenario has helped send bank stocks on a tear in recent months. Now, the question is to what degree Wells Fargo will have to sit out the good times. Wells Fargo executives on Friday suggested that the cap would have limited financial impact, saying it would reduce this year’s net profits by $300 million to $400 million, which works out at less than 2 percent of 2017’s earnings. One reason the earnings hit might be small is that the bank can stay within the cap by selling short-term, lower-risk investments that don’t earn much. Another way the bank intends to limit the negative impact is by reducing the amount of deposits on which the bank pays out a relatively high interest rate. Crucially, Wells Fargo said that it hopes to increase the size of its loan book. The hope is that, by shedding the low-risk investments, the bank will create the room to make more mortgages, credit card loans and loans to businesses, while staying within the limit. But it may not turn out to be as straightforward as that. The growth cap comes after a lackluster year for Wells, which reduced its loans 1 percent last year, compared with an increase of 3.5 percent at Bank of America. Investors waiting for catch-up growth at Wells may have to wait still longer. Also, much depends on whether Wells Fargo can now satisfy the Fed’s concerns. Any indication that the bank is struggling to comply with the regulator’s demands could set off more turmoil at the bank. There is also a possibility that the tactic of shedding of low-risk investments while making more loans could increase the overall risk of Wells Fargo’s balance sheet. Brian Kleinhanzl, a banks analyst at Keefe, Bruyette & Woods, wrote on Sunday that the Fed’s action will “mean Wells will have a harder time maintaining market share and will have to compete more on price or credit terms versus peers,” adding, “Wells will also have to maintain the balance sheet while other banks are growing, and we view this as defensive versus peers.” In   to about $121 billion just now, Broadcom is hoping to allay concerns about its takeover bid and its quest to create a behemoth in computer chips. : • A takeover price of $82 a share, up from its original offer of $70 • A “significant” breakup fee if a deal were to be halted for antitrust reasons • A “ticking fee” that Broadcom would pay in cash if a deal took more than a year to close It said the new “best and final” offer would be withdrawn if Qualcomm either pushed its annual shareholder meeting back from March 6 (when Broadcom hopes to unseat the entire board) or if it paid more than $110 a share for NXP Semiconductor. Qualcomm recently reported a 96 percent drop in operating income amid a royalty dispute with Apple. That has given Broadcom some pause, but not enough to make it walk away. This offer isn’t likely to tempt Qualcomm. It has a better chance of tempting investors, who might then press the chip maker into negotiations. Bitcoin  . That’s a more than 60 percent decline from its high of $19,511 hit on Dec. 8. Other cryptocurrencies are falling as well. Ripple, Ethereum and Litecoin are all down Monday. Simon Tobler, a trader at Swiss-based Crypto Finance AG, told Bloomberg: “If we don’t hold the $8,000 level, Bitcoin may fall to $5,000, where the next big support is. The market is lacking big buyers.” Ever since the bank announced a partnership with Amazon and Berkshire Hathaway to create a new health care company, it appears that  . More from Anna Wilde Mathews, Dana Cimilluca and Emily Glazer of the WSJ:  Ultimately, Mr. Dimon, Jeff Bezos and Warren Buffett are working on a sort of group-purchasing venture, according to some of JPMorgan’s bankers. That’s far less transformative than some on Wall Street had hoped — or feared. On Janet Yellen’s last day atop the Fed (see below), the regulator demanded that Wells Fargo replace four directors and capped the bank’s growth. The goal:  . More from Emily Flitter, Binyamin Appelbaum and David Enrich: Wells Fargo executives were irate that the Fed’s announcement trumpeted the replacement of the banks’ directors, and that it implied the boardroom changes came at the Fed’s instruction. Will Wells Fargo have to do more than it just agreed? Gillian Tan of Gadfly suggests that Timothy Sloan, who became the bank’s C.E.O. after the scandals,  . • Paul Ryan deleted a tweet crediting the tax overhaul for a secretary’s $1.50-a-week pay raise. He’s still being mocked for it. ( ) • The federal government is set to nearly double its borrowing this fiscal year, to $955 billion. ( ) • Democrats on the House Intelligence Committee plan to push for   rebutting the one by Representative Devin Nunes about the surveillance of a Trump campaign aide. Mr. Nunes said he, too, had  . • Senator Dick Durbin, Democrat of Illinois, said that Congress is   to protect the immigrants known as Dreamers this week, despite a Feb. 8 government funding deadline. But John McCain and Chris Coons plan on   anyway. • Jeff Sessions’s silence in the wake of President Trump’s attacks on the Justice Department has weakened morale there. ( ) The now-former Fed chairwoman told PBS NewsHour that while she didn’t agree with Alan Greenspan that there were bubbles in the stock and bond markets, she did see  . From her interview with Judy Woodruff: Already, investors  , faced with a tight-looking labor market and central banks potentially preparing to raise rates and take away the easy-money punch bowl. Both Asian and European stock markets  . She also spoke about being the first Fed chair in history not to be renominated after a full term. “Well, I would have liked to serve an additional term, and I did make that clear. So, I will say that I was disappointed not to be reappointed,” she said. Starboard Value, the activist hedge fund, has taken up a new line of attack as it pushes for change at the chip maker Mellanox. It is accusing top executives and board members of  . : Starboard says Mellanox management and directors have sold shares more than 370 times since the company’s I.P.O., while buying its shares on the open market just once. Starboard is trying to unseat Mellanox’s entire board, arguing that the company needs either to improve its business, including by being more focused in its research spending, or to consider selling itself. , put forth by Ed Lee at Recode: • Getting bigger by merging with another media company doesn’t solve CBS’s problems. Selling to a tech giant with great online distribution does more. • Amazon’s exceptionally deep pockets would let CBS bid for expensive must-watch content like sports rights amid tougher competition. Would Shari Redstone, who with her father controls both CBS and Viacom, allow a deal that didn’t involve both companies? • Is debt driving Dell’s deliberations about a potential I.P.O. or deal with VMware? Maybe less than you’d think. ( ) • Soho House, the operator of trendy members’ clubs, has hired Goldman Sachs and JPMorgan Chase to lead a planned I.P.O. ( ) • Does the deal boom signal a top for the debt markets? ( ) • The Carlyle Group, Bain Capital and Apollo Global Management are among those jockeying for Akzo Nobel’s chemicals unit, according to unnamed sources. ( ) • GlaxoSmithKline and Reckitt Benckiser were the only bidders for Pfizer’s consumer unit, according to unnamed sources. ( ) A South Korean appeals court   for bribery and corruption. A lawyer for Mr. Lee said that his client   to be declared innocent of the remaining charges. Prosecutors haven’t yet said if they’ll appeal. But critics of the country’s conglomerates had hoped that Mr. Lee’s original, unusually long sentence — five years — would herald tougher regulation.  Samsung has done fine with Mr. Lee in jail: Its electronics operation is earning gangbuster profits and its semiconductor business is well positioned to keep minting money. At  , says  , down another 12 percent over the past 24 hours. Other big virtual currencies are down, too.  Credit card issuers including JPMorgan, Bank of America, Citigroup and Lloyds are now  . It helped create the template for London P.R. firms catering to foreign governments. But   — working for the wealthy Gupta family of South Africa and inflaming racial tensions there — that seems lifted from “House of Cards.” More from David Segal of the NYT: • Uma Thurman has opened up about what she described as sexual misconduct toward her by Harvey Weinstein. ( ) • Five women of different ages and professions gathered to discuss experiences of the gender wage gap: “That was the most humiliating experience that I have ever had.” ( ) — J.D. Vance, venture investor and memoirist, in  • Unilever brought deodorant to China dreaming of a market with 2.6 billion armpits, but struggled against beliefs that it’s healthy to sweat. Other companies have hit similar cultural difficulties. ( ) • Early employees of Google and Facebook are among the founders of the Center for Humane Technology, which will challenge the companies they helped to build. ( ) • Amazon has trained markets to give it leeway. They appear to accept that it has a strategy for Whole Foods that will take time. ( ) • New York Times reporters bought the same ingredients for Super Bowl meatballs at a Whole Foods 365 store and a Walmart. Both the price and the outcome were different. ( ) • Greg Coffey, the star hedge fund trader known as “the Wizard of Oz” who retired five years ago, is raising $2 billion for a new fund focused on emerging markets, according to anonymous sources. ( )
Have you ever lived in, or visited, a town or city that felt just right to you? If so, what was it that appealed to you, and why? Imagine your ideal town or city. What would it look like? What would housing, commerce, transportation and recreation be like? What amenities or special features would it include, and why? In “ ,” Emily Badger writes:  Read the entire article, then tell us: — Do you agree with the article that some cities today don’t “work quite right?” If so, what doesn’t work, and why? If not, why not? — Do you agree with the article that today’s cities are “the equivalent of the flip phone,” and are out of date? If so, how could they be redesigned and improved, and why? — What suggestions or ideas would you give to a city planner, if you could, and why?
The website of Mt. Gox,  , appears to have been taken down, shortly after six other major Bitcoin exchanges released a statement distancing themselves from Mt. Gox. The home page of the site, based in Tokyo, could not be entered during Tuesday afternoon in Asia, and no error message appeared. Bitcoin exchanges allow their users to trade Bitcoins for dollars and other currencies. This month, Mt. Gox — once the largest exchange handling Bitcoins — said it was halting withdrawals indefinitely after it detected “unusual activity.” “This tragic violation of the trust of users of Mt. Gox was the result of one company’s actions and does not reflect the resilience or value of Bitcoin and the digital currency industry,” the other exchanges — Bitstamp, Blockchain, BTC China, Circle, Coinbase and Kraken — said in the statement. Mt. Gox was not immediately available for comment. “As with any new industry, there are certain bad actors that need to be weeded out, and that is what we are seeing today,” the companies said. “Mt. Gox has confirmed its issues in private discussions with other members of the Bitcoin community.” On Sunday, Mark Karpeles, the chief executive of Mt. Gox, resigned from the board of the Bitcoin Foundation in a blow to the digital currency. It was a founding member of the foundation and had one of the three elected industry representatives on the board. The resignation followed a number of technical problems, including a huge cyberattack from unknown sources that has sent a barrage of spam to Bitcoin exchanges. “There are hundreds of trustworthy and responsible companies involved in Bitcoin,” the six exchanges said in the statement. “These companies will continue to build the future of money by making Bitcoin more secure and easy to use for consumers and merchants.”
For such a cerebral documentary, “The New Radical” packs a wicked punch. , a self-described  , found himself in trouble with the American government after publishing designs online that could be used to create a gun with a 3-D printer. Stopping him raises thorny questions involving the First and Second Amendments, and introduces broad arguments over liberty and innovation. Interviews with Mr. Wilson show him to be both astute and confounding, sometimes sounding like a cautious bookworm, other times like an undergrad drunk on Ayn Rand novels; he disdains corporate influence in politics, yet admires the alt-right movement. Mr. Wilson’s interests don’t end with guns. He has since joined with Amir Taaki, an anarchist from England, to create  , an internet application that allows for clandestine financial transactions using bitcoin. Like Mr. Wilson, Mr. Taaki has brazen ideas about revolution. Those ideas have been around for centuries. But technologies can now turn them into something frightening. Though it would have been valuable to see Mr. Wilson and Mr. Taaki challenged on their opinions, Adam Bhala Lough, the director, allows the men to make uncontested cases for their extremist and sometimes militant stances. Interviews with Julian Assange and mentions of George Orwell are sprinkled throughout, sowing a sense of paranoia. It’s possible to fully, and vehemently, disagree with Mr. Wilson and Mr. Taaki yet still see their points. That can make   unsettling. It also makes it a film worth watching.
John Flannery, G.E.’s chief executive,   in the way that the company operates, he said today. Though the news accompanied the announcement that   related to its legacy insurance portfolio, the statements are unrelated.  Many on Wall Street think that Mr. Flannery was talking about the once-unfathomable idea that G.E. could be broken apart into separate businesses. On a conference call with analysts, Mr. Flannery said: Late last year, Mr. Flannery, who  , said  by reducing the number of businesses it is in. He said that G.E. would focus on jet engines, power-generation equipment and health-care machines. It’s unlikely that G.E. will make an announcement in the spring that it will only fiddle around the edges, like more fully spinning off its Baker Hughes oil-field services unit. But it’s also unlikely that Mr. Flannery will be the one to break up the 125-year-old conglomerate. It’s more likely that Mr. Flannery and his team will consider unique ways of separating G.E.’s core business units without actually splitting them completely apart. But it’s all somewhat speculative at the moment. from Brook Sutherland of Gadfly: The attorneys general of 22 states filed a lawsuit to block the Federal Communications Commission’s repeal of regulations that ensure an equal and open internet,  The attorneys general said the rollback of so-called net neutrality rules were “arbitrary and capricious” and a reversal of a longstanding policy to prevent internet service providers from blocking or charging websites for faster delivery of content to consumers. The petition to begin the lawsuit, filed in the United States District Court of Appeals in Washington, is the first legal challenge against the F.C.C.’s order in December. Several others are expected, including by public interest groups such as Public Knowledge and Free Press, which argue that the F.C.C.’s order was harmful to consumers and was done hastily and without proper public input. The business that makes Butterfingers and Gobstoppers will find a new home —  , the producer of Rocher chocolate — for $2.8 billion in cash. • The U.S. candy business, which doesn’t include KitKats, generated   in 2016. (That’s roughly   that year.) • The deal is expected to close by  Nestlé said last year that it would   amid a waning appetite among Americans for candy. The move had been lauded by Dan Loeb’s Third Point, which has   to sell off nonessential businesses. from  : For Ferrero:  ,   and the law firm  One of Elliott’s first campaigns of 2018 sees the activist hedge fund going even further abroad: Its latest target is Bezeq, the once-government-owned Israeli telecom company. The phone service provider is up 5 percent as of this morning on the news of Elliott’s investment and public letter to the telecom’s interim chairman, David Granot. Bezeq has been under pressure on multiple fronts: • The company has been   amid an investigation into potential securities violations, including an inquiry into the mogul Shaul Elovitch, who owns 26 percent of the company. • The company’s ownership structure is complicated. Technically, Mr. Elovitch controls Eurocom, which in turn controls Internet Gold, which in tern controls BCom, which in turn controls Bezeq. (Got that?) But Mr. Elovitch has been grappling with debt at Eurocom and is in talks to sell control of that vehicle to another businessman, Naty Saidoff. • Replacing all directors under scrutiny by Israeli securities regulators, in consultation with shareholders • Simplifying the ownership structure of the company From  : Beyond the public pressure that the letter by Paul Singer’s hedge fund will bring, Elliott could also call a special meeting of shareholders to vote on matters like choosing new directors, if it can muster up the support of at least 5 percent of shares. (Elliott said that it currently owns a 4.8 percent economic interest in the company. ) • It isn’t necessarily   that Silver Lake and P2 Capital Partners agreed to pay for the operator of gift card stores. • It isn’t necessarily the 24 percent premium over Blackhawk’s Friday closing price that the $45.25-per-share bid represents. • It isn’t even necessarily the nine advisers listed in the press release. (More on that below.) • It’s the   that Silver Lake is writing to support the deal. That’s one of the biggest-ever equity commitments that the $39 billion investment firm has ever made. Dan Primack has more on   over at Axios. For Blackhawk:  ,   and the law firm  For Silver Lake:  ,  ,  ,   and the law firm  For P2 Capital: The law firm  Qualcomm unveiled its first official “fight letter” in its campaign to beat back Broadcom’s $105 billion bid for the chip maker. Among the highlights of the letter: • Qualcomm says that it will deliver between $6.75 and $7.50 in pro forma earnings per share for its 2019 fiscal year. • A pledge to continue the company’s its cost-savings program. • A reiteration that Broadcom’s offer ignores the upswing that the emerging 5G wireless standard will bring for Qualcomm’s stock. : Ramius, a money manager that owns stakes in both Qualcomm and NXP Semiconductors, said that it plans to reject Qualcomm’s $110-a-share bid for the smaller chip maker. The firm wants a deal done — but at a higher price. That follows the declaration of Elliott that NXP was worth $135 a share  . From  : Citigroup said that it   — if one excludes a $22 billion charge related to the tax overhaul. Here’s a look at its results by the numbers:  Citi’s loss in the fourth quarter, including the tax charge. It is  . The new tax law is causing large banks to report big one-time charges to their fourth-quarter results, but the legislation should benefit the banks over time.  Its earnings per share excluding the tax hit. That beat the $1.19 expected by Wall Street analysts, according to Thomson Reuters and topped the $1.14 per share earned a year ago.  Citi’s revenue for the quarter, which exceeded the $17.01 it generated a year ago.  The amount of the $22 billion tax charge that came from writing down deferred-tax assets, which companies use to offset future tax bills.  The amount of the tax hit that came from a one-time charge on overseas earnings because of the new tax law.  The amount Citi generated in trading revenue, down 19 percent. JPMorgan reported a 17 percent drop on Friday. Goldman’s commodity trading revenue fell 75 percent last year, its worst annual performance,  , citing people familiar with the matter. Goldman reports earnings tomorrow before the bell. The Dow Jones industrial average is trading above 26,000 for the first time. It took just seven days for the blue-chip index to go from 25,000 to 26,000. If it closes above that level, it will mark the quickest move from one millennial marker to the next. The previous record was set on Jan. 4 when the Dow finished above 25,000 just 23 trading sessions after surpassing 24,000. Of course, 1,000 point moves aren’t what they used to be. Going from 25,000 to 26,000 is a move of just 4 percent. By comparison, when the index went from 10,000 to 11,000 in 24 days in 1999, it was a rise of 10 percent,  . And it’s not just the Dow that is surging this month. The more widely followed Standard & Poor’s 500 index crossed 2,800 this morning and is up more than 4 percent this month. That puts it on pace for its best monthly performance since March 2016, when it was rebounding from the steep sell-off during the first six weeks of that year. In fact, the S.&P. 500 hasn’t experienced a monthly decline since March of last year. , the hedge fund manager wrote that his firm had bought shares of Twitter in the fourth-quarter at an average price of $21.59. Shares of Twitter are down about 1 percent to $25.13. Larry Fink of BlackRock is sending a letter to C.E.O.s of public companies today saying that they  , or risk losing the money-management firm’s support. More from  :  BlackRock has $6 trillion under management, making it the biggest investor in public companies in the world. , from Andrew’s latest DealBook column: Mr. Fink’s letter pits the investment mogul “against many of the companies that he’s invested in, which hold the view that their only duty is to produce profits for their shareholders, an argument long espoused by economists like Milton Friedman.” Jeff Sonnenfeld of the Yale School of Management told Andrew, “It is huge for an institutional investor to take this position across its portfolio.” Mr. Sonnenfeld added that he’s seen “nothing like it.” • Citi said it would measure, publish and address gaps in the pay between male and female employees in the U.S., Britain and Germany, after pressure from an investor. ( ) Raine — the merchant bank that invested early in Vice and counts Masa Son and Steve Ballmer as clients —  , the studio that produced the first original series for Apple and Twitter. (Propagate’s co-founders are Ben Silverman, once co-chairman of NBC Entertainment, and Howard T. Owens, who was president of National Geographic Channels.) That content is more important than ever in an era of online streaming. Raine’s betting that Propagate, which is also turning popular podcasts like “Lore” into streaming series and working on content for Netflix and CBS, can produce hits from a variety of sources and replicate them around the world. , from Raine co-founder Joe Ravitch: • Saudi Arabia’s Public Investment Fund is in talks to invest more than $500 million in Endeavor, the parent company of WME, as part of its push to diversify the kingdom’s economy, according to unidentified sources. ( ,  ) • Graydon Carter’s first project after Vanity Fair is  , a start-up described as Instagram for news. From   from this weekend, which has been making the rounds in Silicon Valley:  Stock awards have a real cost — annual dilution of companies’ equity can be as high as 5 percent a year. He adds: • By potentially spinning out its Japanese cellphone business, SoftBank could raise as much as $18 billion for deals. ( ) • Kuaishou, a video site backed by Tencent, is seeking a valuation of about $17 billion in its new round of financing. ( ) Sergio Marchionne, the automaker’s outspoken C.E.O., made it clear that the company won’t sell its Jeep or Ram divisions or otherwise break itself up. But if   as he said at the Detroit Auto Show, what is his plan to compete with rivals who are diving headlong into autonomous vehicles? From  : Mr. Marchionne also confirmed that this will be his last year leading Fiat Chrysler, with a successor to be named in March. • Automakers are celebrating their best ever three-year stretch, but they could be headed for choppier waters. ( ) • BlackBerry continued its push into the auto industry with a product to help carmakers detect software security flaws. ( ) That’s an actual question posed in a private forum that was sent to us by a reader this weekend. Your daily reminder of virtual currency prices, courtesy of  : • Bitcoin is at $12,288,   over the past day. • Ethereum is at $1,137,  . • Ripple is at $1.45,  . And your daily dose of  , courtesy of Bloomberg: • The head of Singapore’s central bank said he hoped the technology underpinning Bitcoin and other digital currencies would outlast the current “fever.” ( ) • Nine hedge funds who had bet on Bitcoin made a 1,167 percent return last year — less than the virtual currency’s return but far more than the 8 percent that the hedge fund industry as a whole generated. ( ) • China is escalating its cryptocurrency crackdown, and has blocked websites and apps that offer exchange-like services, according to unidentified sources. ( ) • IBM has teamed up with Moller-Maersk to create a blockchain-based platform for the shipping industry. ( ) • TechCrunch got hold of Telegram’s initial coin offering prospectus and learned that the messaging service wants to challenge Ethereum as a platform for services. ( ) damage
• What it takes to be a whistle-blower. • Broadcom whacks Qualcomm for raising its NXP bid. • Untangling the productivity mystery. • How Skadden got involved in the special counsel’s Russia inquiry. Sigmund Freud is reputed to have said that “sometimes a cigar is just a cigar.” The Supreme Court took that approach in deciding what is required to qualify for protection from retaliation as a whistle-blower. A   in the Dodd-Frank Act defines a “whistle-blower” as someone who provides “information relating to a violation of the securities laws to the Commission.” That seems simple enough, but the Securities and Exchange Commission made something of a hash out of the requirement by taking an expansive view   aimed at protecting an employee from retaliation even if the person only reports information internally. In Digital Realty Trust v. Somers, a former employee of Digital Realty, Paul Somers, claimed he was terminated after he reported possible securities law violations to senior management. Although he never alerted anyone outside the company, Mr. Somers filed a lawsuit claiming his termination violated the anti-retaliation provision by relying on the S.E.C.’s rule. The Supreme Court, in an opinion by Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg, rejected that reading of the statute. It applied a simple analysis: “Courts are not at liberty to dispense with the condition—tell the S.E.C.—Congress imposed.” By not reporting his suspicions to the S.E.C., he lost the protection afforded whistleblowers. One of the complaints expressed by companies when the S.E.C. considered the whistle-blower rules was that they did not require employees to report information to management first. The incentive created by the Digital Realty ruling is straightforward: Don’t just tell your boss about possible violations; make a beeline to the S.E.C.’s front door, at least if you want protection from retaliation. The Dow Jones industrial average rose 139 points in the half-hour after the Federal Reserve   of its most recent policy meeting at 2 p.m. and was up more than 300 points on the day. Then the index sank 455 points in the final 90 minutes to close down 0.67 percent for the day. Why? There didn’t appear to be anything in the minutes to make investors particularly bearish or bullish. Perhaps the bond market was to blame for the plunge. The yield on the 10-year Treasury note, which rises as its price falls, kept climbing after the minutes came out, closing at 2.95 percent. Higher bond yields can make stocks look more expensive, prompting investors to sell. As a result, Wednesday’s mini move indicates that the tug of war between the stock and bond markets is still very much on. , it appears that the central bank’s policymakers did not spend much time discussing an indicator that is flashing a warning sign. The data point in question is the saving rate, which recently sank to  . With the rate at 2.4 percent of disposable income, a big drop in the stock market, like the one that occurred earlier this month, could prompt consumers to cut their spending. The Fed’s policymakers did not appear overly worried about the saving rate at their last meeting, which was held before the market’s plunge. The minutes state:  not to raise its takeover bid for NXP on Tuesday by increasing that offer by about 16 percent, to $127.50 a share from $110. Now Broadcom has retaliated. Broadcom shaved $3 per share off its hostile takeover bid for Qualcomm, to  . Broadcom’s rationale is that the new NXP offer transfers value away from Qualcomm’s shareholders. From the news release: • Broadcom argues that Qualcomm gave up  , or $6.2 billion, in value to NXP shareholders. In response, it cut its price. At $79 a share, Broadcom’s current offer is just under 13 percent higher than its original offer. (Of course, other elements of Broadcom’s last bid — the $8 billion breakup fee for antitrust reasons, the ticking fee if a deal takes more than 12 months to close — still stand.) • Broadcom also contends privately that had Qualcomm agreed to start deal talks, the two of them could have held firm against NXP shareholders like Elliott Management and Soroban Capital Partners. By giving up less negotiating power to the holdout shareholders, the argument goes, Qualcomm could have recut the NXP deal at a far lower price. • Qualcomm argues privately that the $4.10 a share is nonsense, since the NXP deal a) wasn’t going to get done at $110 a share and b) will still add to its earnings per share price starting in the 2019 fiscal year. Broadcom had previously said that it would walk away if the NXP offer went above $110 a share, but now seems content to take its chances at Qualcomm’s annual shareholder meeting. Broadcom wants six seats on Qualcomm’s board. That campaign gained momentum when the proxy advisers I.S.S. and Glass Lewis recommended that Qualcomm shareholders vote for at least four of its director nominees. A Qualcomm representative didn’t have an immediate comment. Qualcomm’s were down 1.5 percent, while Broadcom’s were up slightly. Shares in NXP — the real winner in this deal saga so far — were essentially unchanged. • Carl Icahn and Darwin Deason pressed Xerox to pursue alternatives to its complicated deal with Fujifilm. ( ) • HNA has borrowed from the private equity firm Pacific Alliance Group, a sign that it may be struggling to raise capital from more traditional sources. ( ) An economy is doing well when companies each year manage to become more productive, or in other words, get more output from their employees and equipment. But productivity for years has grown far more slowly than it did in the past, effectively restraining economic growth. This decline has prompted economists to hunt for causes – and the latest   on the issue comes from the McKinsey Global Institute. The Upshot’s Neil Irwin does a great job of   McKinsey’s main finding: Little in economics is straightforward, however, and McKinsey’s deep dive prompted a couple of questions. Jaana Remes, one of the authors of the work, was kind enough to respond.  In its report, McKinsey notes that the slow down in productivity growth was noticeable before the financial crisis. What caused that? And to what degree did those causes contribute to the decline in productivity growth after the financial crisis? This is important because these forces could continue to weigh on productivity. In the years leading up to 2008, the productivity improvements that started in the 1990s with the introduction of information technology were largely complete, Ms. Remes explains. Important new technologies can often take well over 10 years to have a big impact on productivity, she adds. The optimistic take, though, is that we can in the coming years expect to see big benefits as companies further automate, and introduce artificial intelligence.  If a sluggish economy can create the conditions for weak productivity, why did France, Spain and Italy, whose economies were anemic in the period under study, have significantly better productivity performances than faster-growing countries?  From 2010 to 2014, labor productivity grew by 1.4 percent a year in Spain and 1 percent in France, well in excess of the negative 0.2 percent rate for Britain and the United States. Why was that? Because Britain and the United States had made superior productivity gains before 2010. That made it harder for the two countries to notch similarly strong productivity growth in the years after the financial crisis. By contrast, France and Spain, which had made far fewer productivity gains before 2010, were able to eke out at least some afterward. Ms. Remes also points out that a big cause of Spain’s post-2010 gain came from a reduction in hours worked. That might be described as the least desirable way to bolster productivity because it implies a reduction in incomes for workers. The most economically beneficial type of productivity gain occurs when output per employee increases as hours worked grow.  posted by France’s central bank, the Banque de France, shows that the largest companies in the United States now account for a significantly larger share of production. This dominance, the paper asserts, could allow the companies to enjoy “monopoly rents,” the term economists use to describe the subsidies companies enjoy if their business is protected in ways that are not available to other firms. David Wessel, writing for Harvard Business Review, also recently   at whether dominant companies are holding the economy back. The largest United States bank by assets announced that it plans to tear down its current headquarters at 270 Park Ave. and build 2.5 million square-foot modern tower in its place. The new headquarters has yet to be designed, but it is expected,  , to be between 70 and 75 stories and house 15,000 employees. The current headquarters was designed in the late 1950s for about 3,500 employees, JPMorgan said. During construction, employees will be temporarily moved 237, 245 and 277 Park Ave. and 383 and 390 Madison Ave., Bloomberg reported citing a person familiar with the matter. The tower would be the first major project under New York City’s Midtown East rezoning plan, designed to encourage office construction in the area. The job recruiting site said Wednesday that it has  , as part of a series of high-level executive appointments. Mr. Cox was most recently at Lithium Technologies, a maker of customer relationship management software. Here’s what Robert Hohman, Glassdoor’s C.E.O. and co-founder, said: “We are pleased to welcome Jim to Glassdoor as our new CFO as he brings a proven track record of building and managing financial operations and teams at high-growth technology companies.” Glassdoor also appointed Christian Sutherland-Wong, most recently its general manager of monetization, as its first chief operating officer, and Samantha Zupan, a longtime executive, as its vice president of global corporate communications. The giant law firm’s work for the former Trump campaign manager — who has been charged with several criminal acts by Robert Mueller’s inquiry into Russian election interference — has come into question after a   in the investigation. More from Kenneth Vogel and Andrew Kramer of  : Skadden’s response: It fired the associate in question, Alex van der Zwaan, last year, and is cooperating with Mr. Mueller’s team. Here’s   about Facebook’s role. Chris Hughes, a co-founder, said Facebook   to prevent foreign interference. President Trump   for not being tougher on Russia. And   who helped fund Russia’s troll agency. The judge overseeing the Justice Department’s lawsuit to block the $85.4 billion takeover of Time Warner denied AT&T’s request to see government communications about the case. He ruled that AT&T had not “made a credible showing” that the White House had singled it out for retribution. More from  : AT&T had already agreed to take the Justice Department’s antitrust chief, Makan Delrahim, off the witness list — but could call him during the trial if needed. The trial begins March 19. Symptom A: Albertsons buying Rite Aid to gain scale and enter the pharmacy business Symptom B: Walmart’s online sales growing just 23 percent in the fourth quarter, after it splashed out on Jet.com, Bonobos and more More from  : • Of Walmart, Jennifer Saba of   writes, “Longer term, failure online is an existential risk.” But Elizabeth Winkler of   says, “Given its huge size, investors need to temper their growth expectations.” • Of the Rite Aid deal, Max Nisen and Tara Lachapelle of   write, “There aren’t a lot of appealing options out there, and Albertsons had largely exhausted them.” • Why would Amazon employees working on the HQ2 search be interested in an article about Arlington, Va.? Hmm. ( ) • Amazon now sells its own line of over-the-counter drugs. ( ) • A closer look at Jeff Bezos’s 10,000-year clock. ( ) • Start-ups that take money from the Alexa Fund should still fear Amazon’s competition. ( ) • Mr. Trump ordered the Justice Department to  . But the Florida legislature   that would have banned many semiautomatic weapons and large-capacity magazines. And a Florida teachers’ pension plan   in the maker of the rifle used in the Parkland school shooting. • A clampdown by John Kelly on interim security clearances has upset Jared Kushner, who has one. ( ) • The advocacy group Common Cause filed complaints with the Justice Department and the Federal Election Commission over reports of $150,000 being paid to a former Playboy Playmate who said she had an affair with Mr. Trump. ( ) • The Trump administration wants to sell nuclear reactors to Saudi Arabia, even though the kingdom won’t accept nonproliferation restrictions. ( ) • The U.S. sold $179 billion worth of debt yesterday, now that the debt ceiling is no longer an immediate issue. ( ) From Peter Eavis: For the first time — and after much protest — public companies must report their employees’ median pay and compare it with that of their C.E.O.s. (It’s thanks to Dodd-Frank.)  disclosed last week that its C.E.O., Darius Adamczyk, took home $16.8 million last year,   median employee pay. : • Teva Pharmaceuticals’ was  • Apollo Global Management’s was   (if you exclude, as Apollo did, Leon Black’s $91 million in dividends from his stock holdings) From Matthew Goldstein: A Manhattan federal judge   by his Point72 Asset Management to temporarily seal the complaint in a sexual discrimination lawsuit against the firm by Lauren Bonner, an employee who described the firm as a testosterone-fueled “boys’ club.” The judge said the request was “not narrowly tailored” and ran counter to the “presumption of public access” to court records. Point72 is trying to push the case into arbitration, and said the complaint revealed details of other employees’ compensation.  Sports Illustrated published an investigation into   inside the Dallas Mavericks N.B.A. franchise. • How the founders of a price comparison site ended up as antitrust crusaders taking on Google. ( ) • The dominance of tech giants like Facebook and Amazon could  , according to Banque de France. And George Soros’s Open Society organization is   against those companies. • Apple is in talks to buy directly from miners to  , according to unnamed sources. (It’s vital for batteries.) But don’t expect the Democratic Republic of Congo to become  . • Facebook and Twitter fall short in enforcing rules against impersonation. ( ) • A.I. is getting cheaper to make — and to manipulate. ( ) • Spotify’s co-founders plan to keep control through super-voting shares, unnamed sources say. ( ) • Google has revamped its payments service to better compete against Apple Pay Cash. ( ) The embattled country is pushing ahead with the   backed by its oil reserves, hoping to pay down debt and increase imports. President Nicolás Maduro called it a “cryptocurrency to take on Superman.” But few people give it much hope. Some questions: Would buying the currency run afoul of U.S. sanctions? Can you trust the Venezuelan government to maintain the link between the petro and oil reserves? And how will pricing work? • Long Blockchain — yes,   — replaced its C.E.O. and announced plans to  , while trying to avoid being  . • Airbus and Mercedes-Benz have hired a blockchain consultancy run by U.C. Berkeley students. ( ) • Hackers broke into a Tesla-owned Amazon cloud account to use it for mining virtual currencies. ( ) • You missed your chance of free Bitcoins. ( ) And Bitcoin’s at   today, according to  . •  , the billionaire oil mogul, has stepped down as the C.E.O. of Hilcorp, though he’ll remain executive chairman. ( ) • The C.E.O. of Gap’s namesake brand,  , has stepped down as the label continues to struggle. ( ) • The C.E.O. of the Mayo Clinic,  , plans to step down by year end. ( ) • A Republican plan to let people pay for time off with a new baby by collecting social security benefits early has raised concerns about putting women into more precarious positions in retirement. ( ) • If the U.S. had to face a recession, it would have few stabilizing tools at its disposal. ( ) • The Weinstein Company has formally responded to one of the class-action lawsuits it faces, saying Harvey Weinstein acted alone and that the statute of limitations had run out on some of the claims. ( ) • The slide in the dollar has less to do with U.S. policies and fundamentals and more to do with investors preferring turnaround stories in Europe and Japan, says Goldman Sachs. ( ) • Outstanding Hospitality Management, which operates airport restaurant spaces, sued the Kushner Companies over a planned food hall at the former NYT Building in Manhattan. ( ) • Li Yonghong, owner of the soccer club A.C. Milan, denied reports in the Italian newspaper Corriere della Sera that he was selling assets to settle debts. ( ) • Ray Dalio’s $22 billion bet is against large European companies, but ones with far more economic exposure to the rest of the world than to Europe. ( ) • Glencore is grappling with how to pay Dan Gertler, a former partner who has been placed under sanctions by the U.S. government. It will owe him as much as $200 million in royalties over two years. ( )
SAN FRANCISCO —   has been in a bull market like few the world has ever seen. At the beginning of the year, the price of a Bitcoin was below $1,000. It hit $5,000 in October, then doubled by late November. And on Thursday, less than two weeks later, the price of a single Bitcoin rose above $20,000 on some exchanges,  . The latest price spike has been credited to signs that Wall Street companies plan on bringing their financial heft into the market. At the current cost, the value of all Bitcoin in circulation is about $300 billion. To get a sense of how big that is, all the shares of Goldman Sachs are worth about $90 billion. The gains have been driven by several other factors — perhaps the most important being the irrational mentality that can take over in speculative bubbles. But most people buying Bitcoin are doing so in the belief that others will want it even more in the future. The gains, though, have many people, even Bitcoin believers, anticipating a big crash. The fringe communities that drove Bitcoin in its early years are playing a much less important role in the current rally. Many investors have said the most important factor driving the current enthusiasm is the  The path for large investors has been smoothed by the Chicago Mercantile Exchange and Chicago Board Options Exchange, which have been   Most banks are already signed up with these exchanges and consequently can immediately begin trading the contracts. The options exchange has said it plans to start trading on Sunday. It is still unclear how the arrival of Bitcoin futures will influence the demand for the digital tokens. With a futures contract, banks can bet on the price of Bitcoin without holding the underlying Bitcoins. This is expected to bring many new players into the market who don’t want to deal with the complications of holding Bitcoins. But the futures contract will also allow investors to short Bitcoin, or bet on the price’s going down, which has been hard to do until now. Some analysts think this could put downward pressure on the price. Other market participants   into the rest of the financial system. People still use Bitcoin and other virtual currencies to make ransom payments and buy illegal goods online, including   But that activity has been on the wane since the   this year. Individual investors have been just as active as large investors. Nowhere has the phenomenon of  , where several exchanges have storefronts to help new customers. This is all the more remarkable because just a year ago, Koreans showed almost no interest in these markets. Small  . They have been encouraged by laws passed this year that essentially legalized Bitcoin and allowed Bitcoin exchanges to get regulatory licenses. In the United States,   which provides a Bitcoin brokerage service, similar to Charles Schwab, as well as an exchange for larger investors. Coinbase now has more account holders than Schwab, and it has struggled to keep up with the growth. China   for Bitcoin trading and mining, but the authorities there have  . Many of the largest exchanges, including in South Korea, are essentially unregulated. The lack of oversight means that no one is checking that the exchanges are properly securing their customers’ money or that large players are not able to manipulate the price. One of the largest exchanges in the world, Bitfinex,   about where it is keeping its money. Even regulated exchanges, like Coinbase in the United States, have not been battle tested like larger financial institutions, and their operations have gone down at key moments. Once people buy Bitcoin or other virtual currencies, they are often targeted by hackers who have   Bitcoin “wallets” are vulnerable to new kinds of attacks that are not a problem for ordinary financial accounts. Most important, in contrast to money in a bank account, when a Bitcoin is gone there is essentially no way to get it back and no insurance covering its loss. When Bitcoin was released in 2009, it was described as a new kind of electronic cash. Recently, though, many programmers working on Bitcoin have said the system   They argue that it is best designed to serve as a sort of scarce commodity, like digital gold, allowing people to keep their money outside the control of governments and companies. Many people who want to use virtual currencies for online payments are looking to Bitcoin competitors, like Bitcoin Cash and Monero. Earlier this year, bullish sentiment was focused on Ethereum, a virtual currency network that is  . The price of Ether, the virtual currency on the Ethereum network, has continued to rise in recent months, but not as fast as Bitcoin. Many investors were also   released by entrepreneurs in so-called  . These new virtual currencies have generally been designed to serve as the internal payment mechanisms on new software the entrepreneurs are building. This fall, though,   on coin offerings. The Bitcoin software was released in early 2009 by a   The search is still on for the true identity of Satoshi. The software released by Satoshi set out the basic rules for Bitcoin and the computer network on which it lives. Unlike other forms of money, which are controlled by governments and financial institutions, Bitcoin operates on a decentralized network of computers that no one institution controls. For more details, 
Dabbling in Bitcoin lies somewhere between gambling and investing. After all, true investing requires a rational appraisal of an asset’s value and that is simply not possible at present with  . Real understanding of the economic issues underlying the cryptocurrency is almost nonexistent. It is not just that very few people really comprehend the technology behind Bitcoin. It is that no one can attach objective probabilities to the various possible outcomes of the current Bitcoin enthusiasm. How can we even start estimating the fundamental value of Bitcoin, with its astonishing market value of more than  ? Any attempt will soon sound silly. Let’s try for just a moment. It is possible to imagine a future in which Bitcoin eventually replaces some fraction of money as we know it today. Suppose that happens soon. Note that one  of the United States money supply, M1, is today worth more than $3.6 trillion. But don’t get too excited. Will Bitcoin really replace a large fraction of conventional money? There are reasons to be skeptical. Bitcoin is vastly more volatile than conventional money and relatively few people trust it as a store of value. Even if that hurdle is crossed, how much cryptocurrency will people need? Putting it in economic terms, will the demand for Bitcoin have the same velocity as the demand for money? Will there be the same number of hoarders? And what about all the other cryptocurrencies that exist today, and those that will arise in the future? Bitcoin might well be replaced by something different and better, and end up being worth nothing at all. I won’t go further down this road. Many people are making   to put a fundamental value on Bitcoin — but such efforts will be intrinsically and absurdly inaccurate. The results of a serious attempt to assess the value of Bitcoin can only be ambiguous. Ambiguity in economics is an important and developing subject. Many academic economists still embrace the efficient markets theory: the belief that markets generally respond accurately to genuine new information about fundamentals, and react only to such information. But Bitcoin is an example of ambiguity, and the efficient market theory does not capture what is going on in the market for this cryptocurrency. There has not been enough genuine new information coming in day after day to rationally justify Bitcoin’s huge price swings. Something else is afoot. One narrative that seeks to explain the price increases this year is that they have something to do with the difficulty of betting against — making short sales of — Bitcoin. Absent the opportunity to engage in short sales, “smart money” can   while prices soar. Or so the efficient market theory claims. But pessimistic investors hoping to profit from a Bitcoin price fall actually have had the opportunity to make negative investments for a while. Bitcoin exchanges such as   allow shorting of Bitcoins, and it is possible to short Bitcoin-linked exchange-traded notes on online brokerages like the Bitcoin Investment Trust,  . Both of these options suffer from lack of liquidity and of trust in these new institutions; GBTC has not tracked Bitcoin prices accurately, for example. Still, if enough people had managed to take a short position, that might have helped to limit the increases in Bitcoin prices that we have seen. It is possible that the Bitcoin market will change in a meaningful way now, given the   of Cboe, the Chicago Board Options Exchange, to start a Bitcoin   on Dec. 10 and of the   to do so on Dec. 18. The academic literature tells us that volatility of an underlying asset   after the   for it. But the ability to short an asset more easily won’t necessarily overcome the power of investor excitement. In  , John Maynard Keynes suggested why. He played down the role of quantitative analysis and probability estimates in human thinking of the assessment of ambiguous future events. People in such situations are vulnerable to a play of emotions and at times a “spontaneous urge to action” that he called “animal spirits.” He argued that much of what happens in financial markets has to do with people learning, from price movements, about each other’s animal spirits. I believe that Mr. Keynes was correct about animal spirits in general and how they affect markets like the one for Bitcoin. George Akerlof and I expanded on his perspective in our 2009 book  , which argued that the driving force behind human enterprise cannot be reduced to the rational optimization emphasized by traditional economics. Darwinian evolution produced a human species whose behavior sometimes seems to be emotionally driven. Neuroscientists, psychologists and economists are leading us toward new models of human decision-making. They may help to explain phenomena like the Bitcoin price rise. Scott Huettel, a Duke neurologist, and other researchers  , for example, that when making decisions involving ambiguity, people do not use the parts of the brain required for calculations of probabilities and expected values. And the economists Anat Bracha of the Boston Federal Reserve and Donald Brown of Yale have provided an alternative to conventional economic theory of human behavior under uncertainty. They define a different kind of rationality — one based on Mr. Keynes’ views, not on calculations of utility — in ambiguous situations. Furthermore, a   that was presented at the   annual convention in Toronto in October, showed that psychologically stressful experiences can result in changes in neurological processes when ambiguous situations arise. In short, the Bitcoin market is a marvelous case study in ambiguity and animal spirits. It is providing invaluable information about how millions of human brains process stimuli coming, in this case, from public acceptance, imagination, and innovation surrounding cryptocurrencies. This is fascinating from a psychological and neurological perspective. But it isn’t grounded in solid economics. No wonder the Bitcoin market has been so chaotic.
• How many ways has Wells Fargo been penalized? • Stocks had their worst day since Brexit. • Jon Huntsman Sr. has died. • Wage growth picks up. • What Apple had to say about big-ticket M.&A. The penalties that the Federal Reserve meted out today —   and limiting the bank’s growth — are big. But they’re also just the latest in a series of rebukes amid scandals over the lender’s practices over the years. To recap: • Wells Fargo was hit by   for fraudulently opening customer accounts to churn up fees. • President Trump, who had promised to rein in the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau (one of the regulators that had punished Wells Fargo) said that the agency’s fines against the lender  . • The bank   who were improperly charged fees. • The bank’s C.E.O. at the time, John Stumpf,  . • About   from Mr. Stumpf and the former head of community banking, Carrie Tolstedt. What the Fed said in its statement today: And here’s what Janet Yellen, in one of her final acts as Fed chairwoman,   for Wells Fargo: Shares in Wells Fargo were down nearly 6 percent in after-hours trading. In a lengthy news release, the bank   that it will take to satisfy the regulator’s demands. Among them: • Submitting plans to further improve both corporate governance and compliance operations • Have third parties conduct reviews of those plans and how well they work • Having another third party review risk management practices after the Fed’s limit on asset growth is removed Here’s what Tim Sloan, Wells Fargo’s C.E.O., said: Peter Grauer, the chairman of Bloomberg L.P., disclosed today that he was   of the Blackstone Group. We can think of  . Rising anxiety over inflation and rising rates  , or 2.5 percent, its biggest one-day drop since the United Kingdom voted to leave the European Union. The S&P 500 fell 2.1 percent, and the Nasdaq Composite was down 2 percent. The plunge marked a stark shift in investor sentiment. Stocks have glided higher for two years, lifted by solid economic growth and corporate profits, low interest rates and few signs of inflation. That smooth ride might now be ending. Climbing bond yields have weighed heavily on stocks this week. The yield on the benchmark 10-year Treasury finished at 2.85 percent Friday, up from 2.66 percent a week ago, and at its highest level in four years. The Dow industrials finished the week off 4.1 percent, its biggest drop since January 2016. By historical standards, Friday’s sell-off falls well short of some of history’s biggest. In fact, it doesn’t even crack the top 1,000, according to Howard Silverblatt, senior index analyst at S&P Dow Jones Indices. Here are the top five: 1) -23.52 percent (12/12/1914) 2) -22.61 percent (10/19/1987) 3) -12.82 percent (10/28/1929) 4) -11.73 percent (10/29/1929) 5) -9.92 percent (11/06/1929) Mr. Huntsman   at the age of 80, according to the Salt Lake Tribune. He had been diagnosed with prostate cancer. He built his fortunes — and his family’s power within the state of Utah — thanks to the fortunate marriage of chemicals and fast food. His chemical company won a contract to create a foam clamshell container for McDonald’s Big Mac, a business win that turned Huntsman into an industrial powerhouse. He later turned to philanthropy, and in particular support for cancer research. He also was a founder of Huntsman Gay Global Capital, a private equity firm known today as HGGC. Mr. Huntsman is survived by his children, including Jon Huntsman Jr., the former Utah governor and presidential candidate, and Peter Huntsman, who now runs the Huntsman chemical company. The United States economy  , above the 180,000 Wall Street economists had expected, with strong job growth continuing in January. • The unemployment rate was at 4.1 percent, the same as in December and the lowest since 2000 • Average earnings rose by 9 cents an hour and are up 2.9 percent over the past year. • Revisions in the November and December figures produced a net loss of 24,000 jobs. Economists warned about reading too much into January’s strong wage numbers — several times during the recovery, wage growth has appeared to accelerate, only to fall back to earth. But they said there was little doubt that the latest numbers were an encouraging sign. • “Wage gains for non-supervisory workers is less headline worthy, being 2.4% Y/Y, but the underlying trend is still up. Greater growth in lower wage industries remains the underpinning of the jobs market,” Steven Blitz of TS Lombard writes. • “In a rational world, this would be a major inflection point stimulating profound public debate, Congressional hearings and a Presidential commission to map out possible policy paths in an age of Artificial Intelligence. Instead all we get is an already tired juvenile discussion around who gets political credit for the secular improvement in job creation and the economy,” Joseph Brusuelas of RSM US writes. The computer maker   or a combination with its publicly held subsidiary VMware, Reuters reported. • Dell is under pressure to increase profits after its debt-laden, $67 billion   in 2016. • It faces increased competition in its core hardware businesses and from cloud-based services provided by Amazon, Microsoft and others. • Dell went private five years ago in a $24.9 billion deal with private equity firm Silver Lake Partners. • In 2016, Dell bought EMC for $67 billion. EMC owned 81 percent of VMware, which was publicly traded. The iPhone maker holds $269 billion in cash abroad and has said it will be bringing the vast majority of that back home thanks to the new tax law. On Thursday’s earnings conference call, the company indicated it won’t be just sitting on that pile cash either. Here’s what Luca Maestri, Apple’s chief financial officer, said: When asked about M.&A., Mr. Maestri responded: Interest rate/inflation concerns might be driving the stock market’s decline today, but  . The stock is down 5.8 percent Friday after its earnings fell short of analysts’ expectations. Exxon’s shares have underperformed over the last 12 months even as the price oil has rebounded. The stock is 0.6 percent over the past year, compared with a 222 percent gain in the Standard & Poor’s 500 index. • “The big question still hanging over both Exxon and Chevron is whether the Big Oil model can thrive in shale at scale and actually deliver the return on capital their model demands,” Liam Denning writes. ( ) • “OPEC may be helping Big Oil stay sweet on crude for now. Last quarter’s earnings flubs, though, signal companies may have more mess to come,” Lauren Silva Laughlin writes. ( ) Both boards have   to consider a merger. It’s a big step toward a reunion of the two companies, which split in 2006. • Shari Redstone, who with her father controls the two companies, has pushed since 2016 to bring them back together. • Disney’s deal for the bulk of 21st Century Fox has again left media companies wondering whether bigger might not only be better, but necessary. • The CBS chief, Les Moonves, is more open to a deal than the last time, though still wary. Could another company like Verizon jump in as a spoiler? • Tara Lachapelle writes: “CBS isn’t safe from the industry’s broad ratings pressure and subscriber declines, which is why scale is important. Viacom won’t provide enough of it, but it will offer substantial cost-saving opportunities.” ( ) • The analyst Rich Greenfield writes: “CBS needs far greater scale and a recombination with Viacom is the most logical first step, albeit only a first step with several follow-on strategic moves needed (acquisitions or merger with an even larger entity).” ( ) • BuzzFeed is in talks with the Emerson Collective, Laurene Powell Jobs’s investment vehicle, about an investment in BuzzFeed News, according to unnamed sources. ( ) • The publisher of Newsweek and the International Business Times bought website traffic and engaged in ad fraud, according to a BuzzFeed investigation. The publisher denies fraud. ( ) The big takeaways from the big tech earnings day yesterday: • Apple   in the quarter, but at higher prices, so profit was up 12 percent anyway. And it plans to spend almost all of its fabled cash hoard — perhaps on a combination of buybacks and a big deal. • Amazon more than doubled its profit from a year ago, to $1.9 billion. This was the first time its earnings have surpassed $1 billion in a quarter. • Alphabet reported a $3 billion loss, in part because of the tax law. But its results disappointed because of rising costs: It’s   in smartphone searches. • Alibaba’s profit  , as the Chinese internet giant offered more and better services to vendors. • “Investors are warming to this less highflying but still steady version of Apple,” Shira Ovide writes. ( ) • As Amazon’s third-party marketplace and ad division boom, “Some of the nearly $700 billion internet retailer’s fastest-expanding — and most profitable — businesses could be ones that irritate users,” Robert Cyran writes. ( ) • “It wouldn’t hurt Alphabet to put more energy into revenue sources that don’t start with a G,” Jennifer Saba writes. ( ) • Does Aramco want to be valued as a tech company in its forthcoming I.P.O.? ( ) • Amazon’s patents for worker-prodding wristbands: the beginning of a dystopia? ( ) • HQ Trivia, the game that people cooler than us are playing, is raising $15 million in a new round led by Founders Fund at a valuation of $100 million, according to unnamed sources. ( ) Here are  : • A €2.2 billion net loss for the fourth quarter • A €1.4 billion charge from the U.S. tax overhaul • A €500 million net loss for the year What else has made  : • Higher-than-expected expenses • Double-digit drops in revenue in three divisions • Michael Huenseler of Assenagon, a German asset manager, said, “The results are disappointing again and we don’t see anything encouraging in them, reinforcing our doubts in the bank’s strategy and management.” ( ) • Christopher Thompson writes, “Last month’s profit warning meant investors knew what was coming, but Deutsche still managed to give them an unpleasant surprise.” ( ) The Chinese conglomerate has about $90 billion in debt from splashing out on things like Deutsche Bank and Hilton Hotels. Its borrowing costs are going up, and asset sales are becoming necessary — it’s under the gun to find more money. Which is why it appears to be  , according to Alexandra Stevenson and Cao Li of the NYT: The White House adviser told Republican lawmakers at a retreat this week that infrastructure could be paid for  , according to Axios. But Jonathan Swan of Axios has heard skeptical noises: • President Trump has cleared a path for House Republicans to release a contentious secret memo on the surveillance of a campaign aide, over the F.B.I.’s objections. ( ) • And he’s pressing Democrats to strike a compromise on the young immigrants known as Dreamers. ( ) • Jim Stewart analyzes the president’s economic claims and says it’s too early for him to declare success. ( ) • How business is trying to step into a void left by government. ( ) • The Trump administration’s proposal to let terminally ill patients try experimental medicines without additional liability for drug makers — known as “right to try” — excites libertarians, but has strong critics. ( ) • The Blackstone Group and Apollo Global Management beat earnings expectations, thanks to their seemingly unstoppable fund-raising. ( ) • Steve Schwarzman of Blackstone offered this assessment of Masa Son of SoftBank: “He’s an outlier in terms of his — not to beat the phrase — vision.” ( ) • Speaking of SoftBank, executives from its Vision Fund say they have a time frame of up to 300 years. That’s not a typo. ( ) • Elliott Management is posting printed presentations to fellow shareholders of the chip maker NXP as part of its campaign to push up Qualcomm’s takeover offer. ( ) • AT&T is exploring selling its data centers, according to unnamed sources. ( ) The company’s co-founder and C.E.O., Brian Chesky, couldn’t have put it more plainly in a statement: “Let me address this directly. We are not going public in 2018.” It’s also tricky to I.P.O. without a C.F.O., and Laurence “L.T.” Tosi is   after disagreeing with Mr. Chesky over  . Mr. Tosi, who previously worked at the Blackstone Group, was meant to provide Wall Street experience. Airbnb has hired an executive search firm to find a replacement, and has named Belinda Johnson, its top business operations executive, as chief operating officer. They want to   and show the world what a crypto-utopia looks like. More from Nellie Bowles of the NYT: Regulators had a lot to do with it. India joined in the clampdown on Thursday, with its finance minister, Arun Jaitley, saying his government   as legal tender and would “take all measures to eliminate use of these crypto-assets in financing illegitimate activities or as part of the payment system.” About $8,400, having dropped nearly 14 percent over the past 24 hours, according to  . The organizer of the North American Bitcoin Conference is sorry about  . •   is stepping down as Sony’s C.E.O. after six years, but will become chairman. His old job is going to the C.F.O.,  . ( ) • British officials are secretly considering a customs union deal covering trade in goods with the E.U., according to people familiar with the discussions. ( ) • The University of Pennsylvania revoked Steve Wynn’s honorary degree and stripped his name from a campus plaza and scholarship. It also revoked an honorary degree for Bill Cosby, something it had declined to do in 2015. ( ) • The advertising agency Droga5 fired its chief creative officer, Ted Royer, after telling its staff that it had hired an outside firm to investigate him. ( ) • The chairman of Guess, Paul Marciano, has denied any misconduct after being accused of sexual harassment by Kate Upton. ( ) • Wells Fargo agreed to disclose the gap between what it pays men and women, as well as disparities affecting minority groups. ( ) • The French dairy giant Lactalis has pulled over 7,000 tons of potentially contaminated baby formula and other powdered milk products from shelves across more than 80 countries in one of the biggest recalls of its kind, which has highlighted lax oversight and weak reporting standards. ( ) • India plans to give half a billion poorer citizens free health care. ( ) • Britain has been a pioneer in outsourcing public services to private contractors, but cracks in its system are becoming apparent. ( ) • Why is pay lagging in a tight job market? Possible culprits include lower unionization, constraints on competition and automation. ( ) • Rick Rieder, the manager of BlackRock’s Strategic Income Opportunities bond fund, wants it to be a steady winner that doesn’t take any big bets. ( )

LONDON —  The turbulent start to 2018 in financial markets has finally brought an end to one of the longest ever global bull runs - and there have been few places to hide. After last year's tranquillity, as the charts below show, investors have had it all thrown at them this quarter, from the biggest ever rise in stock volatility to rapidly escalating tensions over global trade, deepening turmoil in the White House and major tech sector wobbles. A "melt-up" that sent the MSCI's world share index up 8 percent in January suddenly evaporated. Now the Dow Jones, S&P 500, FTSE Nikkei and scores of other big markets are all down for the year. (Graphic - Global markets in Q1: https://reut.rs/2pKaneV) As a set, the FAANGs (Facebook, Amazon, Apple, Netflix and Google) are still up 14 percent, but privacy concerns after it was revealed that 50 million Facebook users' data was misused has wiped $400 billion (£284.1 billion) off their value. Not exactly small change. "January was a boom month, but there was clearly complacency coming into the market," said London & Capital's head of equities Roger Jones. "That has all changed now". Cryptocurrency Bitcoin has lost 43 percent as well. (Graphic - The sinking FAANGs: https://reut.rs/2GhhYIe) Still, it hasn't been a one-way "risk-off" doom-fest for markets by any means. Galloping global growth mean commodities like oil are up for a third quarter running, stocks in the world's poorest 'frontier' countries are up 4 percent, and Italian bonds have made almost 6 percent returns despite an inconclusive election. After a stellar 2017, emerging market 'local' currency bonds have done well again too as the Chinese yuan, Mexican and Colombian pesos and South Africa's rand have all rallied hard. So has Britain's Brexit-bound pound. It has had its best quarter since early 2015 and not only against a dollar which is locked in its worst run since the financial crisis, but also versus the euro. "The (political) momentum is to make Brexit work now," said one central banker privately. What the choppy conditions have also reminded people of is the value of a good old-fashioned safe-haven. Japan's yen is up 6.5 percent, gold is up for a third straight quarter, and the ultra-safe German Bund has made just over 3 percent in dollar terms as its yields have gone in an almost-perfect arc. But some of the heavyweight central banks like the U.S. Federal Reserve, ECB, Peoples Bank of China, Bank of England and Bank of Canada are still looking to raise interest rates. Unlike Bunds, U.S. Treasuries have lost 3 percent. It is one of the reasons that stocks have been shaky of course, and it remains one of the main things shaping many investors' view on the rest of the year. "One thing that it is going to be important to get right now is where to be when bond yields are going up," said SEB investment management's global head of asset allocation Hans Peterson. "We are rotating from the old regime of low interest and growth stocks like the FAANGs into a new world... and that creates volatility." (Graphic - Global FX in 2018: https://reut.rs/2pPldj5) (Reporting by Marc Jones; Editing by Hugh Lawson)
This season’s bachelor  , but that hasn’t stopped viewers from  . In this three-hour season finale, the racecar driver turned real estate agent Arie Luyendyk Jr. introduces the final two contestants, Becca Kufrin and Lauren Burnham, to his parents and decides who will become his bride to be. Despite last week’s unexpected appearance by Ms. Kufrin’s ex-boyfriend, the series “is a self-sustaining ecosystem with few surprises,” wrote Carla Correa of The New York Times, who spent a  . Historians recount the remarkable life of the Egyptian queen in this two-part dramatic reconstruction. The first episode covers Cleopatra’s upbringing under the violent and incestuous Ptolemaic dynasty, her ascension to ruler by the age of 21 and her efforts to save the dynasty, and Egypt, by seducing Julius Caesar. This new documentary series revisits acts of racial violence across the United States and Europe and looks at communities’ efforts to tackle the problem. These first two episodes focus on an altercation at a Pennsylvania high school prompted by a racist Snapchat video, and a verbal attack on a Portland, Ore., train that turned deadly. The car guru Aaron Kaufman returns to Discovery with this new series filmed out of his shop in Dallas, where he’ll be customizing Ford F100 trucks with a team of handpicked builders. Binge-watchers can zip through this British drama in no time. Iain Glen (“Game of Thrones”) stars as a celebrity chef in Cornwall who becomes entangled in a love triangle with his ex-wife, Gina (Dawn French), also an accomplished chef, and his second wife, Sam (Emilia Fox). The first season took an unexpected turn in the finale (no spoilers here). The second season picks up with Gina and Sam running the successful Penrose Hotel, where a professional decision on Sam’s part tests their working relationship.  (2017)  The self-described techno-anarchist Cody Wilson made headlines in 2015,   over his downloadable instructions for building a 3-D printable gun. The government threatened him with jail time and million-dollar fines; Mr. Wilson pushed back by claiming his gun design is constitutionally protected free speech. Mr. Wilson then teamed with Amir Taaki, an English programmer, to create a controversial Bitcoin application that encrypts transactions. This documentary by the director Adam Bhala Lough delves into the pair’s work and ideals. “It’s possible to fully, and vehemently, disagree with Mr. Wilson and Mr. Taaki yet still see their points,”  . “That can make ‘The New Radical’ unsettling. It also makes it a film worth watching.”
They have paraded their own flag, formed courts and ministries and issued license plates. Now, the leaders of the Islamic State, the violent jihadist group that has seized parts of   and  , have created their own currency, part of a plan to restore the caliphate era that dominated the Middle East more than 1,300 years ago. In an announcement on Thursday heralding a liberation from the “satanic usury-based global economic system,” the Islamic State said it would begin minting gold, silver and copper coins, in likenesses similar to the days of the seventh-century caliphs. The coins will have standardized weights and values, the announcement said, and they will be the legal tender of the lands controlled by the group, also known as   or ISIL. Important details such as the exact timing of when the coins would begin to circulate, and how they would be minted, were not disclosed, and a question remained: Can the group really create a viable currency? Many money historians and other experts said no, describing the announcement as a propaganda exercise, meant largely to reinforce the Islamic State’s self-anointed legitimacy. They said practical problems could doom the currency, notably its stigma elsewhere, severely limiting its use for money’s basic purposes of buying and selling other goods and services. “What central bank is going to accept an ISIS coin?” said David L. Phillips, a former adviser at the United Nations and the State Department, now at Columbia University’s Institute for the Study of Human Rights. “It’s like blood diamonds,” he said. “No credible financial institution is going to take this.” Some questioned how the Islamic State, even with its profits from oil smuggling, hostage ransoming and stealing, could accrue enough gold and silver to produce coins for mass circulation. Others said the minting of such coins, in what is essentially a war zone, could also be problematic. Even more puzzling, some said, is the Islamic State’s assertion that the coins would be unaffected by movements in the dollar and other prevailing world currencies. The value of gold often moves in the opposite direction of the dollar, which lately has been rising. “Of course this is nonsensical,” said Steve H. Hanke, a currency expert at Johns Hopkins University. The purchasing power of gold, he said, “is determined in the world market, and has nothing to do with ISIL.” Some economists said there could be something to the Islamic State’s aspiration to use gold for money, seeing it as a potential new venue for smuggling and thievery. They noted that since charging interest is forbidden under strict interpretations of Islamic law, gold as a non-interest-bearing investment could be an ideal way for more strict Muslims to transact business and amass wealth. Even with its ups and downs, gold has long been treasured for its retention of value and its universal recognition as a so-called safe haven alternative to paper money, especially in times of uncertainty. The world’s major central banks all maintain large stockpiles of bullion. In the history of money, coins of gold and other precious metals, which first circulated around 500 B.C., predate the introduction of paper currency by roughly 1,300 years. “There’s not a place in the world that won’t take gold,” said James G. Rickards, a lawyer, economist, financial commentator and author of “The Death of Money: The Coming Collapse of the International Monetary System,” an explanatory book about the stresses accumulating in the system, especially since the 2008 financial crisis. Mr. Rickards said groups like the Islamic State, excluded from conventional banking methods, are known to use bitcoin and other crypto-currencies to transfer wealth across borders. Their other way, he said, is gold. “We’ve always talked about gold as part of the threat matrix,” he said. “It’s not surprising to see this.” Mr. Hanke said the more important element of the Islamic State’s currency was its symbolism. “They’re producing money,” he said. “Money is produced by states. So this gives this outfit the patina of being a state.”
Not far into “Ornette: Made in America,” Shirley Clarke’s kaleidoscopic film portrait of the saxophonist and composer Ornette Coleman, is a scene in which Mr. Coleman sits on the porch of his childhood home in Fort Worth. He’s talking with his son, Denardo, about the imperative of original artistic expression and how it survives both the barbs of ungenerous critics and the bile of envious peers. As he speaks, a clangor arises in the background. It’s the sound of a railroad crossing bell as a freight train goes by, just beyond the ramshackle frame of the house. Mr. Coleman, still holding forth in his soft, lisping voice, doesn’t appear to notice the racket until Denardo points it out. “Oh, yeah,” he says, smiling distractedly. “That train used to wake me up every morning. Yeah, I was living really close to the track there.” It’s a fleeting moment that the documentary holds up as a glowing ember of insight. The din of that mechanical bell: doesn’t it call to mind the urgent commotion in so much of Mr. Coleman’s music? Of course it does, especially in light of an abrupt cut to Prime Time, his crypto-funk band, in feverish midgroove. You’re invited to draw this connection yourself, fancying a peek into the artist’s psyche, though Mr. Coleman remains as much an enigma, and his music as radiantly confounding, as before. “Ornette: Made in America,” which was released theatrically in 1985 and opens again, in a print restored by  , at the IFC Center in Manhattan on Friday, is full of such tantalizing stuff: formal juxtapositions, half-sketched implications, parallel experiments of image and sound. By virtue of the footage alone, it’s a valuable time capsule for anyone drawn to Mr. Coleman’s work, particularly in the two decades following the cusp of the 1960s, when his dauntless, affirming vision of free improvisation famously created a crisis of faith in jazz. What nudges the film beyond archival value is a cadence and visual style proudly in tune with the music. The impetus behind “Ornette: Made in America” was the 1983 opening of Caravan of Dreams, an arts center in Fort Worth. Kathelin Hoffman, the center’s director at the time, had invited Mr. Coleman to take part in the festivities, and he responded with a trilogy: his large-canvas work “Skies of America,” performed by the Fort Worth Symphony Orchestra with bracing interjections by Prime Time; a superheated Prime Time  ; and a calmly prickly string quartet, “Prime Design/Time Design,” played in a geodesic dome. Ms. Clarke, brought on to document this sprawl, had already tried in the late 1960s to make a film about Mr. Coleman’s relationship with Denardo, who is a drummer. Her new mission, with scenes shot in multiple locales and time periods on grainy video and Super 16, was to create a Colemanesque kinetic collage. She makes liberal use of the music, often jumping from one recording to another and back. The editing functions as a form of music criticism. One awkwardly staged re-enactment featuring the young Ornette — there are too many of these — is partly redeemed by its score, a movement of the symphony called “Holiday for Heroes,” with a taunting melody that sounds, in this context, like a liberation anthem. The film has its garish touches, including early-video-game graphics and a corny outer-space sequence. But it also has the right sort of panache, both searching and somewhat guileless. Mercifully, no attempt is made to explain Mr. Coleman’s harmolodic theory, or to rehash his chronology. Ms. Clarke does enlist a few talking heads, but her heart obviously isn’t in it: the interviews are framed within cartoon television sets, as if to trivialize the whole exegetic process. This suits the greater scheme of the film, which values the inconclusive hint over the authoritative judgment, and a spirit of enterprise above all. If that’s maddening for a viewer, it can also be empowering — and, for devotees of Mr. Coleman, warmly familiar.
 over the past month that nearly evened the financial playing field with Mrs. Clinton. His war chest now boasts $74 million in cash. Still, the Republicans’ disarray was on display as   a day after Mr. Trump declined to. _____  often stir strong emotions, but one aspect sets them apart from other political gatherings: the frequency with which his supporters use coarse and violent language. The video sampling above captures a range of  . _____  that infiltrated computer systems on the Democratic side have made  Intelligence agencies have told the White House they have a high degree of confidence that Russia was behind the breaches. Above, Hillary Clinton campaigned in Colorado. _____  in Germany, a former ISIS member gave our reporter a detailed account of his rapid disillusionment with the group in Syria and his escape from its clutches. (Watch the video, above.) His experience, including being urged by masked men to return to Germany to spearhead attacks there, adds insight into  . For Americans, he said, the unit prefers to recruit over the internet: “They say we can radicalize them easily, and if they have no prior record, they can buy guns.” _____ , a major victory for Prime Minister Narendra Modi that economists say should significantly boost the country’s growth rate. “This is hugely consequential for the ease of doing business,” an analyst said, “and for demonstrating to the outside world that India is dragging its economy into the 21st century.” _____  of two insular farming communities in the U.S. — the Amish of Indiana and the Hutterites of North Dakota — strongly suggests exposure to  . The results were so compelling that a discussion is already underway on developing a microbial spray that could prompt many more children to develop immune systems that can sidestep asthma. _____  74, may be reclusive, but she’s not idle. The megastar is about to issue a star-studded new album (“Encore: Movie Partners Sing Broadway”), embarking on a nine-city concert tour (“The Music … the Mem’ries … the Magic!”) and writing a memoir. Her perfectionist tendencies were in evidence on matters great and small during an interview at her Malibu estate. She said she was dismayed when she heard a fellow singer in conversation with an interviewer, and “They both called me Barbra Strize-and,” not Stry-sand. _____ called  . Doing so would earn it $20 million Google Lunar X Prize, as the first such private effort. But the Moon Express chairman said the stakes were much higher. “Everything we fight over — whether it’s land or it’s fresh water, whether it is energy — is in abundance in space,” he said. _____  of   plunged after one of the world’s largest Bitcoin exchanges said it had been hacked. An official with the exchange, Bitfinex in Hong Kong, said that 119,756 Bitcoins — worth tens of millions of dollars — had been stolen. _____  is welcoming a flood of athletes and spectators to the Rio Games amid a mosquito-borne epidemic of the Zika virus. This is  . But it’s not the best money can buy — because it’s not on the shelves. A military lab makes it for the exclusive use of the Brazilian Army. There is no “plan for external commercialization,” a military statement said. _____   . Thousands of Starbucks outlets played his albums, stars like Willie Nelson and Oprah Winfrey saluted him, and Lady Gaga ceremonially lights the Empire State Building in his honor at 8:30 p.m. Eastern. “It feels great to be 90!”  . “Thanks for all the birthday wishes. I’m just getting started.” _____
SAN FRANCISCO — Hackers are discovering that it is far more profitable to hold your data hostage than it is to steal it. A decade-old internet scourge called ransomware   when cybercriminals seized control of computers around the world, from the delivery giant FedEx in the United States to  , universities in China and even Russia’s powerful Interior Ministry. On Saturday, investigators could not yet tell who was behind the attack as   raced to contain it. Across Asia, several universities and organizations said they had been affected. Renault, the European automaker, said on Saturday that its French operations had been hit, while one of its plants in Slovakia was shut down because of the digital outbreak. Computer users in the United States so far were less affected after a 22-year-old   inadvertently stopped the ransomware attack from spreading more widely. Ransomware is nothing new. For years, there have been stories of individuals or companies horrified that they have been locked out of their computers and that the only way back in is to pay a ransom to someone, somewhere who has managed to take control. But computer criminals are discovering that ransomware is the most effective way to make money in the shortest amount of time. The advent of new tools that wrap victims’ data with tough encryption technology, hard-to-trace digital currency like Bitcoin, and even online sites that offer to do the data ransoming in return for a piece of the action, have made this method of cybertheft much easier. “You don’t even need to have any skills to do this anymore,” said Jason Rebholz, a senior director at the Crypsis Group who has helped dozens of victims of ransomware. Ransomware has allowed people who are not computer experts to become computer thieves. It used to be that hackers had to be a little creative and skilled to get money out of people. There were fake antivirus scams that promised to clean up your computer — for a fee. Sometimes they resorted to so-called Trojan horse programs that lay in wait on e-commerce or banking sites, ready to get your credit card numbers. And there was old-fashioned hacking, grabbing all sorts of personal credentials that could be sold on the so-called dark web. Four years ago, investigators were pursuing roughly 16 variants of ransomware that were predominantly being used on victims in Eastern Europe. Now there are dozens of types of ransomware, and they are supported by an entire underground industry. And catching and convicting the people responsible is difficult. Friday’s attacks were a powerful escalation of earlier, much smaller episodes. Hackers exploited a vulnerability in Microsoft servers that was first discovered by the National Security Agency and then   last month. It allowed the ransomware to spread from server to server, encrypting as many files as it could, and holding more than 70,000 organizations victim in the process. As of Saturday afternoon, several Bitcoin accounts associated with the ransomware had received the equivalent of $33,000, according to Elliptic, a firm that tracks online financial transactions involving virtual currencies. And the number could grow. The attack should not have been a shock. As data has become our lifeline, cybercriminals have elevated their game and their demands. Just five years ago, attackers in Eastern Europe were locking up victims’ computers and demanding ransoms of $100 to $400 to unlock them. Back then, the idea of paying a criminal on the internet was still foreign, and most important, technicians and security experts could find ways to unlock computers without caving on the ransom. In 2012, security experts estimated that  . These days, it’s a 50-50 split between those who pay the ransom and those who refuse, either because they have adequate backups, are philosophically opposed or simply cannot afford to pay. Ransoms now range from as little as one Bitcoin, which equates to roughly $1,700, to as many as 30 Bitcoin, nearly $51,000, with the median ransom equating to four Bitcoin, or nearly $7,000, according to researchers at the Crypsis Group. Bitcoin has given cybercriminals an easy and anonymous way to get their profits, and it is much harder to track than credit cards or wire transfers. There is even now a concept of “ransomware as a service” — a play on the Silicon Valley jargon “software as a service,” which describes the delivery of software over the internet. Now anyone can visit a web page, generate a ransomware file with the click of a mouse, encrypt someone’s systems and demand a ransom to restore access to the files. If the victim pays, the ransomware provider takes a cut of the payment. Ransomware criminals also have customer service lines that victims can call to get help paying a ransom. There are even live chat options. And while some amateur ransomware attackers may not restore victims’ data once the ransom is paid, the more professional outfits worry that if they do not decrypt a victim’s data, their reputation and “business” may suffer as a result, Mr. Rebholz said. The most notorious of these attackers, a group called SamSam after its type of ransomware, is known for demanding the highest ransoms, 25 to 30 Bitcoin. But they reliably decrypt a victim’s data after being paid. Most small- to medium-size businesses pay the ransoms because they do not have backups of their data and feel they have no other option, Mr. Rebholz said. “That data is the bloodline of their business in many cases,” he said. “They can either go out of business or pay the ransom.” Cybercriminals have also found a soft target in universities, which usually have more open systems that allow for the free flow of information. More recently, they have found a niche in health care, where ransomware attacks take on a new level of urgency as doctors and emergency rooms in Britain discovered on Friday when hackers blocked their access to patient records, and patients had to be turned away. Imperial College Healthcare in London, for example, was hit with ransomware 19 times over 12 months, according to freedom-of-information requests submitted by SentinelOne, a security firm. In the United States, the number of reported ransomware attacks rose fourfold between 2015 and 2016, as did the ransom payments to hackers, to $1 billion, according to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Last year hospitals in California, Indiana, Kentucky, Maryland and Texas were hit with ransomware. And in February, a   to regain access to its computers. On Wednesday, Dr. Krishna Chinthapalli   warning that such an attack was imminent. Dr. Chinthapalli cited a report that one out of every three British National Health Service trusts, the health care providers that serve specific geographic regions or offer specialized mental health or ambulance services, were hit by ransomware last year. “In the past three months, health care providers have been preparing themselves for these attacks, either with Bitcoin at the ready or with professional incident responders,” said Chris Camacho, the chief strategy officer at Flashpoint, a New York company that tracked Friday’s attacks. Nearly half of ransomware attacks begin by persuading an employee to click on an email. Sometimes the methods used by cybercriminals are more complex. A “watering hole attack,” for example, infects a website with ransomware code. When users visit the site, that code is downloaded onto their machine. The other half, Mr. Rebholz and others said, target victims with “brute force” methods: Hackers scan an organization for software vulnerabilities, weak passwords or other unlocked digital doors. After that, ransomware attackers try to encrypt as many files as possible. The SamSam group is known to move from file to file, manually encrypting hundreds of systems, so it can demand the highest in Bitcoin ransoms, according to the Crypsis Group, Symantec and others. It seems no one is immune. In January, a hacker held hostage a small cancer charity in Indiana, wiping the organization’s main and backup servers and demanding 50 Bitcoin — more than $87,000 — in return for restoring their data. They did not pay. And ransomware attackers are not above playing martyr. In one recent attack that Mr. Rebholz tracked, the attackers tried to convince their victim that paying a “contribution” — or ransom — would benefit sick children around the world. “That’s where we are,” Mr. Rebholz said. “Threat actors are now trying to play people’s emotions, trying to put a pretty face on criminal activity by pretending to be a charity case.”
• Tesla’s much-awaited fourth quarter results. • Athenahealth names Jeff Immelt as chairman. • Senate leaders reach a deal to raise spending. • Shares of Snap jumped 40 percent after it reported results. • Trump: Investors are making a mistake. • What’s next for the Wynn empire now its founder has gone? •   for the C.E.O.s of Merck, Stitch Fix and Salesforce for Corner Office. Tesla reported a loss of $3.04 per share, narrower than the $3.20 per share that analysts surveyed by Bloomberg were forecasting. Tesla took in $3.29 billion of revenue in the fourth quarter, more or less in line with the $3.28 billion that analysts were expecting. Tesla’s gross margin in its automotive business, which reveals the profitability of actually producing its cars, came in at 13.8 percent, below the “about 15 percent” that Tesla itself forecast when it reported third-quarter results. The Model 3, Tesla’s first mass-market car. Many of the costs associated with the Model 3 are being booked in the income statement but difficulties in producing the car mean sales are low. As a result, the gross margin on the Model 3 was negative and is expected to remain so in the first quarter of 2018, Tesla said. The company did not specify how negative the gross margin on the Model 3 was. . The company said it was on track to produce 5,000 Model 3s by the middle of 2018. The company had pushed back when it would hit this 5,000 vehicle target last month. But Tesla did not sound overly confident about achieving its Model 3 milestones. The company said: In the fourth quarter, Tesla brought in $510 million of operating cash flow, a big turnaround from an outflow of $301 million in the prior three months. How did Tesla pull this off? The company said the increase was achieved in part by doing a better job collecting the money it is owed and by reducing its inventory of finished vehicles. But the company’s balance sheet showed a nearly $500 million increase in short-term liabilities in the fourth quarter. In other words, the amounts Tesla owes its customers and suppliers went up. It may be tough to keep generating cash flow in this fashion.  Elon Musk said on the call that “2018 is likely to be a very big year for Tesla” and that he is optimistic Tesla will be GAAP profitable. “It’s not certain, but I’m cautiously optimistic,” Mr. Musk said. Since   last year, Jeff Immelt has certainly been keeping busy. He interviewed for the Uber C.E.O. position and   as a partner. Now he is adding “chairman of a fast-growing health company” to his titles. Athenahealth, a provider of electronic medical records software, announced Wednesday that it has hired Mr. Immelt as its chairman, capping a monthslong search for the position. The move adds a veteran corporate chieftain to oversee the fast-growing company, particularly as it seeks to prove that it’s capable of maturing.  last year from Elliott Management, which disclosed a 9.2 percent stake in the company last spring and pressed for operational changes. Jonathan Bush, the company’s founder and C.E.O. (and a cousin of George W. Bush) credited the activist investor with helping him realize that a shake-up was necessary. The company   in its fourth quarter. For Mr. Immelt, joining Athenahealth is in keeping with his interest in the health care business, a focus of his at G.E. • “I literally feel like I just scored a decade’s worth of guitar lessons from Elvis,” Mr. Bush said in a telephone interview. • “I’m convinced that this platform at Athenahealth can be one of the transformational platforms for health care,” Mr. Immelt said, adding, “I’m a junkie for the industry.” Can a founder who has run the company since its beginning take direction from an outsider? Mr. Bush said that with Mr. Immelt, the answer is yes. “I feel like I’m doing less marriage counseling with 12 adults,” Mr. Bush said of his board, adding that Mr. Immelt would be a partner to take advice from (and occasionally whine to). “What Jeff brings is an understanding of scale on a couple of dimensions, not only in terms of people and processes but also how you think about scaling with your partners.”  that Senators Mitch McConnell of Kentucky, the majority leader, and Chuck Schumer of New York, his Democratic counterpart, have struck a far-reaching agreement that would add hundreds of billions of dollars to military and domestic programs over the next two years. • raise the spending caps by about $300 billion over two years, according to a congressional aide. • increase the limit on military spending by $80 billion in the current fiscal year and $85 billion in the next year, which begins Oct. 1, the aide said. • increase the limit on nondefense spending by $63 billion this year and $68 billion next year. • Hard-line conservatives were unsparing in their assessment of the deal. • Representative Nancy Pelosi, the leader of House Democrats, said she could not agree to any budget deal that was not accompanied by a debate over legislation to protect the fate of young immigrants brought to the country illegally as children, known as Dreamers. Shares of the messaging and media company   to $19.49 in recent trading. That’s their highest level since June and well above its initial public offering price of $17 a share. The jump comes after the company reported results after the close on Tuesday. The results have helped quell some of the concerns about the company’s slowing revenue and user growth in the face of increased competition from the likes of Facebook.  “We think shares could continue to grind higher as the narrative changes from 2017’s ‘FB is going to crush SNAP’ to 2018’s “users and revenue accelerate and the platform is under-monetized”. Shares are expensive (8.3x our FY19 revenue estimate), but everything is accelerating, and as we’ve seen repeatedly in consumer internet, these inflection points are not likely one-quarter events.” “This eye popping top-line beat was a ‘shocker’ and was a stark contrast to the overwhelming bear sentiment heading into the 4Q print and speaks to a company with strong growth prospects, albeit clear business challenges ahead to iron out in 2018. After much pain that investors have endured since SNAP went public, this quarter was finally a breath of fresh air that gives new life to the SNAP turnaround story in 2018.” President Trump,  , complained on Twitter Wednesday that “good (great) news” in the economy led to an abrupt decline in stock prices, his first comments about the stock market since its sharp drop earlier this week. In the early-morning tweet, Mr. Trump lamented that in the “old days,” stocks would rise on good economic news, saying “Today, when good news is reported, the Stock Market goes down. Big mistake.” The tweet did not elaborate on what he meant by the “old days” or explain further his analysis of why stocks plummeted on Friday and Monday. Until Wednesday’s tweet, the president had been unusually silent about the stock market,  , including a decline in the Dow Jones industrial average of almost 7 percent over two days. At one point on Monday, the Dow was down almost 1,600 points, or about 6 percent of its total value, the markets plunging at the same moment as Mr. Trump was giving a speech in Blue Ash, Ohio. It closed that day down 1,175 points. Mr. Trump’s assertion that the fall was pegged to good economic news stems from Friday’s job report, which showed wages beginning to rise as the economy nears full employment. , as strengthening economies lead to higher wages and tighter unemployment — and potentially to central bankers raising interest rates. President Trump’s tax cut was meant to supercharge growth in  . (Though Eduardo Porter notes that   and new business formation has slowed.) Economists and analysts are increasingly worried that the tax overhaul will do  .  as the C.E.O. of Wynn Resorts after allegations of sexual misconduct. Those accusations have created an important test for corporate America. In recent months, many powerful men have had to step down from senior positions as they have faced accusations of sexual harassment, but none were the head of a public company like Mr. Wynn. How would the board, shareholders, regulators, customers and unions react? We now know something about the shareholder perspective: Shares in Wynn Resorts were up 7 percent in early-morning trading today. Regulators in Nevada, Massachusetts and Macau are still conducting their own investigations. But the biggest unresolved question remains the board and its conduct. The board set up a committee of independent directors to carry out an investigation after the WSJ article, but it was not clear how rigorous it would be. The board did not have a track record for holding Mr. Wynn accountable. In an email exchange with me, Lucian Bebchuk, a Harvard law professor and an expert in corporate governance, asked why the board did not suspend Mr. Wynn from his position pending the investigation, or demand that he not interact with Wynn Resorts employees, a step that would have limited his ability to influence the board investigation. In fact, the board, in its statement,   by Mr. Wynn’s departure, saying it had “reluctantly” accepted his resignation. One remaining way to assess the board’s resolve will be Mr. Wynn’s separation agreement, which is not yet finalized. When the WSJ article was published, Mr. Wynn denied the accusations of sexual misconduct, calling them “preposterous.” On Tuesday he said, “I have found myself the focus of an avalanche of negative publicity.” It is not clear why Mr. Wynn decided to step down. It may have been pressure from gaming regulators. Customers might have been pulling back. Mr. Wynn may have wanted to preserve the value of his own stake in Wynn Resorts. But as it stands, it does not look like the board was a strong force. Steve Wynn has stepped down from his $17 billion casino empire, a little over a week after allegations of forced sex and other sexual misconduct claims emerged in a WSJ investigation. There had been little sense at Wynn Resorts over the last week that the man who made modern Las Vegas  : He also attended the company’s 1,500-guest Super Bowl party on Sunday, the WSJ says. In a statement, Mr. Wynn blamed his exit on “a rush to judgment” that took “precedence over everything, including the facts.”  reads almost like a corporate eulogy, calling Mr. Wynn a “beloved leader and visionary.” So why the sudden exit? (Our colleague Peter Eavis will weigh in on DealBook this morning.) • Do other S. & P. 500 C.E.O.s now have something to fear? • And is the Wynn empire — from Las Vegas to Macau to, soon, Massachusetts — now ripe for a takeover or breakup? • “While there are plenty of jobs for women as waitresses and croupiers, far too few rise to the levels at which they have the power to make a change,” David Fickling writes. ( ) • “It’s easy for a company in turmoil, especially one so closely associated with a celebrity founder that has effectively been forced out, to become prey,” Jeff Goldfarb writes. ( ) The billionaire Los Angeles doctor joins Jeff Bezos, Sheldon Adelson and Warren Buffett after   and the San Diego Union-Tribune from Tronc for nearly $500 million. The   the assumption of $90 million in pension liabilities. LAT staff have chafed at the decisions of Tronc and its chairman, Michael Ferro. More from Sydney Ember of the NYT: Separately, Tronc  . The company said Ross Levinsohn, the publisher of the Los Angeles Times who was put on leave after National Public Radio published a report that detailed allegations of sexual harassment against him when he was at other companies, will be reinstated and named the chief executive of Tribune Interactive. • SoftBank said it had   from its roughly $106 billion Vision Fund and Delta Fund, and that it  . • Google is expanding its New York headquarters, agreeing to buy the building across the street — which is home to Chelsea Market — for more than $2 billion. ( ) • An activist investor, Blackwells Capital, urged the supermarket chain Supervalu to break itself up, and plans a proxy fight. ( ) As the stocks calmly glided higher in 2017, investors from hedge fund titans to day traders poured billions in to bets that volatility would continue to fall. Those wagers blew up this week. Now investors are selling the exchange company behind the trading in volatility. Shares of the C.B.O.E. Global Markets, whose volatility index facilitated those wagers, are down 17 percent since the start of the sell-off. Thursday they are off 3 percent. The reason? Concern that demand for VIX futures could drop after a   that use them to bet on falling volatility in the stock market,  . : “Given VIX has been a key growth driver of CBOE, we also see the potential for a deterioration in CBOE valuation.”   : “While we remain optimistic around the firm’s longer-term growth prospects... we expect the unwind in VIX exchange-traded products (including any potential further unwind of these products) to weigh on Cboe’s VIX futures franchise, creating headwinds to the firm’s top-line growth and potentially the stock’s valuation.” • Analysts took a closer look at the   — bets on a continued fall in the popular Wall Street volatility index that went very sour on Monday and  . • Steven Mnuchin suggested yesterday that algorithms might be behind the whipsawing: “I have heard from others that it has played a role, as there’s more programmed trading, this tends to have volatility in both directions.” • Carl Icahn said exotic investment funds and lots of leverage had made the markets a “ .” A Turkish franchisee of Burger King restaurants   yesterday, while deal makers worry that a steady stream of big mergers  . • Mr. Trump   if Congress did not address illegal immigration, even as lawmakers work on a two-year budget deal. John Kelly, his chief of staff,   who did not register for protected status. • The White House says it will explain the “principles” of its infrastructure plan on Monday. ( ) • The U.S. had a record trade deficit with China last year, potentially encouraging a tougher line from the Trump administration. ( ) • Mr. Trump wants the Pentagon to hold a big — and rare — military parade in Washington this year. ( ) On one side: Brian Chesky, the home rental giant’s co-founder and C.E.O., who wants it kept private a while yet. On the other,  , according to Bloomberg’s unnamed sources: the C.F.O. Laurence “L.T.” Tosi and the Airbnb investors General Atlantic, Glade Brook Capital, TCV and TPG. More from Olivia Zaleski: Ultimately, Mr. Tosi — who didn’t see eye to eye with Mr. Chesky on other issues and generally did not fit in at Airbnb — resigned. An Airbnb spokesman denied there was ever any intent to pursue an I.P.O. this year.  Mr. Tosi set up a hedge fund of sorts at Airbnb, which was responsible for 30 percent of Airbnb’s cash flow last year and made about $60 million. • Goldman Sachs’s retail arm is in talks to offer financing for Apple customers, unnamed sources say. ( ) • Snap bolstered revenue and user growth in the fourth quarter, and investors rejoiced. ( ) • At the Uber-Waymo trial, Travis Kalanick kept calm and talked about his “jam sesh” with the autonomous-driving engineer at the center of the dispute. ( ) •   for how it handled a 2016 data breach. Meanwhile, the company is hoping to  , through a deal with Bell Helicopter, and is giving its U.S. riders  . • A pollster hired by Facebook to track public sentiment about Mark Zuckerberg said he left after coming to believe the company wasn’t good for society. ( ) • European regulators are   Apple’s bid for the music app Shazam. And Apple might   to users who bought iPhone battery replacements before it discounted them. The S.E.C. and the Commodity Futures Trading Commission told senators that Congress should consider   of cryptocurrency trading. And Agustin Carstens, the head of the Bank for International Settlements, said central banks  , calling digital currencies a “combination of a bubble, a Ponzi scheme and an environmental disaster.” Mr. Carstens also argued that cryptocurrencies were freeloading on existing financial infrastructure and the legitimacy that came from being linked to it.  while Bitcoin is at about $8,000 this morning, things could get far worse,  : • Slack named a longtime executive,  , as its C.F.O., another step on the road to a listing. ( ) • AIG has hired  , a partner at Gibson, Dunn & Crutcher and a former general counsel of the C.I.A., as deputy general counsel. ( ) • A livery driver who had written about being a casualty of the gig economy killed himself outside City Hall in Lower Manhattan on Monday. ( ) • Business Wire, the corporate news-release distributor owned by Berkshire Hathaway, is dealing with a cyberattack. It has caused outages for nearly a week. ( ) • Morgan Stanley gave the cold shoulder to Derek Jeter, co-owner of the Miami Marlins, and his banker, Greg Fleming, when asked if large brokerage clients would like to buy a piece of the team, unnamed sources said. ( ) • FEMA awarded an Atlanta entrepreneur, Tiffany Brown, $156 million to supply 30 million meals to Puerto Ricans after Hurricane Maria. Only 50,000 have been delivered. ( ) • The German carmaker Daimler publicly apologized on Tuesday after its Mercedes-Benz brand caused an outcry in China by quoting the Dalai Lama in a social media post. ( ) • Can Christian Louboutin trademark red soles? The European Union’s highest court says no. ( ) • PepsiCo will not be making Lady Doritos. ( ) • One of the issues that contributed to Laurent Potdevin’s departure as C.E.O. of Lululemon, unnamed sources say, was a multiyear relationship with a female designer. ( ) • Quentin Tarantino, accused by Uma Thurman of putting her life at risk by making her perform a dangerous stunt for the “Kill Bill” films, described it as one of the biggest regrets of his life. He disputed some details of her account. ( ) • The supermarket Tesco is facing Britain’s largest ever collective equal pay claim, for a potential total of about $5.6 billion. ( )

  in Palestinian territories ebbed, but   — the world’s most populous Muslim country — railed against President Trump’s recognition of Jerusalem as Israel’s capital. More protests are expected today. Jihadists from Mali to Afghanistan  , but the Islamic State took aim at its rivals and Arab leaders.  described a city braced for more turmoil. “You feel like you’re living in jail here,” one resident told him. “The people are so tense.” _____  in office, Donald Trump is redefining the American presidency. In interviews with 60 advisers, associates, friends and members of Congress,   less as a titan dominating the world stage than a maligned outsider engaged in a struggle to be taken seriously.” Separately, his U.N. ambassador, Nikki Haley, said that   a break from the administration’s assertions that the allegations have no merit and should be dismissed. And a special election in Alabama on Tuesday has  . _____ is   The epic smog is also pulling down the economy and, according to a new Unicef report, might be permanently damaging children’s brains. Environmentalists say that Mr. Modi has failed to adequately respond, and that his business-friendly policies have made things worse. “Green concerns are not reflected in India’s growth story,” one conservationist said. “In some cities, we draw in poison with every breath.” _____  activist groups are springing up to  . The first step, they say, is exposing the routine instances of groping and catcalling that have long gone unreported. And after watching the “Me, Too” campaign, some  . But the dangers they face when they do are serious. _____  after a week of wildfires raced through Southern California. Extreme fire activity, he said, is likely to occur on a regular basis for decades. The state’s major fires this year — from wine country to just shy of the Mexican border —  . _____ Amid the world’s turmoil is plenty of joy. Here are   recently (including research that shows men should hug more) that prove it isn’t all bad out there. a  , lets customers call a car or motorbike for a ride — or for takeout, a shopping trip or delivering a present. Uber, U.S. investors and Chinese internet titans are taking notice.  in Argentina this week under the shadow of American disdain. The E.U. and Japan expect rapid ratification of their   that covers more than a quarter of the world’s economy. And   from London.    on CBOE Global Markets, an exchange based in Chicago. will become  , a transition expected by the end of March.  or Korean skin care, has fascinated the world in a way one  . (You’ve been had, she says.)  of  .  in Norway honored the International Campaign to Abolish Nuclear Weapons. The group’s leader, Beatrice Fihn, above right, warned that “our mutual destruction is only one impulsive tantrum away.” [ ] announced plans to acquire medium-range cruise missiles capable of striking North Korea, and Japan’s defense force is beginning   with the U.S. and South Korea. [ ] has spent a decade challenging South Korea’s policy of denying citizenship to North Koreans who gained Chinese citizenship to escape their homeland. [ ]  have flown dangerously close to U.S. warplanes in Syria over the past month in what American officials say are daily Russian violations of an air safety agreement. [ ] declared victory over the Islamic State, announcing the end of more than three years of battles to regain control of nearly one-third of the country. [ ] disputed that its crown prince bought a painting of Christ by Leonardo da Vinci for more than $450 million last month. American officials and Arabs familiar with the details say otherwise. [ ] fear a new fixing epidemic after three international captains reported being approached by match-fixers. [ ] Malcolm Turnbull, is searching for the creator of a bicycle covered in rainbow-colored crochet that was left at his home. [ ] you went on this morning? Great! But you still need to  . Start the week right with a batch of  . something with no sound? Our senses don’t operate the way we assume, neuroscientists say, as highlighted by the  , above.    have allowed   in the country’s south — enjoying a sunny life in ways previous generations never imagined. our   of the daily commute. (Shoelaces and an onion have starring roles.) “Greed is good.” Today is the 30th anniversary of the release of the movie “Wall Street.” Michael Douglas won an Oscar for his role as Gordon Gekko, the ruthless corporate raider who takes a young stockbroker named Bud Fox, played by Charlie Sheen, under his wing. The movie was meant as a harsh critique of the excesses of 1980s capitalism — but became wildly popular with actual Wall Street types. (When it came out,   that its moralizing was its weak point: “The movie crashes in a heap of platitudes,” Vincent Canby wrote.) The director, Oliver Stone, said that in a twist, many young people told him it inspired them to go work on Wall Street. Even years later, brokers would tell him, “You’re the man!” Mr. Stone discussed the film’s legacy  . He said it was “misunderstood by some, because it was about a horrible thing that was going on, about how people would worship money at all costs.” That interview took place as he was preparing to film the sequel, “Wall Street: Money Never Sleeps,” released in 2010.   “a corrective, a parody and a sly act of auto-homage.”
The quants and their algorithms may have taken over Wall Street. But one investment legend is making a big bet on a more old-fashioned mode of analysis: philosophy. Bill Miller, the value investor who famously beat the Standard & Poor’s 500-stock index for 15 consecutive years (and whose faith in bank stocks later won a mocking depiction in the movie  ), has donated $75 million to the philosophy department of Johns Hopkins University. The gift, formally announced on Tuesday, appears to be the largest by far to a philosophy department anywhere in the world, the university said. It will allow the department, which will be renamed for Mr. Miller, to nearly double in size, to 22 full-time faculty members, while also supporting graduate students, postdoctoral fellows and new courses aimed at attracting undergraduates. While a number of billionaires and business titans have created splashy million-dollar    , Mr. Miller — a former Ph.D. student in philosophy at Johns Hopkins — said he was pleased to be making an investment in the infrastructure of the profession. “I wanted the gift to go to something where it would have a significant impact, and change the trajectory,” Mr. Miller, whose firm, Miller Value Partners, is based in Baltimore, said in a telephone interview. Philosophy, he added, “has made a huge difference both to my life outside business, in terms of adding a great degree of richness and knowledge, and to the actual decisions I’ve made in investing.” Mr. Miller gift may seem modest compared with the $1.5 billion that  , including a $300 million gift to its School of Public Health in 2016. But Ronald Daniels, the president of Johns Hopkins, said Mr. Miller’s gift would give a much-needed boost to the beleaguered humanities, at a moment when many universities, and the governments that support them, are heavily focused on the so-called STEM fields: science, technology, engineering and math. “This gift is so wonderfully contrarian,” Mr. Daniels said. “To have someone of Bill’s stature who is willing to lend an imprimatur to philosophy, this most ancient of disciplines, and to the idea of its continuing relevance as an end in itself, is simply spectacular.” Mr. Miller, 67, is not the only old-guard Wall Street figure with a background in philosophy. George Soros was   by the Austrian philosopher Karl Popper. Carl Icahn was a philosophy major at Princeton, where he   titled “The Problem of Formulating an Adequate Explication of the Empiricist Criterion of Meaning.” (On the watchdog side of the street, Sheila Bair, the former chair of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, was also a philosophy major.) Mr. Miller, whose father worked as a terminal manager for a trucking company, said he had essentially talked his way into the Ph.D. program at Hopkins, despite having taken only one six-week course in philosophy at the very end of his senior year. “They wanted to see three examples of your philosophical work,” he recalled. “I didn’t have any, so I took 30 days off the Army and wrote three papers.” Mr. Miller, who worked part-time in accounting during graduate school, completed the coursework and qualifying exams. But when it came time to start a dissertation, he looked at the difficult prospects of getting a teaching job, and left for (much) greener pastures. Philosophy is often derided as useless and impractical, and not always in as fond a way as in   “Mrs. Premise and Mrs. Conclusion Visit Jean-Paul Sartre.” But when Marco Rubio, on the campaign trail in 2015, said America needed   defenders of Sophia rushed to note that postsecondary philosophy teachers earned nearly twice as much as welders, while former philosophy majors  . On Wall Street, Mr. Miller, an old-fashioned stock picker who focused on identifying undervalued companies, is famous for his 15-year streak beating the S.&.P 500, from 1991 to 2006, while at Legg Mason, where he spent most of his career. He was an early believer in Amazon, investing heavily at a time when most analysts were highly skeptical. “There was a huge amount of confirmation bias going on with Amazon,” he said. “There was an inability to do what Wittgenstein talked about in his ‘Philosophical Investigations’: crisscrossing the landscape from many angles, investigating in many different ways.” The more general public may recall his   where he was the guy blustering on about the fundamental strength of Bear Stearns stock (which in real life Mr. Miller rode toward the bottom) in a public debate with Steve Carell’s character even as it was shown plummeting on BlackBerry screens. The scene, based on a real exchange, “made the person seem quite a bit more pompous than I think of myself as being,” Mr. Miller said. In recent years Mr. Miller, who said his firm currently has $2.5 billion under management (considerably less than the funds he oversaw at Legg Mason,  ), has  . The cryptocurrency has inspired  , to complement more in-flight friendly reading like Bitcoin Magazine. In addition to books on the history and sociology of money, Mr. Miller said he had been reading the Berkeley philosopher John Searle’s 1995 book   which looks at how objective social realities form, grow and change. “It is particularly insightful when trying to understand new social facts and structures such as crypto assets,” Mr. Miller said.

TOKYO —  Activist investors in Japan may be struggling to get companies to embrace their proposals but are optimistic that management is warming to shareholder activism that will likely shape more of Corporate Japan's decision making. Activist investment has been gaining momentum since Prime Minister Shinzo Abe advocated strengthening corporate governance, and the peak season of annual general meetings in June could see more of such proactive shareholders attempt to influence management. Japanese asset manager Sparx Asset Management's proposals to synthetic fiber maker Teikoku Sen-i were rejected at its annual shareholder meeting on Thursday, according to a preliminary announcement from the company. These included tripling dividend payouts from the current 30 yen ($0.28) per share and halving board members' terms. Details of the actual vote will only be available next week. Nevertheless, Sparx does not think it is leaving the meeting empty-handed. Teikoku Sen-i did announce a small increase in dividend last month. "I think our proposal did have an effect. They surely don't want to do exactly what we asked. But if we hadn't made the proposal, they probably would not have raised dividend," said Shuhei Abe, founder and chief executive officer of Sparx. A Teikoku Sen-i spokesman said the dividend hike was to celebrate the company's 110th year anniversary in 2017 and to reward investors for their support, and declined to comment on the shareholder proposals. Abe also said active engagement helps improve shareholder value. "Considering the globalisation of the market and Japan's market and economic situation, we firmly believe the tides have already turned toward shareholders actively raising issues and having constructive dialog with firms, and that this trend will continue to grow stronger," Abe said. In another battle, Hong Kong-based hedge fund Oasis Management said on Tuesday its six proposals to Japanese internet and cryptocurrency firm GMO Internet were rejected at its AGM last week. But Oasis said it was encouraged by the fact that some of its proposals won support from nearly 90 percent of minority shareholders who voted, including some domestic institutional shareholders. Their proposals were voted down largely because of a 41 percent stake its founder and CEO Masatoshi Kumagai and his personal office hold. "This vote makes it clear that investors in Japan will stand up and make their voices heard by voting for positive corporate governance changes, against recommendations of management, whose interests have unfortunately deviated from what's best for the company and all stakeholders," said Seth Fischer, founder and Chief Investment Officer at Oasis. GMO's Kumagai said he appreciates that Oasis's proposals are aimed at boost GMO's value, and asked other investors to understand that management and Oasis are not in confrontation. Meanwhile, San Francisco-based activist hedge fund ValueAct Capital, a mostly long-term value investor, said it was considering making its first investment in Japan this year. Allison Bennington, partner of the fund, said ValueAct is aware that activist funds have long been viewed as "vultures" in Japan but its approach will be more constructive. ($1 = 106.6000 yen) (Editing by Jacqueline Wong)

Six novels and one anthology: Absorbing this much speculative fiction in a short time is like taking a warp-speed tour of new worlds. And although it is admittedly a small sample, after having visited this particular cross section of the fictional galaxy, it’s hard not to notice a prevailing atmospheric quality common to many of the stories: So much of this work feels as if it is post- , pervaded by a sense of living and writing in an era that comes after, of fiction being produced by novelists who can’t help feeling that it’s getting late or, in some cases, that it’s too late. The emphasis here being on the post-, and less on the something, which is variable from writer to writer and from story to story. Sometimes the something is big and vague, and sometimes it’s more specifically defined. And sometimes, as in Greg Hrbek’s new novel,     the writer manages the trick of having it both ways, of conjuring an evocative and amorphous and yet delicately delineated event, shrouded not in the mists of distant history but in the fish-eye lens of very recent history, of an epoch-defining moment still too close for proper viewing. In Hrbek’s novel, the big event in the rear-view mirror is known as “8/11.” With a deft touch, he creates a picture of an America in a timeline radically different from ours — yet clearly recognizable. He does this by applying pressure in just the right spots (a choice detail here, a faint sketching there) and doling out back story judiciously so that, for most of the book, the reader has only glimpses of what might have happened. A metallic object comes out of the clouds, slicing through suspension cables of the Golden Gate Bridge. From nearby, 19-year-old Skyler Wakefield witnesses the event, which sends her on a life-or-death run to save the child in her care. Elsewhere and meanwhile, in a different region of space-time (a point made obliquely — hinting at revelations to come), Skyler’s younger brother, Dorian, will have to come to terms with the fallout of 8/11 in a very different and no less dangerous way. Dorian and his parents live on the same cul-de-sac as Will Banfelder, retired military, now living in the suburbs as the recent adoptive father of a 12-year-old named Karim who has been plucked by Banfelder from a Muslim relocation camp (they are, we gather, commonplace in this post-8/11 America) and dropped into a life of school and pool parties with the kids on the block. From this setup, Hrbek unspools a taut story of a neighborhood, examining the tangled, complex interactions not through abstractions or generalities but through precisely drawn portraits of individuals, the swirling mix of fear and empathy, hatred and compassion, our best and worst selves. What results is a picture of how the fabric of a community is built, particle by particle, from the small, daily interactions we all have with those closest to us, our neighbors, friends and family. Using multiple points of view, Hrbek slowly reveals the secrets, the lies and the truths, the pain and the dreams of these people. Although there are clear and perhaps deliberate echoes of DeLillo’s airborne toxic event, and perhaps Pynchon’s screaming across the sky, Hrbek does something original and unexpected with his premise, slowly layering in the speculative frame of the story and then expanding it outward into more, into an ingenious exploitation of alternate history as a subgenre, a case of genre and form not just fitting function, but maximizing it. One minor complaint might be with an ending that seems to leave some key questions unexplored, almost untouched, due to the aforementioned expansion of scope, which comes quite late in the story. But judging the novel harshly on this front would be punishing it unduly for having ambition that slightly exceeds its grasp. Hrbek’s prose is sharp and trenchant, his voice remarkably complex yet assured, and this novel is an impressive achievement: a narrative that is changing even as it is still taking place, still being reshaped by the news, by our collective and individual memories, and by the very consequences still unfolding from the event itself. From a post-catastrophe novel to one striving to be post-everything, we get     the third novel written by David Wong, the pseudonym of Jason Pargin, executive editor of the humor website Cracked.com. Wong’s protagonist, Zoey Ashe, is the daughter of a very rich (and by reputation an apparently very bad) man named Arthur Livingston. The action kicks off with a high-concept premise fit for a very dark reality show: a game, a chase, a contest that millions of people are watching. Arthur Livingston is dead, and Zoey, for various reasons best left unspoiled, is the prize, the human bounty in a world where everyone seems to be either an assassin, a vlogger or an obsessed fan. With verve and velocity, the story moves to the city of Tabula Ra$a, where the momentum continues — the first couple of hundred pages or so feel like one cinematic set piece after another, strung together with twisty fun and wit. This early rhythm, however, while initially exciting, gradually grows a bit repetitive, and the connective tissue, contrived scene endings that artificially break off — often literally truncating a chapter in the middle of a moment so the reader has to turn the page — sometimes feel like assertions of suspense rather than the real thing. The bright, clever prose, while a pleasure to read, can also seem slick and a bit soulless, maybe even callous, given the topicality of the dark subject matter to current events. Which is not to judge the book by the wrong metric: This is clearly supposed to be fun, and at that it succeeds wildly, but one can’t help feeling that a writer of Wong’s intelligence might have left some opportunity for real satire and commentary on the table. Although Michael Moorcock’s     the first book in the Corum series, was first published over four decades ago, the newly reissued story doesn’t feel dated so much as impervious to the aging process. Moorcock’s novel is fantasy of the high kind: faraway and long ago and weirder than you expect it to be. The hero is Prince Corum of the Vadhagh people (one of the two ancient races, the Vadhagh and the Nhadragh, whose long equilibrium has been disturbed by the rise of a new and horrific race: mankind). Corum, as princes are wont to do, goes out into the world in search of purpose and, once out there, faces a series of trials and ordeals, and gets roughed up in various terrible ways, as princes are wont to do. Beaten and bloodied but unbowed (well, almost bowed), the prince meets Rhalina, a mysterious human woman who nurses him back to health, allowing him to continue on toward his larger purpose — an encounter with a monstrously large and generally mean god named Arioch. As the first in a series, the book has a lot of track to lay, and Moorcock does it ably, giving depth with a litany of names, variants, lore, adding in the color and shading until he achieves a kind of faraway, never-ever quality to the fantasy. And yet the world he builds has an oddly empty feeling, almost as if it’s a private universe, some obscure and out-of-the-way cosmos that might be found in a dorm room Dungeons & Dragons campaign. Some of this stems from the point of view: The third person here feels narrated from on high, creating a scrim that makes this particular world initially difficult to enter. Early on, the novel seems to flirt with allegory, suggesting it might be a parable about civilization, containing universal truths of men and power, progress and complacency. Toward the end, however, this falls away and the book takes a crazy turn toward the fantastical and truly bizarre. This comes at a cost, as the gain in scale reduces the psychological and emotional stakes. Fantasy might be cool when it detaches this far from reality, but it also lacks punch. The effect is like that of a snow globe, a world that remains inaccessible no matter how much fun it is to look at.    is also part of a series, the latest entry in Ayize Jama-Everett’s “Liminal People” novels. Chabi, his protagonist, is a half-Mongolian, half-black physical prodigy and all-around renegade adolescent girl in the San Francisco Bay Area. Her gifts include extreme levels of endurance, strength and dexterity — but her mental fortitude is what really makes her special. As a student of the enigmatic Narayana, Chabi is introduced to secrets of martial arts, but also to a kind of crypto-cosmology and an underworld or underlayer to reality, where her skills are necessary and valuable. “You and yours are born with some of the weirdest collection of gifts and curses ever assembled on this planet,” one character tells Chabi, and although this might seem to indicate we’re veering into pre-apocalyptic young adult territory, Jama-Everett’s book consistently resists easy categorization. Chabi’s mixed racial background offers a potentially nuanced look from a perspective that seems underserved. And by setting the book in a weird, if recognizable, Bay Area, ­Jama-Everett captures something about the way it feels to live so close to so much money and yet so far; he traces the differences between postindustrial East Bay towns, the gray melancholy of an older city, the particular feeling of struggling while surrounded by otherworldly wealth. If the book veers among different approaches — now a philosophical kung fu master story, now a seduction into a rarefied subculture, now an esoteric universe made from liner notes and the journal entries of a brilliantly imaginative teenager — there’s nevertheless a vitality to the voice and a weirdness that, while not always controlled or intentional, is highly appealing for just that reason. In Amanda Downum’s novel     Liz Drake is a young woman living on the East Coast with her devoted boyfriend, whom she seems a bit ambivalent about — which probably explains her rather casual attitude toward him, a casualness that extends to other things as well. One thing she’s not casual about, however, is her psychic connection to Blake Enderly. When Liz has an intuition, she is absolutely certain that her friend Blake, who lives across the continent and has recently gone missing, is in trouble, so she crosses the country, boyfriend in tow, to help find him. The connection between the two is never fully, or even partially, explained — it seems ambiguously metaphorical, a symbol of the fervent tribal bonds of postadolescent friendship, and on that level it does have some resonance. Similarly, the connections between Liz and her other friends are more asserted than earned — as the story shifts perspectives, many characters feel like profiles or postures more than fleshy humans, an effect that may be symptomatic or intentional on Downum’s part, or both. There are hints at a deeper story here, one of drugs and addiction, about getting lost and the depths to which you can go to save your friends. And there are moments of promise, in which Downum successfully blurs the boundary between reality and fantasy until the narrative takes on a dreamlike fluidity, resulting in the freedom of possibility, of real surprise. Rachel Vincent’s     likewise relies on multiple points of view, and the strategy again works to the novel’s detriment. Vincent switches among so many characters, human and nonhuman, major and minor, that she ultimately saps the story of suspense and energy. “Menagerie” is set in a world still suffering the aftermath of an event known as the reaping, in which some 300,000 American children disappeared after the murder of their siblings. (The federal government seems implicated somehow, as it tends to be in this kind of book.) The story preaches tolerance and acceptance, and on that front its earnestness is hard to dislike. It suffers through its middle sections, however, as it treads water, with identical or very similar story points occurring several times and without much justification. Where it does succeed, though — especially in the early going, where it sets up the pins, and in the final few chapters, where it knocks them all down — it is well paced, readable and imaginative. The anthology     edited by Nisi Shawl and Bill Campbell, is an eye-opening illumination of the full reach and depth of Delany’s influence. The stories here are diverse, but what they have in common is a clear and exuberant feeling of joy in their shared enterprise, of indebtedness and gratitude. There is something about the constrained nature of the assignment (to write in the style of, or inspired by, the work of another person), along with the benefit of having, for once, an outwardly directed purpose to write a story, that must have felt freeing, allowing the contributors to be both more and less themselves. Maybe it’s similar to the way a great cover song reveals something surprising about both the original and the cover artist. The assignment becomes a kind of literary DNA test, showing how much one writer’s influence has found its way into different parts of the family tree. Some of this might be a result of dilution — the concentrated ­Delany is a dense substance, difficult to appreciate in large quantities. But cut, diluted and mixed in, you get recombinant strands of prose, styles and voices, like the entry from Nick Harkaway, “Billy Tumult,” a story about a psychic surgeon that lets Harkaway pay homage to Delany while demonstrating his abundant verbal wit and maximalist exuberance. Other standouts include stories by Anil ­Menon and Haralambi Markov. In the aggregate, the reader is left with a sense of negative space, of many newer voices having a dialogue with a major figure, of the displacement of a large piece of imaginative real estate occupied in the field of ­​speculative fiction.
This may come to be known as the Samuel A. Alito Jr. election. The U.S. presidential contest is predominately about President Barack Obama’s stewardship of the economy and the political-cultural divide in the Republican Party. It is also about the huge sums of money sloshing around, after Justice Alito replaced Sandra Day O’Connor on the Supreme Court and provided the swing vote in the 2010 Citizens United case. Supporters claimed that allowing unlimited contributions from individuals, corporations and labor unions would create a more educated and enthused electorate, and enable the insurgent party to make its case more effectively. Instead, the Republican primary contest has produced the most negative, mean campaign since the Watergate scandal brought about campaign-finance changes four decades ago. Turnout is mediocre and the appeal of the Republican brand has plummeted. Those who backed the Supreme Court’s decision contend that Citizens United is not responsible for the proliferation of “super PACs” with multimillion-dollar contributors like Sheldon G. Adelson, the Las Vegas gambling magnate. That is only true technically. Citizens United v. Federal Election Commission overturned precedents and ruled that corporate funds could be used for “independent” efforts to promote political candidates. It was a 5-to-4 decision. Later, a U.S. Court of Appeals, citing the high court case, found that wealthy individuals could give unlimited sums to super PACs, which are not permitted to coordinate their actions with the candidates they support. There had been similar efforts in earlier campaigns: In 2004, a group called the Swift Boat Veterans for Truth, funded largely by rich Texans, assailed the military record of the Democratic nominee, Senator John Kerry of Massachusetts, a decorated Vietnam War hero; the billionaire George Soros was a prime backer of independent efforts against President George W. Bush. The lax Federal Elections Commission later found such efforts illegal and fined the organizations involved. What about Rick Perry, Citizens United defenders ask? Mr. Perry, the governor of Texas, had plenty of cash and bombed in his attempt to gain the Republican nomination. What that demonstrates is that no matter how much money is spent, a candidate with a room-temperature political I.Q. is doomed. For less-challenged candidates, money is still the mother’s milk of politics. Mr. Obama, once a campaign-finance reformer, is making up for lost time. He has encouraged top White House aides and certain cabinet members to help his super PAC shake money from rich contributors. His campaign manager, Jim Messina, assured New York fat cats that the president had no intention of politicking against Wall Street. The Obama campaign — which through the end of January had raised more than twice as much as the leading Republican candidate, Mitt Romney, the former Massachusetts governor — has insisted that the Republican super PACs give the president no choice; they made him do it. On the Republican side, Mr. Adelson, with his family, has given about $11 million to a super PAC backing Newt Gingrich, keeping the dying campaign alive. The billionaire casino owner is under investigation by the Justice Department and the Securities and Exchange Commission related to his interests in China. He has asked other candidates seeking money for a commitment to help Israel obliterate any Iranian nuclear facilities. Mr. Gingrich and the backer of his “independent” super PAC huddled in Las Vegas last month; neither has disclosed what they talked about. The Romney super PAC, which so far has spent more than all the other independent groups combined, including those supporting the president, is run by close political and personal associates; the candidate has urged his campaign aides to help this “independent” effort. Of the 30,146 television spots broadcast by the Romney group, Restore Our Future, 29,642 were negative, according to Kantar Media’s CMAG, which tracks and monitors political television advertising. In Ohio, Mr. Romney’s backers have put up three commercials, two attacking Rick Santorum as a crypto-leftist and one praising Mr. Romney for helping a colleague find a missing child. Over the past two weeks, the negative ads have run 2,019 times; the positive ones, 154 times. These figures paint a somewhat distorted picture as some legitimate comparison ads are classified as negative; and some of the critical ones are very legitimate: commercials pointing out the lavish consulting fees paid to Mr. Gingrich by Freddie Mac, the mortgage finance company, or those drawing attention to Mr. Romney’s health care measure in Massachusetts, a precursor of Mr. Obama’s national initiative. Still, much of the advertising is trashy and cheap, the sort of stuff that turns off voters. And that is what is happening. The Republican electorate, desperate to get rid of Mr. Obama, was thought to have all the intensity and energy in 2012, much like the Democrats four years earlier. Yet in the first batch of primaries, turnout over all has not increased from 2008, supposedly a doldrums year, though there are no competing Democratic contestants this time. And the Republican brand, as measured by the favorability or positive ratings in almost every major poll, is continuously sinking to its lowest level in almost 40 years. That is what cash-rich politics often produces; a race to the bottom, not a bigger marketplace to showcase ideas. It is hard to find a Republican who argues that voters have been treated to an inspiring and informative debate; privately, some are beginning to doubt the wisdom of Citizens United and the unleashing of super PACs. It is only going to get nastier and dirtier this autumn when so-called 501(c)(4) groups, which can accept secret and unlimited corporate and labor union funds, kick in. Because of Justice Alito and his majority, the courts are not a recourse. The only mild palliative might be to pressure Congress to pass the Disclose Act, which would end the secrecy of big donations and require super PACs to list top donors in ads. Even something that mild is a slog in this Congress. The only shot may be if Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, disgusted with the havoc the court decision has wreaked on campaign finance laws, puts on his reformer hat and shames his Senate colleagues to pass this measure.




• For once, Doug Jones said, Alabama declined to take “the wrong fork” at a political crossroads. The former prosecutor   on Tuesday, an almost-unimagined victory for Democrats that shaves Republicans’ Senate majority to a single seat. Here are  , and  , including robust turnout by black voters. There were over 22,000 write-in votes, more than the margin of victory. Mr. Jones’s win could complicate the Republicans’ legislative agenda in Washington. It also amounts to a snub of President Trump, who had broken with most of his party and embraced the scandal-scarred Mr. Moore. •   by   and  , who has not conceded. •   his contention that the women who have accused him of sexual misconduct fabricated the allegations. He also described Senator Kirsten Gillibrand of New York, one of his leading critics, as a “lightweight” who “would do anything” for campaign contributions. •   “The success that Democrats had using the war on women theme had started to fade away, but now there is no denying that Republicans have a problem with women right now, and most of these are self-inflicted. This has far-ranging consequences for 2018.” • From almost the day it opened in 2004, the Spotted Pig has been at the top of the list of New York City’s leading restaurants. But 10 women say that Ken Friedman, its co-owner,  . They accuse him of groping them in public, demanding sex, or requesting nude pictures or group sex. Among employees and industry insiders, the restaurant’s third-floor space earned a nickname: “the rape room.” •   apologized  . • With help from experts in law and finance, we put together   to make money — or at least save some — under the Senate tax bill. Republicans are closer to agreeing on  . The measure would cut the corporate tax rate by a little less than previously proposed, lower the top rate on the wealthy and scale back the existing mortgage-interest deduction. A vote could come next week. •   may be to living standards,  . • Accusations of bias at the agency are likely to increase after   showing support for Hillary Clinton and describing the prospect of a Trump victory as “terrifying.” One of the officials became a top investigator in the inquiry into the Trump campaign’s ties to Russia. The special counsel, Robert Mueller, removed him over the summer. •  , the deputy attorney general who appointed Mr. Mueller,  . •   to complete a once-unthinkable bid to buy most of Rupert Murdoch’s movie and television empire. The $60 billion-plus deal  . •   our columnist wrote in 2014. He now points to  . •  on Tuesday. Here’s a snapshot of  . • is  . •  , with   to help you have a “hygge” winter. • What could improve a  ? Whiskey. •    In today’s 360 video,   as they celebrate the rebuilding of a 1,000-year-old Buddhist temple. •  Nearly eight years after an earthquake, some of the island’s residents remain blisteringly poor. Many cannot bury their loved ones, so  . •  With the latest “Star Wars” movie, the writer-director Rian Johnson unites the past and the present while looking toward the future — and has fun doing so, our critic writes.  . We’ve also   from around the galaxy, er, internet. •  Our restaurant critic, Pete Wells, has chosen  . He also selected   from restaurants that didn’t make the list. Too pricey? We have a   in the city, as well. •  The shows were recorded before Alabama’s election results came in, but hosts did note that Roy Moore rode to the polls on horseback. “Look at that, what a majestic picture of two animals not allowed in the mall,”  . • “I didn’t know anything about your culture, didn’t know what motivates you, didn’t know anything about your work, didn’t know anything about how you get your work done.” The holiday season involves many traditions. For Britons and millions of others around the world, one of them is Queen Elizabeth II’s annual Christmas Day message. The first British monarch to broadcast on Christmas Day was King George V, her grandfather, 85 years ago. “Distant lands thrill to his ‘God bless you,’ ”  . “Farmers in Brisbane, Australia, listened to it in a summer heat of 95 degrees in the shade,” a correspondent wrote from London, in apparent awe of the radio technology. “Passengers on Atlantic liners heard it as their ship plowed through winter storms.” In 1952, the queen gave her first Christmas message, sitting in the chair her father and grandfather had used,  . According to the BBC, 100 million people heard it. Five years later, the speech was televised for the first time. ( .) The change occurred,  , after the queen was criticized as being too remote and surrounded by “tweedy” courtiers. “That it is possible for some of you to see me today is just another example of the speed at which things are changing all around us,”  .
 woke on Nov. 6, he had just enough time to pour himself a glass of orange juice and open his laptop before the Bureau of Labor Statistics released its monthly employment report at 8:30 a.m. He sat at the kitchen table in his one-bedroom apartment in Chelsea, nervously refreshing his web browser —   — as the software of his company, Kensho, scraped the data from the bureau’s website. Within two minutes, an automated Kensho analysis popped up on his screen: a brief overview, followed by 13 exhibits predicting the performance of investments based on their past response to similar employment reports. Nadler couldn’t have double-checked all this analysis if he wanted to. It was based on thousands of numbers drawn from dozens of databases. He just wanted to make sure that Kensho had pulled the right number — the overall growth in American payrolls — from the employment report. It was the least he could do, given that within minutes, at 8:35 a.m., Kensho’s analysis would be made available to employees at Goldman Sachs. In addition to being a customer, Goldman is also Kensho’s largest investor. Nadler, who is 32, spent the rest of the morning checking in with some of the bank’s most regular Kensho users — a top executive on the options-and-derivatives-trading desks, a fund manager — then took an Uber down for a lunch meeting at Goldman’s glass tower just off the West Side Highway in Manhattan. While almost everyone in the building dresses in neatly pressed work attire, Nadler rarely deviates from his standard outfit: Louis Vuitton leather sandals and a casual but well-cut T-shirt and pants, both by the designer Alexander Wang. Nadler owns 10 sets of these. His austere aesthetic is informed by the summer vacations he spent in Japan while pursuing a doctoral degree in economics from Harvard, mostly visiting temples and meditating. (‘‘Kensho’’ is the Japanese term for one of the first states of awareness in the Zen Buddhist progression.) He also wrote a volume of poetry — imagined ancient love poems — that Farrar Straus & Giroux will publish later this year. I met with Nadler later that day in his own office, across the street from the Goldman building, on the 45th floor of 1 World Trade Center. His dozen or so employees shared a large room decked out in typical start-up style, including an aquarium and large speakers playing electronic music. Nadler has an office off to the side with little more than a large desk, made out of reclaimed telephone poles, and a large upholstered leather chair with matching ottoman. After closing the door, Nadler, who has curly dark hair and pale skin, sat on the ottoman, folded his bare feet under him and told me about the day’s feedback from Goldman. This included some tips on what they wanted in the next report, and a good dose of amazement at Kensho’s speed. ‘‘People always tell me, ‘I used to spend two out of five days a week doing this sort of thing,’ or ‘I used to have a guy whose job it was to do nothing other than this one thing,’ ’’ Nadler said. This might sound like bragging. But Nadler was primarily recounting those reactions as a way of explaining his concern about the impact that start-ups like his are likely to have on the financial industry. Within a decade, he said, between a third and a half of the current employees in finance will lose their jobs to Kensho and other automation software. It began with the lower-paid clerks, many of whom became unnecessary when stock tickers and trading tickets went electronic. It has moved on to research and analysis, as software like Kensho has become capable of parsing enormous data sets far more quickly and reliably than humans ever could. The next ‘‘tranche,’’ as Nadler puts it, will come from the employees who deal with clients: Soon, sophisticated interfaces will mean that clients no longer feel they need or even want to work through a human being. ‘‘I’m assuming that the majority of those people over a five-to-10-year horizon are not going to be replaced by other people,’’ he said, getting into the flow of his thoughts, which, for Nadler, meant closing his eyes and gesticulating as though he were preaching or playing the piano. ‘‘In 10 years Goldman Sachs will be significantly smaller by head count than it is today.’’ Goldman executives are reluctant to discuss the plight of their displaced financial analysts. Several managers I spoke to insisted that Kensho has not yet caused any layoffs, nor is it likely to soon. Nadler had warned me that I would hear something like that. ‘‘When you start talking about automating jobs,’’ he said, ‘‘everybody all of a sudden gets really quiet.’’ Goldman employees who lose their jobs to machines are not likely to evoke much pity. But it is exactly Goldman’s privileged status that makes the threat to its workers so interesting. If jobs can be displaced at Goldman, they can probably be displaced even more quickly at other, less sophisticated companies, within the financial industry as well as without.  two Oxford academics   that 47 percent of current American jobs are at ‘‘high risk’’ of being automated within the next 20 years. The findings provoked lots of worried news reports about robots stealing jobs. The study looked at 702 occupations, using data from the Department of Labor, and assigned a probability of automation to each one, according to nine variables. The conclusions made it clear that this was no longer just the familiar (and ongoing) story of robots replacing factory and warehouse employees. Now software is increasingly doing the work that has been the province of educated people sitting in desk chairs. The vulnerability of these jobs is due, in large part, to the easy availability and rapidly declining price of computing power, as well as the rise of ‘‘machine learning’’ software, like Kensho, that gathers and assimilates new information on its own. According to the Oxford paper and subsequent research, employment prospects vary significantly by industry. In health care, for example, where human interaction is vital, automation threatens fewer jobs than it does in the labor market as a whole. Taxi and truck drivers, though, face a bleak future given recent advances in self-driving cars. Among better-compensated professions, the Oxford researchers took into account software that can analyze and sort legal documents, doing the work that even well-paid lawyers often spend hours on. Journalists face start-ups like Automated Insights, which is already writing up summaries of basketball games. Finance stood out in particular: Because of the degree to which the industry is built on processing information — the stuff of digitization — the research suggested that it has more jobs at high risk of automation than any skilled industry, about 54 percent. The Oxford study received plenty of criticism — understandably, given the patina of exactness that it tried to apply to a speculative exercise. Nevertheless, the financial industry is taking automation very seriously, both as an opportunity and as a threat. It is one thing to make a few analysts redundant, but automation could put whole business models in peril. Investments in what is known as fintech, or financial technology, tripled between 2013 and 2014 to $12.2 billion, and start-ups are now taking aim at nearly every line of financial business. Decisions about loans are now being made by software that can take into account a variety of finely parsed data about a borrower, rather than just a credit score and a background check. So-called robo-advisers create personalized investment portfolios, obviating the need for stockbrokers and financial advisers. Nearly every Wall Street firm has put out research reports on the tens of billions of dollars of revenue that might be lost to these upstarts in the coming years. Banks are trying to fend off the newcomers by making their own investments in start-ups like Kensho, which has raised more than $25 million so far. The skilled industries that form the bedrock of New York City’s economy have so far largely avoided this sort of transformation, because the work of financial analysts, publishers and designers hasn’t been easy to automate. But to look at a company like Kensho, and the sort of conversation it generates across the financial industry, is to see the degree to which these trends are now confronting industries that used to be thought exempt from this sort of disruption. Last fall, Antony Jenkins, who was dismissed a few months earlier as chief executive of Barclays, the giant British bank, gave a speech in which he said a coming series of ‘‘Uber moments’’ would hit the financial industry. ‘‘I predict that the number of branches and people employed in the financial-services sector may decline by as much as 50 percent,’’ Jenkins told the audience. ‘‘Even in a less-harsh scenario, I expect a decline of at least 20 percent.’’ This process could, in at least some cases, help do away with some of the expensive bloat in the financial system, providing more transparent services with fewer hidden fees. It could also be seen as a satisfying blow against the titans of an industry that only recently almost crashed the world economy. But so far the burden of job losses is stopping just short of the executive suites, even as the gains in efficiency are worsening already troubling levels of income inequality. Some of the venture capitalists backing Kensho have told Nadler that he would be wise to stop talking about the potential job losses at the same banks he is trying to secure as customers. Nadler has told them that he needs to carry on, partly to maintain his intellectual integrity. He often connects his discussion of jobs to his political fund-raising on behalf of candidates who call for a more robust social-safety net. But he also says that his awareness of what his business is both creating and taking away sets him apart as an entrepreneur: It’s his ‘‘edge’’ in a business that is all about competing to predict the future more accurately.    at Goldman so far have been the salespeople who work on the bank’s high-ceiling trading floors. In recent months, they have used the software to respond to incoming phone calls from investors who buy and sell energy stocks and commodities, wondering how they should position their portfolios in response to, for instance, flare-ups in the Syrian civil war. In the old days, the salespeople could draw on their own knowledge of recent events and how markets responded, with all the limitations of human memory. For a particularly valuable client, the sales representative might have called a research analyst within Goldman to run a more complete study, digging up old news events and looking at how markets responded in each case. The problem with this approach was that by the time the results came back, the original trading opportunity was often gone. Now a sales representative can simply click an icon and access the Kensho interface, which consists of a simple black search bar. Nadler walked me through the process on his own laptop. Type in the word ‘‘Syria,’’ and several groups of events related to Syria’s civil war appear, in much the same way that Google recommends queries based on past searches. Here, among the top event groups, are ‘‘Advances Against ISIS,’’ which includes 25 past events, and ‘‘Major ISIS Advances and Brutal Atrocities,’’ with 105 events. Kensho’s software is constantly tweaking and broadening these suggested search terms, all with little human intervention. In some ways, this is the most sophisticated part of the program. In the past, a trader or analyst would have to search Wikipedia or a news database using whatever keywords came to mind. Kensho’s search engine automatically categorizes events according to abstract features. It has figured out, for instance, that ISIS’s seizure of Palmyra and France’s first airstrike in Syria were both escalations in the civil war there but also that in one of those cases, ISIS was the aggressor while in the other case, it was on the defense. The software also looks for new and unexpected relationships between events and asset prices, allowing it to recommend searches that a user might not have considered. For this feature, Nadler said, he hired one of the machine-learning whizzes who worked on Google’s megacatalog of the world’s libraries. Back on the trading desk, after picking out one group of events — the 27 incidents of ‘‘Escalations in the Syrian civil war,’’ say — a sales trader can pick from a series of drop-down menus that narrow the search to a specific time period and a specific set of investments. The broadest set includes the world’s 40 or so major assets, including German stocks, the Australian dollar and a few varieties of crude oil. They can then click on the green Generate Study button, and a few minutes later they’ll have a new page full of charts. Nadler clicked to demonstrate. The top chart showed that the prices of natural gas and crude oil have underperformed in the weeks after past escalations in the war, while Asian stocks and the United States and Canadian dollar pair has outperformed. Scrolling down, we could also see how each event in Syria played out and begin to structure an optimal set of trades based on that history. Nadler closed his laptop. The whole process had taken just a few minutes. Generating a similar query without automation, he said, ‘‘would have taken days, probably 40 man-hours, from people who were making an average of $350,000 to $500,000 a year.’’  something for a company that was first dreamed up less than three years ago. In 2013, while in graduate school, Nadler was working as a visiting scholar at the Federal Reserve Bank in Boston. At the time, the Greek elections and instability across Europe were buffeting the financial markets. When Nadler asked how he could find out what impact similar events had on financial markets, he learned that neither the regulators nor the bankers had any good method for doing so beyond digging up old news clips. In his free time, Nadler began talking with a former Google programmer he befriended at a student club for Japan enthusiasts. Nadler was supposed to be finishing up his doctoral dissertation on the influence of politics on the 2008 financial crisis. Instead, within weeks, he had put together a small team and received early funding for his idea from Google’s venture-capital arm. They later received investments from many other sources, including the C.I.A.’s venture-capital arm, according to Forbes. Kensho’s main office is still in Cambridge, Mass., two floors above an old barbershop, with windows looking out onto Harvard Yard. The 30 or so employees in the large main room look like the kind of bright-eyed kids who in years past might have gone to work for Goldman Sachs. Here, though, they work at standup desks, wear jeans and enjoy the benefits of a Zen room, with pillows and tatami mats for meditation, as well as a game room with chessboards and a poker table. I visited the Cambridge office in December, shortly before Christmas. When I arrived, most of the employees were doing their Secret Santa gift exchange; their laughter frequently trickled back to the conference room where I sat with Nadler and a few of his top deputies. Curious to know how much they all talked about the larger implications of their work, I asked the deputies how quickly the topic of automation and job loss had come up in their relationship with Nadler. ‘‘Pretty much the second sentence,’’ said Matt Taylor, the chief technology officer, who, at 38, is one of the senior citizens of the company. ‘‘This was Day 1,’’ said Martin Camacho, Kensho’s 20-year-old chief architect, who entered Harvard as a freshman when he was 15. Camacho remembered going home one night to Nadler’s apartment during their first summer working on Kensho. They watched the science-fiction film ‘‘Oblivion,’’ about a world populated by alien-generated human clones, and stayed up talking about the socioeconomic implications of the story. More recently, Nadler invited his engineering team to a dinner at one of Cambridge’s nicest restaurants, Henrietta’s Table, for a group conversation about the more distant implications of automation. Nadler said he anticipated some form of strong artificial intelligence, whereby computers in the far future would be smart enough to anticipate our needs and usher in an era of abundance. For the next few decades, though, he predicted a more complicated time — an interregnum in which the computers are not as smart as people but smart enough to do many of the tasks that make us money. Camacho was less pessimistic than his boss. When computer-assisted math proofs were invented a few years back, he said, it didn’t lead to any decline in the number of math-research jobs. ‘‘I think there will be plenty for everyone to do,’’ Taylor said, agreeing. When I raised the topic of automation with executives at Goldman and beyond, I often heard a similarly optimistic belief that all the new software will free up employees in the financial industry to do other, more valuable things; that it would also create new types of jobs that don’t exist right now. Several executives I spoke with argued that when A.T.M.s were widely deployed, you didn’t suddenly see bank branches disappearing. This is a common criticism of the Oxford report on automation: Even if 47 percent of all current jobs end up being automated, that does not mean that 47 percent of the working population will not have jobs, as many newspaper articles on the report concluded. Cars once displaced lots of coachmen and stable boys but created many more new jobs laying out highways and attending service stations. Nowadays, software that provides financial advice has automated the work of some stockbrokers, but it is also expanding the number of people getting financial advice and the demand for cheap investment products. The lead author on the Oxford paper, Carl Benedikt Frey, told me that he was aware that new technologies created jobs even as they destroyed them. But, Frey was quick to add, just because the total number of jobs stays the same doesn’t mean there are no disruptions along the way. The automation of textile work may not have driven up the national unemployment rate, but vast swathes of the American South suffered all the same. When it comes to those A.T.M.s, there has, in fact, been a recent steady decline in both the number of bank branches and the number of bank tellers, even as the number of low-paid workers in remote call centers has grown. This points to a disconcerting possibility: Perhaps this time the machines really   reducing overall employment levels. In a recent survey of futurists and technologists, the Pew Research Institute found that about half foresee a future in which jobs continue to disappear at a faster rate than they are created. a boisterous, bearded man who runs all of Goldman’s technological operations, is unrestrained in his enthusiasm for Kensho. ‘‘This thing that we would have done in a very bespoke, almost artisanal way is now something that Kensho has industrialized,’’ he told me. Chavez said Kensho itself was unlikely to displace many employees. The software, he said, was doing something that was previously so time-consuming that it was seldom attempted. (Some users also told me that there were still significant limitations on the sort of events the software could search.) But whatever the impact of Kensho, Chavez’s larger efforts to digitize more of Goldman’s operations are already changing the number and the type of employees at the firm. Over the last few years, the number of campus recruits coming to Goldman from science-and-technology majors has gone up 5 percent each year, while the total head count has barely budged. (Goldman is one of the few companies on Wall Street at which the total number of employees hasn’t dropped significantly.) ‘‘I’m pretty sure there are going to be new jobs 10 or 20 years from now that none of us could even imagine today,’’ Chavez said. Stock trading, one of the earliest areas to go electronic, provides an interesting precedent for how automation can play out in an institution like Goldman. On the company’s trading desks, stocks are now bought and sold by computers instead of people. Chavez says that the advent of computerized trading over the last two decades has reduced the number of Goldman employees who buy and sell American stocks the old-fashioned way — over the phone — to four from around 600, but the change in the number of traders tells only part of the story. Some of the traditional traders were replaced by programmers who design and monitor the new trading algorithms. Beyond that, there are now new jobs in the data centers where the high-speed trading takes place. Goldman doesn’t provide numbers on any of this. But Paul Chou, who worked on Goldman’s electronic-trading desks from 2006 to 2010, told me that he would guess that the company probably needed one programmer for every 10 of the old-school traders who lost their jobs. In one sign of the shrinking work force, Goldman moved the last trader out of one of its four Manhattan trading floors last year. The progression of Goldman’s stock-trading operations also illustrates that automation is not an on-off switch. When Chou first joined Goldman, after graduating from M.I.T., part of his job involved logging onto dozens of trading systems and checking on what the algorithms were spitting out to make sure they weren’t making any mistakes before the trades were executed. Chou sat near a woman who had been doing phone-based trading for years. She helped Chou and his young colleagues learn what to look for in a good trade. Over time, though, the programs proved themselves more error-proof than the humans. The woman left Goldman. And then Chou himself created a new program that logged into all the trading systems and pulled everything into a single screen. When he first got it going, he remembers his boss, a programmer himself, turning to Chou and saying, ‘‘I don’t even know why I show up to work anymore.’’ The software Chou designed made it possible for him to dedicate himself to higher-level work, researching new trading strategies for the computers. This was more satisfying than all the monitoring he had been doing, but eventually it became too repetitive as well. Chou left Goldman in 2010 for Silicon Valley and now runs LedgerX, an options exchange that he founded with his wife and two others. The team he left at Goldman was smaller than it was when he arrived. Over the course of my conversations with Nadler, he backed away from the notion that Kensho will destroy jobs at Goldman itself. But he said he had no doubt that Kensho and other financial start-ups would eliminate jobs as they expanded across the industry and that the pace of the losses would be much faster outside Goldman than inside. After the end of Goldman’s period of exclusivity with Kensho last summer, Nadler signed contracts to roll out the software at JPMorgan Chase and Bank of America. The number of jobs that these banks will support in the future will be influenced by much more than just software. Banks are currently cutting back in response to slower-than-expected economic growth and new regulations since the financial crisis. But these factors are also encouraging all the banks to look for any place where they can find a cheaper and more transparent way to do jobs that are currently being done by expensive and unreliable humans. When I asked Chavez whether the job losses were likely to continue to outpace the gains, he reacted with what seemed like genuine uncertainty. ‘‘That is one of the most interesting questions of our time,’’ he said.  the lead author of the 2013 study on automation, has done more recent research indicating that innovations are no longer providing as big a boost to the economy and the labor force as they did in the past. In a paper he published last year with Thor Berger, a Swedish academic, he found that in the 1980s, a large portion of the American work force was going into job categories that did not exist a decade before; IBM, in other words, was hiring. That movement, though, slowed down in the ’90s and went practically to zero between 2000 and 2010. To the degree that there are new jobs, Frey’s data suggests that they are often lower-paying ones that serve the wealthy elite, in roles like personal trainer or barista. ‘‘Technology is becoming more labor-saving and less job-creating,’’ Frey said. One theory for why this might be happening is that many of the recent technological advances have been in software rather than hardware. While a company like IBM or Dell needed employees to build each new computer for every new customer, software like Facebook and Kensho can be replicated endlessly, at near-zero marginal cost. When Chou came up with the software that automatically logged onto dozens of trading systems, it could essentially have been rolled out across all of Goldman’s trading desks around the world the next day. This is very different from the 1970s, when Detroit would need to retrofit its car-manufacturing plants one at a time, after the robots themselves were actually built. The difference is what convinced Chou, after his time at Goldman Sachs and in Silicon Valley, that this phase of automation would play out differently from past ones. ‘‘We are not coming up with new jobs as fast as we are replacing them,’’ Chou told me. This observation appears to be borne out by Kensho. In less than three years, Nadler’s company has expanded to serve three of the world’s largest banks and has needed only around 50 employees to do so, just enough to fill two relatively small offices. Recently, Nadler’s New York staff moved to a bigger office in 1 World Trade Center. It has more room for desks so that Kensho can expand. But most of the additional space is taken up by a kitchen, a pool table and a putting green. The growth has made Kensho worth hundreds of millions of dollars and turned Nadler into a millionaire many times over, at least when his stake in the company is taken into account. But it’s not clear how beneficial his company will be to the American labor market as a whole. Back when I first met Nadler, for a lunch last summer, he wasn’t too proud to admit this. ‘‘The cynical answer that another tech entrepreneur would give you is that we’re creating new jobs, we’re creating technology jobs,’’ he told me. ‘‘We’ve created, on paper at least, more than a dozen millionaires. ‘‘That might help people sleep better at night,’’ he continued, ‘‘but we are creating a very small number of high-paying jobs in return for destroying a very large number of fairly high-paying jobs, and the net-net to society, absent some sort of policy intervention or new industry that no one’s thought of yet to employ all those people, is a net loss.’’
Last year’s rally   in 2018. If anything, the record run in stocks appears to be gaining momentum. The Dow Jones industrial average just recorded its best start to the year since 2003,  . Having just surpassed 25,000 on Thursday, the blue-chip is already more than a quarter of the way to 26,000. The Standard & Poor’s 500 index rose 2.6 percent after posting four straight records during the holiday-shortened week. That was its best start to a year since 2006. Tech stocks surged 4.2 percent to begin the New Year. Fourth-quarter earnings season kicks off next week with JPMorgan, Wells Fargo & Co. and BlackRock all reporting Friday. Here’s what Wall Street analysts are expecting, courtesy of FactSet. Analysts expect companies in the Standard & Poor’s 500 index to report profits rose 10.5 percent from a year ago, according to FactSet. • All 11 sectors are forecast to report earnings growth. • The index’s energy companies are expected to show the biggest jump, up 132 percent. That increase is largely a result of the continued rebound in oil prices. The two-year free-fall in oil prices that began in 2014 decimated the bottom line of energy companies, but since the second half of last year, the sector’s profits have been rebounding. • If analysts forecast for earnings prove correct, it will mark the third quarter in the past four that the S.&P. 500 has posted double-digit gains in earnings. • Sales are forecast to grow 6.7 percent. Most Federal Reserve officials expect to raise rates three times this year. A number of private economists, including Goldman Sachs’s Jan Hatzius, are forecasting four. The market, meanwhile, has priced in only two. The Fed, though, could surprise investors to the upside,  Mr. Beddor added:  that “Stefan Blom, Spotify’s chief content officer, announced his departure via an internal memo Friday.”  earlier this week that Spotify had filed confidentially with the Securities and Exchange Commission to list its shares on the New York Stock Exchange in the first quarter of this year. Via Recode: • F.B.I. agents have renewed asking questions about the dealings of the Clinton Foundation amid calls from President Trump and top Republicans for the Justice Department to take a fresh look at politically charged accusations of corruption. ( ) • The first known criminal referral has emerged from Congress’s Russia inquiries. The target is the author of the Trump-Russia dossier. ( ) • The nation’s political and financial capitals have never felt so far apart. Washington is kicking off the new year with a fresh round of Trump-fueled chaos. On Wall Street, meanwhile, the sky hardly seems the limit. ( ) • Gary Cohn told Bloomberg TV that the Trump administration may try to block potential plans by high-tax states including New York and California to shield residents from state and local tax break changes. ( ) • American cannabis startups raised a record amount of venture capital last year, with 69 companies snaring nearly $274 million. ( ) • Netflix shares jumped 1.4 percent to an all-time high after the video-streaming service announced a Jan. 12 premiere for the new show from longtime talk-show host David Letterman. ( ) • Lionel Messi has written a clause into his contract with FC Barcelona allowing him to leave the team if Catalan independence means he can’t play top-league soccer. ( ) • Berkshire Hathaway’s Class A shares closed above $300,000 for the first time Thursday, marking a new record for the world’s most expensive stock. Here are some items you can buy from Berkshire businesses for the price of one A share. ( ) The headline number of 148,000 jobs added came in well below the 198,000 expected by Wall Street economists. But don’t read too much into the miss. The trend remains strong. The United States economy has added jobs for 87 straight months, an unparalleled run, and the unemployment rate remained at a 17-year low. On top of all that, the number may be revised upward in the coming months. Joe Brusuelas, chief economist at RSM,  : But this jobs report was all about wages, and growth there remained lackluster. Year over year, earnings increased by around 2.5 percent. “We expect a clear upturn over the first half of this year, but it isn’t happening yet,” wrote Ian Shepherdson, chief economist of Pantheon Macroeconomics. This mysterious lack of earnings growth has helped provide cover for Federal Reserve officials to slowly raise rates.  “At the margin, this report reduces the odds of a March rate hike, but two more reports are due before the FOMC meeting, by which time these numbers will be ancient history,” wrote Mr. Shepherdson. Fitbit is investing $6 million into Sano, which is developing a patch to track a person’s blood sugar level,  The move could help Fitbit reverse declining sales. Via CNBC:  Last month   that device manufacturers are tapping into new features on the Apple Watch to develop medical accessories. Apple is also looking for its own medical breakthroughs, such as a noninvasive continuous glucose reader, the NYT reported. David Tepper of Appaloosa Management  , telling CNBC:  The market historian James Stack told Jim Stewart of the NYT: “ . The longer we go without one, the greater the risk this will end badly. A lot of people will get hurt.” It’s Jobs Friday today. A Reuters survey of economists expects the nonfarm payroll report to show   for December. Legal experts are poring over the question, after a report by Mike Schmidt of the NYT that President Trump told the White House’s top lawyer to   from the Russia investigation. From Mr. Schmidt’s story:  “Fire and Fury” is to go on sale today, ahead of schedule — and despite  . So a steady drip of excerpts — from Steve Bannon calling a meeting between Donald Trump Jr. and Russians “treasonous” to the former adviser suggesting that money laundering charges were in the offing — is about to become a flood.  may be the book’s descriptions of Mr. Trump’s erratic behavior and of aides’ private contempt for their boss. Many   are underway (you start in the index, looking for your name). The firestorm has also propelled Mr. Wolff from local media gadfly into  . Rebekah Mercer, the adviser’s longtime benefactor,   in a rare public statement. And Breitbart’s board members have debated   as the media organization’s chairman, according to the WSJ, citing unnamed sources. Tim O’Brien of Bloomberg View says that Mr. Bannon’s allegation   as any claim of “treason.” • Mr. Trump may have dismantled his voter fraud commission, but he wasn’t happy about it. ( ) • Bipartisan talks on protecting the young immigrants known as Dreamers are starting to fray amid disagreements on a border wall and other immigration policies. ( ) • Ajit Pai, the chairman of the F.C.C., canceled his speaking appearance at the Consumer Electronics Show, citing death threats, according to unnamed sources. ( ) Already, its decision to let prosecutors   against the drug has taken its toll on publicly traded pot-related companies. • Shares in  , whose C.E.O. has courted marijuana growers, dropped as much as 5 percent yesterday. • Those in  , which produces edibles and other pot-related products, plunged 24 percent. • And shares in  , a cannabis farming company, fell 21 percent. It’s a shocking turnaround, too. Cannabis-related shares had rallied this week  . • Senator  , Republican of Colorado,   Justice Department appointments. • The head of California’s Bureau of Cannabis Control,  , said the state  . If you’re a budding cannabis entrepreneur and need financing, you’ll probably have to turn to  . Yes, corporations like Apple will have to repatriate overseas earnings under the new code. And the tax analyst David Zion estimates that they will pay some $235 billion. But he also reckons that the new repatriation treatment alone is worth $500 billion more compared with the old law. And analysts in general think the overhaul  . As J. Richard Harvey, a Villanova law professor, told Jesse Drucker of the NYT, multinationals have sought a change like this for over a decade: Energy companies, obviously. And the president of the National Ocean Industries Association, Randall Luthi, called the offshore leasing proposal “ .” But investor reaction yesterday was fairly muted: American depositary receipts in Royal Dutch Shell and BP, for instance, each rose less than 1 percent. From Lisa Friedman of  : Interior Department Secretary Ryan Zinke  : “We’re going to become the strongest energy superpower.” Immediately green-light drilling. , obviously. But also  , including the Republicans Chris Christie of New Jersey and Rick Scott of Florida. That is, if he follows through on his plan to sell   in Uber to a group led by SoftBank, as Bloomberg reports. (We hear that the report is accurate.) about $1.4 billion. More from Eric Newcomer of Bloomberg: • Intel struggled for months to address Meltdown, one of two computer chip security flaws that came to light this week. Apple said that nearly all of its computing devices, including iPhones, were vulnerable and that it  . ( ) • What you can do to protect your devices against the flaws. Briefly: Update! ( ) • A close look at Iran’s hackers, who have begun cyberespionage campaigns against the U.S. and others. ( ) • China’s internet users increasingly want privacy. Their government wants more data and more control. ( ) • Mark Zuckerberg’s 2018 personal goal: “fix” Facebook. He’s also looking closely at encryption and digital currencies. ( ) • Don’t rush to regulate A.I., Andrew Burt, the chief privacy officer of the data management company Inmuta, writes in an NYT Op-Ed. ( ) , according to the WSJ, citing unnamed people. But the eventual buyer is expected to pay less than $500 million, and shareholders like the Weinsteins, the advertising giant WPP and SoftBank could be wiped out. (Remember that Tom Barrack’s Colony Capital had agreed to buy the embattled studio, but backed out.) Who’s in the running, according to Ben Fritz and Keach Hagey of the WSJ: • Disney’s proposed acquisition of Fox assets has raised questions about the future for Fox’s television properties, including, “Am I going to have to put Mickey Mouse in ‘American Horror Story’?” ( ) • Newsroom employees at the L.A. Times began voting on unionization yesterday. ( ) • H. Brandt Ayers, the former publisher of The Anniston Star in Alabama, resigned on Thursday as chairman of the newspaper’s parent company after admitting to spanking a reporter in the 1970s. ( ) •  will leave Apple in August, roughly four years after he and Dr. Dre sold Beats to the tech giant. ( ) • Neiman Marcus’s C.E.O.,  , plans to step aside, according to unnamed people, as the luxury retailer struggles with weak sales growth and heavy debts. ( ) •  , a senior money manager at Moore Capital Management, will leave Louis Bacon’s hedge fund to start his own firm. His old boss is investing. ( ) • Sprint named  , the C.E.O. of Altice until two months ago, as its new chief financial officer. ( ) • Brookfield bet $4.6 billion on Westinghouse, which faces few major competitors while building nuclear reactors is out of fashion. ( ) • Insurers are set to pay out a record $135 billion on losses from natural disasters in 2017, according to Munich Re, the world’s largest reinsurer. ( ) • Brendan Byrne, who as governor of New Jersey governor brought in the state’s first income tax, died on Thursday. ( ) • HNA has walked away from late-stage negotiations for a stake in Value Partners Group, a Hong Kong fund house, according to people with knowledge of the matter. ( ) • Google led a $120 million investment to help the Chinese online gaming platform Chushou reach more overseas viewers. ( ) • Aurora, a self-driving car start-up, agreed to supply technology to the Volkswagen Group and Hyundai. ( ) • The owner of Quiksilver surfwear has agreed to buy Billabong for $315 million, according to a person familiar with the situation. ( ) • The private equity firm Silver Lake has agreed to buy a majority stake in the online education company Weld North Education from K.K.R. ( )

The Learning Network runs  , but when we announce a new one, it’s always with trepidation. Will it be too hard? Have we been clear enough about what we’re looking for? Will anyone out there actually take the time to do it? Well, in the case of the  — to connect something you’re studying in school with the world today — we needn’t have worried. Over 1,200 students suggested interesting thematic links between recent Times articles and literary, historical and scientific texts and topics like “Their Eyes Were Watching God,” “Walden,” the Chinese Exclusion Act, the Chandrasekhar Limit and the California gold rush. Some texts came up so often that, if you’re a teacher currently working with any of them, you could do worse than to search this post to find the many and varied ways students see their resonance. “Brave New World,” “Fahrenheit 451,” “The Prince,” “1984,” "Othello” and “Macbeth” are in that category. Certain issues in the news also appeared in all kinds of contexts. The #MeToo movement reminded students of literature like “Jane Eyre” and “The Handmaid’s Tale,” but one student also thought Newton’s first two laws of motion applied, while another saw an analogy to the rock cycle in geology. Participants discovered that fake news is old news, with clear parallels in the plots of “The Crucible” and “The Great Gatsby.” President Trump was compared to literary characters including Macbeth and Grendel, and his policies were invoked in examining topics as varied as “The Scarlet Letter” and the Indian Removal Act. Below, in alphabetical order, is a list of winners, runners-up and honorable mentions, including full essays by our top eight winners. All told, the list represents the work of 50 students, more than we usually call out in our contests. But not only were there simply that many ideas we wanted to honor, we also think the variety and originality of the choices speak for themselves: Any future student who wonders what school-assigned reading has to do with “the real world” only has to look at this list to see how easy it is to answer that question. 17, New Tech High @ Coppell: “Fahrenheit 451” by Ray Bradbury and “ ” 16, Concord Carlisle Regional High School: “Walden” and “ ” 17, Concord Carlisle High School: “White Privilege: Unpacking the Invisible Knapsack” by Peggy McIntosh and “ ” 16, Livingston High School: “The Great Gatsby” by F. Scott Fitzgerald and “ ” 16, Mamaroneck High School: “The Adventures of Huckleberry Finn” by Mark Twain and “ ” 17, Concord-Carlisle Regional High School: “The Merchant of Venice” and “ ”  17, Oceanside High School: “The Scarlet Letter” and “ ” 19, Texas A&M University: Stereotype threat and “ ” 17, St. Ignatius College Prep: “Beowulf” and  15, Jamesville-DeWitt High School: The Stanford Prison Experiment and “ ” 14, Biotechnology High School: “The Crucible” by Arthur Miller and “ ” , 15, Hoggard High School: Genghis Khan and “ ” 18, New Tech High @ Coppell: “Brave New World” by Aldous Huxley and “ ” 17, St. John’s School: “Invisible Man” and “ ” , 16, Oceanside High School: Newton’s Laws and “ ” , 15, New Milford High School: “Othello” by William Shakespeare and “ ” 16, Bergen County Academies: “Troilus and Cressida” by William Shakespeare and “ ’” 18, Women’s Christian College: “Doctor Faustus” by Christopher Marlowe and “ ” , 16, Livingston High School: “The Great Gatsby” by F. Scott Fitzgerald and “ ” , 17, South Forsyth High School: “The History Teacher” by Billy Collins and ” , 16, Arlington High School: Foreign-language study in school and “ ” 18, University of Oregon: “The Blank Page” by Karen Blixen and “ ” 18, South Forsyth High School: “Tulip Mania” in 17th century Holland and  , 16, Saint Ignatius College Prep: “Macbeth” by William Shakespeare and “ ” 16, Yarmouth High School: The Chinese Exclusion Act and “ ” 16, Livingston High School: “The Great Gatsby” by F. Scott Fitzgerald and “ ” , 16, Duxbury High School: “David Copperfield” by Charles Dickens and  ” 18, Classical High School: “1984” by George Orwell and “ ” , 17, Cosby High School: The Civil War and “ ” 15, Oceanside High School: The Industrial Revolution and “ ” , 16, Greenwood College School: “Fahrenheit 451” by Ray Bradbury and “ ” , 14, Oceanside High School: Orchestra class arrangements for modern music and “ ” and , 14, St. Michael’s Episcopal School: The geology concept of the rock cycle and “ ” , 17, New Milford High School: “Othello” by William Shakespeare and “ ”  17, Sandra Day O’Connor High School: “The Prince” by Niccolo Machiavelli and “ ” , 13, Asheville Catholic: The Indian Removal Act and “ ” , 16, Concord Carlisle High School: “The Wretched of the Earth” by Franz Fannon and “ ” , 16, Wekiva High School: “Macbeth” by William Shakespeare and “ ” , 17, New Milford High School: “Othello” by William Shakespeare and “ ” , 16, Concord Carlisle Regional High School: “Things Fall Apart” by Chinua Achebe and “ ” , 16, Arlington High School: Women’s rights movements in the Antebellum period and “ ” , 18, Eunoia Junior College: “Woman in Mind” by Alan Ayckbourn and “ ” , 18, New Tech High at Coppell: “Brave New World” by Aldous Huxley and “ ” , 17, New Milford High School: “Othello” by William Shakespeare and “ ”  16, North Carolina School of Science and Math: “The Yellow Wallpaper” by Charlotte Perkins Gilman and “ ” , 17, CICS Ralph Ellison: “Their Eyes Were Watching God” by Zora Neale Hurston and  , 16, Garden City High School: “Frankenstein” by Mary Shelley and “ ” , 14, West Windsor Plainsboro High School North: “Jane Eyre” by Charlotte Brontë and “ ” , 16, Concord Carlisle High School: “The Danger of a Single Story” by Chimamanda Ngozi Adichie and “ ” , 16, Arlington High School: Injustice to Native Americans and the doctrine of Manifest Destiny and “ ” , 16, Folsom High School: “Hamlet” by William Shakespeare and “ ” 16, Oceanside High School: Election and presidency of Andrew Jackson and “ ” , 17, Concord Carlisle Regional High School: “Things Fall Apart” by Chinua Achebe and “ ” , 15: Climate change and “ ” , 14, C. Leon King High School: The French Revolution and “ ” , 16, The Seven Hills School: “Beowulf” and “ ” , 17, Arlington High School: The California gold rush and “ ” , 16, North Broward Preparatory School: “Twelfth Night” by William Shakespeare and “ ” 17, South Forsyth High School: “The Namesake” by Jhumpa Lahiri and “ ” , 17, New Tech High School @ Coppell: “Brave New World” by Aldous Huxley and “ ” , 16, Concord Carlisle High School: South African Truth and Reconciliation Commission and “ ” , 16, Cosby High School: The 1848 Seneca Falls Convention and “ ” , 16, Sandra Day O’Connor High School: “The Prince” by Niccolo Machiavelli and “ ” , 13, St. Michael’s Episcopal School: The 1885-1908 rubber craze in Congo and “ ” , 17, South Forsyth High School: “Southern Cop” by Sterling Brown and “ ” 15, Biotechnology High School: The Chandrasekhar Limit (the maximum mass of a stable white dwarf star) and “ ” _________ • The lesson plan that accompanied this challenge:  • Our  , in which The Learning Network matches often-taught literary, historical and scientific texts with Times articles past and present. • O , “Ripped From the Headlines and Applied to the Classics: Pairing Often-Taught Literary and History Texts With Times Articles and Multimedia,” which explores more ideas for helping students make connections like these. _________
Nothing is what it seems in the joyously ersatz   a 1958 exploitation film produced by Albert Zugsmith, newly available from Olive Films on Blu-ray and DVD. The movie’s resident blond bombshell, Mamie Van Doren, is not Jayne Mansfield (let alone Marilyn Monroe). Her “nephew” Russ Tamblyn, the bad-attitude new kid at Santa Bellow High, is not James Dean and also, spoiler alert, not what he seems. Neither is Jackie Coogan, once Charlie Chaplin’s little sidekick in “The Kid,” first glimpsed tickling the ivories in a Santa Bellow nightclub cum malt shop. The rockabilly star Jerry Lee Lewis, who opens the film pounding out “Boppin’ at the High School Bop” on a flatbed truck inching past Santa Bellow High, is not Elvis — not that any of the school’s over-age students would care. Three years and a change in management after “The Blackboard Jungle,” MGM’s superserious exposé of juvenile delinquency run amok, the studio released a blatantly, if not then obviously, facetious satire of the teenage crime wave, replete with hot rods, switchblades and jive talk, not to mention intimations of under-age sex, hard drugs and rock ’n’ roll. “Most ‘squares’ should feel like remnants of the Stone Age after seeing yesterday’s new film at the Loew’s State,” Howard Thompson began his review in The New York Times. At once a sincere exploitation film and a Mad magazine parody of the form, “High School Confidential!” was directed with a straight face by Jack Arnold (best known for his science-fiction movies   and  ); not until John Waters’s 1970 burlesque of hippie tolerance,   would there be a comparable travesty of the youth film. “High School Confidential!” cautions against drug use (there are two scenes of nice young girls going through heroin withdrawal) even as it revels in drug culture argot. The head jokes are so plentiful and the suburban locations so antiseptic, the movie might have been called “Gidget Goes to Pot” or “The Adventures of Doobie Gillis.” Playing multiple angles, Zugsmith padded his cast with undistinguished namesakes: Charles Chaplin Jr., William Wellman Jr. and John Drew Barrymore. Actually, Barrymore (son of John, father of Drew) had a large and memorable part as the high school pusher, including a showstopping solo in which he delights his English class with a slangy riff on Christopher Columbus. The material, as well as the delivery, is suggestive of the hipster stand-up comedian Lord Buckley and was in fact supplied by Buckley’s gag man, the Columbia Ph.D. and Hollywood beatnik Mel Welles. Welles’s other contribution is even more electrifying: an incantatory nihilistic prose poem forcefully delivered by a finger-snapping beat chick (Phillipa Fallon). “Tomorrow is a drag, man,”   at regular intervals. “Tomorrow is a king-sized bust.” With its well-staged drag race (a wheel detaches to spin toward the viewer as a car flips over) and climactic slugfest, not to mention the twerking camera placement contrived for Mr. Lewis’s second number, “High School Confidential!” burnishes Arnold’s reputation as one of the great drive-in directors of the 1950s. The auteur, however, is Zugsmith. Were it not for two near-contemporaneous productions, Douglas Sirk’s   and Orson Welles’s   and Zugsmith’s own 3-D recording of Phil Silvers cavorting around a Broadway stage in   “High School Confidential!” would be this creative  . Zugsmith’s first production, the sensationalized Civil Defense film “Invasion USA” (1952), featuring a stock footage nuclear attack, would not be out of place on the DVD “Target You! II,” the Bear Family sequel to their 2005 compilation of official civil defense movies. “Community Shelter Planning” (1967) dwells on the logistical difficulties that responsible politicians and hard-nose government experts (Gene Hackman among them) have in thinking about the unthinkable and planning for the unplannable. Somewhat livelier, “Public Shelter Living: The Story of Shelter 104” (1964) is a nuclear version of   with a disparate gaggle of citizens taking shelter as the hard rain falls, demoralized by the defeatist railings of a drunken folk singer. This half-hour movie dramatizes his change of heart, ending as he cheerfully serenades the residents of Shelter 104 at their Sunday prayer service. , which comes with informative notes by Bill Geerhart, a Cold War historian, also includes two military training films released during the Korean War (“Face to Face With Communism” and   both 1951) and the hourlong “Freedom and You” (1962), known in its shorter version as   Narrated by Jack Webb, star of the TV cop show   this elaborate educational film first imagines the Warner Bros. small-town set as a secret training site “deep behind the Iron Curtain” and then — shades of “The Twilight Zone” — punishes the complacent pater familias Jerry Donovan (a machinist with three kids, a stay-at-home wife and a capacious suburban home), by teleporting him to the Soviet movie set. Although Jerry’s major sins are dodging a P.T.A. meeting and forgetting his son’s Cub Scout banquet, his “red nightmare” is triggered by rage over his 17-year-old daughter’s decision to marry her just-drafted boyfriend. The movie peaks when, having been put on trial for busting up the People’s Museum (a former church), Bill is denounced by his daughter, now a brainwashed Young Pioneer in tailored safari garb, as “the ugly remnant of a diseased bourgeois class.” This psychosexual tension makes “Freedom and You” something more than camp. Had the movie been directed by Arnold, with an assist from Mel Welles, it might have been something more than that.  Musical comedy merges with pathology in Bob Fosse’s  , starring Roy Scheider as Fosse’s alter ego in a movie that, among other things, imagines his own death. The show must go on ... and on. Writing in The New York Times in 1979, Vincent Canby called “All That Jazz,” out in a dual edition with appreciative notes by Hilton Als, “an uproarious display of brilliance, nerve, dance, maudlin confessions, inside jokes and, especially, ego.” (Criterion)  Mickey Rooney animates this 1954  , now on DVD, directed by Richard Quine from Blake Edwards’s script. A scarred and vulnerable auto mechanic, Rooney is vamped by the statuesque if wooden Diane Foster and trapped into driving the getaway car for a bank heist organized by the smoothie Kevin McCarthy with cataclysmic results. (Sony Choice)  This is how the world ends ... at least for Ava Gardner, Gregory Peck, Anthony Perkins and (in a rare dramatic role) Fred Astaire, as a massive cloud of nuclear fallout drifts inexorably toward Australia. To see how seriously Stanley Kramer’s adaptation of Nevil Shute’s best-selling account of   was taken in 1959, watch the trailer included on both the DVD and Blu-ray versions. (Kino Lorber)  Jim Jarmusch’s languidly beautiful contribution to the current vampires cycle, out on Blu-ray and DVD, imagines the bloodsuckers Tilda Swinton and Tom Hiddleston as a glamorous pair of crypto-addict aesthetes. “In many ways, ‘Only Lovers Left Alive’ is among Mr. Jarmusch’s most voluptuous movies — full of rare and gorgeous images and sounds, heavy with wistful sighs and sprinkled with wry, knowing jokes — but it is also thin and pale, and perhaps too afraid of daylight for its own good,” A. O. Scott wrote in The Times   (Sony)  A Mexican-American teenager is charged with sexual assault resulting in the death of an Anglo classmate in this belated 1955 response to the 1942  . Directed by Mark Robson, it uses a naïve law professor, Glenn Ford, to triangulate between rabid nativists and unscrupulous Communists. This MGM problem film, now available on DVD, was a personal project of Dore Schary, the liberal studio head who was soon after forced from the company. (Warners Archive)
• Archer Daniels Midland has approached Bunge about a possible takeov • Lowe’s adds three new directors amid pressure from activist investors. • Questioning whether Vice will have a harder time selling itself now. • We’re warily waiting to see if the government shuts down. • How Goldman Sachs alumni churned through the Trump administration. • How bad did things at Uber get under Travis Kalanick? Archer Daniels Midland  , the WSJ’s Dana Mattioli and Jacob Bunge report citing people familiar with the matter. The move sets up a possible bidding war with Glencore. • Glencore said in May that   to Bunge. At the time, Glencore said: “Discussions may or may not materialize.” • In October,  that the two companies have a standstill agreement that blocks Glencore from buying Bunge’s stock and from making a hostile bid. The agreement expires in the coming weeks.  that the home retailer is adding is   of Relational Investors, who has long prodded for change at companies like Hess. The other two incoming directors are: •   of Adtalem Global Education •   of T. Rowe Price  D.E. Shaw, which had   at Lowe’s and planned to call for change at the retailer. The company has long trailed Home Depot in the market for selling hammers, lumber and power tools to homeowners and professional contractors. Here’s what Robert Niblock, Lowe’s chairman, said of the appointments in a statement: is Quentin Koffey of D.E. Shaw, who was part of the team at Elliott Management who   five years ago along with Mr. Batchelder. Mr. Koffey moved over to D.E. Shaw last summer Here’s what he said of today’s announcement: •   continued to press Qualcomm into raising its offer for NXP Semiconductor well above $135 a share, which the hedge fund says is NXP’s value on a standalone basis. ( ) •   wants Xerox, of which he owns a 9.7 percent, to renegotiate a joint venture with Fujifilm. And if the board won’t do it, he wants those directors replaced. ( ) • Lex writes of  ’s plan to more than double the management stake in his firm’s publicly traded investment vehicle: “A champion of shareholder rights should be beyond reproach in his treatment of his own shareholders. That is not consistent with getting a board waiver to breach a 4.9 percent ownership limit, even if other investors can apply as well.” ( ) In the wake of the #MeToo movement and the media empire’s problems with allegations of misconduct —   by Emily Steel of the NYT — some in the industry are speculating that Vice may have a harder time selling itself. More from  : • The company isn’t as dependent on digital advertising as peers like BuzzFeed. • It also has a number of sources of revenue, from its HBO shows to its branded content studio to its subscription service in Asia. • And it has a presence in 40 countries. Mr. Vance, a venture capitalist and the author of “Hillbilly Elegy,” had been courted by Republicans as a potential candidate for the Senate. Specifically, to run against Senator Sherrod Brown, the incumbent Democratic senator who’s up for re-election this year. But Mr. Vance squelched that talk today: Where ADT hoped to price its stock:   a share Where ADT priced its shares:   per share Where ADT is trading now: About   a share Shares of Overstock.com briefly rose  after the  ,  Kroger may be eyeing a deal for the e-commerce company. The report comes a little more than a month after Patrick Byrne, Overstock’s chief executive,   “he expects to have a deal in the next three months on selling or reorganizing the company’s retail business to focus on blockchain.” Overstock was recently up 2.6 percent. One of the great mysteries of the recovery is why wage growth has remained lackluster as the labor market has tightened. Average hourly earnings rose just 2.5 percent last year, below the Fed’s target and in line with recent years. But there has been some optimism that wage growth might pick up this year because: 1) The unemployment rate should continue to fall; 2) Companies are doling out one-time bonuses and pay raises in response to the new tax law; 3) Several cities and states raised the minimum wage on Jan. 1. The economists at BofA Merrill Lynch took a closer look these dynamics, and here’s their take away: So far, the markets don’t seem bothered. S. & P. 500 futures were up this morning. Will that change as the Senate   over the House’s stopgap funding bill? Democrats so far appear united on wanting a permanent shield for the young immigrants known as Dreamers (something  ), and Senate Republicans need 60 votes to pass the funding bill.  Money to keep the government open for a month, six years’ funding for the Children’s Health Insurance Program, and the delay or suspension of several taxes tied to the Affordable Care Act.  House Minority Leader Nancy Pelosi said, “This is like giving you a bowl of doggy doo, put a cherry on top and call it a chocolate sundae.” If Democrats force a shutdown and win the escalating political battle, they could have more clout to push back against President Trump’s agenda, including further deregulation of industries. If Republicans win, they could add to legislative momentum from their tax overhaul victory. How Mr. Trump   with his chief of staff, John Kelly. Dina Powell is gone. So is Steve Bannon. Anthony Scaramucci was barely there. And soon, Gary Cohn is expected to leave. What was expected to be   in the Trump administration is down to, primarily, Steven Mnuchin. Here’s what Newt Gingrich told Jim Stewart of the NYT: • The Senate is weighing whether to clamp down on Chinese acquisitions of U.S. tech companies. ( ) • The White House is considering appointing John Williams, the head of the San Francisco Fed, as vice chairman of the Federal Reserve, according to unnamed sources. Meanwhile, a vacancy at the New York Fed has given critics of Mr. Trump hope of being able to partially counter the president’s economic agenda ( ,  ) • Mick Mulvaney, the interim head of the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, sought precisely $0 for the agency’s budget this quarter. ( ) • Could the tax law — and companies like Apple that are repatriating cash — boost the dollar? ( ) , according to Bloomberg Businessweek’s latest cover story. Here’s a detail about Mr. Kalanick’s apology to Fawzi Kamel, an Uber driver with whom he had had a heated, and videotaped, argument: Still, Mr. Kalanick is doing OK in some respects. He’s   after a consortium led by the SoftBank closed its $9.3 billion investment in Uber yesterday. A senior executive at the Japanese tech giant, who is set to become an Uber director, is already challenging the ride-hailing giant’s strategy of worldwide domination. It should   in the U.S., Europe, Latin America and Australia, Rajeev Misra told the FT. Mr. Misra insisted that his suggestion wasn’t about cutting losses but about focusing on promising areas for growth. On Twitter, our colleague Mike Isaac had, shall we say,  . Twenty cities got a rose from Amazon and are   for its second headquarters. What New York City, Atlanta, Toronto, Denver and the others  , according to Nick Wingfield of the NYT: It’s notable that three contenders are in the D.C. area. And would Amazon dare   by  ? • Detroit: “This is the N.F.L. Economic development at this level,  ,” said Sandy Baruah of the Detroit Regional Chamber, who said that the city fell short on developing and attracting talent. • San Diego: Cindy Gompper-Graves of the South County Economic Development Council said that the city might have done better if California had been  . • Tom Buerkle writes, “Hundreds of cities hoped Amazon would think outside the box, but a desire for talent and a welcoming environment led it to the usual hot spots.” ( ) • Brian Alexander worries about how cities court big companies: “The way most cities pursue that goal — by offering to forfeit enormous amounts of tax revenues — produces outcomes that have worried many economists for years.” ( ) The S.E.C. questioned how the virtual currency’s volatility and potential illiquidity  , which must calculate a fair market price for their portfolio at the end of every trading day and let investors cash out easily. And Europe's Securities and Markets Authority said that it may restrict retail investors from   that let investors bet on the price of virtual currencies without owning them outright (so-called contracts for difference). If Santa left you Bitcoin under your virtual tree, or if you just bought some, you   The tax collector regards virtual currencies as property, not money. In the restaurant industry, it’s involved  . Here’s what Shannon White, the C.O.O. of John Besh’s restaurant group in New Orleans, said of taking over after the eponymous restaurateur left amid scandal: Meanwhile, a study by McKinsey & Company found that companies with more diverse executive teams   than their peers.  Moira Donegan said that  . “I think that every time we get a little louder, and we get a little closer to making the changes that actually need to be made,” she told the NYT in a video interview. From a LinkedIn post by Glenn Kelman, the online real estate brokerage’s C.E.O.: . Mr. Kelman also reflects on flying commercial to save money (which left him with delays and Sbarro’s pizza) and nerves about whether the I.P.O. would take off. •  , the veteran Wall Street deal maker who has long led the Blackstone Group’s alternative-asset business, is  ; he’ll remain chairman. John McCormick will take over as C.E.O. • Bank of America Merrill Lynch’s global head of tech, media and telecom investment banking,  ,  , according to CNBC. • Snap laid off two dozen workers in New York and London, half of them content producers, consolidating its content work in Los Angeles. ( ) • Investment banks often say that underwriting debt and equity issues for companies brings in trading activity and vice versa, but big banks’ latest results don’t always back that up. ( ) • IBM’s revenue grew for the first time in five-and-a-half years, but not enough to erase industry analysts’ doubts. ( ) • Researchers at the Electronic Frontier Foundation and Lookout said they had evidence that Lebanon’s intelligence agency had spied on thousands of people via their computers and cellphones, primarily via decoy apps. ( ) • Wyndham Worldwide will buy La Quinta’s hotel operations for $1.95 billion. ( ) • Dogus Holding is working with advisers to spin off some of its restaurants into a separate unit for a potential initial public offering. That would include the Nusr-Et steakhouse, founded by Nusret Gokce, or Salt Bae. ( ) • Hackers who attacked a petrochemical plant in Saudi Arabia last year gained control over a safety shut-off system that is critical in defending against catastrophic events, according to security researchers. ( ) • H.S.B.C. agreed to pay a $101.5 million penalty over attempts to manipulate foreign exchange markets, in a settlement with the Department of Justice that lets the bank avoid pleading guilty to criminal charges. ( ) • ADT, the security company owned by Apollo Global Management, said on Thursday that its initial public offering was priced well below its expected range. ( ) • The U.S. government will not approve any investment by HNA Group until the Chinese conglomerate provides adequate information on its shareholders, according to a person familiar with the situation. ( )
SAN FRANCISCO — For the last two years, rival factions have been vying for control of the Bitcoin virtual currency and its global network of computers and supporters. Now, one of the main camps is preparing to break off and create a competing version of Bitcoin. A group of investors and entrepreneurs, most of them based in Asia, have announced a plan to create what they are calling Bitcoin Cash, starting next week. The plan would seal a divorce between opponents in a long-simmering feud over what Bitcoin should be — and lead to two competing virtual currencies going by the name of Bitcoin. “I actually think it would be a good thing if there is a split,” said  , a Tokyo-based investor who voiced his preliminary support for Bitcoin Cash on Tuesday. He said the differences among the different camps had quite likely grown too stark for them to move forward together. Bitcoin Cash could easily dissolve into irrelevance — the level of support for it is still unclear — but the concrete plans to move forward have underscored, once again, how hard it is to govern a decentralized, open-source technology like Bitcoin with no single set of leaders or ownership. “In the long run it will be forced to develop some real political structure to take these kinds of decisions, but it just isn’t there yet, so the result has been chaos,” said Joseph Bonneau, who has studied Bitcoin and is a fellow at the  , which describes itself as a nonprofit defending digital privacy, free speech and innovation. The Bitcoin divide is part of a wider splintering of the world that has sprung up around virtual currencies. Many people who initially got excited about   have taken advantage of the public, open-source nature of the technology and created their own new virtual currencies, like Ethereum, Ripple and Litecoin. These other systems run according to different rules than Bitcoin, with some emphasizing more speed and complexity, and some more focused on anonymity and security. The divisions have, if anything, increased the excitement and the value of all the virtual currencies in the world — and banks and governments have   to harness the technology. The price of Bitcoin has recently been at record highs, near $3,000, and several other coins have grown to be worth billions of dollars on their own. A whole class of companies have   by creating and selling their own new digital tokens. Until now, though, Bitcoin has remained the most valuable digital token of them all, and it has kept its followers united by a single set of rules, despite all the warring behind the scenes. The divisions, though, appear to have grown too stark to keep everyone on the same blockchain, as the ledger of all Bitcoin transactions is known. Mr. Ver has been one of the leaders of a contingent that has long wanted to change the rules governing the Bitcoin network so that it can handle more transactions and compete with the likes of PayPal and Visa. Bitcoin Cash is set to increase the limit on the number of transactions that can be processed by the Bitcoin network every 10 minutes. Currently, the network can process only blocks of transactions that are smaller than one megabyte, which allows for roughly five transactions in a second. The move to increase the size of the so-called blocks, though, has run up against intense opposition from the programmers who maintain the Bitcoin software. These programmers, known as the core developers, have said that increasing the amount of data included in each block of transactions would make it harder for individual users to process the blocks and easier for a small number of companies to take control of the Bitcoin network. “It destroys the Bitcoin ethos, which is open and permissionless, where nobody is telling you what to do,” said Samson Mow, the chief strategy officer at Blockstream, a company that employs some of the most prominent core developers. The core developers have come up with their own solution to increase the number of transactions flowing through the system with software known as Segregated Witness, or SegWit. Mr. Ver and others, though, have said SegWit does not expand Bitcoin fast enough to keep up with its recent growth in popularity. The arguments have given way to vicious mudslinging and hacking attacks against the leaders on both sides,  . Proponents of increasing the block size, like Mr. Ver, have put forward proposals in the past that have failed to garner majority support in the community, in part because of concerns about the sophistication of the programmers working on the projects. But the big block camp has not, until now, announced a definite plan to split off from the rest of Bitcoin. While Bitcoin Cash will not exist until next week, a small number of exchanges have begun trading futures contracts, tied to the expected price of Bitcoin Cash. On Tuesday,  , or a fraction of the $2,600 value of an ordinary Bitcoin. As recently as last week, it appeared that the major Bitcoin players had found a compromise that would avert a split in the network, or a fork as it is known in Bitcoin world. Many of the largest Bitcoin companies   that they would install the SegWit software the core developers created, while also moving toward a doubling of the size of each block of transactions, to two megabytes, in November. The largest Bitcoin processors had signaled last week that they intended to begin running the new software on Aug. 1. But the developers have suggested that they do not intend to move forward with any increase in the size of the blocks in the coming months. One of Mr. Ver’s many investment holdings,  ,   that it would put all of its resources behind Bitcoin Cash if the block size has not been doubled by November. To gain traction more broadly, Bitcoin Cash will have to win backing from the broader community of so-called Bitcoin miners. Bitcoin miners are best known for using specialized computers to unlock, or mine, new Bitcoins. But miners also process Bitcoin transactions and have voting power over any changes to the Bitcoin network in direct proportion to the amount of computing power they dedicate to the network. Most of the largest mining operations are now in China, thanks to the availability of cheap hardware and electricity. One significant Chinese mining operation, ViaBTC, has been an outspoken supporter of Bitcoin Cash and has said it will begin backing the system next week. The largest Bitcoin mining operator in the world, a company known as Bitmain, is a primary investor in ViaBTC. That has led many in the Bitcoin world to expect that Bitmain will also provide backing to Bitcoin Cash. But Bitmain has   that it does not “rule out” supporting Bitcoin Cash. , every current holder of Bitcoins will have access to an equivalent amount of Bitcoin Cash, but from that point forward the two systems will diverge. In the coming weeks, Bitcoin enthusiasts on all sides of the debate will be watching closely to see which big Bitcoin companies offer support for people who want to hold, trade and mine Bitcoin Cash.
METZ, France — French and Japanese flags flap in tandem at the Pompidou Center here, hailing the fall program at this sister venue of the Paris museum of contemporary art. Its exhibitions include one about , and the recently opened “ ,” a survey of Japan’s contemporary art since 1970, on view through March 5. “Japanorama” picks up where an important 1986 exhibition at the Pompidou Center in Paris, “Avant-Garde Arts of Japan 1910-1970,” left off. That show presented some important Japanese artists abroad for the first time — but it examined their work as influenced by, and even dependent on, Western art traditions. Aomi Okabe, who was part of the 1986 show’s curatorial committee and is currently artistic director of exhibitions at the  , said that, at the time, “the French public considered modern Japanese paintings of the early 20th century copies of European art, especially from France.” The subtitle of “Japanorama” is “New Vision on Art Since 1970,” the year that Japan began to reassert its own cultural identity, spurred by the new confidence it found at Expo ’70 in Osaka. The show is a “discovery of what was overlooked,” the curator, Yuko Hasegawa, said. While Japan wrestled with complicated issues of modernization and heritage, its culture was understood in the West though clichéd binaries: The ascetic Zen of a rock garden on one hand, the gleeful kitsch of Hello Kitty on the other. The exhibition corrects this reductive caricature, examining the way the push and pull between tradition and technology, individual and collective, have shaped the culture in unique ways. For European audiences, what’s new about this “New Vision” is examining contemporary Japanese art on its own terms. European interest in Japanese art dates back to the 19th century — van Gogh collected Ukiyo-e prints, Monet modeled his water lily pond at Giverny on Japanese gardens — yet many of today’s art institutions rarely showcase non-Western contemporary art. There have been piecemeal exhibitions in Paris over the past year, among them shows at the  ,  ,   and  . But no exhibition here in France has examined Japanese creativity across eras, mediums and generations. In 2016, the French and Japanese governments announced  , a diplomatic initiative to highlight Japanese culture through exhibitions and events in France in 2018. The cooperation is a mixed blessing, according to the Franco-Japanese gallerist  , who represents both European and Japanese artists. “I’m really happy about this — the Japanese scene is worthy of being presented in depth and detail,” he says. However, “there’s the fear of returning to orientalism.” He added, “There’s nothing worse for an artist than becoming a curiosity.” How to prevent flattening cultural context while encouraging foreign audiences to embrace the unfamiliar? Ms. Hasegawa tackles that question in “Japanorama.” Having previously presented Japanese contemporary art in Brazil, Britain and Germany, she “looked very carefully at the past 10-15 years: what was organized, what kind of Japanese contemporary art has been collected in public institutions in Europe.” She continued: “I want to bring awareness to context behind what people misunderstand, to the social commentary behind the works.” Ms. Hasegawa’s vast and thoughtful synopsis encompasses six themes (called “archipelagos”) that bridge art, architecture, video, fashion and music. She porously connects movements and multimedia across two floors, with a mise-en-scène conceived by the Tokyo architects SANAA. (The Pompidou Center Metz itself was designed by the Japanese architect Shigeru Ban). The first section, “Strange Object/Post-Human Body,” confronts visitors with “Electric Dress,” a multicolored cluster of lights, created in 1956 by Atsuko Tanaka, that prefigures today’s evolving relationship between the physical and the digital. The piece resonates with Comme des Garçons garments on display, which present an alternative approach to Western ideas of beauty and body image. Transfigurations unfurl throughout this section: Ms. Hasegawa notes “traumatic ideas about the atomic bomb and pollution-activated mutation” in two “very weird, very critical” late 1960s cocoon pods by  ). New technology informs the work of the ’80s collective  , the techno-pop musical outfit Yellow Magic Orchestra and the programmers and artists behind  . Rhizomatiks contributes a visualization of Bitcoin’s blockchain system rejigged according to live transactions, in a digital ballet that shows a forward-looking evolution of Japanese creativity. Within the Pop Art sphere, Ms. Hasegawa has highlighted works with a strong conceptual background and Japanese specificity. She wishes to undercut the way in which Japanese pop culture is often understood as sunny or silly: The graphic kitsch is, in fact, inherently critical, she says. “It’s vernacular — but also very sophisticated,” she added. The artist Takashi Murakami’s work in this vein, is perhaps the most well-known, but it is also the most misunderstood. The painted smileys of his “Cosmos” are not just bright and fun — the composition owes everything to 18th-century Edo paintings. His lesser-known “Polyrhythm Red” canvas, adorned with Tamiya soldier figurines, reflects, Ms. Hasegawa said, “Japanese culture becoming childish,” and a malaise about violence and vulnerability. The exhibition also overturns the seeming naïveté of “kawaii,” Japan’s signature brand of cute, to reveal assertions of sociopolitical frustration. A 2002 kimono using Bingata, the traditional dyed fabric of Okinawa — where the artist Yuken Teruya grew up, near a United States Army base — is especially striking. The cheery flowers and trees on the garment are, upon closer inspection, composed of fighter planes and parachutes. The exhibition concludes with a section on “Materiality and Minimalism,” highlighting examples such as Hiroshi Sugimoto’s calm photographs of horizon lines and  ’s trancelike work based on numerical data. “It’s a landing,” Ms. Hasegawa said of the exhibition’s finale, to “look at something sublime.” ’s breathtaking “ ,” an installation of viscous black silicone oil, which rains down without making a splash, appears soothing, but this is deceptive: Its subject is radioactive fallout. Like many works in “Japanorama,” it shows that simple does not mean straightforward, that beautiful things can contain disquieting fears. To grapple with these nuances requires being open to another perspective. In this sense, the show’s most emblematic piece is by the artist  . His video “Then, I Decided to Give a Tour of Tokyo to the Octopus from Akashi,” is as gently funny as it is affecting. He collects an octopus from his hometown and brings it to the metropolis on the bullet train — takes it to the fish market, introduces it to another octopus there — and eventually releases it back into the sea. It’s a fitting narrative for visitors to the exhibition, who, at the end, are returned to their usual setting, more enlightened for having explored an unfamiliar territory.
LONDON —   announced the arrest on Saturday night of the prominent billionaire investor Prince Alwaleed bin Talal, plus at least 10 other princes, four ministers and tens of former ministers. The announcement of the arrests was made over Al Arabiya, the Saudi-owned satellite network whose broadcasts are officially approved. Prince Alwaleed’s arrest is sure to send shock waves both through   and the world’s major financial centers. He controls the investment firm Kingdom Holding and is one of the world’s richest men, owning or having owned major stakes in 21st Century Fox, Citigroup, Apple, Twitter and many other well-known companies. The prince also controls satellite television networks watched across the Arab world. The sweeping campaign of arrests appears to be the latest move to consolidate the power of  , the favorite son and top adviser of King Salman. At 32, the crown prince is already the dominant voice in Saudi military, foreign, economic and social policies, stirring murmurs of discontent in the royal family that he has amassed too much personal power, and at a remarkably young age. The king had decreed the creation of a powerful new anti-corruption committee, headed by the crown prince, only hours before the committee ordered the arrests. Al Arabiya said that the anticorruption committee has the right to investigate, arrest, ban from travel, or freeze the assets of anyone it deems corrupt. The Ritz Carlton hotel in Riyadh, the de facto royal hotel, was evacuated on Saturday, stirring rumors that it would be used to house detained royals. The airport for private planes was closed, arousing speculation that the crown prince was seeking to block rich businessmen from fleeing before more arrests. Prince Alwaleed was giving interviews to the Western news media as recently as late last month about subjects like so-called crypto currencies and Saudi Arabia’s plans for a public offering of shares in its state oil company, Aramco. He has also recently sparred publicly with President Donald J. Trump. The prince was part of a group of investors who bought control of the Plaza Hotel in New York from Mr. Trump, and he also bought an expensive yacht from him as well. But in a twitter message in 2015 the prince called Mr. Trump “a disgrace not only to the GOP but to all America.” Mr. Trump fired back, also on Twitter, that “Dopey Prince   wants to control our U.S. politicians with daddy’s money.” As president, Mr. Trump has developed a warm, mutually supportive relationship with the ascendant crown prince, who has rocketed from near obscurity in recent years to taking control of the country’s most important functions. But his swift rise has also divided Saudis. Many applaud his vision, crediting him with addressing the economic problems facing the kingdom and laying out a plan to move beyond its dependence on oil. Others see him as brash, power-hungry and inexperienced, and they resent him for bypassing his elder relatives and concentrating so much power in one branch of the family. At least three senior White House officials, including the president’s son-in-law, Jared Kushner, were reportedly in Saudi Arabia last month for meetings that were undisclosed at the time. Before sparring with Mr. Trump, Prince Alwaleed was publicly rebuffed by Mayor Rudolph W. Giuliani, who   for the victims of the Sept. 11 terrorist attacks in New York because the prince had also criticized American foreign policy. As powerful as the billionaire is, he is something of an outsider within the royal family — not a dissident, but an unusually outspoken figure on a variety of issues. He openly supported women driving long before the kingdom said it would grant them  , and he has long employed women in his orbit. In 2015 he pledged to donate his fortune of $32 billion to charity after his death. It was unclear Saturday whether Saudi Arabia’s corruption committee might seek to confiscate any of his assets. Saudi Arabia is an executive monarchy without a written Constitution or independent government institutions like a Parliament or courts, so accusations of corruption are difficult to evaluate. The boundaries between the public funds and the wealth of the royal family are murky at best, and corruption, as other countries would describe it, is believed to be widespread. The arrests came a few hours after the king replaced the minister in charge of the Saudi national guard, Prince Mutaib bin Abdullah, who controlled the last of the three Saudi armed forces not yet considered to be under control of the crown prince. The king named Crown Prince Mohammed the minister of defense in 2015. Earlier this year, the king removed Prince Mohammed bin Nayef as head of the interior ministry, placing him under house arrest and extending the crown prince’s influence over the interior ministry’s troops, which act as a second armed force. Rumors have swirled since then that King Salman and his favorite son would soon move against Prince Mutaib, commander of the third armed force and himself a former contender for the crown.
BOCA RATON, Fla. —  Cryptocurrency exchange operator Coinfloor said on Wednesday it will launch a futures exchange for digital assets that will include the first physically delivered bitcoin futures contracts  next month. The new British Virgin Islands-based trading platform, known as CoinfloorEX, is aimed at hedge funds, proprietary trading firms and sophisticated retail investors, as well as cryptocurrency miners, Mark Lamb, co-founder of Coinfloor, said in an interview. "When you talk to the liquidity providers, they all say the same thing, which is they want a physically delivered futures contract so they can hedge their exposure across exchanges," he said on the sidelines of the Futures Industry Association's annual conference in Boca Raton, Florida. Some traditional futures exchanges, including those run by Cboe Global Markets Inc and CME Group Inc, already offer bitcoin futures. But they are cash settled, meaning the actual cryptocurrency does not change hands. Many proprietary trading firms and large investors have voiced concerns that the cash-settled process can be manipulated too easily, as bad actors can attempt to move the price of the indexes or auctions on spot exchanges that set the futures prices in their favor, Lamb said. The first physically delivered contract launches in April. Coinfloor, which includes the closely held Chicago-based proprietary trading firm DRW among its investors, was started in 2013 and runs the largest UK-based cryptocurrency spot exchange in London and another spot exchange Gibraltar. (Reporting by John McCrank in Boca Raton, Florida; Editing by Dan Grebler)




 Readers of Carl Hiaasen’s new Florida mystery, “Bad Monkey” — it enters the hardcover fiction list at No. 3 — won’t be surprised to learn that there is, in fact, a bad monkey in its pages: Driggs, an animal performer who works on Johnny Depp’s pirate movies until he’s caught masturbating on wigs in the costume trailer. “My vision of the monkey was of a show business monkey that just crashed and burned,” Hiaasen said on NPR recently. “Sort of a Lindsay Lohan of monkeys.” He added that he was struck by pop culture’s recent turn toward the simian: “In every movie it seems you go to now, and TV sitcoms and everywhere you look, there’s sort of a gratuitous monkey,” he said. “I wanted a monkey with a back story.” Devoted Hiaasen fans may recognize the phrase “bad monkey” from the 2004 novel “Skinny Dip,” where it appeared in a similar context: every time the young (human) protagonist retreated to a family bathroom to pleasure himself, his addled stepfather “would turn up the Irish Rovers full blast, rap on the doorjamb and chant, ‘Bad monkey! Bad monkey!’ in an eerie falsetto.” I asked Hiaasen if there was any significance to the repetition, and he laughed. “I didn’t even remember that line from ‘Skinny Dip,’ ” he said. “I swear I didn’t. I don’t know whether it lodged in my unconscious or something — I just thought it was silly and fitting, in that every monkey I’ve ever met has been naughty. I wish it had more depth or meaning than that.”  I’m not sure I’ll ever get used to typing “Dan Brown’s ‘Inferno’ ” — it’s as dissonant a combination as “James Patterson’s ‘Moby-Dick’ ” would be, not that I want Patterson to get any ideas — but since Brown’s Dante-based crypto-thriller still tops the hardcover fiction list after five weeks, I suppose I’d better resign myself. Brown was also near the top of the list a decade ago, on June 29, 2003, when “The Da Vinci Code” was a few months into its total world domination. (The only thing keeping him from the No. 1 spot that week was, as it happened, Patterson’s novel “The Lake House.”) Two other novelists from the 2003 list also appear this week: Lauren Weisberger and Dean Koontz. Here’s the entire fiction list for June 29, 2003: 1) “The Lake House,” by James Patterson. (Little, Brown) 2) “The Da Vinci Code,” by Dan Brown. (Doubleday) 3) “The King of Torts,” by John Grisham. (Doubleday) 4) “The Face,” by Dean Koontz. (Bantam) 5) “Naked Prey,” by John Sandford. (Putnam) 6) “Flirting With Pete,” by Barbara Delinsky. (Scribner) 7) “The Devil Wears Prada,” by Lauren Weisberger. (Doubleday) 8) “The Lovely Bones,” by Alice Sebold. (Little, Brown) 9) “The Guardian,” by Nicholas Sparks. (Warner) 10) “Armageddon,” by Tim LaHaye and Jerry B. Jenkins. (Tyndale) 11) “The Sinister Pig,” by Tony Hillerman. (HarperCollins) 12) “Gettysburg,” by Newt Gingrich andWilliam R. Forstchen. (Thomas Dunne/St. Martin’s) 13) “The Traveler’s Gift,” by Andy Andrews. (Thomas Nelson) 14) “The Dogs of Babel,” by Carolyn Parkhurst. (Little, Brown) 15) “Dead Ringer,” by Lisa Scottoline. (HarperCollins) 16) “Executive Power,” by Vince Flynn. (Atria)
Ross Ulbricht’s last moments as a free man were noisy enough to draw a crowd. Employees at the Glen Park branch of the San Francisco library heard a crashing sound and rushed to the science fiction section, expecting to find a patron had hit the floor. Instead, they found a handful of federal agents surrounding a slender 29-year-old man with light brown hair and wearing a T-shirt and jeans. The goal of the arrest, at 3:15 p.m. on Oct. 1, 2013, was not simply to apprehend Mr. Ulbricht, but also to prevent him from performing the most mundane of tasks: closing his laptop. That computer, according to the F.B.I., was the command center of Silk Road, the world’s largest and most notorious black market for drugs. In just two and a half years, the government says, Silk Road had become a hub for more than $1.2 billion worth of transactions, many of them in cocaine, heroin and LSD. The site was like an eBay for the illicit, celebrated by drug enthusiasts,   by United States senators and stalked by four federal agencies. But because it was run on Tor, an encrypted Internet network, and because it merely connected buyers and sellers — rather than warehousing any products — it seemed to operate in a vaporous cloud. It was a business without infrastructure, other than a few servers and that laptop, which on 3:14 that October afternoon sat on a library desk, open. Had Mr. Ulbricht seen the F.B.I. coming, and simply closed the laptop, password protections probably would have kicked in, turning the hard drive into what Nicholas Weaver, a researcher at the International Computer Science Institute, called “an encrypted lump” that would have been “tougher to break into than Fort Knox.” Whatever tactics were used — the F.B.I. would not comment — they worked. Mr. Ulbricht was administering Silk Road when he was grabbed, the bureau said in a criminal complaint, and working under an alias, Dread Pirate Roberts, the name of a swashbuckling character from the novel and film “The Princess Bride.” The government later released screen photographs showing that Mr. Ulbricht was logged into a page titled “mastermind.” According to the government, operational files were found, including ledgers that tallied personal revenue of 600,000 Bitcoins, the crypto-currency used for every Silk Road transaction, a stash that, at the time, was worth $80 million. A criminal complaint laid out the charges, which included narcotics trafficking, computer hacking and money laundering. An indictment in a parallel but separate investigation, run out of Baltimore, included this startling detail: Some of Dread Pirate Roberts’s booty was spent to commission killings — six killings in total, to be done by hit men whose targets were deemed by Dread Pirate Roberts to threaten Silk Road. None of the orders resulted in actual deaths, the authorities said. One, in fact, was an elaborate fiction concocted by a federal agent posing as a drug dealer. In a scene that sounds as if it were lifted from “Breaking Bad,” federal agents traveled to Utah to fake a beating and execution, sending the evidently grisly photographs to D.P.R., as the government calls him in its complaint. “What’s done is done,” D.P.R. would later write to the putative dealer. News of Mr. Ulbricht’s arrest, and the particulars of the crimes with which he was charged, elicited the inevitable chorus of “They’ve got the wrong guy” from friends and relatives, an almost clichéd feature of double-life cases. But this chorus was different. Sure, Mr. Ulbricht took his share of drugs growing up in Austin, Tex. And a high school buddy, Thomas Haney, said he could sort of imagine Ross   from Silk Road. But running it? Ordering killings? No way. “It’d be like they accused my mother of trying to kill someone,” said Mr. Haney, who now lives in Boise, Idaho. “He’s one of the most guileless and nonaggressive people I’ve ever met.” A man who shared a house with Mr. Ulbricht in San Francisco for two months remembers how he rushed to help an elderly homeless woman in a wheelchair. “We were standing outside a restaurant, and he just handed me the leash to my dogs, ran into the street and said, ‘Can I help you?’ ” said the man, who, like many people interviewed for this article, spoke on the condition of anonymity because he did not want his name in an article about this case. “And he didn’t wait for an answer.” Far from the bloodless kingpin portrayed by the government, Ross Ulbricht, by the accounts of friends and relatives, was soulful and sensitive. In a   with his childhood friend Rene Pinnell, recorded in 2012 through StoryCorps, a national oral history project, and still posted on YouTube, Mr. Ulbricht said that in college he initially refused to sleep with the woman he described as his first love, for fear that he would wind up heartsick. “We didn’t have sex for like three months,” he said. “But we’d make out, and really, like, get close but never go there. And when we finally did, it was amazing.” It seems nearly impossible to reconcile the government’s version of Mr. Ulbricht with the warm, compassionate person that others describe. Which leaves at least three possibilities. One, that the government has, in fact, collared the wrong man. Two, that Mr. Ulbricht is a sociopath who concealed a dark side from everyone for years. Three, that Mr. Ulbricht is Dread Pirate Roberts — and that the two are not really that different. By relying on Bitcoin and an encrypted Internet network, Silk Road created an anonymous bazaar where drugs could be bought from the comfort of home. No more drives to seedy parts of town, no more face-to-face encounters with shady dealers. Instead, transactions would be conducted through the mail, and, in what many academics regard as the linchpin to the business-model innovation, Dread Pirate Roberts devised a system to ensure that nobody got fleeced. The site acted as an intermediary, hosting the online market and holding money in escrow until buyers confirmed that products had arrived. D.P.R. would then release the payment to the seller, keeping 8 to 15 percent of the transaction. “He had basically commoditized security,” says Nicolas Christin, an assistant research professor at Carnegie Mellon University who has studied Silk Road. “It was a system that allowed people to buy drugs without fear that they would be ripped off.” Within months of its start in January 2011, the site was thriving. Sellers posted photographs and descriptions of their products, like “10 x 10mg OxyContin” and “5G Pure Cocaine Cristal.” A guide offered tips for newcomers. Vacuum-sealed packages were recommended for anyone mailing narcotics to avoid detection by “canine or electronic sniffers,” and post office boxes were urged for buyers. Reviews were posted, just like on eBay. “Perfect stealth and perfect dope to match,” gushed a customer of a merchant known as “gotsitall,” who sold what was billed as high-quality heroin. “Got product in less than 24 hours! Thanks again.” A small staff was hired to respond to users and settle disputes. These employees, none of whom knew the identity of Dread Pirate Roberts, were paid between $1,000 and $2,000 a week in Bitcoins. By June 2011, the site was attracting enough buzz to merit a post on Gawker, which called it “the underground website where you can buy any drug imaginable.” Soon, Senators Charles E. Schumer of New York and Joe Manchin III of West Virginia were demanding that the Justice Department close Silk Road. But the site had only begun to catch on. An inventory taken by the F.B.I. one day last September found 13,000 listings for controlled substances, in categories that included opioids, psychedelics and ecstasy. A “services” section with 159 offerings included a tutorial on hacking automated teller machines. More than 800 listings offered “digital goods,” such as hacked Netflix accounts, and 169 listings in “forgeries,” including driver’s licenses and   records. Anyone with minimal computer literacy could access this superstore of criminal mischief. Users needed only to install software for Tor, a network that hides I.P. addresses and bundles communications in layers of encryption. Type in Silk Road’s ungainly address, silkroadvb5piz3r.onion, and you entered the market. Acquire Bitcoins, through exchanges such as Mt.Gox, and you could start shopping. The system made D.P.R. a cybermultimillionaire. But accumulating that wealth came with its share of management migraines. One of the biggest involved an employee named Curtis Clark Green, a burly man whose colorful past includes a stint as a semipro poker player and charges of prescription fraud. From his home in Spanish Fork, Utah, the government said, he sold drugs on Silk Road under the name “chronicpain,” and eventually he built enough trust with D.P.R. to become one of his lieutenants. In early December 2012, D.P.R. needed Mr. Green for a special task. A dealer who operated under the alias “nob” had complained that Silk Road transactions were too small to be worth his time. Mr. Green was to find someone willing to play in the same league. “Hey, I think we have a buyer for you,” D.P.R. subsequently wrote to nob. “One of my staff is sending details.” Nob, however, was not a dealer. He was a member of Operation Marco Polo, a task force based in Baltimore that was named for the explorer who followed the Silk Road and that included agents from the Drug Enforcement Administration and Homeland Security Investigations. (No one from any of the investigating agencies would comment on the case.) When Mr. Green helped nob arrange the sale of a kilogram of cocaine, in early 2012, he did something that is hard to explain: he offered to act as a conduit and have the cocaine sent to his house. Mr. Green was soon arrested. He was quickly released and the kilogram was sent, as planned, to the buyer, presumably to prevent D.P.R. from realizing that one of his underlings had been caught. Dread Pirate Roberts did somehow learn of the arrest, but he still didn’t realize he was communicating with a federal agent who had arranged it. He was soon fuming to nob that Mr. Green had absconded with Bitcoins, and D.P.R. asked for help. “I’d like him beat up, then forced to send the Bitcoins he stole back,” D.P.R. wrote. “Like sit him down at his computer and make him do it.” Soon, D.P.R. had a change of heart. “Can you change the order to execute rather than torture?” he asked nob, explaining, “I’m afraid he’ll give up info.” Nob told D.P.R. that he knew “pros” who could get the job done. The cost was $40,000 in Bitcoins up front, and $40,000 after the killing. Dread Pirate Roberts agreed to the price but wanted “proof of death,” asking nob to instruct the killers to send a video, “and if they can’t do that, then pictures” of the deceased. Only the broad outlines are known of what must have been a highly cinematic dumb show of violence. What is clear from the criminal complaint is that by Feb. 21, nob sent photos of Mr. Green doing a fine impression of a corpse. Mr. Green had “died of asphyxiation/heart rupture” while being tortured, nob explained. Dread Pirate Roberts replied that he found the images disturbing, but that he did not have any other choice. “I just wish more people had some integrity,” D.P.R. wrote. In the months that followed, D.P.R. would pay a supposed hit man named “redandwhite” $150,000 in Bitcoins to whack a blackmailer who was threatening to release the identities of Silk Road users, and later a seller who appears to have scammed buyers en masse. When redandwhite noted that the scammer lived with three roommates, D.P.R. was persuaded to kill all four of them, at a cost of $500,000. The government contends that the whole enterprise was likely a swindle. Whether these targets were in cahoots with redandwhite, or were the creation of redandwhite, is not clear. But authorities in Canada, where all five killings were supposed to have taken place, found no trace of crimes that matched redandwhite’s descriptions, according to federal prosecutors. Nonetheless, D.P.R.’s willingness to underwrite killings would become an argument against bail, which was presented in November by prosecutors in the Southern District of New York, where Ross Ulbricht was transferred soon after his arrest. (The F.B.I. ran its case out of Manhattan.) Today, Mr. Ulbricht awaits trial in the Metropolitan Detention Center in Brooklyn. Lyn Ulbricht, Mr. Ulbricht’s mother, sat one recent morning in the downtown Manhattan office of her son’s lawyer. She had flown in from Austin a few days earlier, to look for a place where she and her husband could live to be close to their son. “I can’t be somewhere else while he’s in jail,” she said. “We want to visit him. We believe in him, so that’s what we’re going to do.” Ross Ulbricht grew up in a suburb of Austin that his mother described as the poorest neighborhood in a good school district. She and her husband, Kirk, earn most of their income renting four beachside vacation houses they own in Costa Rica. Ross is remembered by friends as bright, though not whiz-kid bright, part of a circle that mostly avoided the football culture that dominated high school. “He was outdoorsy,” said James McFarland, who met Mr. Ulbricht in a physics class. “We played a lot of ultimate Frisbee, hiking, swimming, that sort of thing.” Mr. McFarland and others say he was shy around girls, sweet-natured, loyal to friends and a fan of intense philosophical conversations. He was also an unusual combination of rule follower and rule breaker. He did a lot of drugs, as he explained in that StoryCorps conversation, likening his intake to a guy who jumped into the deep end of a pool and stayed underwater for as long as he could hold his breath. At the same time, he collected enough merit badges to become that emblem of teenage all-Americanness, an Eagle Scout. By the time he went to the University of Texas at Dallas, on a full academic scholarship, he was 6-foot-2, a lean, good-looking guy who could have fronted an indie rock band. But he was the opposite of a Lothario. He was vulnerable and eager to find a soul mate, and fell hard for that college girlfriend. The two were engaged, according to Thomas Haney, but it ended when Ross learned that she had cheated with one of his closest buddies. “I’d have killed the guy, but Ross completely forgave him within a year of it happening,” Mr. Haney said. That was Ross’s style, not just willing to forgive, but empathetic to the point of mushy. At a bachelor party held in the woods two years ago for a friend named Daniel, Mr. Haney said, everyone was sitting around, kind of stumped about what to do. “Then Ross pipes up,” Mr. Haney said, “and he said, ‘Let’s go around in a circle and say why we love Daniel.’ ” After graduating in 2006 with a degree in physics, Mr. Ulbricht headed to Penn State, where he earned a master’s degree in material sciences and engineering. His  , “Growth of EuO Thin Films by Molecular Beam Epitaxy,” is still available at the school’s online archives. He later returned to Austin and was a co-founder of Good Wagon Books, which collected used books from around the city and sold them online, donating 10 percent of profits to charities. But the venture failed, and Mr. Ulbricht started what he described to acquaintances as a hedge fund, trading stocks and currencies, including Bitcoin. Friends had the impression that it was not going well, especially after other people started to give him money to invest, which made him overly cautious. At the invitation of Mr. Pinnell, Mr. Ulbricht relocated to San Francisco in 2012. When Mr. Pinnell became engaged, Mr. Ulbricht moved into a group house, where he told roommates that his name was Joshua Terrey, according to an   in Forbes. In August, two months before he was arrested, he abruptly left that house for another, without explanation. His new accommodations were hardly those of a drug lord. He paid $1,100 a month for a 12-by-14-foot room, sharing a house with three roommates. One of those roommates said that they knew him by his real name and that he told them he earned a living by building and managing websites. Nothing about him seemed out of the ordinary, until he was arrested. That day, his roommates returned to their house to find a search warrant left by the F.B.I. on the coffee table in the living room. “The F.B.I. came back a bunch of times and asked questions for hours,” the roommate said. “We were in shock. It really was about a week before I felt normal.” How did the F.B.I. connect Dread Pirate Roberts to Ross Ulbricht? That is still a mystery. Mr. Ulbricht certainly left more than a few digital crumbs, according to the government’s complaint and a variety of online rubberneckers who followed the case. The first mention of Silk Road online, in January 2011, by someone called “altoid,” was followed a few months later by a user with the same alias on a Bitcoin Talk forum. This person was searching for an I.T. pro for hire. Applicants were asked to email “rossulbricht at gmail dot com.” But this was only enough to make Mr. Ulbricht a person of interest. In July 2013, Customs and Border Protection intercepted a package from Canada bound for his address. The package contained  , each bearing a photograph of Mr. Ulbricht and a different name, with addresses in a variety of states and countries. On July 26, agents of Homeland Security Investigations knocked on the door of Mr. Ulbricht’s group house. “Josh,” as he then was calling himself, refused to answer most of the agents’ questions, the government would say later. Though Mr. Ulbricht did not take the opportunity to skedaddle, he apparently had considered it. The government would say later that his laptop contained a filled-out application for “economic citizenship” in Dominica, a Caribbean island. The price was a one-time donation of $75,000 to the country’s government. The crucial breakthrough in the case occurred a few weeks after that fake ID package was intercepted. The F.B.I. located and copied the contents of Silk Road’s main servers, the computers that powered the site’s operations and stored its data. It is here that the government’s otherwise detailed account gets fuzzy. The F.B.I. has stated only that the main server was found in “a certain foreign country,” one that has a mutual legal assistance treaty with the United States. Through the treaty, the F.B.I. was given a copy of the server — a “mirror” of it, in tech terms — on July 23. The site continued to operate, so D.P.R. would not be spooked. What is unclear is how the feds knew where the servers were. Presumably, they were rented in some faraway corners of the globe — Iceland, Latvia and Romania are likely, according to experts who have studied the I.P. addresses. But the official vagueness has provoked speculation in academic circles and among security specialists. Was the National Security Agency involved? Did this process involve breaking laws, or violating constitutional rights? That issue will be at the heart of Ross Ulbricht’s defense strategy, says Joshua L. Dratel, his lawyer, whose clients include a Guantánamo detainee.“It’s called the fruit-of-the-poisonous-tree doctrine,” Mr. Dratel explained. “If you think of the acquisitions of evidence as a chain, if you find one bad link, everything on the other side of that link is suppressible.” In other words, if Mr. Dratel can prove that the government acted improperly when it found and copied that server, all the evidence it gathered after that — including the laptop taken in that Oct. 1 arrest — could be tossed out of court. Mr. Dratel said he would also argue that Mr. Ulbricht is not Dread Pirate Roberts. But that contention could be hard to square with a   by Mr. Ulbricht, filed with the court Dec. 12. It says the Bitcoins seized from the laptop should be returned to him, because he “has an interest as an owner/possessor” of the money. This seems a tricky needle for Mr. Ulbricht to thread. He is denying that he is Dread Pirate Roberts but demanding what the government maintains is D.P.R.’s money. How did Mr. Ulbricht earn millions in virtual dollars, if not through Silk Road commissions? Mr. Dratel declined to say, citing a reluctance to discuss the facts of the case. The 2012 StoryCorps video ends with Rene Pinnell asking where Mr. Ulbricht hopes to be in 20 years. “Twenty years, uh,” says Mr. Ulbricht, tugging at his facial hair and looking sideways. After a pause, he looks directly at Mr. Pinnell and says, “I want to have had a substantial positive impact on the future of humanity by that time.” Mr. Pinnell laughs, because that sounds so ambitious that it initially comes across as a joke. But Mr. Ulbricht isn’t laughing. “Do you think you’re going to live forever?” Mr. Pinnell asks, getting serious. “I think it’s a possibility,” says Mr. Ulbricht, allowing a grin. Again, his friend chuckles. “I honestly do,” Mr. Ulbricht says with a smile. “I think I might live forever in some form, by that time. I mean technology is changing so fast.” Mr. Pinnell does not pose the obvious follow-up — what are you   about? How exactly do you plan to transition from day trader-with-a-laptop to historical figure? None of Mr. Ulbricht’s friends, it seems, had an answer for that one, perhaps because they didn’t know enough about his interior life. Most grasped that he’d long been a searcher, a restless mind rummaging around for a philosophy. For years, he was fascinated by Eastern mysticism, and briefly was an advocate of the Landmark Forum, a three-day seminar intended to give participants “the power to make what you’re committed to into a reality,” as the company’s website says. What few friends realized is where his philosophical quest had brought him. At Penn State, he was becoming a dedicated libertarian. He joined the school’s Libertarian Club and wore a Ron Paul for President shirt to classes. Mr. Ulbricht was quoted in the school’s newspaper, The Daily Collegian, saying of Mr. Paul, “there’s a lot to learn from him and his message of what it means to be a U.S. citizen and what it means to be a free individual.” By the time Mr. Ulbricht left Penn State, his views had taken on a vehemently anti-tax tone. A friend in Austin said Mr. Ulbricht’s politics at the time were more “hard core” than his own. “I’d say ‘Less government but we need the government to build roads,’ ” this friend said. “But for him, even when it came to building roads, he felt there ought to be a voluntary basis for that. The point for him wasn’t to abolish government. He just thought people should have the ability to opt out of paying taxes.” These views weren’t a secret. Not long after graduating from Penn State, he wrote on his LinkedIn page that his interest in physics had waned. “Now, my goals have shifted,” he wrote. “I want to use economic theory as a means to abolish the use of coercion and aggression amongst mankind.” Institutions and government were the problem, he continued. Which is why he was “creating an economic simulation to give people a firsthand experience of what it would be like to live in a world without the systemic use of force.” Was Silk Road that economic simulation? Without question, Dread Pirate Roberts considered the site a means to “abolish the use of coercion.” He routinely proclaimed so, in postings that sound like a mash-up of manifesto and infomercial. “I walk tall, proud and free, knowing that the actions I take eat away at the infrastructure that keeps oppression alive,” D.P.R. wrote on Silk Road in March 2012. “Now it is profitable to throw off one’s chains, with amazing crypto technology reducing the risk of doing so dramatically. How many niches have yet to be filled in the world of anonymous online markets? The opportunity to prosper and take part in a revolution of epic proportions is at our fingertips!” Dread Pirate Roberts considered his work epochal because he was not just promoting the sale of illicit goods. He was reimagining the fundamentals of commerce. For centuries, consumers have been taxed by governments or overlords of one type or another, rendering unto Caesar for as long as there have been Caesars. But if Silk Road were scalable, that era was over. Or at least imperiled. Anyone would have the option to sell goods undisturbed by regulations and without sharing a percentage of revenue with the state. And why stop at drugs? The system would work for legal products, too. The tools are there for a kind of subterranean  . “It could literally change the world as we know it,” D.P.R. wrote of Silk Road in an online exhortation. A man who created a website that changed the world as we know it could believe he had a chance to live forever. At minimum, he could be a hero to anyone who thinks that government has no business in business. Ross Ulbricht and Dread Pirate Roberts have other similarities, including a fondness for the  , part of the Austrian School of Economics, which was celebrated by Mr. Ulbricht on his Google+ page and by D.P.R. in Silk Road pep talks. This could be a coincidence. It could also be a coincidence that neither man nor pseudonym seemed motivated by greed. Mr. Ulbricht’s lifestyle was one notch above that of urban couch surfer. And the primary goal that D.P.R. professed was to unshackle humanity from what he regarded as economic tyranny. If a handful of miscreants — and yes, a few of their unfortunate roommates — were killed along the way, that is a shame. But Silk Road was like a tunnel under the gulag, and D.P.R. was digging for the sake of humanity. “It needs everything we have,” D.P.R. wrote of Silk Road, urging buyers and sellers to grasp its significance. “Do it for me, do it for yourself, do it for your families and friends, and do it for mankind.” Perhaps this is where Dread Pirate Roberts, the criminal mastermind, overlaps with Ross Ulbricht, the guy who aided a homeless woman in a wheelchair. With aching sincerity, they both really wanted to help. The success of Silk Road raised the prospect that the thuggish street drug dealer, the stock character of countless police procedurals, could be replaced by a geek in a coffee shop with a laptop. But in the months since Silk Road was shut down, several sites have tried to takes its place and all have failed. One of them, called the Sheep Marketplace, went dark in December, as users howled that administrators had made off with as much as $44 million in Bitcoins. Project: Black Flag lasted a few weeks in October, before its leader announced, “I was unable to cope with the stress and constant demand, so I panicked.” Metta Dread Pirate Roberts, as that site’s fearful leader was known, then absconded with an unknown sum of Bitcoins, according to news reports. “I suspect that the online drug marketplace is a passing fad because it’s too traceable, too vulnerable to hacking,” said Mr. Weaver at the International Computer Science Institute. Once Bitcoins are converted to another currency, the government can subpoena the records of the exchange where the transaction took place and harvest all the information it needs. “Bitcoin isn’t really a ‘coin’ as much as a distributed, public balance ledger,” Mr. Weaver added, “with every balance and transaction recorded.” Hence Bitcoin’s wry new nickname in legal circles: “Prosecution Futures.” The government has begun making arrests:  , a Delaware doctor, was charged in November with selling oxycodone, Xanax and other drugs on Silk Road, stuffing Sour Patch and Jolly Rancher candy in the packages to thwart detection. But the limits of technology are only part of the reason that another Silk Road is unlikely anytime soon. To function, such a site needs a leader who is dedicated to the point of fanaticism, and, more important, has a strange kind of integrity. Dread Pirate Roberts did not take the Bitcoin and run because he was a true believer first and an outlaw second. He was a rare set of contradictions, a humanitarian willing to kill, a criminal with a strict code of ethics.
  , perhaps to fight another day. Classified Western intelligence assessments say that some militants are defecting to Al Qaeda’s branch in Syria. Others are paying smugglers to spirit them to Turkey, with an eventual goal of returning home to Europe. Meanwhile, Turkey’s military   in its two-week offensive against Kurdish-led militants in Syria, a day after other  . _____   has   and added fuel to its debate on migration ahead of next month’s elections. A gunman wounded six people in a drive-by attack in the city of Macerata that appeared to have targeted African immigrants. The authorities later   that they found white supremacist material, including Hitler’s “Mein Kampf,” at the home of a 28-year-old suspect. _____  scorched-earth assault on the F.B.I. and Justice Department, now largely focused on a Republican memo released Friday, is  . , annotated by our Washington correspondent. (Above, Andrew McCabe, the former deputy director of the F.B.I. who resigned last week.) Democrats pressed for the release of their classified rebuttal,   on whether to make it public. _____  the U.S. and Russia to keep their long-range nuclear arsenals at the lowest levels since early in the Cold War goes into full effect today. But the Trump administration has already vowed to counter a rush by the Russians to modernize their forces,  . Separately, our diplomatic correspondent in Brussels gauged reactions to Mr. Trump’s threat to cut foreign aid so it would “only go to America’s friends.” Experts  . (Above, a U.S. officer carrying the “nuclear football” of launch codes.) _____  one question dominates the political debate: When should President Jacob Zuma (above right) leave? Real power   to Cyril Ramaphosa (above center), Mr. Zuma’s successor at the helm of the governing African National Congress. We took an  , the British public relations firm that was caught up in the corruption scandal that hastened Mr. Zuma’s downfall. Its spin campaign helped drive racial tensions to levels not felt since apartheid. _____  finally talked about Harvey Weinstein. The actress, who said in October that she was waiting to feel “less angry,” spoke about   with him and a gruesome episode during shooting of the “Kill Bill” films. And dozens more  , the former doctor for U.S.A. Gymnastics — even as the F.B.I. was pursuing its case against him. Have you seen organizations make changes to better address sexual harassment?  . made newly wealthy by virtual currencies, have moved to Puerto Rico   (and to avoid tax).  have lifted the fortunes of many Western brands. But some products —   — have failed to impress. to be in another time zone: All gains in U.S. stock prices since 1993 have come outside trading hours,  . Jerome Powell takes office today just as the U.S. economy is  . extending   Here’s   global markets this week, including major European bank earnings.  rallied in Athens against the inclusion of the word “Macedonia” in the name of the neighboring former Yugoslav republic. [ ]  a suspect in the 2015 Islamic State attacks in Paris that killed 130 people, is set to face trial in Brussels on charges related to a separate shootout there. [ ]  of at least 20 African migrants were recovered off the coast of Melilla, a Spanish outpost in northern Africa. [ ]   have become unlikely secret allies in a covert war against Islamist militants in the Sinai Peninsula. [ ]  the Turkish president, is scheduled to meet Pope Francis today for talks that are expected to center on Jerusalem. [ ]  the ousted Catalan president, is fighting from Belgium to stay relevant in Spain. [ ]  fear their country is sliding away from democracy as the government muzzles dissent. [ ]  are rare on President Vladimir Putin’s campaign trail in Russia ahead of the March 18 election. (He is practically guaranteed to win.) [ ]  fear that fentanyl could become the country’s next most dangerous drug. [ ] A years-old report released by the presidential office suggests that nearly half of Iranians want women to be free to uncover their heads in public. [ ] by baking a pie  .  has fallen by the wayside,   (subject line “2018 resolutions”) with your name, your goal and why you chose it, and two steps toward it. three tries over 52 years, but  . (This year’s ads  .)  uncovered the ruins of a   in Guatemala. are slowly returning to the Kurdish region of Iraq to find a place of great beauty, haunted by war. We compiled  .  for an unusual new building next to the site of Edvard Munch’s studio on the outskirts of Oslo   in Norway.  in Amsterdam ran out of closet space. About 4,000 costumes have been put up for sale to the public.  A century ago on Tuesday, the Austrian painter   died in Vienna. Klimt is famous for his heavily ornamented portraits, one of which was confiscated by the Nazis during World War II but later recovered.  , and the recovery effort inspired “The Woman in Gold,”  . Among the artist’s quirks — and a source of irritation for his wealthy patrons — was that he often refused to declare his works complete. One Belgian family   for a palace in Brussels, as a way of motivating him to finish. He eventually did. But patrons who tried to collect his artwork were sometimes offered a refund instead of a painting. Klimt would even tweak pieces after they had won critical acclaim. His painting “Death and Life,” for example, won first prize at the International Art Exhibition in Rome in 1911. But Klimt later changed the background from gold to gray,  , and gave his representations of death and life “further ornaments.”
TOKYO —  Five cryptocurrency exchanges have withdrawn their applications to be licensed in Japan, saying they can't meet the government's requirements, the Financial Services Agency said Thursday. Two exchanges, Tokyo GateWay and Mr. Exchange, recently told the government they no longer want to apply for licenses. Three other exchanges: Raimu, bitExpress and Bit Station, dropped out earlier, the agency said. Japan has been bullish on virtual money and has set up a system requiring that exchanges be licensed to help protect consumers. Sixteen exchanges have the licenses. The FSA said the exchanges that are giving up on being licensed will reimburse their customers before shutting down. The companies may also continue with other services that don't require the cryptocurrency exchange licenses. Earlier this year, the Tokyo-based Coincheck exchange reported a 58 billion yen ($547 million) loss of a cryptocurrency called NEM, from suspected criminal hacking. There have been no arrests in the case. Coincheck, in operation since 2012, had been applying for a government license but had not yet gotten one. ____ Her work can be found at https://www.apnews.com/search/yuri%20kageyama
As the Trump administration moves to block one media deal, it appears more supportive of today’s big transaction. From  : Ms. Sanders also inserted the White House into the little matter of  . She said that Mr. Trump thinks that today’s deal could be “a great thing” for jobs. There’s a problem. Here’s what Disney’s C.F.O., Christine McCarthy, told analysts this morning: As Andrew reminded earlier this week, “synergies” is a code word for “layoffs.” And Disney executives said that the company expects to start realizing synergies within the first year after the deal closes. It isn’t clear yet how many jobs would be cut if the transaction succeeds, but this would be a rare deal if it actually generated new positions on balance. Fox has a bit of unfinished business before it can go forward with its deal with Disney. It’s in the process of seeking regulatory approval in Britain to take full control of the British satellite television giant Sky in a deal worth about $15 billion. The two companies said on Thursday that Fox plans to proceed with the acquisition and hopes to complete the acquisition of the 61 percent of Sky that it doesn’t own by the end of June. Sky would then be wholly owned by Disney, following the closing of the Fox deal. Mr. Murdoch helped found Sky in the early 1990s and has long sought total ownership of it. He last tried to do so five years ago, but was forced to back off amid the controversy over phone hacking by British tabloids, including the since-shuttered Murdoch-owned News of the World. Mr. Murdoch’s company had previously said that its existing stake in Sky was “not a natural end position.” British regulators have been concerned about how much control the Murdoch family would exert over the country’s media and whether Fox, as an entity, would uphold broadcasting standards here. In June, the regulator Ofcom ruled that Rupert Murdoch and other company executives were   to hold broadcasting licenses in Britain, even as it also concluded that a   at Fox News had amounted to “ .” Britain’s culture minister, Karen Bradly, asked the country’s competition regulator in September to carry out   of the Sky transaction.   and provisional findings by the Competition and Markets Authority are expected to be released in January. “While 21st Century Fox’s existing plans to acquire Sky remain in place, we expect the current investigation to continue,” a spokesman for the Department for Digital, Culture, Media & Sport said on Thursday. Some analysts have speculated that the British government might be more comfortable with a Sky deal if Disney is the ultimate owner, but whether the Sky deal ultimately received approval remains an open question for now. As part of his company’s $52.4 billion deal for Fox, Bob Iger of Disney agreed to renew his contract through 2021 to help complete the merger and integrate the new businesses. That would seem to mean a 2020 presidential run is off the table for Mr. Iger. In March,   that Mr. Iger “had told friends he is considering their nudges that he make a run for president in 2020 as a Democrat. “ The publication added: Here are a few other notable business people that are on the list: • Howard Schultz of Starbucks • Mark Cuban • Oprah Winfrey • Mark Zuckerberg of Facebook That’s the question that media executives and Wall Street bankers have been asking this morning. Could a digital company like Amazon, Google or Apple emerge with a higher bid? Or Verizon or Comcast? Or could some of them team up to buy the assets and split them among themselves? For example, Comcast has always wanted Fox’s international assets, while any of the digital players would love to own Fox’s content business. The Fox-Disney deal has about a $1.5 billion breakup fee if a higher bid were to emerge. If regulators block the deal, Disney would have to pay about $2.5 billion. The Murdochs’ voting control is worth 39 percent of 21st Century Fox in most situations, except for this: If the company were up for sale, they can only vote their economic stake, which is about 17 percent. And of course, even if the deal is completed as presented today, the next chess piece that will become a point of focus is Hulu given its ownership: Disney would control 60 percent of the service, but Comcast would still own 30 percent and Time Warner owns another 10 percent. It gets complicated quickly. Ryan Parker of The Hollywood Reporter   that one of “The Simpsons” showrunners, Al Jean, told him, “I predict people will make far too much of this mere coincidence.” Matt Selman, an executive producer of “The Simpsons,”  : And, more important, how some of them will split an estimated fee bounty of up to $154 million. • Guggenheim Partners • JPMorgan Chase • Cravath Swaine & Moore • Goldman Sachs • Centerview Partners • Deutsche Bank • Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom • Hogan Lovells • Simpson Thacher & Bartlett According to estimates from Freeman & Company: • Disney’s bankers could split between  . • Fox’s bankers could share between  . Here’s Paul Pendergrass’s take: One is a tech C.E.O. who has publicly espoused socially liberal initiatives. The other is one of the most prolific and prominent conservative donors around. But Mr. Cook and Mr. Koch have written   imploring Congress to give “dreamers” — the young immigrants at the center of a fight over illegal immigration — a path to staying in the U.S. From the piece: Let’s break down   that was just announced: • Disney will pay   in an all-stock transaction, buying a big chunk of Fox businesses valued at about  , including debt. • Fox shareholders as a whole will own about   of The Walt Disney Company. • As expected, today’s announcement has   of a role for James Murdoch at Disney. That may come down the line as he negotiates with Disney. • The Murdochs, who own about 17 percent of existing shares in Fox, will own less than 5 percent of Disney and won’t have any board seats there. Disney wants to   against Netflix and Amazon. The deal will give the media giant another production studio to pump out content for its forthcoming video streaming service. And Fox’s international broadcasting operations will extend its reach abroad. Ben Thompson of Stratechery takes a look at   this is to Netflix. He writes, “What has been so impressive over the last few months is the extent and speed with which Disney has seemingly figured it out — and acted accordingly.” : • The corporate tax rate going down to 21 percent,instead of 20 percent • The top tax rate going down to 37 percent • A $10,000 deduction that can be split between mortgage payments and state and local taxes • A repeal of the corporate alternative minimum tax, but not the individual A.M.T. • The repeal of the individual insurance mandate • A preservation of tax breaks for medical expenses and tuition stipends for graduate students • A tax deduction for pass-through businesses that largely mirrors the Senate bill’s treatment  still unclear.  “We’re very close to getting it done; we’re very close to voting.” So far, Bob Corker of Tennessee looks likely to again reject the bill on budget deficit grounds. It’s unclear whether Susan Collins of Maine or Marco Rubio are on board after having raised concerns, though neither has raised fresh objections in recent days. • Although Mr. Trump has talked of the tax code drawing companies back to the United States from Ireland, the overhaul may make little difference with investment in the European Union country. ( ) • Even as Jamie Dimon extols the benefits of the G.O.P. tax plan, banks could face higher taxes on important transactions like repo agreements. ( ,  ) • Jeff Gundlach of DoubleLine Capital warned that the tax overhaul could pose problems for the $1.5 trillion market for junk bonds. ( ) You can  . This is perhaps   for the F.C.C. chairman, Ajit Pai, who has already opened the door for more media mergers, curtailed a high-speed internet program for low-income families and allowed broadband providers to raise rates to business customers.  Geoff Fowler of the WaPo illustrates the issue using  . The Fed has concluded that Republican tax plan isn’t economic “rocket fuel,” though it will  . The regulator predicts 2.5 percent growth next year, up from 2.1 percent — but not enough to change the Fed’s plan for three rate increases next year. When told that the president thinks the Republican tax plan could lead to growth of more than 4 percent, here’s what Ms. Yellen said: “Let me emphasize that  .” Mario Draghi’s final European Central Bank news conference of 2017 is today. Here’s  . Any final deal on Britain’s withdrawal from the European Union will have to be   as legislation before it can be put into effect. It was a defeat for the prime minister, who wanted more leeway to negotiate with the European Union. Ms. May is scheduled to be in Brussels for an E.U. Council meeting, where the Europeans are expected to allow Brexit negotiations to proceed to discussions about trade, amid renewed  . On top of that, she is under pressure to explain what exactly Britain wants from an E.U. trade relationship, even though she has yet to find a consensus within her own cabinet. From Jim Brunsden, George Parker and Caroline Binham of  :  Facebook said that it found   in last year’s Brexit vote. • Salma Hayek described how Harvey Weinstein harassed her, including by trying to shut down her movie, “Frida,” which he co-produced. (  and  ) • Four women have accused the hip-hop mogul Russell Simmons of sexual harassment and assault. ( ) • The angel investor Ron Conway said that he tried to warn Hillary Clinton’s presidential campaign about getting too close to Shervin Pishevar, who now faces accusations of sexual misconduct. ( ) • PBS suspended its airing of Tavis Smiley’s talk show amid an investigation into unspecified allegations of misconduct by the host. Mr. Smiley has denied wrongdoing. ( ) • Meet Rotten Apples, a website that tracks which movies and TV shows have ties to men accused of sexual misconduct. ( ) • A Netflix executive who dismissed misconduct allegations against the actor Danny Masterson, who starred in the service’s series “The Ranch,” no longer works for the company. ( ) • Only after   did employees of the Martin Agency, which created award-winning ads for Geico, learn that their chief creative officer, Joe Alexander, had been accused of harassment. ( ) • The documentary filmmaker Morgan Spurlock admitted to committing sexual harassment in the past and that he settled an accusation out of court. ( ) • This week’s NYT Magazine explores the fallout of sexual misconduct allegations and how to move forward. And the NYT gender editor, Jessica Bennett, answered readers’ question. ( ,  ) The U.S. Attorney’s office for the Northern District of California confirmed in a court filing that it has   into the ride-hailing giant. (We don’t know the nature of the case.) But   overseeing the trade-secrets trial between Uber and Alphabet’s self-driving car company that Uber hasn’t produced some evidence relevant to that court fight. A letter from a former Uber security employee, accusing the company of secretly surveilling competitors, is expected to be released, in a redacted form, by the court on Friday. • Farhad Manjoo writes in his latest State of the Art column: “Tech giants began to grudgingly accept that they have some responsibility to the offline world. The scope of that responsibility, though, is another matter entirely.” ( ) • A look at how the Philippine government under Rodrigo Duterte uses Facebook to push back against critics. ( ) • Why investment management giants like Fidelity are racing to keep up with Silicon Valley. ( ) • Target agreed to acquire Shipt, a same-day delivery service similar to Instacart, for $550 million in effort to keep up with Amazon. ( ) • Apple agreed to invest $390 million into Finisar, the maker of a key component in the iPhone X, to lock up an important parts manufacturer. ( ) • Microsoft’s new partners in A.I. include Reddit and UPS. And Google has established an A.I. center in China. ( ,  ) • UBS hired  , the former C.E.O. of Commerzbank, as the head of its wealth management unit, marking him as a contender to become the Swiss bank’s next chief. ( ) • UBS also hired   from Bank of America to run its tech, media and telecom equity business in the Americas. ( ) • Blackstone has hired   from Bain Capital to build out a leveraged buyout team in Japan. ( ) • A major union has won significant job protection and increased pay for about 20,000 AT&T wireless employees. The union has offered to help make the case for the company’s proposed acquisition of Time Warner. ( ) • Walmart is trying to ease some of the financial strain on its workers by allowing them to receive wages before their next payday, but labor groups say that the company should be paying its employees more. ( ) • Atos is continuing its unsolicited bid to buy the security software maker Gemalto even after the company’s board unanimously rejected the $5.1 billion offer. ( ) • When N.F.L. owners signed off on Roger Goodell’s five-year extension, they were looking for continuity. ( ) • China has put Jia Yueting, a tech tycoon, onto an official online blacklist of credit defaulters, which means he can be blocked from flights, high-speed trains and big purchases. ( ) • Kingdom Holding Company, Prince Alwaleed bin Talal’s investment firm, has become a black hole of information, and all meaningful activity has been suspended in his absence, according to bankers. ( ) • The rise of economic nationalism is clashing with the open-market ideals of the European Union’s founders and affecting products from Italian chocolates to German faucets. ( ) • Bitcoin made Michael Poutre, chief executive of Crypto Company, one of the richest men in the United States, briefly. “It is yet another sign of the extraordinary popular delusion being created by Bitcoin and the rush for everything crypto,” writes James Mackintosh. ( ) • Tesla is “headed for a brick wall,” according to Jim Chanos of the hedge fund Kynikos Associates. ( )
LISBON, Portugal —  Police in Spain have captured a cybercrime gang made up of Ukrainians and Russians that allegedly stole more than 1 billion euros ($1.24 billion) from financial institutions worldwide in a five-year spree, authorities said Monday. The gang's alleged mastermind, identified as a Ukrainian and named only as "Denis K.," was arrested in the coastal city of Alicante, 350 kilometers (220 miles) southeast of Madrid, according to statements issued by Spanish police and European Union law enforcement agency Europol. Three suspected accomplices, said to be Russian and Ukrainian, were also arrested, Spanish authorities said. In Ukraine, police said that an unidentified 30-year-old man linked to the gang was cooperating with authorities. The hackers — whose activities have long been tracked by security researchers — used malware to target more than 100 financial institutions worldwide, sometimes stealing up to 10 million euros in each heist. Almost all of Russia's banks were targeted, and about 50 of them lost money in the electronic robberies, authorities said. The gang used well-worn techniques such as booby trapped emails to break into banks and compromise the networks controlling ATMs, effectively turning the machines into free cash dispensers. Ross Rustici, a senior director at Boston-based digital security firm Cybereason, said the gang stood out from others because of the amount of care and planning it put into operations. "They're unusual in how slow and methodical they are and how organized they are," Rustici said. Other groups use similar techniques in isolation, "but nobody before them had strung all those things together on such a scale," he said. Authorities said that the gang converted its illicit gains into bitcoins and used the cryptocurrency to purchase big ticket items, including houses and vehicles, in Spain. Rustici said it seemed likely the gang members botched their effort to launder their ill-gotten gains. "That's usually what happens with these who are very good on the network side, they make mistakes on the money side," he said. "You can't buy a nice villa on the Mediterranean with cryptocurrency. Or at least not yet." ___ Satter reported from London.

NEW YORK —  Wall Street has been much more excited about the system underpinning bitcoin than the cryptocurrency itself, but the global financial industry has not yet been able to do much with the technology known as blockchain. Reuters has found several blockchain projects launched by major financial institutions that have been shelved, as development of the technology enters a hype-meets-reality phase. The casualties include projects by the Depository Trust & Clearing Corporation (DTCC), BNP Paribas SA and SIX Group, Reuters has found. These were among the wave of blockchain tests touted by the financial industry over the past few years, as firms bet the new technology would displace much of the sector's infrastructure, cutting out middlemen, speeding transactions and reducing costs for things like securities and payments processing. Yet as some projects were developed, companies pulled back for various reasons - from costs to industry readiness, underscoring that, for all its potential, blockchain is still in its early days. DTCC, known as Wall Street's bookkeeper, recently put the brakes on a blockchain system for the clearing and settlement of repurchase, or repo, agreement transactions, said Murray Pozmanter, head of clearing agency services at the DTCC. The project, which had successfully tested with startup Digital Asset Holdings (DA), was shelved because banks and other potential users believed the same results could be achieved more cheaply using current technology, he said. "Basically, it became a solution in search of a problem," he said. Post-trade services provider, SIX Securities Services, a unit of the group that operates Switzerland's stock exchange, has also decided not take into production a prototype built by DA for the processing of securities, SIX spokesman Jürg Schneider, told Reuters. "We wanted to go into another direction," Schneider said. The partnership with DA, run by former JPMorgan Chase & Co executive Blythe Masters, was announced in 2016. French bank BNP Paribas in 2016 said its securities services division had partnered with startups including SmartAngels to build a platform for private small businesses to manage their securities. The bank stopped work on the project, and will instead team up with other financial institutions on another blockchain initiative called LiquidShare, said a source familiar with the matter. "Creating an enterprise-wide robust blockchain platform requires the full cooperation of the whole post trade ecosystem," the source said. PROOFS OF CONCEPT The DTCC, BNP Paribas and SIX tests were among a barrage of blockchain "proofs of concept" announced with great fanfare by financial institutions. "A large part of the problem has been expectation management, or rather lack thereof by many vendors and large consultancies that made claims that could not be fulfilled in the time spans they had said on stage at fintech events," said Tim Swanson, founder of technology advisory Post Oak Labs. Reuters reported last week JPMorgan was considering spinning off its marquee blockchain project Quorum. In July a partnership between settlement provider Euroclear and startup Paxos to develop a blockchain service was dissolved. Still, other projects are moving forward. Pozmanter said the DTCC is still examining another project with DA and that it is close to testing a blockchain-based trade information warehouse set to launch next year. "We're still bullish on the technology," Pozmanter said. The repo test with DA "met all its stated goals" and led to a new project that DTCC is examining, said DA spokeswoman Vera Newhouse. SIX is working on a blockchain project with Nasdaq  and Australia's stock exchange ASX Ltd said in December that DA will help replace its registry, settlement and clearing system, in one of the most ambitious projects to receive a green light. (Reporting by John McCrank and Anna Irrera; Editing by Nick Zieminski)

Will a public relations campaign in Washington by Facebook’s Sheryl Sandberg and others take the heat off technology giants? Ms. Sandberg, who sat down with lawmakers on Capitol Hill and was  , conceded that Facebook made mistakes during the 2016 presidential campaign. And she gave more information to congressional investigators. As collected by Cecilia Kang,  : • Representative Emanuel Cleaver II, Democrat of Missouri: “She said 10 to 15 times, ‘We’ve got to do better.’ ” • Representative K. Michael Conaway, Republican of Texas: “They are leaning in on this issue.” • Representative G. K. Butterfield, Democrat of North Carolina: “I remain cautiously optimistic.” But those expecting huge changes in Facebook’s business model will be disappointed. Sara Fischer and David McCabe,  : •  : How Facebook advertising works. • How the world views tech now, according to Ross Baird of the venture capital firm Village Capital in  : Executives from Facebook, Alphabet and Twitter will testify before the Senate Intelligence committee on Nov. 1. Now that Mr. Trump is taking his biggest step yet to unwind the Affordable Care Act, how will the stock market react? So far, health insurers are keeping quiet. But some representatives for the industry are speaking out. The White House’s proposal “would draw younger and healthier people away from the exchanges and drive additional plans out of the market,” Ceci Connolly of the Alliance of Community Health Plans told The  . Shares in major American health insurers were little changed in premarket trading today. Today, Bank of America and Wells Fargo are reporting earnings. How are they doing in the quest to find more profit? JPMorgan Chase and Citigroup both beat earnings expectations, but not because of fixed-income trading. “Solid but perhaps not exceptional,” one shareholder told the  . • JPMorgan benefited from better lending margins, according to  . • Citi benefited from better investment banking performance. • Goldman, which reports on Tuesday, is getting into mortgages for house-flippers by buying Genesis Capital, according to The  . (Yesterday we discussed its Innovation Lab initiative.) •  : Banks will need more than a cut in the corporate tax rate, with sluggish loan growth and growing defaults on the horizon. •  : Expect tech companies like Google and Amazon to muscle their way into lending. Jamie Dimon, a famous Bitcoin skeptic, said he’s   about the digital money anymore. That’s O.K., because everyone else  . Bitcoin   of $5,856. Why? • Expectations that China might ease restrictions on Bitcoin • A prediction from Michael Novogratz, formerly of Fortress Investment Group, that Bitcoin could hit $10,000 within the next year. • JPMorgan and Citi are joining Goldman in considering whether to trade in the cryptocurrency. • Christine Lagarde said it was   about the digital currency, pointing out that the I.M.F.’s Special Drawing Right could incorporate cryptocurrency technology. Paul Vigna,  : Tugce Ozsoy and Natasha Doff,  : • Janet Yellen, the choice for continuity. • Jerome Powell, the choice for maintaining current rate policy but more deregulation. • Kevin Warsh, the choice for skeptics of inflationary policy. • John Taylor, the choice for those even more worried about inflation. The   that President Trump met with Mr. Taylor on Wednesday. Depends on whom you ask. •  : Steven Mnuchin is pushing for Mr. Powell. •  : A survey of economists found Mr. Warsh is considered the leading candidate, with Ms. Yellen and Mr. Powell tied for second. Who could take over as the leading patron for Los Angeles after Mr. Broad — one of the city’s top social and philanthropic figures for five decades — steps down from public life? Adam Nagourney and Adam Popescu,  : He also mentioned  , who donated $150 million to the Los Angeles County Museum of Art. • He has counseled mayors and governors. • He has donated $4 billion to philanthropy and medical research. • The Broad Foundations’ endowment now totals $2.5 billion. • He spearheaded the construction of the Walt Disney Concert Hall in downtown L.A. , an assistant managing editor at The L.A. Times: Yet another hot tech start-up’s business model is being questioned, in the wake of scrutiny at Theranos, Zenefits and Just Mayo. The WSJ reports that Outcome Health, which puts those video screens in doctors offices that show drug ads, had misled its pharmaceutical clients by charging them for more ad placements than it had screens available to show them. Rolfe Winkler,  : The report says that there’s no evidence that Outcome’s top executives knew about the scheme. But three employees have been put on paid leave, and the company is conducting a review. • Goldman Sachs • Alphabet’s CapitalG • Pritzker Group Ventures •  : Roy Price, the executive in charge of Amazon’s investment in films and television shows, was suspended after a Hollywood producer publicly accused him of making unwanted sexual advances toward her. •  : The CtW Investment Group, which advises several union pension funds invested in 21st Century Fox, has called for the company to overhaul its board and conduct a comprehensive review of its workplace culture in the wake of sexual and racial harassment scandals at Fox News. •  : The police in London and New York said on Thursday that they were looking into complaints involving Harvey Weinstein. • Bryan Taylor, one of TPG’s top technology deal makers, is leaving after 13 years,  . DealBook’s Andrew Ross Sorkin will interview Richard Branson, the Virgin Group founder (and as of yesterday, a  ), at a TimesTalks event on Oct. 18. 
Good morning, readers! Let’s talk about tech. The stock market hasn’t been kind to new consumer start-ups. Snap, the maker of Snapchat, has been dogged by sluggish user growth since it hit the market last summer; its stock price is still below its $17 I.P.O. price. Blue Apron, the meal delivery start-up, is also trading far below what investors paid for its stock last June. The apparel retailer Stitch Fix, meanwhile, has gained some ground since its I.P.O. in November, but only barely. Now Spotify thinks it can buck the trend. After months of windup, the   this week to sell shares on the New York Stock Exchange. It isn’t doing an initial public offering but instead a novel model called a direct stock listing — but let’s forget about the mechanics for now and consider its prospects. On the surface, it looks like a tough road for Spotify. The company is beset by wealthy competitors, is losing tons of money, and its business model does not offer an obvious path to huge profits. But it has one thing going for it, and it’s huge: Spotify is excellent at what it does. None of its competitors match its pace of innovation and its wide cross-platform functionality. And although many musicians remain suspicious of Spotify, it offers the best path forward for the industry — a chance to thrive outside the cross hairs of Apple, Google, Amazon and Facebook. Spotify’s filings suggest strong growth. The company has 159 million active users, 71 million of whom pay for a subscription to its ad-free service. Its revenue in 2017 was almost $5 billion, up 38.6 percent from the year before. But its losses also piled up; its operating loss was $461 million in 2017, up slightly from $426 million in 2016. There’s a path here to success. Spotify’s grand theory is that as it grows, it can negotiate better rates with music labels, which then increases its chance of profitability. That’s happening — its   — but slowly. And it’s always going to have huge content costs; Spotify has to pay for music every time it’s streamed, whereas video streaming companies like Netflix usually pay for content just once. But Spotify is worth rooting for. It’s one of few examples of a thriving consumer company that sits outside the clutches of large American tech firms. (It’s based in Sweden.) Its independence makes it great for consumers — Spotify works just about everywhere, from your iPhone to your Amazon Echo to your cheapo Android tablet. Because music streaming is all the company does, it has an incentive to keep improving its service; Spotify, I’ve noticed, adds excellent features faster than most of its bigger competitors add basic ones. That’s the best reason to hope it survives. Last month,   to send in ideas for tech stories they’d like to see covered in The Times. I expected to get a handful of responses; instead we were inundated with hundreds of thoughtful suggestions. And I read all of them! Thankfully, most of you were brief. So, what would you like to see more of? A lot of things, it turns out. Many people were interested in cryptocurrencies and the blockchains behind them. What did they want to know? The basics, really, like what’s the deal with cryptocurrencies, what is a blockchain and why is everybody suddenly talking about both? We actually have   by our Bitcoin reporter, Nathaniel Popper — and stay tuned for more. There was also a lot of interest in “algorithmic bias,” the suspicion that the computers making so many decisions about our lives might not be fair or transparent. Readers were also interested in technologies for people who aren’t thought of as a natural audience for new tech — older people, for example, or people in rural areas. “Don’t overlook the folks who are being left behind,” said Michael Starks of Zionsville, Ind. Many had concerns about security. They wondered if the cloud was really secure, and if there was anything they could do to make themselves safer online. That’s an area Times reporters are constantly digging into, but for now, the brief answer is: You’re never as safe as companies say you are. Finally, there was an interest in up-and-coming tech, even tech that’s way out there. Important as they are, people are sick of hearing about Google, Facebook, Apple, Amazon and Twitter. They want to know about quantum computers, flying cars (oh, look,  ), any manner of robots and the start-ups behind them. And even beyond that: “All these billionaires, yet no one is making serious ground on time machines or teleportation?” asked one reader. Good question! So, some news: This will be my last newsletter for a few months. Like my nemesis Mike Isaac, I’m going to write a book about my hobbyhorse — how Apple, Amazon, Facebook and Google are conquering the world. When I get back, I hope they put me on the time travel beat. See you then!
WASHINGTON — A manufacturing start-up recently announced plans to move into a shuttered aluminum factory in upstate New York, taking advantage of abundant cheap electricity from the St. Lawrence River. Instead of smelting aluminum, however, the company plans to turn that power into Bitcoins. Money is supposed to be a means of buying things. Now, the nation’s hottest investment is buying money. And the investment rush is raising questions about whether one reason for the slow pace of economic growth in recent years is that the nation is busy distracting itself. While Bitcoin mining may not be labor intensive, it diverts time, energy and capital from other, more productive activities that economists say could fuel faster growth. “It appears that much of our evolving digital infrastructure is devoted to activities, like the proliferation of cybercoins, that are worse than frivolous,” said James McAndrews, the former head of research at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York. By a wide range of measures, America has a productivity problem. The economy is growing slowly, and almost 20 percent of adults in their prime working years  . Americans who do have jobs are less likely  . Even the most basic kind of production is in decline.   and making fewer babies. Some economists see evidence that people are  ,  , and plowing a growing share of their time, capital and natural resources into virtual products like social media, games and the latest fad: virtual currencies. Bitcoin, the largest virtual currency, is a particularly voracious consumer of resources because new Bitcoins are distributed in a kind of lottery where each ticket is purchased with electricity. Bitcoin miners compete for the coins by submitting answers to difficult math problems. Instead of solving the problems, miners use computers to submit a flood of guesses. This can be lucrative: Each Bitcoin is currently valued at about $10,550. Believers insist it is a worthwhile endeavor. They describe Bitcoin as a superior currency that will eventually come into wide use, and they predict even broader applications for  , the  used to record ownership of Bitcoins and to verify transactions. But Bitcoin remains so hard to use that a major Bitcoin conference in January  . It is, in practice, a speculative investment, like gold. And Tyler Cowen, an economist at George Mason University, said mining gold was a better use of resources, because even if it lost value, it could be used to fill teeth. “Once the Bitcoin power is burned, it is never coming back,” he said. Colin L. Read, the mayor of Plattsburgh, N.Y., also sees it as a public nuisance. The city was guaranteed a fixed supply of cheap electricity as part of the construction of power-generating dams on the St. Lawrence in the 1950s. Bitcoin mining companies are plugging into that power supply like a swarm of hungry mosquitoes. Mr. Read said that Bitcoin mining now consumes about 10 percent of the city’s power, and that is forcing Plattsburgh to buy a growing amount of extra electricity on the open market, at rates up to 100 times higher than its base cost. Mr. Read, who is also an economics professor, said he would rather sell the city’s supply of cheap power to companies employing large numbers of people.  , which makes bottle caps, also uses about 10 percent of the city’s power, but it employs about 200 people. The mining companies? “They hire a security guard,” he said. “And a guy who comes when something breaks.” David Bowman, who describes himself as Plattsburgh’s first Bitcoin miner — “I started a long time ago, around 2014,” he said — started with a handful of computers. Now he has 20 machines. A few years ago, he rented a room in an old paper warehouse, where he runs the specialized hard drives around the clock. They sit side-by-side on wire racks, fans whirring to dissipate the heat. About half a dozen other mining companies have since moved into the same building. Mr. Bowman, who is from Plattsburgh, said he sympathizes with the mayor’s concerns. He is the only employee of his company, and he is presently a full-time medical student on the Caribbean island of Grenada. But Bitcoin mining paid his college tuition and it is paying for medical school. And he doesn’t see that Plattsburgh has better options. “The place needs all the jobs they can get,” he said, although his company employs no one beyond him. He does pay fees to an investor-owned company that operates and maintains the machines and has one employee. Other governments also are grappling with the merits of virtual currencies. Enel, the largest European power company, said earlier this month it would not sell electricity to a virtual miner, citing environmental concerns. “Enel has undertaken a clear path toward decarbonization and sustainable development and sees the intensive use of energy dedicated to cryptocurrency mining as an unsustainable practice that does not fit with the business model it is pursuing,” the company, partly owned by the Italian government, said in a statement. Some Bitcoin miners emphasize their reliance on renewable energy, but the energy they use might otherwise be put to other purposes. Consider the example of Quebec, one of the world’s largest producers of hydroelectric power. Local demand has flatlined, leading the province to consider exporting electricity to Massachusetts, which is seeking to increase the share of current power consumption generated by sustainable sources. But Quebec is now weighing that possibility alongside a wave of proposals from mining companies. Some American utilities, too, are hungry for new customers. Domestic demand for electricity is in decline as power-hungry industries, like aluminum smelting, have moved to other countries and  . “They’re thankful that anyone still wants to use energy,” said Robert McCullough of McCullough Research, an Oregon energy consultancy. And plenty of places are hungry for jobs — even the relatively few jobs that virtual mining brings. Massena, the town with the shuttered smelter, is about two hours from Plattsburgh. It also enjoys a guaranteed supply of cheap electricity, but it has lost several of its major employers, including the smelter and a General Motors factory. The New York Power Authority reserves 490 megawatts of low-cost power for industrial users in Franklin, Jefferson and St. Lawrence counties, the northern tier that includes Massena. The decline of local industry means only 52 percent of that power is currently committed, which is why officials were delighted when a company called Coinmint proposed to install 16,000 computers in the old aluminum building. The company, which is still negotiating contracts, told the power authority it would employ 150 people. Employers historically have created 30.5 jobs in exchange for each megawatt of low-cost electricity, according to the power authority, while Coinmint is proposing to create just new 10 jobs per megawatt. But 10 is more than none. “The plan is to get anybody here that you can,” said Steven D. O’Shaughnessy, Massena’s town supervisor. “I have said all along, I’ll take whatever I can.”
SAN FRANCISCO — The creators of the famous Forbes rich list have made their first attempt to identify  . Yet the list that was published on Wednesday, right after major drops in virtual currency prices, inadvertently also served as a reminder of the fleeting nature of that wealth. While the list in Forbes magazine, which was assembled in recent weeks, identifies about 10 virtual currency billionaires, most of them were not billionaires by the time the feature went online on Wednesday morning. On Monday alone, the prices of many virtual currencies plummeted over 20 percent, before stabilizing on Tuesday. At the top of the list is Chris Larsen, a founder of the Ripple virtual currency. Mr. Larsen was   last month when Ripple’s price peaked, taking his net wealth to nearly $60 billion. Since then, the price of Ripple’s digital token, XRP, has fallen more than 80 percent. Forbes put Mr. Larsen’s wealth at around $8 billion, but the same holdings were worth less than $6 billion by Wednesday. Mr. Larsen is followed on the Forbes list by Joseph Lubin, an early investor in the Ethereum virtual currency network; Changpeng Zhao, founder of the virtual currency exchange Binance; the brothers Tyler and Cameron Winklevoss,   who are famous from their legal battles with Mr. Zuckerberg over Facebook; and Matthew Mellon, the banking heir who is now a major holder of XRP. The list is a reminder of how the biggest gains in virtual currencies have been reaped by a small number of early adopters — despite the early promises that virtual currencies could democratize the financial system and spread wealth more evenly. Nearly all of the people on the list either helped found virtual currencies or have been involved with them for years. Recent   among Bitcoin holders have found that it is significantly higher than in even the most stratified countries, which may sting many people who recently rushed into virtual currencies and are now sitting on losses. For early virtual currency adopters like the people on the Forbes list, the recent price declines are not catastrophic. The price of Bitcoin is still up 600 percent from a year ago, and up 70,000 percent from when the Winklevoss twins began buying in 2012. Identifying the richest people in the secretive and paranoid virtual currency realm is far from easy; some of it is guesswork. Mr. Lubin, whom Forbes pegged as the second-wealthiest person in the virtual currency universe, illustrates the difficulties. He told the magazine that he had begun selling his Ethereum tokens, known as Ether, last year to fund his business, ConsenSys. Because Forbes could not verify his holdings, the magazine put his wealth at between $1 billion and $5 billion before the most recent price declines. The normal Forbes billionaires list is easier to compile because the richest people in the world generally have most of their wealth tied up in stock holdings, which usually have to be disclosed for big public companies. With virtual currencies, it is not necessary to disclose your identity, and the system was created by people who were interested in protecting financial privacy. Many large holders of virtual currencies are loath to acknowledge their holdings for privacy and security reasons, and many people who are rumored to have giant Bitcoin stockpiles are not on the Forbes list. Perhaps the most notable omission is Satoshi Nakamoto, the mysterious creator of Bitcoin, whose identity has been guessed at many times but never confirmed.   that Satoshi, as the creator is known, most likely amassed about one million Bitcoins during the network’s first year, when few other people were mining new tokens. Those Bitcoins would now be worth around $7 billion. Others have publicly claimed to have large holdings without verifying those holdings. Brock Pierce, a former child actor and the leader of a  , has said he would donate $1 billion of his virtual currency fortune to charity, but Forbes said, “He refuses to provide documentation that proves he has anywhere near that much money.” The magazine estimated Mr. Pierce’s wealth at between $700 million and $1 billion. The list suggests that inventing virtual currencies can end up being less lucrative than investing in them. The magazine estimated that the inventor of Ethereum, Vitalik Buterin, is less wealthy than two early investors, Mr. Lubin and Anthony Di Iorio, who had previously managed his family’s patio-door business in Canada. And while three big holders of Ripple’s token, XRP, are on the list, the inventor of the digital token, Jed McCaleb, is not.
• Judge deals AT&T a setback in fight with Justice Department • Billionaire investor Steven A. Cohen lost a bid to seal a sex discrimination lawsuit against his investment firm. • Corporate leaders are discussing whether the finance industry can help regulate gun sales. • Walmart’s fourth-quarter earnings missed expectations. • Facebook is still facing blowback for an executive’s tweets about Russian electoral meddling. • Qualcomm’s revised bid for NXP raises questions about Broadcom’s pursuit of the company. The telecom company  between the White House and the Justice Department regarding AT&T’s $85.4 billion acquisition of Time Warner. On Tuesday, a judge ruled that AT&T was not entitled to those documents, saying the companies had not “made a credible showing that they have been especially singled out.” AT&T has argued that the Justice Department has unfairly singled out its proposed merger with Time Warner partly to stay in favor with the White House. President Trump has been a vocal critic of Time Warner’s news network, CNN, and said before the election that the deal should be stopped. The trial is set to begin on March 19. For the first time, and after much protest, public companies must report their employees’ median pay and compare it with that of the chief executive. The Dodd-Frank Act, passed nearly eight years ago, required the disclosure, and firms are now disclosing it in proxy reports for 2017. Companies, lobbyists and some compensation experts spent years criticizing the rule, arguing that it revealed little about pay trends and was of little use to shareholders. The Institute for Policy Studies, a liberal-leaning think tank, on Tuesday noted that Honeywell was the first United States corporation to release the ratio. The company’s C.E.O., Darius Adamczyk, had a total pay package of $16.8 million in 2017, which was 333 times the pay of the median employee. The rule allows certain companies to exclude some foreign employees from the calculation of the ratio. Honeywell excluded workers from several countries where pay is most likely lower than in the United States. “The 333:1 ratio that Honeywell is reporting most likely would be even wider if Honeywell took all its workers into account,” the Institute said. A federal judge in Manhattan, in a brief order, rejected a motion filed by lawyers for Mr. Cohen and his firm, Point72 Asset Management, to temporarily seal a complaint filed last week by Lauren Bonner, an employee of the firm. Mr. Cohen’s lawyer had asked the judge to seal the lawsuit, which alleges the firm underpays female employees and fosters a hostile workplace for women, pending the resolution of another motion to push the matter into arbitration. Judge Analisa Torres of Federal District Court in Manhattan said the request to seal the entire complaint was “not narrowly tailored” and was inconsistent with the “presumption of public access” to court records. Lawyers for Mr. Cohen had sought to seal the order because it contained details of other employees’ compensation packages. The lawsuit also detailed a testosterone-fueled “boys’ club” atmosphere in which men commented frequently on women’s bodies and belittled their abilities. Andrew writes: More from the column:  President Trump expressed some openness to  . The United States Treasury Department is flooding the market with debt. On Tuesday, the government sold $179 billion worth of debt. That’s been a regular question since the tax overhaul was signed into law last year. Analysts at Goldman Sachs in a note over the weekend shed some light on the answer. • “Companies have pointed to a modest increase in investment as one destination for the incremental cash flow from tax reform. Consensus estimates for 2018 capex have increased by $17 billion (3 percent) since the passage of tax reform.” • Last month 39 S.&P. 500 companies increased their dividend, while for the first since 2012 no companies cut their payments. • Buying back shares remains a priority of companies, Goldman writes. Over the past 2 ½ months, S.&P. 500 firms have announced $171 billion of buybacks, $67 billion of which has come this year, a 22% increase from the same period in 2017. By many measures, corporate earnings are the strongest they have been in the past decade. Goldman points out: • Companies in the S.&P. 500 are set to report that profit grew 15 percent last quarter. That’s the fastest pace since 2011. • The percentage of companies beating estimates is at its highest level since 2010. The percentage beating sales forecast is at its highest since 2004. But the stock reaction to S.&P. 500 companies either beating or missing expectations “has been muted relative to history.” The reason? Investors are more focused on tax reform and earnings forecasts for 2018, Goldman writes. Analysts have raised their 2018 earnings estimates for companies in the S.&P. 500 by 7 percent so far this year. Higher profit margins because of the lower corporate tax rate are driving much of the increase in this year’s earnings forecast. A point that becomes clearer by looking at 2018 sales estimates. Analysts have increased their revenue forecasts by only one percentage point and much of that increase comes from higher oil prices boosting forecasts for energy companies. Remember when the company said that it was changing its name from Long Island Iced Tea and shift its corporate focus to virtual currencies? Well,  : • Long Blockchain has named a new C.E.O., Shamyl Malik. • It plans to spin off its beverage division into the publicly traded Long Island Brand Beverages by June 30, and the company’s last C.E.O., Philip Thomas, will be on the new business’ board. • And last week, Nasdaq informed Long Blockchain that it   because its stock price had traded too low. Long Blockchain’s market cap as of this morning was $31.9 million, below Nasdaq’s threshold, after shares in the company tumbled amid the great crypto crash of early 2018. The company is appealing. Here’s why the company’s shares are down 10percent — their biggest fall since 2015 — after  : • The company earned   a share, while analysts had expected $1.37. • Operating income    , to $4.5 billion, thanks to charges tied to the closing of Sam’s Club stores. • E-commerce sales   during the quarter, a slower pace than in previous quarters. • Full-year sales growth expectations went down by  , to 1.5 percent to 2 percent, in part because of Sam’s Club and a curb on the sales of tobacco products. What the company’s chief, Doug McMillon,  : Days after Rob Goldman, its vice president of advertising, tried to clear up misconceptions about the company’s role in the 2016 presidential election, Facebook  . President Trump took the tweets as proof that Russia didn’t try to help him win, while critics said they  . Mr. Goldman apologized in an internal Facebook post. But his tweets — which   — suggested that Facebook executives   how central the company was to Russia’s misinformation campaign, according to Nicholas Thomson of Wired. More from Kevin Roose of  : Josh Hendler, the former head of tech for the Democratic National Committee,  , “It was an almost perfect example of Silicon Valley overconfidence and lack of sophistication when it comes to politics.” • One sign of how highly Google and Facebook value A.I.: The researchers sit near their C.E.O.s. ( ) • Is Google’s ad blocker for the Chrome browser good for the web? ( ) • Washington’s mayor, Muriel Bowser, toured San Francisco to promote her city’s tech bona fides. ( ) • And Washington has granted Elon Musk’s Boring Company permission to do a little digging. ( ) • Snapchat and Nike’s partnership during the N.B.A. All-Star Weekend highlighted the social network’s future in e-commerce. ( ) • Sony is planning an A.I.-based ride-hailing system for Tokyo. ( ) With Qualcomm   to  from $110, it may have finally found a way to beat back its persistent and unwanted suitor. Broadcom has said a higher NXP bid would be a deal-breaker (as of this morning, however, Michael hears that it isn’t clear whether it will walk away). The new offer may have come at an opportune time: I.S.S., the influential proxy adviser, recommended that Qualcomm shareholders vote for four of Broadcom’s six board nominees. (But that too falls short of Broadcom’s goals. The company’s C.E.O., Hock Tan, has said he would walk away if the entire slate wasn’t elected.)  Elliott Management, which campaigned against the $110-a-share offer, is on board with the new one. But will Qualcomm’s shareholders accept paying more for NXP? It and other hedge funds stand to be big winners from Qualcomm’s raised offer. that Elliott, Soroban Capital Partners, Pentwater Capital Management and Farallon Capital Management own 47 percent of NXP’s shares. • Albertsons plans to buy Rite Aid to better compete with Amazon, Walmart and Walgreens. ( ) • BHP Billiton’s C.E.O. will meet with Elliott Management to discuss changing its corporate strategy. ( ) • SoftBank   as part of any minority investment. But Patrick Jenkins of the FT ponders whether Masa Son can become  . • The marketing company Engine Shop has bought T Burns Sports Group, the consultancy founded by Terrence Burns, who worked on eight winning Olympic and World Cup campaigns, including Pyeongchang’s. ( ) • How Spotify’s privately traded shares could influence its direct listing. ( ) • The head of Arcadia, which owns Topshop, denied being in talks to sell it to a Chinese textile giant. ( ) • ValueAct has bought 5.4 percent of Merlin Entertainments, which owns Madame Tussauds, as U.S. activists continue to seek targets in Europe. ( ) • Temenos of Switzerland is near a deal to buy Fidessa, a British maker of financial software, for more than £1.3 billion. ( ) • President Trump   the Senate campaign of Mitt Romney, whom he once called “  in the history of Republican politics.” • Public support for the tax overhaul  , according to a survey by the NYT and SurveyMonkey. It has also made   about stock prices.   over whether the Office Management and Budget should get involved in tax rules. • The recent budget deal takes a step toward a federal rescue for as many as 200 multi-employer pension plans. ( ) • The Office of Financial Research, Washington’s financial storm forecaster, is foundering. ( ) • How Michael Cohen, Mr. Trump’s longtime personal lawyer, used intimidation, hush money and a top tabloid publisher to protect his client. ( ) • The Trump administration is continuing to dismantle Obama-era L.G.B.T. policies. ( ) • The California assemblywoman Cristina Garcia, a leading voice for #MeToo, has been accused of sexually harassing staffers. ( ) An estimated   in the U.S., and $235 million in four-day sales. The fifth-biggest U.S. box office opening ever, not adjusted for inflation. An estimated $387 million in sales worldwide. (Oh, and a soundtrack that’s  .) Has Disney’s latest blockbuster   that there aren’t big audiences for movies with largely black casts? More from Brooks Barnes of the NYT: What effect would Wakanda opening itself up have for global trade balances? What would happen to mining stocks? How would its immigration policies work if the country’s ruler says, “In times of crisis, the wise build bridges?” Does Wakanda have its own blockchain technology? Investors have been held hostage until they paid Bitcoin or Ether ransoms worth millions of dollars, as criminals   at the crypto-rich. The worst part: There’s no way to halt or reverse a Bitcoin transfer. Solutions discussed at a recent conference included hiring security, setting up “duress wallets” to fool hostage takers, and keeping Bitcoin fortunes secret.  China’s crackdown on crypto   there. Prime Shipping Foundation, which struck the first freight deal settled in Bitcoin,   And retail investors   if the digital money markets collapsed, according to S. & P. Global Ratings. About $11,490, according to  • Mark Carney of the Bank of England says Bitcoin has failed as a currency. ( ) • Paul Singer of Elliott Management called virtual currencies “one of the most brilliant scams in history.” ( ) • Sarah Tavel of Benchmark thinks digital money has a bright future but many I.C.O.s are “complete scams.” ( ) • John Flint, HSBC’s incoming C.E.O., is a virtual currency skeptic too. ( ) • Deutsche Bank is cutting 250 to 500 investment banking jobs, unnamed sources say. ( ) •  , Citibank’s global head of foreign exchange solutions, is stepping down after 38 years at the bank. He’ll be replaced by Sam Hewson. ( ) • HSBC’s full-year results missed expectations, partly because of the collapses of Steinhoff International in South Africa and Carillion in Britain. ( ) • Private equity bosses face an uncomfortable choice between becoming corporations, potentially bolstering their valuations, and staying as partnerships to keep taxes lower. ( ) • WeWork’s C.E.O. doesn’t just want to lease communal offices. He wants to transform how people work, live and play. ( ) • Britain’s prime minister, Theresa May, is considering a contingency plan that would involve holding back billions of pounds in Brexit payments if the E.U. does not give Britain the trade deal it wants, unnamed sources say. ( ) • The European Central Bank has asked Latvia to freeze payments to its third-largest lender, ABLV Bank, after the U.S. Treasury Department said it may label the firm a money launderer for North Korea. ( ) • Fox News is planning a stand-alone subscription service, available without a cable package. ( )
SAN FRANCISCO — There are hedge funds with blockbuster returns. Then there is the Pantera Bitcoin Fund. The fund — one of the first in the world to dedicate itself to virtual currencies — released its returns in a letter sent to investors on Tuesday. The figure for the life of the fund, which was set up in 2013, is eye popping: 25,004 percent. A significant portion of the gains have come this year, thanks to the skyrocketing price of an individual Bitcoin, which hit $19,000 on Monday. (The fund’s 25,004 percent figure was actually counted back when Bitcoin was at $15,500, a week ago.) For comparison, the top performing hedge fund in the world last year returned 148 percent,  , a hedge fund tracker. Since 2013, the Pantera Bitcoin Fund’s compound annual returns have been around 250 percent. The Pantera Bitcoin Fund did not have to do much to get those returns. It just bought Bitcoins and held them as the price went up. Its performance is a reminder of the unprecedented gains that Bitcoin has experienced, with some analysts arguing that Bitcoin’s moves have been   back in the 1600s. But Dan Morehead, who founded Pantera Capital and the fund after a career at Goldman Sachs, said it was not an easy decision to create a Bitcoin-focused hedge fund in 2013, when Bitcoin was primarily known as a currency for online drug markets. “The first hard part was actually deciding to launch a cryptocurrency fund when everyone else thought that was crazy,” he said on Monday. Many of the investors in the Pantera fund have not enjoyed its full 25,004 percent return. Some bought in at the beginning and then sold out when Bitcoin’s price was in a slow steady decline during 2014 and 2015. Others bought in during the current boom and have reaped only the returns that Bitcoin has experienced over the last year. Those still aren’t bad, at around 1,900 percent. Those gains have given Pantera a lot of competition. More than 150   have been created this year, bringing the total number of such funds to 175, according to the research firm Autonomous Next. Pantera estimated that in dollar terms, the fund has made $2.1 billion for its investors. Investors have taken out Bitcoins worth around $1.7 billion to hold for themselves, to avoid paying Pantera’s 0.75 percent annual fees. That has left Pantera holding coins worth $400 million. Overall, investors originally put about $150 million into the fund. Like all hedge funds, Pantera is open only to accredited investors with significant assets. The minimum investment is $50,000. The relatively straightforward strategy of the Pantera Bitcoin Fund, which has offices in San Francisco, could be replicated by small investors buying and holding Bitcoins. But in its investor letter, Pantera noted that investors who go through  , pay fees ranging from 1.5 percent to 4 percent each time they buy or sell Bitcoin, creating more costs than Pantera charges its investors. The Pantera Bitcoin Fund has developed strategies for buying and selling at good prices and also buys and holds an alternative to Bitcoin, Bitcoin Cash, which was  . Mr. Morehead said his fund has been attractive because it allows investors access to Bitcoin without going to Bitcoin exchanges, the places where people buy and sell the tokens, which have been hacked many times in recent years. Several of the fund’s early investors came from the top ranks of the enormous asset manager the Fortress Investment Group. One of them, Michael Novogratz, is  . There have been a number of attempts to set up a similar fund for small investors, a so-called exchange traded fund, or E.T.F. So far, though,  . Meanwhile, Pantera has expanded its own offerings with six other funds. Most recently, it began the Pantera Digital Asset Fund, which owns 25 virtual currencies, including several that were created through so-called  Mr. Morehead said there is a chance that the value of a Bitcoin could plummet to zero, given how early and undeveloped the technology still is. He said he tells investors to put only around 1 percent of their net worth in virtual currencies. But he thinks that 1 percent could do very well. “There are a lot of famous people who have said Bitcoin is a joke,” he said on Monday. “They might be right. But if they are wrong and it goes up 25 times, they are missing out on a huge trade.”
Amazon, Berkshire Hathaway and JPMorgan Chase are teaming up to  . • Ken Chenault is moving to venture capital. • JPMorgan has (and hasn’t) clarified its succession plans. • What should we expect in tonight’s State of the Union speech? Health care stocks fell on news that Amazon, Berkshire Hathaway and JPMorgan are partnering to form a venture to lower the health care costs of their employees. The e-commerce giant has so disrupted businesses from booksellers to grocers to department stores over its two decades as a public company that  . And with good reason. Amazon could spend huge sums, and bear years of losses, to win customers with lower prices. But beyond that threat, there are some big questions looming over the initiative. The venture will be an independent company that “is free from profit-making incentives and constraints.” That sounds liberating, and there is no reason to think it won’t be, but such visionary language would pack a bigger punch if it was accompanied by hard cash. The release did not give details about the initial investment in the venture. The effort focuses on the United States employees of JPMorgan Chase, Amazon and Berkshire Hathaway. Together, the companies have nearly one million employees (a portion of those, though, are outside of the United States.) That’s a lot of employees but relatively small when compared with 157 million people who had employer health care plans at the end of 2016, according to the Kaiser Family Foundation. Would the venture be able to scale up? Some experts are skeptical about that. : “My bet is that JPMorgan and Amazon’s employees have pretty good health coverage, with plans that rank among the richest that the industry has to offer. If so, will these lead users be anxious to find a more cost-effective model? Will they even be willing to experiment with their coverage? And, beyond that – if they do develop a new approach, will it be helpful to the masses of employees at lesser companies, or, worse, the unemployed and uninsured?” It’s not clear how much more expertise Amazon, Berkshire and JPMorgan have than companies that have been operating in health care for decades. Amazon could have gotten into pharmacy services years ago, if it had wanted, which means it might have seen complexities and risks that don’t exist in other sectors. Berkshire brings a strong insurance specialization, but not in providing health insurance directly to the consumer. What is more, Berkshire’s point man in the joint health care effort will be Todd Combs, an investor who does not come from the insurance operations of the company. Much depends on whether the effort can address the main reason that health care spending has gone up in the United States versus other countries. A recent   showed how much of the rise is a result of more being done for patients during hospital stays and doctor visits, or that they are charged more for those services. One way to assess the brash new initiative from Jeff Bezos, Warren Buffett and Jamie Dimon is whether it does anything to address this dynamic. That’s how Warren Buffett referred to the nation’s “ballooning costs of health care” Tuesday. Mr. Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway   to form an independent health care company to serve their employees in the United States. The three companies provided few details about the new entity, other than saying it would initially focus on technology to provide simplified, high-quality health care for their employees and their families, and at a reasonable cost. They said the initiative, which is in the early planning stages, would be a long-term effort “free from profit-making incentives and constraints.” Mr. Buffett’s concern about rising health care costs is not new, nor is his use of “tapeworm” to describe them. Mr. Buffett’s statement Tuesday echoes other recent comments he has made on the subject. He trotted out the tapeworm metaphor to describe rising medical costs during television interviews in 2010 and 2012,  . : “Medical costs are the tapeworm of American economic competitiveness.” In fact, Mr. Buffett use of the tapeworm metaphor to describe drags on the economy dates back more than three-and-a-half decades at least. Mr. Buffett wrote in his 1981 shareholder letter: “Inflation acts as a gigantic corporate tapeworm.” Then in his 2013 letter to Berkshire shareholders, he wrote: “Citizens and public officials typically under-appreciated the gigantic financial tapeworm that was born when promises were made that conflicted with a willingness to fund them.” The smooth glide higher for U.S. stock markets may be hitting a bumpier stretch. Volatility, as measured by the widely followed C.B.O.E. Volatility Index, or VIX, jumped nearly 30 percent in recent days as investors paused to consider the ongoing sell-off in the United States dollar and rising yields on United States government debt. The S.&P. 500 stock index dropped roughly 0.7 percent early Tuesday and could notch its second consecutive decline, something that hasn’t happened since mid-December. Low interest rates have been a key ingredient in the almost relentless rise in U.S. equity markets. But with the yield on the benchmark U.S. 10-year Treasury now above 2.70 percent, its highest level in four years, that backdrop could be changing. Despite being inundated by post-American Express job offers, Ken Chenault has chosen an interesting path: becoming chairman and managing partner of General Catalyst Partners, which has invested in Airbnb, Warby Parker and Stripe, among others. More interesting is  , Andrew writes in his latest DealBook column. He’s hoping to be the adult in the room for the next generation of start-ups, after the troubles at Uber, SoFi and more. Here’s what he told Andrew: In   — previously the head of Credit Suisse’s American operations — as the successor to Daniel Och, the hedge fund has apparently laid to rest questions about its leadership planning.  Before Mr. Shafir, Mr. Och’s chosen successor was James Levin. Then the two men had  . Mr. Och’s statement: And a statement by Mr. Levin, who had weighed quitting — but was identified in today’s statement as still being Och-Ziff’s co-chief investment officer: The JPMorgan Chase chief said yesterday that he  . So who will eventually pick up the baton? It could be  , the head of JPMorgan’s investment bank, or  , the head of its consumer bank. They were named co-presidents yesterday — but Mr. Pinto is 55 and Mr. Smith is 59. It could be one of the other executives named in  : •  , 50, who runs the asset and wealth management arm •  , 52, who runs the commercial banking division •  , 48, the C.F.O. “The board and Dimon both believe that under all timing scenarios, whether today or in the future, the company has several highly capable successors in place,” JPMorgan said in its statement. But the firm has had trouble holding onto potential successors over the years.  Mr. Dimon has said publicly that he isn’t going to run for president. (There’s been speculation, and friends are still encouraging him to try.) • Antony Currie writes, “JPMorgan has given Jamie Dimon the freedom to outstay his welcome.” ( ) • Lex writes, “As murky as the future is, the situation at JPMorgan is probably preferable to Goldman, where there is a ferocious thinly-disguised competition between the two co-presidents for the top job.” ( ) Surely jobs and the economy, given how often he has spoken on those topics (including at the World Economic Forum in Davos). Politico   infrastructure, immigration, trade and national security. But here are  : • Will President Trump stick to the script and focus on issues like  ? •    ? Democrats are opposed, and the next shutdown deadline is Feb. 8. • Will he touch on  , given that Republicans have so far rolled back only a small portion of the Affordable Care Act? • Republicans on the House Intelligence Committee voted to release a contentious memo alleging improprieties in the surveillance of a Trump campaign associate. The Justice Department had wanted it kept secret. ( ) • The Trump administration declined to issue new sanctions against Russia. ( ) • Congressional Republicans are hoping to tame President Trump’s stances on trade. ( ) • Businesses and investors are starting to focus on a little-noticed provision in the tax overhaul: “opportunity zones” to draw investment in economically disadvantaged areas. ( ) • The F.B.I.’s deputy director, Andrew McCabe, is stepping down after months of criticism by Mr. Trump. ( ) Both the F.C.C. and the telecom industry are against a plan created at the National Security Council and  . Here’s what Ajit Pai of the F.C.C. said: The White House itself   and appears to prefer focusing on building secure networks using 5G tech. , from Cecilia Kang and Mark Landler of the NYT: • Facebook will  , Mark Zuckerberg says. And pediatric and mental health experts are asking him to  . • How committed is Kodak to virtual currency? ( ) • Microsoft issued an update to Intel’s update mitigating the Spectre security flaw. ( ) • Strava users in the U.S. military have inadvertently disclosed their locations and habits, including in sensitive areas in Iraq and Syria. ( ) Listed in the phalanx of bankers and lawyers behind   is a name you might easily miss, “AFW LP.” It’s short for “Antonio Francesco Weiss,” the former Lazard banker and Treasury Department official — and an adviser to Keurig. Mr. Weiss was one of Lazard’s biggest deal makers, eventually becoming the firm’s global head of investment banking. He worked on InBev’s takeover of Anheuser Busch and Reynolds American’s takeover of Lorillard. (He also sold D.E. Master Blenders to JAB, the investment firm that later bought Keurig.)  to become a counselor at the Treasury Department under the Obama administration, taking on issues like Puerto Rico’s debt crisis and new lending marketplaces. He’s become   at the Mossavar-Rahmani Center for Business and Government at Harvard’s Kennedy School, and  . He has considered getting back into investment banking, and has been courted by many a bank. And he might yet start his own shop. Companies want to go public. But recent news suggests that many want to avoid the initial public offering process. • Exhibit A:  ’s $18.7 billion deal with Dr Pepper Snapple Group, which would let JAB take the coffee maker public. • Exhibit B:   is contemplating  , according to CNBC. (That’s one of several options, we’ve been told.) • Exhibit C:  . Of course, there will still be I.P.O.s.: Uber, Dropbox and Airbnb are all working toward offerings. But if some companies can avoid the process, it appears they will. • Blackstone is in advanced talks to buy about 55 percent of Thomson Reuters’ Financial and Risk business, valuing the unit at about $20 billion, including debt, according to unnamed sources. ( ,  ) • Qualcomm is under growing pressure to negotiate with NXP shareholders, who have become frustrated at its reluctance to discuss raising its bid. ( ) • The Japanese chip maker Renesas Electronics is in talks to buy Maxim Integrated for close to $20 billion, according to unnamed sources. ( ) • Polychain Capital, the hedge fund investing in blockchain assets that’s backed by Sequoia Capital and Andreessen Horowitz, talked to bankers about going public in Canada but decided against. ( ) • SAP will buy Callidus Software for $2.4 billion, its biggest deal in more than three years. ( ) • Dalian Wanda is getting a $5.4 billion investment in its property unit and has put two overseas property developments up for sale, according to unnamed sources. ( ) • Elliott Management is in talks to take over Waterstones, the British book chain owned by the Russian billionaire Alexander Mamut since 2011. ( ) •  , a senior financing banker at Deutsche Bank who is close to SoftBank, has left for Bank of America Merrill Lynch. ( ) •  , Meredith’s chief operating officer, will take over as the C.E.O. of the combined Meredith and Time Inc. ( ) •   will become the editor in chief of the N.Y. Daily News as   takes over the L.A. Times. ( ) • Wells Fargo named   as the permanent head of its mortgage division. ( ) • New Jersey’s newly elected governor, Philip D. Murphy, ordered his state to rejoin a regional carbon trading program. A growing number of Democratic state governors are considering taxing or pricing carbon dioxide emissions. ( ) • Britain would be worse off outside the European Union under every scenario modeled in a British government analysis. ( ) • Janet Yellen will preside over her final policymaking meeting today and tomorrow, in which the Fed is expected to leave its benchmark interest rate unchanged. ( ) • Discussions on revamping the North American Free Trade Agreement moved from stalemate to negotiation during the sixth round of talks, which concluded on Monday. ( ) • To get funds for new stadiums, the N.F.L. dangles the prospect of hosting the Super Bowl. But the windfall generated by the event could be overstated. ( ) • People are sharing their 401(k) balances on social media. ( ) • HNA Group told creditors its ability to repay debt will face a potential shortfall of $2.4 billion in the first quarter, according to people with knowledge of the matter. ( ) • Elon Musk’s tunneling start-up, Boring Company, has started selling a branded flamethrower. It had taken thousands of orders worth $5 million by Monday. ( ) • Indecision at the highest levels of government about Saudi Aramco’s planned initial public offering is causing frustration among company executives and financial advisers. ( ) • Exxon Mobil plans to spend $50 billion on expanding its U.S. business in the next five years, saying that the tax overhaul had “enhanced” its investments. ( )
• A tale of three tech companies earnings. • CBS and Viacom are talking about getting back together. • A shake-up in Airbnb’s C-suite • Why Europe matters for Facebook. • Regulators are worried that Bitcoin’s price is being manipulated. • Jeff Immelt has gone from C.E.O. to V.C. • And when will Congress raise the debt ceiling? Apple reported record profit and sales, Amazon easily beat expectations, and Google-parent Alphabet posted a loss because of the new tax law. $20.1 billion — Apple’s profit during the quarter, up 12 percent.  $88.3 billion — Apple’s revenue for the quarter. • $61.6 billion — Revenue from iPhone sales, up 13 percent from a year earlier.  77.3 million — The number of iPhones that Apple sold in the quarter, down 1 percent and below the 80.2 million analysts expected,   $796 -- The average sale price of an iPhone,  .  $60 billion to $62 billion — Apple's revenue guidance for the current quarter, well below analysts’ expectations of $65.9 billion.  $285 billion — Apple’s big cash pile.  $1.9 billion —the e-commerce giant’s fourth-quarter profit, more than double its profit from a year ago and the first time Amazon’s earnings have surpassed $1 billion in a quarter.  $789 million —The boost to Amazon’s bottom line from a one-time tax benefit.  $60.5 billion — Amazon’s revenue in the quarter, up 38 percent and above analysts’ estimates of $59.8 billion. $3.02 billion — The loss Alphabet reported for the fourth quarter.  $9.9 billion — The hit Alphabet took to its earnings related to the new tax law.  $32.32 billion — The search giant’s revenue for the quarter, up 27 percent from same period a year ago. More than a decade after Viacom and CBS split, the boards of the two companies . • Shari Redstone, who along with her father, Sumner Redstone, controls the two companies, is pushing for a deal.Her previous effort to combine the two companies in 2016 faltered over the concerns of CBS’ directors and CBS’s chief executive, Les Moonves. According to media reports, Mr. Moonves l, though  that he remains wary. • Walt Disney’s deal for much of 21st Century Fox late last year has sparked much strategic rethinking across the industry. Ms. Redstone believes that CBS and Viacom need greater scale to better compete with Disney, Netflix and Amazon. Belinda Johnson is moving up. Laurence Tosi is moving out. And don’t expect the company to go public this year. Ms. Johnson, who’s currently the home-rental company’s chief business affairs and legal officer, will become its chief operating officer. Meanwhile, Mr. Tosi, who had been Airbnb’s chief financial officer since coming over from Blackstone, will leave the company to focus on his investment fund. Airbnb has hired a search firm to find a new C.F.O. Ellie Mertz, the company’s head of global financial planning, will fill in that role on an interim basis. • Ms. Johnson had been a rising star at Airbnb, often compared to Facebook’s Sheryl Sandberg as the company’s  . • Mr. Tosi had been increasingly at odds with Airbnb’s C.E.O., Brian Chesky, over strategy. (The Information covered their disputes — which were over   — in great detail.) Airbnb is heading ever so slowly toward an initial public offering.   as its first outside director, for example, and promoting its most successful business mind to C.O.O. is another step in that direction. Still losing its C.F.O. — particularly one well versed in Wall Street — could set those plans back a bit. Here’s Mr. Chesky on Ms. Johnson: And here’s a statement from Eric Holder, the former U.S. Attorney General who has been advising the company on anti-discrimination policies: And here’s Mr. Chesky on Mr. Tosi: Some of the most consequential battles in the world of technology are playing out in Europe, where governments are cracking down on tech giants like Google and Facebook. Facebook’s quarterly results, released Wednesday, provide crucial information for better understanding the balance of power between Silicon Valley titans and the democracies of Europe. The results clearly showed the importance of the European market to Facebook’s future growth. The company’s average revenue per European user in the fourth quarter of 2017 was $8.86, well below the $26.76 that Facebook rakes in per user in the United States and Canada. Facebook should be able to move that European number a lot higher in the coming years. Europe’s economy is only a bit smaller than the United States’, and the Continent contains prosperous nations whose citizens are just as addicted to social media as Americans. Indeed, Facebook has more daily active users in Europe than in the United States and Canada (277 million versus 184 million.) What is more, total European daily active users grew in the fourth quarter, while the United States and Canada number edged lower. All this helps explain why the growth in European revenue per user, at nearly 50 percent in the fourth quarter versus the year-earlier period, is significantly higher than the 35 percent rate for the United States and Canada. What does this mean for Facebook as European countries introduce measures aimed at   that may go beyond what the company is used to in the United States? Given how lucrative Europe is and will be to Facebook, it may be willing to spend what it takes to comply with new regulations, and even tolerate any inefficiencies the rules impose on its advertising business. Indeed, Facebook itself says it wants to make its network safer for users and democracies. But if there is any slip in that stance, Europe’s leaders, seeing how important their countries are to Facebook’s bottom line, arguably have considerable leverage to respond. Its price on Thursday:  Its all-time high hit on Dec. 18:  That’s more than a 50 percent slide, and it marks it lowest price since November. To put the Bitcoin’s recent slide in perspective, the cryptocurrency has lost $44 billion in market value last month, according to Bloomberg. The tumble has continued so far in February. Bitcoin is down 11 percent Thursday. Regulators are increasingly worried that Bitfinex, a widely used (and famously opaque) exchange,  . The Commodity Futures Trading Commission has subpoenaed the company, whose Tether digital token is often used to buy other virtual currencies. More from Nathaniel Popper of the NYT:  According to  , Bitcoin is trading at $9,545, down almost 7 percent over the last 24 hours, Ethereum’s Ether at $1,099, and Ripple’s XRP at $1.05, down 7 percent. • How Goldman Sachs was rushed into supporting Bitcoin. ( ) • Meet Bibor, a proposed interest rate for lending Bitcoin. ( ) • Samsung is making specialist chips for mining virtual currency. ( ) The Wall Street Journal, citing anonymous sources,   that Saudi Arabia’s Aramco and Google’s parent, Alphabet, are in talks to build a tech hub within the kingdom. Details, including when and if a deal will come to fruition, remain scant at this point. Saudi Arabia is seeking to diversify its economy away from oil, and Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman has made   a key part of his “Vision 2030” plan. In late 2016, he traveled to Silicon Valley to promote those reforms, and the kingdom has taken bigger steps in recent years into the tech investing world. That year Saudi Arabia  , and its Public Investment Fund put $45 billion into SoftBank’s  , which is making eye-popping investments in tech companies. from the WSJ article: It isn’t clear how setting up tech hubs could fundamentally transform an oil company into a tech company — and therefore command a higher multiple — but it’d be interesting to see bankers make that argument. The former G.E. chairman and C.E.O. will focus on tech and health care companies in his new role as  , one of the biggest V.C. firms in the world (that isn’t named SoftBank). From the release: and: (Worth noting: Mr. Immelt’s successor at G.E. is struggling to turn that company around. See below.) Mr. Immelt is only the latest corporate chieftain to find his next act in venture capital. Earlier this week, Ken Chenault announced that he would become  . Mr. Immelt himself famously dallied with Silicon Valley last year, when   to become Uber’s next C.E.O. Its fourth-quarter earnings handily beat expectations. The average price per ad went up 43 percent. Mark Zuckerberg said changes to the News Feed   from the time users spent on it (as Shira Ovide of Gadfly points out, that’s about  ). Here’s where our colleague Peter Eavis says investors should focus: • Apple: Everyone wants to know   — well enough to start a new “supercycle”? • Alphabet: Will   make its nonadvertising business more than a tiny blip in earnings? • Amazon: Will Wall Street have finally  ? ¯\_(ツ)_/¯ • Is digital advertising what’s wrong with the internet? ( ) • More than a million followers have disappeared from the accounts of dozens of prominent Twitter users in recent days.  . ( ) • Microsoft’s cloud computing push continues to pay off. ( ) • Uber is offering bicycle sharing in San Francisco. ( ) • EBay will shift its payments business from PayPal. That pummeled PayPal’s share price in after-hours trading. ( ) • The Twitter co-founder Biz Stone and the Craigslist co-founder Craig Newmark are investing in a fact-checking start-up. ( )  to do it quickly, amid worries that the government could run out of borrowing capacity late this month. (The Congressional Budget Office   because of the tax cuts.) The Treasury secretary argued that the cuts would eventually pay for themselves, but conceded that it wouldn’t happen this year. In the meantime, the Treasury Department said that  . And   over whether to keep supporting short-term bills to keep the government operating. • Robert Mueller appears to be focusing on the White House’s initial statement about a June 2016 meeting between Trump campaign officials and Russian individuals over potential dirt on Hillary Clinton. ( ) • The F.B.I. made an unusual public statement opposing the release of a secret House Intelligence Committee memo about surveillance of a Trump campaign aide. ( ) • A federal appeals court ruled that the president could fire the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau’s director only for cause. ( ) • The E.U. is preparing measures to stop Britain undercutting it on tax or regulation after Brexit. ( ) • The Treasury Department insisted that new sanctions are coming against Russian individuals close to Vladimir Putin. ( ) • Prosecutors have dropped corruption charges against Senator Bob Menendez, Democrat of New Jersey. ( ) • The director of the C.D.C., Brenda Fitzgerald, resigned after she was reported to have bought stock in a tobacco company. ( ) Yesterday’s meeting, Janet Yellen’s last as Fed chairwoman,  . But the accompanying statement hinted that higher inflation — and rate hikes — might be around the corner. Analysts’ takes: • Economists at Bank of America Merrill Lynch write, “This shows that the Fed is taking notice of the recent shift in market perception about inflation.” • Ian Shepherdson of Pantheon Macroeconomics writes, “In short, the statement sets up the March hike, which will be followed by Jay Powell’s first press conference.” • Diane Swonk of Grant Thornton said, “Everything from stronger growth at home and abroad to debt-financed tax cuts have raised expectations for inflation.” , from Binyamin Appelbaum of the NYT: Analysts over at Deutsche Bank think so. They wrote in a research note yesterday: G.E. is the last survivor of the index’s 12 original components from when it started in 1896, and has been in it continuously for more than 110 years. in  . • SoftBank agreed to buy a majority stake in the cellphone service unit of Line, a Japanese messaging company. ( ) • Brookfield Asset Management is in talks to buy Forest City Realty Trust, a fellow real estate owner with a market value of about $6.2 billion, according to unnamed sources. ( ) • CVC Capital Partners has hired Morgan Stanley and UBS to lead an initial public offering of the antivirus company Avast Software, which could be the biggest ever in British tech, according to unnamed sources. ( ) • Meet the three-month old boutique investment bank that helped put together the Blackstone Group’s $20 billion deal for Thomson Reuters’ financial information unit. ( ) • General Assembly, the coding boot camp, may sell itself. ( ) • Tell us your memories of Xerox as the onetime corporate icon strikes a deal with Fujifilm of Japan. ( ) The state’s gaming commission is looking into the numerous, decade-spanning sexual assault and misconduct allegations against Steve Wynn. It has the power to   for Wynn Boston Harbor, the biggest single-phase development in Massachusetts history, which is expected to create thousands of jobs. More from Susan Pulliam, Jon Kamp, Chris Kirkham and Kate O’Keeffe of  : Shares in Wynn Resorts fell more than 3 percent yesterday. •  , who spent 11 years at JPMorgan, mostly as its general counsel, has joined Simpson Thacher & Bartlett as a litigation partner. ( ) • The public relations firm Brunswick Group has hired  , the former president of the World Bank, and  , the former director general of the World Trade Organization, as part of a new consultancy focused on geopolitical advice. ( ) Our colleagues  . They’ll use the best responses in a forthcoming special section. • U.S. prosecutors have issued grand jury subpoenas in an investigation into potential corruption at international sports bodies, and exploring bringing charges of racketeering, money laundering and fraud. ( ) • BMW and Daimler said they had taken action against executives involved in an organization that sponsored emissions experiments on monkeys. ( ) • Equifax began offering a free service on Wednesday that promised to let consumers lock their credit files using their cellphones. It didn’t work. ( ) • Some of Interior Secretary Ryan Zinke’s rapid moves on environmental regulation look vulnerable to legal challenge, experts say. ( ) • SoFi is laying off dozens of employees in its mortgage division, according to people familiar with the matter. It used to highlight the area as a growth prospect. ( ) • Hong Kong developers and distressed debt and private credit funds are lining up to offer financing to HNA, bankers and property investors say. ( ) • David Einhorn’s Greenlight Capital lost roughly 6 percent in January, extending a multiyear period of weakness. ( ) • Private equity heavyweights like K.K.R., Carlyle and Apollo have started issuing U.S. preferred shares, which pay higher interest than traditional bonds and can be a highly efficient way to raise capital. ( ) • Hedge funds have earned spectacular payoffs from bearish bets against companies like Steinhoff International and Carillion, but can accounting sleuths expect more wins on that scale? ( )
LONDON — In the last two decades, London has forged a reputation as the technology capital of Europe and as a global capital of the fashion technology sector — a competitor to New York and Silicon Valley, where creative, commercial and digital talent thrives in a single cosmopolitan place. Some of the biggest names in the fashion industry, especially in e-commerce — such as Asos, Farfetch, Lyst and Yoox Net-a-Porter — have headquarters in the British capital. But in the wake of  , a development that raised the possibility of an immigration crackdown, a drop in foreign investment and economic uncertainty, London’s high-ranking position has come into question. Taavet Hinrikus, the Estonian co-founder of the money-transfer company TransferWise, which says it has a valuation of more than $1 billion — has   that his company is unlikely to continue hiring at its London headquarters. Peter Smith, chief executive of the financial technology company Blockchain,   that many non-British tech entrepreneurs in London were “deeply offended” by the British government’s stance on immigration since the vote. And while the fashion community has stayed relatively silent on the subject, there is little doubt that businesses have been mulling their options as European capitals on the Continent position themselves as worthy alternatives. Venture capital investments in Britain plummeted 40 percent in the second quarter this year compared with the first quarter, as uncertainty before the vote held investors back, according to data published this week by CB Insights. Given that climate, an announcement this week from the Yoox Net-a-Porter Group about   in the BBC’s former headquarters in West London has been a welcome vote of confidence. Yoox Net-a-Porter, a British-Italian company,   that it planned to accommodate about 600 staff members in its new technology hub by March, taking two floors — about 70,000 square feet of state-of-the-art (and expensive) office space — in the new MediaWorks building at White City Place. That represents a 20 percent increase in the size of the group’s technology team, which the company says will have as many as 1,000 employees in Britain and Italy. Although a majority of London’s technology headquarters are in the east of the city, Alex Alexander, chief information officer of Yoox Net-a-Porter, said the company wished to stay in the west to be close to its other operational base, above the Westfield shopping center. Other big names in the local creative sphere said to be setting up offices in the White City development include the fashion label Stella McCartney and the Royal College of Art. “We were keen to show our commitment to the U.K.,” Mr. Alexander said by telephone from New York, “and felt that bringing all of our technology talent into a single hub was an important step in terms of bringing our five-year plan, which is based on outpacing our competition on mobile, to fruition.” He brushed off suggestions that London’s reputation had been tarnished by the country’s decision to leave the European Union. “We continue to have real confidence in London, regardless of the decision to leave the E.U., and see this investment as an opportunity to reaffirm that,” Mr. Alexander said. “We don’t see any side effects in terms of talent being drawn here. We are expecting to see a steady flow continue and think the city will remain a world-leading tech hub.” Fashion companies are not alone in doubling down on the British capital. Facebook and Google, among other American tech giants, also have plans to expand their London operations, investing in development and sales teams to fuel their European activities. Predictably, signs of major technology and fashion companies taking steps to expand its presence in London was met with open arms. “I am delighted that there will be yet more new tech jobs coming to the capital,” said Rajesh Agrawal, London’s deputy mayor for business and enterprise. “This highlights once again that London is open for business, new investment and global talent.” For now, the signs for Britain are encouraging. Of Europe’s technology unicorns — private companies with a valuation of more than $1 billion — almost 40 percent are based in the country. Nearly a third of all European venture capital funding comes to Britain. But it is still early. There is no certainty that Europeans working in Britain will be forced to leave once the withdrawal from the bloc is final, and a report by Balderton Capital shows that while engineers in Berlin or Paris earned on average almost 18 percent less than their London counterparts do, the devaluation of the pound was fast closing that gap. Whether entrepreneurs looking to start the next billion-dollar fashion technology business might favor Berlin, Dublin or Stockholm — which have established technology sectors and benefit from the European Union’s free flow of labor — remains to be seen.
SAN FRANCISCO — Recently the founder of something called Ripple briefly  . Another day an anonymous donor set up an $86 million Bitcoin-fortune charity called the Pineapple Fund. A Tesla was spotted with a BLOCKHN license plate. There’s a surge in people  . After the Long Island Iced Tea company announced it would pivot to blockchain,  . In 2017, the cryptocurrency Bitcoin went from $830 to $19,300, and now quivers around $14,000. Ether, its main rival, started the year at less than $10, closing out 2017 at $715. Now it’s over $1,100. The wealth is intoxicating news, feverish because it seems so random. Investors trying to grok the landscape compare it to the dot-com bubble of the late 1990s, when valuations soared and it was hard to separate the Amazons and Googles from the Pets.coms and eToys. The cryptocurrency community is centered around a tightknit group of friends — developers, libertarians, Redditors and cypherpunks — who have known each other for years through meet-ups, an endless circuit of crypto conferences and internet message boards. Over long hours in anonymous group chats, San Francisco bars and Settlers of Catan game nights, they talk about how cryptocurrency will decentralize power and wealth, changing the world order. The goal may be decentralization, but the money is extremely concentrated. Coinbase has more than   that own cryptocurrencies. Data suggests that about  , and some estimate that  . There are only a few winners here, and, unless they lose it all, their impact going forward will be outsize. They also remember who laughed at them and when. James Spediacci and his twin brother, Julian, who bought ether when it was about 30 cents, now run one of the most popular whale clubs: private cryptocurrency trading communities where crypto syndicates are coordinated in group chats. He showed me a screen shot of his Facebook post from 2014 telling everyone to buy ether. “One like,” he said, pointing to his phone. “It got one like.” Whether it’s all built on sand or not, the crypto castle has risen. There’s an actual house called the Crypto Castle, and the king is Jeremy Gardner, 25, a rakish young investor with a hedge fund who has become the de facto tour guide for crypto newcomers. Early one afternoon, he opened a bottle of rosé while he charged half a dozen external batteries so he wouldn’t have to ever plug in his phone in Ibiza, Spain, the next week. “I do I.C.O.s. It’s my thing,” he said. He wore a pink button-front and pink pants. “It’s me, a couple V.C.s and a lot of charlatans.” An initial coin offering is a way to raise money: A company creates its own cryptocurrency and investors buy into the new coin, without actually buying a stake in the company. Mr. Gardner led an I.C.O. for his start-up Augur, creating an “Augur token” that he then sold to raise real world money. These tokens sold fast, and it is one of the forces that kicked off this boom. For a time, the  , a market-forecasting start-up with few customers, exceeded $1 billion. About eight people live in the Crypto Castle on any given night, and some of Mr. Gardner’s tenants brought out snacks (Cheez-Its and a jar of Nutella). One of the bedrooms has a stripper pole. Mr. Gardner leaned back into the sofa and rested his feet on the table. He recently did an I.C.O. for a start-up after-party. “You can I.C.O. anything,” he said. He runs Distributed, a 180-page magazine about cryptocurrency that comes out about once a year. He is now raising $75 million for his hedge fund,  (pronounced “awesome”). He said his closest friends are moving to Puerto Rico to get around paying taxes. “They’re going to build a modern-day Atlantis out there,” he said. “But for me, it’s too early in my career to check out.” He wears a bracelet from his Burning Man camp ( ) and a necklace that is a key on a chain. “I was given this necklace and was told my net worth would go up, and it’s gone up six x since then,” he said. He drew a chart to explain the crypto community: 20 percent for ideology, 60 percent for the tech and 100 percent for the money, he said, drawing a circle around it all. A roommate on the sofa perked up and asked if he’d ever invest in his lucid dreams start-up (the idea is a headpiece that induces them). Mr. Gardner did not seem impressed: “Probably not,” he said. A reality show wants to follow him around, but he’s skeptical that it can add to his life. “I literally have a date with Bella Hadid not having a reality show,” he said. A few weeks after we first met, as the Bitcoin price exploded in December, Mr. Gardner seemed shaken. People had begun making pilgrimages to the Crypto Castle, knocking on the door, hoping Mr. Gardner could help them invest. “Nothing feels real, it doesn’t feel real,” he said. “I’m ready for crypto assets to go down 90 percent. I’ll feel better then, I think. This has been too insane.” Nearby is a building residents call the Crypto Crackhouse. Grant Hummer, who runs the San Francisco Ethereum Meetup, lives there. Long hallways called Bitcoin Boulevard and Ethereum Alley lead to communal bathrooms. Mr. Hummer and his co-founder committed $40 million of their own crypto-made money to their new $100 million hedge fund, Chromatic Capital. “My neurons are fried from all the volatility,” Mr. Hummer said. “I don’t even care at this point. I’m numb to it. I’ll lose a million dollars in a day and I’m like, O.K.” His room is simple: a bed, a futon, a TV on a mostly empty media console, three keyboard cleaning sprays and a half dozen canisters of Lysol wipes. His T-shirt read, ‘The Lizard of Wall Street,’ with a picture of a lizard in a suit, dollar-sign necklaces around its neck. He carries with him a coin that reads, “memento mori,” to remind himself he can die any day. He sees the boom as part of a global apocalypse. “The worse regular civilization does and the less you trust, the better crypto does,” Mr. Hummer said. "It’s almost like the ultimate short trade.” Mr. Hummer went out to meet Joe Buttram, 27, for drinks. As a mixed martial arts fighter, Mr. Buttram said he would fight for a couple hundred bucks, sometimes a few thousand, and worked security at a start-up, but his main hobbies were reading 4chan and buying vintage pornography, passions that exposed him to cryptocurrency. He said his holdings are into double-digit millions but wouldn’t give specifics other than to say he’d quit his job and is starting a hedge fund. There’s a common paranoia among the crypto-wealthy that they’ll be targeted and robbed since there’s no bank securing the money, so many are obsessively secretive. Many say even their parents don’t know how much they’ve made. This also allows people to pretend to be wealthier than they are, of course. “It’s unforgiving,” Mr. Buttram said. “You make one mistake and it’s all gone.” They talk about buying Lamborghinis, the single acceptable way to spend money in the Ethereum cryptocurrency community. The currency’s founder  . Mr. Buttram says he’s renting an orange Lambo for the weekend. And he wears a solid gold Bitcoin “B” necklace encrusted with diamonds that he had made. Otherwise, HODL. This is one of the core beliefs in this community: HODL, “hold” typed very fast, as if in a panic. HODL even if you feel FUD — fear, uncertainty and doubt. If you show wealth, it means you don’t really believe in the cryptocurrency revolution, a full remake of the financial system, governments and our world order that will send the price of ether up astronomically. “HODL when everyone has FUD,” Mr. Hummer said quietly, to explain why he still lives in a dorm room. “This will change civilization. This can 100 x or more from here.” He knows this is strange. “When I meet people in the normal world now, I get bored,” Mr. Hummer said. “It’s just a different level of consciousness.” The tone turns somber. “Sometimes I think about what would happen to the future if a bomb went off at one of our meetings,” Mr. Buttram said. Mr. Hummer said, “A bomb would set back civilization for years.” A few days later, Mr. Hummer was working from his co-founder’s apartment. James Fickel, 26, lives in a high-rise with a Russian blue cat called Mr. Bigglesworth. Mr. Fickel is known in the community for “going full YOLO” and investing $400,000 when Ethereum was at 80 cents. Now, with a fortune he says is in the hundreds of millions, his parents have retired and sent his younger sister to live with him. “I’m taking over her education,” Mr. Fickel said, sitting on a white leather sofa, Mr. Bigglesworth asleep in his impossibly skinny arms. Today, Mr. Fickel is outlining the endgame for cryptocurrency true believers. “It’s the entire world reorganizing itself,” Mr. Fickel said. “We could get rid of our armies because for the first time you’ll have people saying, ‘I want to vote for a global order.’ It’s the internet waking up — it’s the internet grabbing its pitchfork. That’s the blockchain.” Mr. Hummer is skeptical. “All I know is the price of ether is going to go up,” Mr. Hummer said. At a jazz bar a few days later, I run into Mr. Fickel’s personal trainer, Alan Chen, who is now running in this crypto circle. Mr. Fickel had convinced Mr. Chen to put his savings into Ethereum. “I’m retired, man,” Mr. Chen said. “I’m moving to L.A. next week. I got a penthouse on Marina del Rey.” “Don’t say I’m retired,” he added. “I’m going into business now. I’m going to use blockchain to help personal trainers.” Nearby was Chante Eliaszadeh, 22, a law student at the University of California, Berkeley, who started the Berkeley Law Blockchain group. “Obviously the bubble’s going to burst and everyone’s going to need a lawyer,” she said. At the annual San Francisco Bitcoin Meetup Party, hundreds gathered under the fluorescent lights of a co-working space, and there was a line out the door. The waiting list had to be told not to show up. Many there wore Bitcoin- and Ethereum-themed clothes from  , which sells unisex cryptocurrency sweaters. Those closest to the technology are the most cautious. Pieter Wuille, 33, a Bitcoin core developer, kept his backpack on as he wandered the party. He’s part of the team working to develop the Bitcoin technology. “The technology still needs time to evolve,” Mr. Wuille said. "This infusion of interest is bringing the wrong kind of attention. Some people believe Bitcoin can’t fail or this technology solves many more problems than it does. It can. And it does not.” He said everyone is asking him whether to buy Bitcoin. “I tell them I have no idea,” he said. “I don’t know!” “There’s so many people rushing into the space, if it’s a bit of speculation, I’m O.K. with that,” said the Coinbase C.E.O., Brian Armstrong, whose company has become the de facto portal for casual investors. “But we can’t guarantee the website’s going to be up exactly when you need it. Everyone needs to take a deep breath.” As the holiday party filled up, a cryptocurrency rapper called CoinDaddy — Arya Bahmanyar, 28 — was getting ready to perform. Formerly a commercial real estate agent, Mr. Bahmanyar works full time at CoinDaddy after becoming a self-described crypto-millionaire (“you think I would dress up like this if I wasn’t?”). “Right now all our entertainers come from outside crypto culture — not inside crypto, and we’ve got to change that,” he said. He pointed to his outfit — a long white fake mink coat, gold-heeled shoes — and said, “It’s gold, right? It’s gold. It’s a niche, and I’m going to fill it.” He says he is going to shoot a music video soon for a song called “Lambo Party” and another called “Cryptomom,” about “all these moms are pumping in their children’s savings accounts.” Maria Lomeli, 56, came to the party to find the people she had put a lot of trust in. A housekeeper from Pacifica, Calif., she said she had invested $12,000 in cryptocurrencies over the last few weeks after reading about it in the news. She wore running shoes and a zip-up jacket that said, “Cinemark, the best seats in town.” She worked there cleaning out theaters. Now she cleans houses. Banks, she said, were designed to steal. Taxes left her supporting a government that she felt didn’t support her. “Charges for sending money to my daughter, interest on our loans,” she said. "And then the money we pay in taxes goes to wars and whatever else they want.” She found a Bitcoin event in the city and asked people there how to buy Bitcoin on her phone. She invested $1,000. It went up. So she put in $10,000 more, she said, along with $1,000 in a currency called Litecoin. Both her children have discouraged this. “And maybe I’m going to lose it,” she said. “Maybe I’m going to keep cleaning houses. But something is telling me I can trust this generation. My instinct is telling me this is the future.” She had to leave the party early because parking downtown is expensive, she said. She zipped up her jacket and left on her own.

Five years ago, I wrote   about virtual currencies, documenting the sizable stockpile of Bitcoins that the Winklevoss twins, Cameron and Tyler, had amassed. At the time, I figured Bitcoin would be a flash in the pan, with roughly the life span of pet rocks or Furbys. But neither Bitcoin nor the Winklevii, as they’re known, has withered under the unending stream of skepticism. The value of a single Bitcoin is now up more than 11,000 from when I wrote that first story, and  , at least on paper. I have continued writing about Bitcoin throughout its remarkable rise, but I could have never anticipated the way the technology has broken out over the past year, with everyone from Vladimir Putin to mom-and-pop investors in South Korea looking at how to use and profit from the technology. (Most recently, I wrote about the enormous   supporting Bitcoin, which now uses as much energy as some medium-sized countries.) These developments have been enough to turn me, over the last year, into essentially a full-time cryptocurrency reporter. It’s safe to say that’s a first for The Times. Before this all began, I was covering financial markets and banks from New York. That gave me a grounding to begin understanding this, but Bitcoin has turned into a very different kind of financial market. At the banks, I kept hearing about how they were taking this technology seriously as something that might change their business in the long run. That is because beneath the digital tokens, Bitcoin introduced a new kind of crowdsourced financial infrastructure, known as the blockchain, that allows for the creation of money and financial records that aren’t maintained by any central authority like a bank or a government. Claims about Bitcoin’s longevity differ dramatically. If you listen only to virtual currency aficionados, you would think that digital money is certain to dethrone the dollar as the global reserve currency and kill Wall Street, to boot. I get dozens of emails every day from entrepreneurs who tell me how they are going to use the technology introduced by Bitcoin to revolutionize the music industry, or shipping business, or even democracy itself. Meanwhile, very smart people like Warren Buffett and Joseph Stiglitz have continued to say that the whole thing is just a bubble waiting to burst. How is a single journalist supposed to work through it all? It can feel a bit like being there at the invention of the stock market, but with no certainty that stocks would actually work as promised — and with everything hinging on software that few people understand. Certainly one part of this requires understanding the technical details of  . The time I’ve spent grappling with the inner workings of virtual currencies has given me a sense of why so many computer scientists see the Bitcoin network as real technological innovation and not just a token that people buy and sell. I have a good stable of geeks who help walk me through the details when I get confused. And when I go to dinner parties it comes in handy — everyone these days wants to talk about how Bitcoin works and whether it is a bubble. But from that first article about the Winklevoss twins, I have tried to focus, whenever possible, on the real people who are buying and using Bitcoin and other virtual currencies, and what is motivating them. That has taken me to Argentina, where I saw how people are using virtual currencies to escape the inflation their local currency is experiencing. It has also led me to the online black markets, where virtual currencies have made it easier for addicts to buy deadly drugs from China and for criminals to collect ransom payments. It is also the real-world usage that tests whether Bitcoin and other virtual currencies are able to live up to the big promises that they are making. With most virtual currency projects, I’ve found that there are relatively few real-world transactions to back up the big, speculative bets that investors are making. Perhaps most fascinating is how these new currencies draw communities around them. It’s a potent reminder that all money is a social construct: The more people who believe a Bitcoin or dollar will retain its value in a week, the greater the value the currency will have. But these are still early days. The death of Bitcoin has been wrongfully proclaimed many times already. For my part, The Times’s rules against investing in what we write about has allowed me to be equally open to this going up or down. Beyond that, these virtual currencies are all living economics experiments, testing how different sorts of incentives create different behaviors. Bitcoin has an elaborate system of carrots and sticks designed to attract followers and to increase the cybersecurity of the Bitcoin network. But these incentives don’t always work as expected. That uncertainty is what makes it so interesting to watch — and to report on.
Jerry Seinfeld is going to run out of cars someday.   is the latest manifestation of that inevitability. Mr. Seinfeld’s droll series   is still probably the best-known original show on Crackle, which has been slowly building its roster, hoping for the kind of breakthrough that has brought other streaming services to the forefront of television.   a drama it introduced last year, is pretty good but didn’t generate big buzz. “StartUp,” a 10-episode drama the service rolls out on Tuesday, probably won’t either, despite a dynamic performance by  . She plays Izzy Morales, a tech wizard who thinks she has invented a better Bitcoin, which she calls GenCoin. Her hunt for a financial backer leads her to Nick Talman (Adam Brody), who is restless in his job as a cog in some large financial institution. Nick happens to have money to invest because his father, who operates on the wrong side of the law, has some he needs to hide. Soon the improbable duo of Nick and Izzy becomes an even more improbable threesome: They find themselves in a reluctant partnership with Ronald Dacey (Edi Gathegi), a high-ranking member of a Haitian gang.  , who had nice runs recently in “Sherlock” and “Fargo,” is the F.B.I. agent who, trying to get at Nick’s father, begins scrutinizing their start-up. The series is set in Miami, so of course there are drugs. (Can a location become a cliché? If so, Miami has.) And there is sex, deployed with a dismaying reductiveness; it seems in the first episode as if every character who is introduced has to be immediately shown in bed (or, in one case, in the shower), always gratuitously. “StartUp” is trying to meld the high-finance sheen of series like “Billions” with the gee-whiz digital jargon of, say, “Scorpion,” but it never seems innovative, only imitative. The casting, however, is refreshing, even if the plot strains credulity. Ms. Marrero is the find, giving her blunt, brainy character an appealing pithiness. Izzy, who is Cuban-American, is an outsider trying to break into the tech bubble, knowing she has a marketable idea but unable to get insiders to take her seriously. You might find yourself wishing that the character and the actress would make their way into a more believable series.
During the middle of his concert Saturday night at Irving Plaza, the young country singer Kane Brown told a story about meeting one of his idols, Randy Travis. Mr. Travis has one of the most convincing, haunting voices in the genre, and has been a model of stoic dignity for the last couple of decades. When they met, Mr. Brown said he asked Mr. Travis for a hug. After telling that story, Mr. Brown proceeded to sing “Three Wooden Crosses,” Mr. Travis’s dark crypto-morality tale. His voice was low, meaty, resonant; his mood was somber. Just before, he had sung Craig Morgan’s “Almost Home,” a borderline bizarre song about the power of imagination told from the perspective of a homeless man. Both songs were hits in 2003, when Mr. Brown, now 23, was just 10 years old, and it seems as if they helped to shape his approach to singing. At his best, his voice is viscous and rich, low and wide like a barge. And yet this is a hostile time in country for such a voice, and so Mr. Brown is not exactly that kind of singer, not most of the time at least. He is in the third or fourth wave of country bros who have bottlenecked Nashville in recent years, and on his self-titled debut album, which was released last week (on RCA Nashville/Zone 4), he is attempting to strike a compromise between his two selves. On songs like “Ain’t No Stopping Us Now,” celebrating how “them lips taste like watermelon,” and “Hometown,” a deeply generic take on post-Florida Georgia Line, midtempo-rock rural boosterism, Mr. Brown’s voice is thin and unenthused. These are the sorts of songs that are at this point long past cliché, and perhaps beyond parody, too. To his credit, though, Mr. Brown seemed to understand this during his concert. While singing these songs, he looked almost bored, as if wandering around someone else’s stage. Here especially, his backing band was missile-grade intense, with arrangements that were far too burly for Mr. Brown’s voice. And the more punishing the music became, the more reluctant Mr. Brown was, as if looking for a place to hide. In truth, Mr. Brown is more intriguing than energy-drink country. When he used to post country covers on YouTube, his better ones were of   and  , singers with a tough, steady affect. And during this show, Mr. Brown was eager to demonstrate his old-fashioned country bona fides. His hometown, he said, was recently voted “the fourth most boring city in Georgia,” and he sang “Cold Spot,” about the general store his father owned and operated there, while a picture of the humble store was displayed on the screen behind him. Mr. Brown also has an unusual background. His rapid ascent in the last two years has taken place largely through the internet and social media, and   by country traditionalists looking to poke a hole in the story of his seemingly organic rise. (He was initially signed through Zone 4, an imprint affiliated with the hip-hop and R&B producer Polow Da Don.) Mr. Brown’s father is black and Cherokee, and his mother is white — in undiverse country music, this is still uncommon. Early in the show, he stopped to relate some of the particulars of his upbringing: “Went through child abuse. Went through racism.” He mentioned living in a car with his mother for a spell. He spoke about friends who used drugs and overdosed, and some who used guns and hurt themselves. The crowd was muted during this section — perhaps it had come for the other version of Mr. Brown, the version that, twice, halfheartedly pulled up his shirt to reveal his abdominal muscles, as if he were Trey Songz. But here, too, Mr. Brown was savvy. One of those times was during “Pull It Off,” which he performed first. It’s a moody burner, the best song on his new album, and also the one place in which his two sides are wholly reconciled — his deep voice applied to the thick, sweet molasses of seduction.

LONDON — The mystery behind who created the online currency Bitcoin deepened on Thursday. Craig Steven Wright, an Australian entrepreneur and computer programmer who earlier this week said he was that person, on Thursday withdrew an offer to prove his assertion, removing the contents of his blog and replacing it with a post simply titled, “I’m sorry.” “I believed that I could do this,” Mr. Wright wrote on his blog. “I believed that I could put the years of anonymity and hiding behind me. But, as the events of this week unfolded and I prepared to publish the proof of access to the earliest keys, I broke. I do not have the courage. I cannot.” Mr. Wright was first identified as Bitcoin’s founder in December 2015 by Wired magazine and the technology website Gizmodo, but he did not come forward then. This week that changed, and he said in interviews with the BBC, The Economist and GQ that he  , known by the pseudonym Satoshi Nakamoto. Almost as soon as Mr. Wright announced he was the creator of Bitcoin on Monday, skepticism surfaced in the Bitcoin community about the authenticity of his claims. In a news release on Monday, Mr. Wright said that he had decided to make his identity public to “dispel any negative myths and fears about Bitcoin.” “I cannot allow the misinformation that has been spread to impact the future of Bitcoin” and the blockchain, the currency’s communal digital ledger, he said at the time. “I’m now able to build on what I have previously completed by releasing my research and academic work and help people understand just how powerful this can really be.” Outside Organization, a public relations company that distributed his release on Monday, verified that the comments on the blog were from Mr. Wright and did not provide any additional comment on Thursday. Bitcoin was founded as a digital competitor to existing currencies, and it has gained traction as financial institutions and others have begun researching how they can use the blockchain technology to improve transactions. The currency is created by people using computers to solve complex math problems, and it can then be traded digitally. Each coin is associated with its owner by a digital key. The mysterious identity of its founder created an aura around the digital currency since it surfaced in 2009 and fueled a parlor game of speculation about Satoshi Nakamoto’s identify. Satoshi Nakamoto communicated only by electronic message and never revealed his or her true identity before ending all communication in 2011. To verify his assertions this week, the BBC said, Mr. Wright   using cryptographic keys inextricably linked to Bitcoins generated by Satoshi Nakamoto. Mr. Wright also posted evidence on his blog, including a technical walk-through of how to verify cryptographic keys. All of that information was wiped from his blog on Thursday. “When the rumors began, my qualifications and character were attacked,” Mr. Wright said on his blog on Thursday. “When those allegations were proven false, new allegations have already begun. I know now that I am not strong enough for this.” In his post on Thursday, Mr. Wright apologized to Jon Matonis, one of the founding directors of the Bitcoin Foundation, and Gavin Andresen, who succeeded Satoshi Nakamoto as the lead Bitcoin developer. Both men said on Monday that, after reviewing evidence provided by Mr. Wright, they believed that he was Satoshi Nakamoto. “I can only hope that their honor and credibility is not irreparably tainted by my actions,” Mr. Wright said on his blog. “They were not deceived, but I know that the world will never believe that now. I can only say I’m sorry.” After the Wired and Gizmodo articles last year, Australian Federal Police  home in a suburb of Sydney in connection with a tax investigation. Tax authorities in Australia said at the time that they had determined that Mr. Wright was not Satoshi Nakamoto. On Thursday, Mr. Wright seemed determined to return to the shadows, ending his post with the words, “And goodbye.”
HONG KONG —  By day, David Shin is an investment banker at a major financial firm. By night and in pretty much every other free minute, he is an entrepreneur looking to break into  ’s growing Bitcoin scene. Even as concerns swirl about the long-term viability of the virtual currency, Mr. Shin is raising money, courting clients and hiring staff to build a sort of stock exchange for Bitcoin-oriented companies. Mr. Shin, 38, plans to start his venture, CryptoMex, at the end of April. “I believe Bitcoin will bring about a brave new world of money,” he said. “The Internet started out as a revolutionary protocol, became more easy to use over time, and saw an explosive growth rate. The same is happening with Bitcoin.” Mr. Shin joins a growing field of technology experts, financial players and crypto-geeks who are betting that an unfavorable regulatory environment in mainland   has put this special administrative region — with its more laissez-faire attitude — on the edge of something big. Bitcoin, digital money backed by no government and “mined” by computers performing complex algorithms, have been largely unregulated, creating a virtual Wild West of programmers and speculators. But as Bitcoin tries to gain greater mainstream acceptance, authorities around the world have begun eyeing it more cautiously, as they might a currency. The spectacular  , the Tokyo-based Bitcoin exchange, has only fanned regulators’ concerns. Regulatory moves in China have been among the more aggressive to date. In December, the Chinese authorities curtailed the use of Bitcoin by banks and payment processors, which helped halve the value of the virtual currency in two weeks. While the government said the general public was free to trade Bitcoin online, the broad fear is that China may eventually impose a sweeping ban on its use offline,   to Q Coin, a virtual currency issued by Tencent. But Hong Kong has so far remained relatively passive on the regulatory front. The former British colony has retained a separate political and economic system since it returned to Chinese rule, and the Hong Kong Monetary Authority, the city’s de facto central bank, says it is not directly regulating Bitcoin, at least for now. Entrepreneurs in Hong Kong are essentially playing regulatory arbitrage. Although firm data is scarce, China is widely seen as the world’s second-largest market for Bitcoin, after the United States, and the restrictions have cooled its nascent Bitcoin scene. By virtue of proximity, businesses in Hong Kong are hoping to capture some of the demand. “Like water, Bitcoin may take the path of least resistance and find its way into Hong Kong,” said Michael Chau, a business professor at the University of Hong Kong. “Because of the city’s proximity to China — and because it has become part of the country since 1997 — Hong Kong has the potential to absorb part of China’s Bitcoin market.” The Chinese customer base of Laser Yuan, the founder of the Hong Kong-based exchange  , doubled after the December notice. Three weeks ago,  , Hong Kong’s largest Bitcoin exchange, opened what it said was the world’s first brick-and-mortar store for the virtual currency, where customers can buy Bitcoin over the counter. It also set up a Bitcoin vending machine last week. , a maker of Bitcoin automated teller machines, will set up its first A.T.M. in Hong Kong this spring, and plans 100 more around the world, none in China, said the company’s chief executive, Jordan Kelley. “We have hundreds and hundreds of Chinese businessmen and entrepreneurs contact us with the purpose of becoming Robocoin operators,” Mr. Kelley said, adding that if China gave him the green light, the company would “have 200 A.T.M.s in China before the end of the year, if not more.” Mr. Shin said he first saw the promise of Bitcoin last year, when the coins were worth $25 apiece, compared with about $620 now. After raising $2.5 million, he and his business partners built  , an operation in Montreal where racks of speedy computers race to generate Bitcoin. But he is now selling part of his stake in the Canadian mine and focusing on his start-up in Hong Kong, which he said could be “the capital of Bitcoin in Asia.” Mr. Shin recently hired Jake Smith, a well-connected Bitcoin enthusiast who worked for Li Xiaolai — a Chinese investor who reportedly holds 100,000 coins — to get Chinese to buy into the companies listed on his platform. “When the government comes out and puts constraints on Bitcoin in China, investors naturally look at Hong Kong — not Singapore, not Korea — for substitution,” Mr. Shin said. Hong Kong operates in a type of regulatory limbo, so uncertainty reigns as much as opportunity. If China clamps down further, Hong Kong may be forced to rethink its stance. John Greenwood, chief economist at Invesco and architect of Hong Kong’s exchange-rate system, said that whether the Chinese authorities would toughen measures depended on whether Bitcoin became so prevalent that it undermined China’s capital controls. “China’s mainland residents can buy things with Bitcoin from Europe or North America or anywhere else in the world, or make transfers,” Mr. Greenwood said. “It’s a hole in the dike, a leakage from China’s system of foreign-exchange control.” Entrepreneurs like Mr. Shin also face a legacy of past ventures that have proved problematic. Two once-prominent Bitcoin crowdfunding platforms, BTCST and Bitfunder, are now defunct. BTCST, which offered Bitcoin-denominated securities that claimed to return up to 7 percent a week, has been charged by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission with fraud and with running a  . “The operating environment is much clearer,” Mr. Shin said. “The Hong Kong government has acknowledged Bitcoin as a commodity, so we have clarity on both fronts here as well.” Then there is the need for better basic infrastructure and consumer awareness, a challenge for Bitcoin around the world. For example, few businesses let customers make payments with the currency. In Hong Kong, they largely amount to a boutique hotel, a flower shop, a tailor, a music teacher and a Beijing-style crepe restaurant. On the eve of the Chinese New Year in January, the three co-founders of the Bitcoin exchange ANX took to the bustling streets of the Lan Kwai Fong entertainment district to hand out 50,000 red envelopes, each carrying a little more than a dollar’s worth of Bitcoin. “I use Bitcoin to buy stuff online all the time,” Ben Lau, an online marketer, said as he stood on the sidewalk using his smartphone to scan the QR code — an image that works like a bar code — on the voucher he had just received. But Mr. Lau was in the minority. Even months after Bitcoin leapt into the limelight, most passers-by had little idea about what it does, and some associated it with drugs and frauds. When the after-work crowd diminished, the co-founders went to a nearby bar to check on rumors that it had recently started accepting Bitcoin. A few beers later, Ken Lo, managing director of ANX, waved for the bill and asked to pay in the virtual currency. “A customer’s friend thought our bar had a matching name — Bit Point — with Bitcoin, so he helped us set this up,” said Gaga Lam, the bar’s manager. “We haven’t really tried it out yet.” Her iPad Mini displayed the website of  , the Bitcoin payment processor in which Asian billionaire Li Ka-shing was an early investor. But the group ended up paying with a credit card after a few unsuccessful tries. “We can do better than that,” Mr. Lo said, referring to his company’s Bitcoin payment solution. “We clear faster than the banks, our transaction fee is lower than credit card companies, and there would be no chargebacks. And Bitcoin fans will flock to your bar in droves.”

Please take your seats. It is that time of year again: our annual closing dinner, where we look back at the year that was, to toast and roast the year’s deal makers on Wall Street and in Washington and look ahead to what may come next. And what a year it was. This year, we decided to hold our dinner at the Breakers in Palm Beach, Fla., just down the road from the Mar-a-Lago resort, better known as the Winter White House. Given that President Trump has spent nearly a third of his presidency — that’s not a typo — at one of his properties, as The Wall Street Journal reported, we figured we would try to make it convenient for him. There were a surprising number of free openings at Mar-a-Lago given all the cancellations by foundations and charities, but ever since an artist  “Pay Trump Bribes Here” on the Trump International Hotel in Washington, our conflicts committee suggested that hosting the dinner at Mar-a-Lago would be a bad idea. We also figured holding the dinner in Florida would be convenient for so many of you moguls and machers already down here looking for real estate since the tax bill was signed into law. The other bonus of buying here, of course, is that your home is protected even if you file for bankruptcy. Sitting at the dais are Mr. Trump along with the first lady. (Ivanka, Jared and the rest of the family were away on vacation.) Next to him are Rupert Murdoch and his new B.F.F., Robert Iger of the Walt Disney Company, who just gave up any hope of running for president in 2020, a condition of his deal to buy most of 21st Century Fox’s assets. To their right are the chief negotiators for the tax plan: Gary Cohn and Steven Mnuchin (and Ms. Mnuchin’s wife, Louise Linton, who I should mention — and I’ll be sure to   — is wearing a beautiful scarf from Hermes and gown by Valentino). The seating chart is, of course, always a bit complicated. We had to keep Jeffrey Bezos of Amazon from the dais to prevent Mr. Trump’s Twitter war with him from interrupting the festivities. And we had heard that Mr. Bezos had a practical joke planned: He was going to tell Mr. Trump that he had chosen Mexico City as Amazon’s second headquarters. Masayoshi Son, SoftBank’s founder, is also here this year. He is seated at the Uber table, having just   to invest $9 billion in the company at a 30 percent discount to the company’s previous valuation of $68 billion, although he had also invested $1 billion at the company’s previous valuation to maintain the fiction that the company was still worth $68 billion. It’s been a tough year at the Uber table of frenemies: Dara Khosrowshahi, Uber’s new chief executive; Travis Kalanick, Uber’s founder; Arianna Huffington, an Uber board member; and Bill Gurley, one of Uber’s largest investors. To help keep the peace, we’ve invited a calming influence to sit with them: Anthony Scaramucci, the Mooch, who had his own tough year as the president’s director of communications for a hot minute. We had extended an invitation to  , but our invitation was returned. When we tried to call him at the Ritz Carlton in Riyadh, otherwise known as the Royal Prison, we were told, “The hotel telephone lines are currently disconnected until further notice.” (By the way, that’s not a joke.) And then there is the Facebook table: Mark Zuckerberg is here this year along with Sheryl Sandberg. We’re sorry to say that Vladimir Putin could not make it. I jest! Sort of. Finally, we have the Bitcoin table: The Winklevoss twins, newly minted as Bitcoin billionaires (cut out the gloating and spitballs to the Facebook table, please) and Jamie Dimon, JPMorgan Chase’s chief executive, who has said Bitcoin mania is “worse than tulip bulbs,” adding: “It won’t end well. Someone is going to get killed.” We’d love to hear the dinner conversation among you all. Now, on to the toasts of 2017.  Amazon.com’s acquisition of Whole Foods came as a true surprise. The deal has the potential to truly accelerate Amazon’s march into our daily lives by giving it an even closer distribution point to our homes. It also was a signal to the rest of the marketplace that nothing is off limits. The betting line is that the next land grab for Amazon is pharmaceuticals, which may have driven CVS’s $68 billion bid for Aetna. Also, a postscript: One deal that has not received enough credit but that proved itself in 2017 was Walmart’s acquisition of  . The $3.3 billion acquisition of a money-losing site seemed like a mistake, but has breathed new life into Walmart’s e-commerce business.  Roku, the streaming television company, went public, and its stock is up 280 percent, one of the highest increases of the year. The company is being compared to Netflix and is considered a pure-play bet on over-the-top streaming television services. Blue Apron, a meal kit service, went public and quickly fell faster than Pets.com. Who thought that was a good idea?  Stock investors were some of the biggest beneficiaries in 2017, with a rally that began when Mr. Trump won the presidency. On an individual basis, Stephen A. Schwarzman of the Blackstone Group gambled early and publicly on Mr. Trump, despite protests inside and outside his firm. It gave him a ringside seat to the White House last year. Saudi Arabia backed a new $40 billion infrastructure fund by the firm. And Mr. Schwarzman, like the entire private equity industry, was a beneficiary of the new tax plan, which kept carried interest taxed at capital gains rates with only a slight adjustment.  Kenneth C. Frazier of Merck was the first chief executive on one of Mr. Trump’s councils to   after violence in Charlottesville, Va. A wave of executives followed suit, but only after Mr. Frazier made the first move. That took real courage.  Lloyd C. Blankfein of Goldman Sachs won Twitter in 2017 with this   during the solar eclipse: “Wish the moon wasn’t the only thing casting a shadow across the country. We got through one, we’ll get through the other.”  Say what you will about Elon Musk — he has fans and critics — but he again proved that he thinks differently. Sure, he introduced new Teslas and sent more rockets into space. But he also introduced perhaps his craziest idea: the Boring Company. Technically, he founded the company in December 2016, but it was during 2017 that we really learned about his ambitions: He wants to dig huge tunnels under the earth to create a patchwork of roadways. The economics and physics of it all have been questioned. But as a venture capitalist, Jason Calacanis, said this summer: “Betting against Elon Musk is betting against the future of humanity, and it’s an incredibly stupid thing to do.”  Janet Yellen, the departing Federal Reserve chairwoman, deserves our genuine thanks for steering the economy successfully and overseeing a drop in the unemployment rate to levels not seen in decades. She took verbal abuse from our president, who called her “obviously political” before he was elected, only for him to double back and praise her once he realized that his economy was her economy, too.  The exposure of bad behavior by men toward women in the workplace — and elsewhere — throughout virtually all industries was perhaps the most important and profound story of the year. It has already shaken up a multitude of businesses, and more revelations are likely to come. Its impact on our culture and office politics will last far longer, hopefully, than anything else discussed at tonight’s dinner.  Why does the administration really want to block the AT&T-Time Warner deal? Of course, the speculation in media circles is it has to do with Mr. Trump’s war on CNN. That may or may not be true. But the president didn’t help himself when Sarah Huckabee Sanders quoted him as saying he supported a rival merger between Mr. Murdoch and Disney, saying that “this could be a great thing for jobs” when it plainly will result in layoffs.
SAN FRANCISCO — Growing up in San Francisco, I’d heard about  , a storied hippie hotel in Big Sur, Calif., for years. The retreat center was where my parents’ friends would hang out; it was also where the cool older kids would go at 1 a.m., when the hot springs were free to anyone who made the trek. Now I’m a tech reporter, roving my old hometown. I was at the launch dinner for a cryptocurrency investment vehicle the other night when someone mentioned Esalen had a new director (a young former Googler) and a new mission (find a soul for Silicon Valley). So I signed up for a weekend there and joined a class about finding one’s “inner-net” led by a tech branding executive. The guests were young. Clothing was now required in most places. Many came from Silicon Valley because they felt anxious about what they were building and needed a place to talk and think through it. I liked the story for a couple of reasons: It captures murky social changes happening here in a contained, physical space. And it shows how anxious the people who work in technology are right now. Writing it, I knew I would tap into the narrative that San Francisco has been ruined by tech. (The hippies are gone! There are Tesla chargers! Tech!) I’ve gotten a half-dozen texts to that effect, as well as tweets asking tech to “please give California back to the natives” and lamenting that “tech eats counterculture for breakfast, I guess.” People like this narrative because it imagines a glowing era of San Francisco tie-dyed perfection and equality that I am doubtful ever existed. Even so, this city’s hippie days are long gone, as anyone who’s walked through the Marina looking for a flower child anytime in the past 30 years can tell you. The work now is to understand who’s at Esalen these days, why, and what it means. And that’s my job. I’m a new correspondent for The Times, brought on to do tech and internet culture. I grew up here (sixth-generation San Franciscan, my dad will want me to add). After school and a Fulbright in Swaziland, I came home and took a job at The San Francisco Chronicle in 2012. I started as essentially a party reporter, covering culture, characters, galas and night life when the most recent tech boom was hitting its stride. I profiled  , and I went to   and  . Over the years the start-up boom has slowed as big tech companies’ power has grown. The region is now changing the entire world in tangible ways — how we communicate and work, how we organize and socialize, how we learn. But it’s also changing it in ways we can’t see yet. The story told to consumers over the decades (“Don’t Be Evil” was once Google’s motto) is beginning to slip, and a new one is taking shape. At The Times, my project is to document both Silicon Valley and the culture it is creating, using a mix of profiles, scene dispatches and trend stories. I’ve written about  , as well as a  . Because, and here’s the key: Building a culture is Silicon Valley’s goal. Some here speak about it explicitly, but most try to hide this fact. Facebook executives, for example, talk a lot about algorithms and try very hard to erase human workers from the process. In the past, the company hasn’t let its engineers go on the record to explain the “ , which recognizes who users associate with in real life with dismaying accuracy. Individual engineers are shielded from the public eye, tucked away at three-meal-a-day, laundry-doctor-and-gym-included campuses. But humans build these machines. And those humans have goals, anxieties, ideas and agendas. Today, a small group of people hold unimaginable amounts of power. And even they don’t quite know how to handle that. So they go to Esalen. My job is then to go with them.

SAN FRANCISCO — The virtual currency Bitcoin has been swept up in yet another speculative frenzy, pushing its price toward the peak it last reached in late 2013. The price of Bitcoin has been buoyed by increased interest from places like Venezuela, where  , and India, where the government   from circulation. More broadly, a tilt toward isolationism that has emerged in American and European politics — highlighted by Donald J. Trump’s election victory — has given a new sheen to a currency that can move between countries with little oversight. “The more there is an expectation for new barriers to be erected, the more there is an expectation that Bitcoin will be valuable for moving money across borders,” said Gil Luria, the director of research at Wedbush Securities. Still, most of the people actually buying and selling Bitcoin these days are coming from a single country: China. Some wealthy Chinese have used Bitcoin to evade their government’s strict controls on moving money in and out of the country, according to Bitcoin specialists in China. But the heavy trading on Chinese Bitcoin exchanges, much of it by automated software, suggests that most of the price movement is a result of bets by speculators. In recent days, the price of a Bitcoin has been about 3 percent higher on these exchanges than on dollar denominated exchanges, suggesting more demand in China than outside. The importance of speculators suggests that the value of Bitcoin is still driven by the hope of how it might be used someday, rather than real world use today, which has generally been hard to quantify. In dollar terms, a Bitcoin was going for about $1,025 on Tuesday, or about 140 percent more than what it cost at the beginning of 2016. The volatile price has led many analysts to conclude that is less similar to a currency than to a commodity, like gold, which has a value resulting from its scarcity. In Bitcoin’s case, the rules of the network dictate that only 21 million Bitcoin will ever be created. The recent rise has brought the price of one Bitcoin to within striking distance of the price of an ounce of gold, which was about $1,150 on Monday. The price has increased in the last year despite the lack of interest in Bitcoin from banks and a majority of more sophisticated investors. After showing early interest in the currency, most big banks have moved on to make investments in the  , the new type of ledger technology introduced by Bitcoin, while eschewing Bitcoin itself. Some   on some sort of blockchain inspired by but unrelated to the blockchain that Bitcoin uses. Bitcoin and the blockchain were introduced in late 2008 by a mysterious coder who used the name Satoshi Nakamoto. Anyone with a computer and internet access can open a Bitcoin wallet and help maintain the blockchain ledger where all Bitcoin transactions are recorded. Because it is run by a decentralized network of computers around the world, Bitcoin does not require a central authority like a central bank or financial institution. That has made it attractive to people who hope to do financial transactions anonymously, such as the drug dealers who have sold illicit goods for Bitcoin on the   website and its successors. New Bitcoins are released at regular intervals to computers helping to support the Bitcoin network, and previously released Bitcoins can be bought and sold on exchanges around the world. Since 2009, the price of Bitcoin has generally been defined by long periods of stability marked by short periods of speculative excitement. The only other time the price of Bitcoin has exceeded $1,000 was in late 2013, when the demand was driven by a surge of interest from Chinese investors and traders. The price soon crashed when one of the largest Bitcoin exchanges, Mt. Gox, which was based in Tokyo and went bankrupt, announced that it had lost most of the Bitcoins held by its customers (the cause remains in dispute). The Bitcoin price fell to its low — under $200 — in early 2015. Since then, the price has risen in fits and starts, in part because of continuing hacking and fraud, and because of fights over the direction of the Bitcoin network. Many Bitcoin businesses have   to change the number of transactions that can move through the network every day. But the proposed changes have run into opposition from the team of coders responsible for maintaining the basic Bitcoin software. Many Chinese Bitcoin companies have  . That disagreement has led to slowdowns on the Bitcoin network, with some transactions taking days to be processed. The slowdowns have made it harder to use Bitcoin for everyday payments. But through the controversy the security of the basic Bitcoin wallets and transaction software has held up, making it a potential alternative for people in countries with less secure currencies and financial institutions. In November,   after the government announced moves to quickly ban the largest Indian bank notes, in an effort to crack down on corruption. The continued fall in the value of the Venezuelan currency, the bolívar, has led to reports about   for Bitcoin. But despite the new demand, the total value of all outstanding Bitcoin, about $16 billion, is still only that of a medium-size American company, and is not large enough to sustain the demand of even a moderate number of Indians or Venezuelans looking to store their wealth in the virtual currency. That points back to the importance of speculators, who are betting that someday soon people worldwide will turn to Bitcoin for their daily financial needs, and push the price much higher. “I ascribe only 10 percent of the value of Bitcoin to current day usage, and more like 90 percent of it to the expectation of future usage,” Mr. Luria of Webush Securities said.

Pretend you are the lead detective on a hit new show, “CSI: Terrible Stuff on the Internet.” In the first episode, you set up one of those   plastered with headlines and headshots, looking for hidden connections between everything awful that’s been happening online recently. There’s a lot of dark stuff. In one corner, you have the Russian campaign to influence the 2016 presidential election with digital propaganda. In another, a rash of repugnant videos on YouTube, with  ,   on the kids’ channel and a popular vlogger recording  . Then there’s   the rising worry that adults and kids are getting hooked on smartphones and social networks despite our best efforts to resist the constant desire for a fix. And all over the internet, general fakery abounds — there are   on Twitter and Facebook,   and even   to sell you a mattress. So who is the central villain in this story, the driving force behind much of the chaos and disrepute online? This isn’t that hard. You don’t need a crazy wall to figure it out, because the force to blame has been quietly shaping the contours of life online since just about the beginning of life online: It’s the advertising business, stupid. And if you want to fix much of what ails the internet right now, the ad business would be the perfect perp to handcuff and restrain — and perhaps even reform. Ads are the lifeblood of the internet, the source of funding for just about everything you read, watch and hear online. The digital ad business is in many ways   — it corrals and transforms latent attention into real money that pays for many truly useful inventions, from search to instant translation to video hosting to global mapping. But the online ad machine is also a vast, opaque and dizzyingly complex contraption with underappreciated capacity for misuse — one that collects and constantly profiles data about our behavior, creates incentives to monetize our most private desires and frequently unleashes loopholes that the shadiest of people are only too happy to exploit. And for all its power, the digital ad business has long been under-regulated and under-policed, both by the companies that run it and by the world’s governments. In the United States, the industry has been almost untouched by oversight, even though it forms the primary revenue stream of two of the planet’s most valuable companies, Google and Facebook. “In the early days of online media, the choice was essentially made — give it away for free, and advertising would produce the revenue,” said Randall Rothenberg, the chief executive of the Interactive Advertising Bureau, a trade association that represents companies in the digital ad business. “A lot of the things we see now flow out from that decision.” Mr. Rothenberg’s organization has long pushed for stronger standards for online advertising.  , he implored the industry to “take civic responsibility for our effect on the world.” But he conceded the business was growing and changing too quickly for many to comprehend its excesses and externalities — let alone to fix them. “Technology has largely been outpacing the ability of individual companies to understand what is actually going on,” he said. “There’s really an unregulated stock market effect to the whole thing.” Facebook, which reported its earnings on Wednesday, said its   hold that ads should “be safe and civil.” It defended the targeted ad business’s overall value, arguing that digital advertising connects people to products and services from small businesses and “creates jobs and helps the economy.” The company also pointed to several steps it had taken recently. “We’ve tightened our ad policies, hired more ad reviewers, and created a new team to help detect and prevent abuses,” said Rob Goldman, Facebook’s vice president of advertising. “We’re also testing a tool that will bring more transparency to ads running on our platform. We know there is more work to do, but our goal is to keep people safe.” A spokesman for Google, whose parent company, Alphabet, reports earnings on Thursday, said it was constantly policing its ad system, pointing out recent steps it has taken to address problems arising from the ad business, including several changes to YouTube. The role of the ad business in much of what’s terrible online was highlighted in a recent report by two think tanks, New America and Harvard’s Shorenstein Center on Media, Politics and Public Policy. “The central problem of disinformation corrupting American political culture is not Russian spies or a particular social media platform,” two researchers, Dipayan Ghosh and Ben Scott, wrote in the report, titled   “The central problem is that the entire industry is built to leverage sophisticated technology to aggregate user attention and sell advertising.” The report chronicles just how efficient the online ad business has become at profiling, targeting, and persuading people. That’s good news for the companies that want to market to you — as the online ad machine gets better, marketing gets more efficient and effective, letting companies understand and influence consumer sentiment at a huge scale for little money. But the same cheap and effective persuasion machine is also available to anyone with nefarious ends. The Internet Research Agency,   at the center of Russian efforts to influence American politics, spent $46,000 on Facebook ads before the 2016 election. That’s not very much — Hillary Clinton’s and Donald J. Trump’s campaigns spent tens of millions online. And yet the Russian campaign seems to have had enormous reach; Facebook has said the I.R.A.’s messages — both its ads and its unpaid posts — were seen by nearly 150 million Americans. How the I.R.A. achieved this mass reach likely has something to do with the dynamics of the ad business, which lets advertisers run many experimental posts to hone their messages, and tends to reward posts that spark outrage and engagement — exactly the sort that  . “You can’t have it both ways,” Mr. Scott said. “Either you have a brilliant technology that permits microtargeting to exactly the people you want to influence at exactly the right time with exactly the right message — or you’re only reaching a small number of people and therefore it couldn’t be influential.” The consequences of the ad business don’t end at foreign propaganda. Consider all the nutty content recently found on YouTube Kids — not just the child-exploitation clips but also videos that seem to be created in whole or in part by algorithms that are mining the system for what’s popular, then . Why would anyone do such a thing? For the ad money. One producer of videos that show antics including his children being scared by clowns   that he had made more than $100,000 in two months from ads on his videos. YouTube, which is owned by Google, has since pulled down thousands of such disturbing videos; the company said late last year that it was hiring numerous  . It also tightened the rules for which producers can make money from its ad system. Facebook, too, has made several recent fixes. The company has built a new tool — being tested in Canada and slated to be rolled out more widely this year — that lets people see the different ads being placed by political pages, a move meant to address I.R.A.-like influence campaigns. It has also fixed holes that allowed advertisers to target campaigns  . And it recently unveiled a new version of its News Feed that is meant to cut down on passively scrolling through posts — part of Mark Zuckerberg’s professed effort to improve the network even, he has said, at the cost of advertising revenue. The tinkering continued on Tuesday, when Facebook also said it would ban ads promoting crypto currency schemes, some of which have fallen into scammy territory. Yet these are all piecemeal efforts. They don’t address the underlying logic of the ad business, which produces endless incentives for gaming the system in ways that Google and Facebook discover often only after the fact. Mr. Rothenberg said this was how regulating advertising was likely to go — a lot of fixes resembling “Whac-a-Mole.” Of course, there is the government. You could imagine some regulator imposing stricter standards for who has access to the online ad system, who makes money from it, how it uses private information and how transparent tech companies must be about it all. But that also seems unlikely; the Honest Ads Act, a proposal to regulate online political ads, has gone nowhere in Congress. One final note: In 2015, Timothy D. Cook, Apple’s chief executive, warned about the dangers of the online ad business, especially its inherent threat to privacy. I wrote   — I argued that he had not acknowledged how ad-supported services improved his own company’s devices. I stand by that view, but now I also regret dismissing his warning so cavalierly. Socially, politically and culturally, the online ad business is far more dangerous than I appreciated. Mr. Cook was right, and we should have listened to him.


• How foreign is Broadcom? • The markets are worried that free trade has no voice at the White House. • The E.U. formally announced its plan for any Trump tariffs. • Chuck Rosenberg, a former senior official at the Justice Department, is going to Crowell & Moring. As the Trump administration weighs whether to block the chip maker’s $117 billion takeover bid for Qualcomm, a central issue is how much of a threat the deal is to national security. In an effort to assuage concerns,   Wednesday to increase research spending on 5G wireless tech and to create a $1.5 billion fund to invest in training engineering talent in the United States to help allay those concerns. The Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States, or Cfius, has jurisdiction over the transaction because Broadcom is currently incorporated in Singapore, where the company has been legally headquartered since 2005. But the company is preparing to move its corporate base to the United States, in part to avoid being considered a foreign acquirer. Beyond Broadcom’s legal domicile, though, is it a substantially foreign company? Let’s take a look at a number of factors. According to Broadcom’s  , roughly  of its $17.6 billion in net revenue comes from the United States. The single biggest market for the company is China, which accounted for roughly 54 percent of its net revenue. “Other” markets made up nearly 38 percent. As a point of comparison,   of Qualcomm’s revenues come from the United States. Some 65 percent of its revenue comes from China, including Hong Kong, according to  . Roughly   of Broadcom’s employees are based in North America, according to the annual report. About 38 percent are in Asia, and the remainder work in Europe, the Middle East and Africa. About   of Qualcomm’s employees are based in the United States. Broadcom also said that about   of the square footage of its properties, both owned and leased, are in the United States. By contrast, Qualcomm has roughly   of its owned and leased facilities in the United States. The vast majority of Broadcom’s board are American citizens who live in the United States. That includes Jim Diller, its chairman; Henry Samueli, the founder of the original Broadcom; and Ken Hao, the Silver Lake partner who has backed Broadcom for years. Hock Tan, the company’s C.E.O., immigrated to the United States to attend M.I.T. and then Harvard Business School and lives in the San Francisco Bay Area. He became a naturalized citizen of the United States in 1990. Broadcom does have one Singaporean director, Check Low, to comply with Singapore’s corporate rules. The two companies share 11 of their top 20 shareholders, including big index fund managers like BlackRock and Vanguard. President Trump’s top economic adviser finally announced  , in a sign that   the White House debate on tariffs. The news prompted Tom Nides, Morgan Stanley’s vice chairman, to  , “Oh, that’s a problem.” More on Mr. Cohn’s decision from Kate Kelly and Maggie Haberman of the NYT, who broke the news yesterday: , according to Axios: Peter Navarro, the trade adviser who pushed for the tariffs; Kevin Warsh, the former Fed governor; Shahira Knight, a deputy of Mr. Cohn’s; and the pro-free-trade economist Larry Kudlow. But Axios says that there’s  , and that other members of the National Economic Council will likely leave (We can  .) The timing:   that Mr. Cohn’s announcement came hours after Mr. Trump said that “everyone wants to work in the White House.” It also came after  , “There is no Chaos, only great Energy!”  Even if there is no plunge, now is a moment for investors to  .    said Mr. Cohn’s departure was “a significant blow” to Mr. Trump’s presidency.   said Mr. Cohn had done “an awful job,” which still probably represented “the high-water mark for economic thinking” for this White House. And his former boss, Lloyd Blankfein, said he had   “in a first class way.” The Federal Reserve has helped support the economy when a big event – fears for the survival of the euro, fiscal standoffs in Congress, oil price declines — threatens to dampen growth. But will the Fed have the same leeway to stimulate the economy if rising trade tensions start to weigh on the growth prospects of the United States? Maybe not. The Fed had ample room to keep its policy loose when inflation was dormant for years after the financial crisis. But now that inflation seems to be waking up, the Fed might not have the same flexibility. Indeed, amid the current trade tumult, investors still seem to believe that inflation is moving higher. This can be seen in a closely watched bond market indicator flagged this morning by Lisa Abramowicz of Bloomberg. : The concerns about a trade war may end up weighing on growth and causing the inflationary pressures to abate. That would give the Fed more room to maneuver, perhaps allowing it to raise interest rates more slowly.  Trade tariffs, applied broadly, could push up the prices of many goods at a time when the Fed has to grapple with the enormous fiscal stimulus that Congress just enacted. Federal Reserve governor Lael Brainard became the latest policymaker to express confidence that inflation would hit the Fed’s target of 2 percent this year. What are those tailwinds? Ms. Brainard’s comments are notable because she had previously argued vocally for caution in tightening monetary policy. Major stocks indexes in the United States are down a bit. The Dow Jones industrial average and the S.&P. 500 are both off just over 0.5 percent. Futures fell more than 1 percent in the hours after the news broke. Despite the muted response, a number of analysts are warning that investors need to prepare for the possibility that more protectionist/populist policies are on the way. Here’s a look at some reactions: What does that mean? The analysts said they think the United States is more likely than not to withdraw from Nafta. But he adds: Between Feb. 12 and Feb. 22, the billionaire investor  of the crane maker's stock. To some, that seemed like good timing. Since the day before he started selling, the stock is down 20 percent. The catalyst? The Trump administration’s plans to slap tariffs on imported steel and aluminum. Manitowoc stock fell 4.8 percent on Feb. 16   for tariffs on imported steel. The company’s shares then dropped 6 percent Thursday when President Trump announced his plan. On Wednesday, Mr. Icahn said he had no knowledge of the Trump administration’s plans when he moved to reduce his holding. In a statement on his website,  : The political bloc  , including taxing American goods like Harley-Davidsons and bourbon and filing a challenge with the World Trade Organization. Meanwhile, allies continued to fret.   that tariffs will complicate its efforts to denuclearize the North.   warned of the perils of a trade war. And   continued to lobby the White House. In  , the Aluminum Association (which represents both U.S. and foreign suppliers) said that the move would be a bad idea. Complaints can be heard around the sector. The C.E.O. of Novelis, a big aluminum producer,   for saying predictions of price increases were “hysteria.” And DowDuPont said it might now build plants   rather than the U.S. Bayer said it is in   with BASF about the sale of its entire vegetable seeds business as the German chemicals multinational, seeks to win approval for its $56 billion deal for Monsanto from European regulators. European antitrust regulators   into Bayer’s   of Monsanto, its American agribusiness rival, in August. European competition authorities are expected to wrap up their inquiry by early next month. The proposed combination is the latest in a series of mergers in the rapidly consolidating seed and agrochemical sector. Bayer previously   selected businesses with its Crop Sciences unit to BASF for 5.9 billion euros, or about $7.3 billion at current exchange rates, in October. Both deals, if one were to be reached on the vegetable seeds business, would be subject to the Monsanto transaction closing. Mr. Rosenberg had a long career in government: twice U.S. attorney, he’s been a longtime senior official at the Justice Department (including as chief of staff to James Comey) and acting head of the Drug Enforcement Administration. Now he is heading to Crowell and Moring as senior counsel in the firm’s white-collar and regulatory-enforcement practice. Philip Inglima, the chairman of Crowell, said of Mr. Rosenberg in a statement: • Some Senate Democrats joined with Republicans to send an overhaul of Dodd-Frank to the floor, setting up a battle over loosening banking regulations. ( ) • The former C.E.O. of a payday lender investigated by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau asked Mick Mulvaney, the regulator’s acting director, for a senior position there. ( ) • An adviser to the U.A.E. with ties to associates of President Trump is cooperating with Robert Mueller, suggesting that the special counsel is looking into whether Emirati money was funneled into his campaign, unnamed sources say. ( ) • The adult-film star Stormy Daniels asserted in a lawsuit that the president never signed a nondisclosure agreement about the affair she says they had. ( ) • The Justice Department has sued California over its sanctuary city policies. ( ) • Smith & Wesson’s parent company said it was wary of smart-gun proposals. ( ) It’s 5G,   that Washington, Beijing and business think will be transformative. So important is 5G that Cfius disclosed   about Broadcom buying Qualcomm. More from Cecilia Kang and Alan Rappeport of the NYT: As  , however, much of Cfius’s letter to the two companies focused on how Broadcom could manage Qualcomm if it took over. Its “private equity” cost-cutting could lead to Qualcomm reducing investment in R. & D. and ceding its 5G lead to Huawei of China, according to the letter. Broadcom   that it was committed to advancing 5G and that it is an American company in everything but legal headquarters. More on Huawei: It’s the Chinese tech company that  , even if other companies don’t. , from DealBook’s friend Steven Davidoff Solomon: The onetime king of messaging devices has accused Facebook of violating its patents in Facebook Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp. More from Ahmed Farhatha of  : Facebook says that it will fight the lawsuit and added, “BlackBerry’s suit sadly reflects the current state of its messaging business.” Coinbase is   including Bitcoin, Bitcoin Cash, Ether and Litecoin. A federal judge ruled that the Commodity Futures Trading Commission  . And rich people are investing in Bitcoin  . • Conservatives are increasingly targeting tech giants: The man behind “Clinton Cash” is producing a documentary on Facebook and Google. ( ) • Uber’s self-driving trucks   around Arizona, but they’re not ready to replace human drivers. And European automakers are preparing for an electric future, but  . • Scientists are trying to   machines learn on their own. The   expect artificial intelligence to lead to job losses in the coming decade, but,  , few see it coming for their own position. • The idea of Facebook paying us for our puppy pictures may sound crazy, but it’s gaining momentum. ( ) • Data centers have helped revitalize cities like Prineville, Oreg. ( ) • UiPath, an automation software company, has raised $153 million in a Series B round of funding led by Accel, CapitalG and Kleiner Perkins. ( ) • HQ Trivia raised new funding at a $100 million valuation, and its co-founder, Colin Kroll, apologized for his behavior when he worked at Vine. ( ) The investor group that had walked away, only to come back, took a look at the company’s finances and got a nasty surprise   — up to an additional $65 million in liabilities, according to the NYT. Maria Contreras-Sweet, who was leading the investor group, said that it would “consider acquiring assets that may become available in the event of bankruptcy proceedings.” The Weinstein Company’s response: “The company has been transparent about its dire financial condition.” • CVS Health sold $40 billion of bonds, the biggest such deal in two years, to help pay for its takeover of Aetna. ( ) • J.M. Smucker called off its deal to buy the Wesson cooking oil brand after federal regulators sued to block it. ( ) • International Paper’s bid for the European cardboard-box maker Smurfit Kappa is worth about 8.64 billion euros, or $10.7 billion. ( ) • Spotting an M&A dud: the bigger the deals, the harder they fall. ( ) • A proposed change in Japan’s tax law could encourage more all-stock deals. ( ) • UnitedHealth is among the bidders for a unit of Envision Healthcare, a health services provider under pressure from activist investors, unnamed sources said. ( ) • S.&P. Global is buying Kensho Technologies, which provides A.I.-based data analysis to financial institutions, for $550 million. ( ) • Penske Media, which owns Variety and Deadline, has acquired SheKnows Media to expand its female audience. ( ) • The story behind the fall of the British electronics retailer Maplin. ( ) • WeWork is buying the digital marketing and advertising company Conductor. ( ) • Singapore’s Temasek and GIC are close to a deal for the parent company of the Salt Bae’s steakhouse chain, which values the business at $1.5 billion. ( ) • Airbnb has named  , an Amazon executive who helped create Prime, as the head of its homes business. ( ) • Royal Bank of Scotland agreed a $500 million settlement with New York State over the mis-selling of residential mortgage-backed securities before the financial crisis. ( ) • Red Granite Pictures, which produced “Wolf of Wall Street,” agreed to pay $60 million to settle claims it financed the film with money siphoned from a Malaysian state investment fund. ( ) • UnitedHealthcare, one of the largest U.S. health insurers, said it would stop keeping millions of discounts it gets from drug companies and share them with its customers. ( ) • The N.Y.S.E. agreed to pay $14 million in penalties to settle regulatory charges for multiple violations related to high-profile events that disrupted trading. ( ) • A new book chronicles how American businesses won their civil rights. ( ) • Synthetic identity fraud, using fictional names and unassigned social security numbers, is one of the fastest growing forms of identity theft. ( ) • Billy McFarland, the entrepreneur who created Fyre Festival, admitted that he had defrauded investors. ( ) • Multinationals have made such extensive use of Ireland for funneling royalty payments that they made up about 23 percent of the country’s annual gross domestic product, according to the European Commission. ( ) • “The Big Picture” tells the story of movie and television executives whose careers were destroyed or made as entertainment went digital. ( )

Last week, I announced the beginning of a semiregular “ ” service. Send me your questions, but not just any questions. I want to explore the deep, dark conversations that we don’t hear on the financial pornography network, like how we feel about money and how money makes us feel. To kick off things, Shawn Cook from San Diego asked a question about Bitcoin. (For an explainer on Bitcoin, see   by Nathaniel Popper of The New York Times, who literally wrote   on the topic.) His hipster friend is constantly bugging him to invest in the cryptocurrency. It’s making Shawn wonder: Should he ditch his boring old index fund? Shawn, this is a great question because who among us doesn’t have a hipster friend who is always talking about how he is killing it with his investments in Bitcoin, Apple and Tesla? Those people have all the fun! They seem to know exactly what’s going to happen in whatever market they’re investing in and have this aura of self-assurance that is really annoying. It’s enough to cause even the most rational, non-hip among us to doubt our boring, old-style investing. In fact, I remember feeling a bit this way back in 1999. I was surrounded by tech people with their BlackBerries and Hotmail accounts. I resisted the siren call of the Nasdaq and the technology bubble — until I finally gave in. Then, I took some hard-earned money out of a boring diversified investment and bought Infospace. Remember that? If you do, it may not be pleasant. In fact, I can’t remember the exact details because they’re too painful, but I know I invested a lot of money (for me) back then. When I sold, I didn’t have enough to pay for a burrito and a Coke. I even considered buying more on “the dip.” Except I didn’t have any more money to invest, and this wasn’t a dip. The stock never recovered to anything close to what I had paid to buy it. Today, I still have the stock certificate as a reminder of that valuable lesson. So, Shawn, the moral of the story is that your friend just might be right. But then again, he might be flat-out wrong. What he is talking about is speculation at best, and it’s probably closer to gambling. If you have some spare money and you feel like gambling, fire away. But here’s an alternative idea. Keep your low-cost, boring, diversified investments, and have a T-shirt made (black, with white text) that says: “I own Bitcoin. How you like me now?” I’ll even provide the sketch. Keep the questions coming  !
ordan Peele is famous, in part, for imitations — of rappers and dingbats and the 44th president of the United States. But he would be impossible to imitate. He isn’t ribald. He’s droll. Sometimes he’s not even that. Sometimes he’s quiet. Sometimes he’s sitting across from you expecting you to hold up your end of a conversation. Sometimes he’s listening and hearing you — like, really hearing you. This is the Peele who made “Get Out,” and it takes a minute to square him with the Peele from “Key & Peele.” On Halloween, we had lunch at one of those casually cool American bistros in Los Angeles where all the food seems as if it was grown out back. He chose a spot outside, not to be seen (although a few people saw him) but mostly to see. Peele, who is 38, lives in his head, and he watches the world around him intensely. I got the duck, then so did he, and while we ate I was pretty sure I could hear him thinking. It was toward the end of the meal when he saw someone he recognized. Well, he thought he did. “He’s dressed like Chris,” he said with some amusement. “Do you think he’s being Chris?” He was looking past me, so it was hard to turn all the way around to confirm with any subtlety. But Peele’s gaze made it perfectly obvious to the person approaching that Peele was looking at him. “Are you Chris from ‘Get Out’ for Halloween?” Peele asked, committing less an act of racial profiling than an uncanny identification of his own handiwork. “Get Out,” of course, is the surprise hit movie that Peele wrote and directed about a black man named Chris, who discovers that his white girlfriend’s family is running a nasty racist conspiracy. Chris has big, watery eyes that seem red from weariness (or weed) and wears a collarless blue chambray shirt over a gray T-shirt and jeans. The man Peele thought might be costumed as Chris was also black, with skin as dark and eyes as striking as those of Daniel Kaluuya, the actor who plays Chris. This impostor was indeed Chris-attired too. And the white woman he was with could also have been part of the costume. It was the sort of similarity that, once pointed out, can’t be unseen. Alas, it wasn’t Halloween for this guy, just Tuesday. He was thrilled, nonetheless, to be stopped by Chris’s inventor, and he asked Peele for a photo. Peele, who got a kick even out of being wrong, asked him for one, too. The impostor then offered an incidental, partial explanation for why “Get Out” became the phenomenon it did: No, he wasn’t Chris, “but I could be.” It has been 10 months, and we’re still talking about this movie and its alarming presentation of white racism. “Get Out” opened at the top of the box office at the end of February and has grossed many, many times the $4.5 million it cost to make. Racism is old, but Peele found a poetic new way of talking about it. He gave us language we didn’t know we lacked. For a white audience, the movie might be one of the few times they’ve been asked to identify with a regular, imperiled black person without the sweetener of a white co-star — no Spencer Tracy or Sandra Bullock here, just Catherine Keener and Bradley Whitford as the Armitages, the sort of parents who’ll inquire about the history of their daughter’s interracial relationship by asking: “How long’s this been going on? This  ,” as daddy Armitage does. For a black audience, the movie could have ended right there. What does an affluent, middle-aged, suburban white dude know about a thang? And what’s he doing saying the word with this much insinuating self-delight, this much put-on jive? “I didn’t want any white saviors,” Peele said over lunch. White saviors hog the history of race in American film. Instead, his movie is full of white people whom Peele reveals as insatiable predators of blackness. In a bid to help rid Chris of the urge to smoke, Mrs. Armitage tries hypnosis. She sits him down and swirls a spoon around the rim of a teacup and commands him to “sink into the floor.” Suddenly, Chris can’t move. He’s entered a state of paralysis that Mrs. Armitage calls the “sunken place.” There’s a cut to Chris falling downward into a dark space, looking up at the lighted surface where his body sits motionless while his struggling subconscious drowns. It’s a strange, complicated, disturbing metaphor for the long history of white control over the black body. It’s also a prelude to the rest of the movie’s sinister doings, which include a racist cabal of the Armitages and their mostly white friends and culminate in an elaborate medical procedure called “coagula.” The “sunken place” is the movie’s most potent metaphor. Peele says he devised it as a way of thinking about a crisis like the mass incarceration of black men. “The first moment in the writing process where I sat there and cried,” he told me, “was realizing that while I was having fun writing this mischievous popcorn film, there were real black people who were being abducted and put into dark holes, and the worst part of it is we don’t think about them. I hadn’t been thinking about them. We put them to the back of our minds. That was kind of a trigger point for me, this idea of the back of one’s mind.” As a concept, the sunken place has grown even more capacious. It has been repurposed to explain both institutional disenfranchisement and racial self-estrangement — an explanation for the behavior of black people who seem to be under white control, based on either their sustained proximity to whiteness or statements construable as anti-black, or probably both. Sunken-place entrants include Clarence Thomas, Ben Carson, Tiger Woods, O.J. Simpson, sometimes Kanye West and any black person with something nice to say about President Trump. It’s more generous than “sellout” and less punitive than “Uncle Tom,” a dis and a road to redemption. Before he noticed fake Chris, Peele had been talking about the restricted ways bigotry is discussed. “We’re never going to fix this problem of racism if the idea is you have to be in a K.K.K. hood to be part of the problem,” he said. The culture still tends to think of American racism as a disease of the Confederacy rather than as a national pastime with particular regional traditions, like barbecue. “Get Out” is set in the Northeast, where the racial attitude veers toward self-congratulatory tolerance. Mr. Armitage, for instance, gets chummy with Chris by telling him he’d have voted for Obama a third time. “Get Out” would have made one kind of sense under a post-Obama Hillary Clinton administration, slapping at the smugness of American liberals still singing: “Ding dong, race is dead.” Peele shows that other, more backhanded forms of racism exist — the presumptuous “can I touch your hair” icebreaker, Mr. Armitage’s “I voted for Obama, so I can’t be racist” sleeper hold are just two. But Clinton lost. Now the movie seems to amplify the racism that emanates from the Trump White House and smolders around the country. A few people have remarked to me, not unreasonably, that “Get Out” isn’t terribly plausible. The cabal doesn’t make sociological sense. How does the cotton stuffing go from the armchair into Chris’s ears? What does a weekend at the Armitages look like with no black visitor? None of the terror stands up to logic! But when is terror logical? Peele developed a tone, other than hysteria, to present the black experience of discomfort in seemingly benign white worlds and the way their residents chronically deny the reality of that experience. Peele takes that reality as a given, but he is amplifying the paranoia that results from its constant denial. It’s a movie made by a person having the same bad dream I and lots of other black people have had. Every time I’ve seen it, I’ve thought about that moment not too far into Toni Morrison’s “Song of Solomon” when somebody asks, “What difference do it make if the thing you scared of is real or not?” What befalls the black characters in “Get Out” is the thing we’re scared of. Peele presented one serious stipulation. “When you come to the office and see cards with names and details on them, I don’t want anybody knowing about that,” he warned. He is already at work on his next movie and doesn’t want to say much about what it is. He does intend to sic the “Get Out” model on other phobias and -isms. But which ones? “It’s tippy-top secret,” he told me on Halloween. “I can give you hints or something.” Peele says he wants to make “more social thrillers about different human demons, and the first human demon that I was trying to tackle with ‘Get Out’ was racism and neglect for one another. It’s going to be another piece of that project.” On an overcast afternoon, Peele’s assistant, a chill young man named Alex Kim, drove us into the Hollywood Hills to the Spanish-style colonial house that for about eight months has been the office of Peele’s production company, Monkeypaw. Like a lot of the residences up here, this one is nestled into the geological table and seems charmingly underfurnished. Most of the common space feels spare in a lonely, college-y sort of way. Some rooms have rugs, but the longer you’re there, the more rugs you want to put down. There were no visible markers of any coming projects, just walls of inspired fan art and designer posters, like the black-and-white image of a coffee mug fashioned with Kaluuya’s worried face and a spoon stirring where the top of his skull should be. These guys might be too busy to worry about décor. Peele is producing a new “Twilight Zone” for CBS All Access and, with Misha Green and J.J. Abrams, another anthology series for HBO based on the 2016 novel by Matt Ruff, “Lovecraft Country.” Peele’s comedy “The Last O.G.” — in which an ex-con played by Tracy Morgan adjusts to, among other things, Brooklyn gentrification — is set to start on TBS in the spring. Monkeypaw is co-producing Spike Lee’s next movie, “Black Klansman,” in which an undercover detective somehow winds up running a chapter of the K.K.K. And then there’s the diversification initiative for young writers and filmmakers working in what lots of fans and critics call “genre,” which combs the country for voices — women of color, say, or gay people — that Hollywood tends to ignore. And of course there’s Peele’s own movie. Wandering around the house makes clear that Peele’s lean into horror and thriller and science fiction and fantasy isn’t a lean at all. It’s just Peele. Anytime I’d marvel at a picture or poster in the house, he seemed delighted that I recognized it. He recited with perfect accuracy the scariness classifications from Stephen King’s 1981 horror-culture manifesto, “Danse Macabre” — terror, horror, revulsion — and convincingly applied them to “The Blair Witch Project.” He loves Alfred Hitchcock’s films (“every single possible aspect of the cinema working in unison to bring you something new”). But also Darren Aronofsky’s bonkers crypto-Old Testament flop, “Mother!”: “I think that that movie will stand the test of time in a way that more successful movies won’t.” Peele’s space on the top floor doubles as a mini museum of his sensibility. A tall, loaded bookshelf holds everything from screenwriting manuals and six installments of the Japanese manga landmark “Akira” to Raymond Carver’s “What We Talk About When We Talk About Love” to an LP of Philip Glass’s score for the underrated 1992 urban-blight horror film “Candyman.” There are encyclopedias on “early earth” and “vampire, werewolves and other monsters,” and a slender volume titled “Trolls.” “Another one of my favorites over there,” Peele said, gesturing toward a frame hanging by the door: a poster for “The Secret of NIMH,”  . It’s “a weird combination of fantasy,” he said, “and kind of melancholy and some scary [expletive], but beautiful. Beautiful.” “I’m a film geek,” he told me when we first met. And as a film geek, Peele has learned the rules for various genres — whom they include, omit and exploit and how to re-engineer it all. Earlier, Peele thought aloud about the notorious horror convention of black characters being the first to die. He believes we’ve looked at it the wrong way. The real problem, as Peele sees it, is that they don’t survive the movie at all. “Final girl” is a horror trope. “Final brother” is not. Usually, if Peele is watching a black person in a horror movie, he knows that “it’s just a matter of time until Tyrone walks away to smoke some weed or pee or something and gets macheted. It used to come right at that moment when you know everyone’s going to die. But you definitely know the final girl is not going to be the black dude.” So Kaluuya represents a correction. Now, he said, “Daniel’s the final girl.” For a movie with this much grisliness centered around as fraught a theme as race relations in America, it’s notable that the only substantial fight about it has been one of classification: What is it? In mid-November, it was reported that “Get Out” had been submitted for Golden Globes consideration in the “musical or comedy” category, in which it’s now a nominee. Twitter — black Twitter — practically collapsed in exasperation, managing a collective SMDH. “Musical or comedy” constituted an insult, albeit an ironic one, to the historical injury the film appeared to be addressing. The dismay amounted to: What’s so funny about black pain? At the controversy’s peak, Peele tweeted simply,   poking the beehive with characteristic waggishness. But days later, he released a statement that read, in part: Peele told me he meant for the tweet and the statement to reflect the anguish and pride of the movie’s fans. “To me one of the greatest things about having this movie come out is we can get to this conversation that says: Who’s calling it what, and why are they calling it that?” With that “documentary” tweet, Peele was more or less saying that the movie’s genre is truth. Its other genre could be empathy. A nonwhite audience might have been Chris once, twice or all the time. But white audiences are pushed into an uncomfortable new experience. “One of the reasons this movie clicked with more than just a black audience,” Peele said, “is because you get to be black while you’re watching it.”    orienting principle of Peele’s art. Its richness, its strangeness, its beauty, its complication, its ridiculousness, its divisiveness, its allure, its very realness. Many a black artist has explored blackness, but few have found it as fascinating as Peele appears to. It perplexes, amuses and excites him, the way language obsesses some novelists and food delights certain cooks. Increasingly, though, he has wanted to do more   blackness — building that pipeline, for instance, through which other artists’ ideas would flow. You can see the shift from frolic to duty in his sketch work with Keegan-Michael Key. Their Comedy Central show, “Key & Peele,” was, in some ways, a lab for “Get Out,” one in which they did as much critiquing of blackness as they did of white people’s relationship to it. One sketch from Season 1 features a fake documentary about the   Gafilta Fresh (Key) and Dr. Dreidel (Peele). They blast into a banquet hall with a dose of rappity-rap B-boy blackness. They’re Kid ’N Play. They’re a minstrel act. And everybody digs them. The documentary cuts to a Jewish mother who says: “When you see black people at a bar mitzvah, it’s very exciting. It’s like a scary ride. And the kids just love it.” The father tells the filmmakers: “You just really can’t put a price on the look on your child’s face when they see a black person for the first time. It’s just magical.” Gafilta and Dreidel do all kinds of stereotypical black-party shtick, in the hope, they say, of exposing Jewish kids to black people early enough so that they don’t discriminate. It’s a walk around the rim of a sunken place. Somewhere in all this code-switching and impersonation is a stinging indictment of the cultural attraction to “niggas.” America loves a loud, crazy, funny black person as much as it needs to see him passed over for work, harshly sentenced and shot to death. “Key & Peele” was unusually creative in the way it satirized that duality, until the gravity of what we were being asked to laugh at began to darken the lunacy of the show. For the final two seasons, the bright “Cosby Show”-style a cappella number that opened each episode was replaced with ominous “True Detective”-like music, and rather than talking to a live audience, the comedians talked to each other in a car. They were on a road trip, but their enclosure whispered “fallout shelter.” Key and Peele’s was a classical comedy combo: tall and shorter, zany and chill, wet and dry, Jerry Lewis and Dean Martin, Martin Lawrence and Will Smith. Key’s exuberant virtuosity can upstage Peele’s subtlety. Peele is quieter and seems to be doing less. Whether Key is Michael Jackson or Tim Cook, he boils over, melts down, blows up, simmers, stews and karate-kicks. He’s the rocket. Peele is the control center. He doesn’t appear to hunger for applause the way Key does. You laugh at Key because he works so hard. You laugh at Peele because, by comparison, he makes it look easy. Key told me he believes “Get Out” is cathartic for Peele. He’s using his work to work on himself. “I’m the kind of person who would sit across from a therapist on the couch and go, ‘Then my mom. ...’ ” Key told me. “Whereas Jordan doesn’t know another way to do it other than to  , and he has enough confidence in himself to say, ‘Well, I’m going to do it this way,’ and I’m not sure he’s necessarily conscious that he’s doing it.” Peele suspects that the self-investigation he is undertaking through his work has something to do with his father, whom he didn’t see after his 7th or 8th birthday. He contrasts his relationship to his blackness with that of Key, whose biological and adoptive fathers were black. “If you had a black father around, I think that role model gave him a context to understand his blackness,” he says. “I would probably have been the voice in ‘Key & Peele’ that was pushing and pushing and pushing to expand the definition of ‘African-American.’ I can see how that is something I’ve been searching for in my art.” He and Key played scores of black people of every type, and many with no type at all. For some African-Americans, for a long time, rules for what counts as black have been apparent. And they’ve been fixed. The joy of Peele’s comedy with Key was in their violation of those rules. The show was about how lost in this stuff we all are. “Get Out” is a determination to be found. In November, Peele was in good spirits as he sat in the greenroom before a conversation with Seth Meyers at the 92nd Street Y. He was dressed in new jeans, white sneakers and a black sweater with a taxi-cab-yellow stripe across the front. It was a variation on his usual streetwear (baseball caps, varsity jackets, hoodies, boots) but even fresher. As he was getting ready to go onstage, I asked him if he missed performing. His answer was firm. “I don’t miss it. I just don’t.” Did he not miss it for the moment? Like, was he on a break from it? Or did he existentially not miss it? “I existentially don’t miss it,” he said. “I think there will probably be a point where I get really excited about a role and go for it because it feels fresh again and new.” With comedy, “the failure on performing is brutal,” he said, then laughed to himself. “We’ll see how I feel when my next movie bombs.” I mentioned that the between-sketch banter in the early episodes of “Key & Peele” was often as funny and as revealing as the sketches themselves. “One of the hardest things about a sketch show is,” he started to say, before taking a second to consider what the hardest thing could be. He happened to be facing the dressing-room mirror, giving himself a solemn stare. “The way we were approaching sketch was complete immersion into these characters and going for it. People like routine in television. They like ritual. They like knowing what they’re going to get. This is why it’s hard to break in a new sketch show — because the first season you just look like a bunch of people putting on outfits and trying too hard to make everybody laugh. And we only want to laugh at people we trust, not these new [expletive] coming in. No way.” He thought some more. “I’ve noticed that the truth works. People can feel the truth. If you’re being yourself and you’re just using your own emotions, they can feel it. If you’re doing fake, they can feel it. It took me a while in comedy to realize that your truth is more powerful than your mask.”  on the fifth floor of a brownstone walk-up a block and a half from Central Park, a paradise that some of my black friends still don’t feel is theirs. But as a teenager, Peele used it to clear his head or explore his thoughts, the rainier and gloomier the better. He wasn’t a morose kid, he said, just introspective. “I don’t know, there was always something about the rain that was like I couldn’t be upset,” he said. “It was just always instant happiness, instant connection to something, and some sort of connection to God.” Through eighth grade, Peele went to local public schools. Then he attended the Calhoun School, about a 20-minute walk from his apartment. He was a nerd, a black nerd, before black nerds were a thing, before there were “blerds” (a word he and Key both casually use). They were nerds in the time of Lamar from the “Revenge of the Nerds” movies and Steve Urkel from “Family Matters” and, in a different way, Carlton Banks from “The Fresh Prince of Bel Air.” If you reminded anyone of them, you were dead. But he never got hassled in the cafeteria or between classes. In seventh grade, Peele had a bunch of Garfield shirts he liked to wear. There’s nowhere to hide for a black kid in a Garfield shirt. “I never tried to wear the clothing to not get me beat up,” he said. “I was into musical theater, I was into movies, I was into being free. I was a child, and I’m still that child. Part of being a child internally is not falling victim to fashion, not feeling like you have to present something that you’re not.” He was charming and funny and had some close friends, two of whom now work with him at Monkeypaw. Growing up, Peele came to love “Rosemary’s Baby” — he lived a few blocks from the Dakota, the mega manse in the movie. Tim Burton’s “Edward Scissorhands” was another personal landmark. He has a warm memory of his mother’s taking him to see it at the Ziegfeld Theater, the single-screen palace that projected its final film last year. “The movie just crushed me,” he said. “I thought it was, you know, the best movie I had seen, and still, any day, it could debatably be my No. 1.” Burton’s persecuted misfit artisan spoke to him. So did Burton, one of Peele’s favorite directors, whose approach to filmmaking revolves around the experience of belonging: “I feel like I don’t quite fit in, like how I am supposed to fit in,” he said, summing up one of Burton’s themes. Peele’s father, Hayward Peele, wasn’t around much and had other children with other women in different parts of the country. Peele has fond memories of him and of the limited time they spent together. And yet he remains curious about a major part of himself that stood out in the context of his mother’s white extended family. When I spoke to Peele’s mother, Lucinda Williams, on the phone, stories from her life and life with her son poured out. She tried to keep Peele’s father connected to their son, first through visits, but she learned not to count on those after he stood Peele up a few times. Then she tried to keep the culture of him around — the jazz and food that he liked. But some things she wouldn’t have, like the time he asked Peele why he “talked white.” “I knew I couldn’t allow that,” she said. Peele said he was never made to feel different. He was loved. But the void he felt was out of his mother’s control. It was out of his too. He knows that in some ways he’s searching for something through his work that he may never sufficiently resolve in his life. When Peele was an adult, a half brother reached out to him through social media and shared details about his father’s life after he left them, but this only compounded the questions. In July, Peele became a father himself, and he wants, as best he can, to protect his son from these nagging mysteries of the self. Perhaps his adolescent plunge into the worlds of fantasy and sci-fi and horror was a respite from the question “ ” But in adulthood, he’s using genre as an instrument of self-discovery and social X-ray:  . Peele talked about his childhood over two tiny   and a couple of mimosas at a busy French place less than a quarter mile from the apartment he grew up in. Maybe bringing all this up saddened him, but it didn’t show. He even laughed through some of it. Peele curses a lot, and he’s fond of using “man” as an interjection. There’s an enthusiastic crack of adolescence, of nasality, in his voice that might sound nerdy but is also warm. Ascribing whiteness to it might say more about the ascriber than about Peele. It permits you to miss what the voice is saying. He sounds perfectly black to me. Peele is married to Chelsea Peretti, the wry, sneakily blunt observational comedian. While we walked around the Upper West Side, he told me that the acidity and audacity of her humor struck him. He looked up some videos of her and watched a web series she made. “Oh! You know what?” he said, interrupting his train of thought. “The first time I fell in love with her was this ‘Comedy Bang! Bang!’ episode.” The guests on the podcast included Peretti and some of her fellow writers on “Parks and Recreation.” “They were pretending to be sort of bad, obnoxious comedians, and it was really subversive and subtle, and I said to my assistant, ‘Who is that?’ He was like, ‘That’s Chelsea Peretti,’ and I said to him right there — no joke — ‘There’s a 10 percent chance I will marry that woman right over there, because she is cracking my [expletive] up.’ ” Naturally, he reached out to her on Twitter. “I slid up in them DMs,” he clarified. Peretti is white and, in certain moviegoers’ analysis, the presumed subject of “Get Out.” People who don’t know her or Peele want to know what the deal is. They both say there isn’t one. But Peretti understands the confusion. “I can’t really fault anyone for wondering what it’s about,” Peretti told me over the phone. “I don’t even know if either of us fully knows. Some of it is like poetry — it’s not all fully intellectual and logical.” She went on: “All of art has some stuff that’s real and some stuff that’s not, but I can’t really distinguish for him, for his movie, what was what. I certainly don’t harvest black bodies for my eternal liberty ... yet.” Peele didn’t mean for Chris and his girlfriend, Rose, to function as avatars of his marriage. He was thinking more universally. “I can’t point to somebody who I’ve felt betrayed by on a racial level,” he told me one evening. “I wrote it before I met Chelsea. This is why you marry a comedian: because she gets it,” he said. “I knew that something would ring true about the narrative of the white family and the white woman and the trap that that can be for a black man.” He has never felt trapped by the Perettis. He wanted to challenge Hollywood’s idealization of interracial relationships. They’re a fact of American life and yet also still suspicious, even to enlightened people, even to people in an actual interracial relationship. “It’s still a principle that’s disapproved of from both sides,” Peele said. “Part of me thought: I don’t know if people will want to come and see an interracial love story, even put in this sort of horror setting, because there’s something about it that makes people uncomfortable. At the same time, there’s a conventional way we’re meant to deal with miscegenation in pop culture, which is with a certain reverence. It’s Romeo and Juliet. It’s Martin Luther King’s dream.” Peele jaundices the romance. Rose is no Juliet: She’s a bloodthirsty vacuumer of black souls. But the movie isn’t only about black men and the white women they date. It’s entirely possible the movie is about something else. About the terror of black America accusing you of “talking white.” About feeling suspicious as a black person among white people. Maybe they’re guilty of, say, coveting you, and maybe the covetousness is all your fault, a result of having gotten so close in the first place.  spot on the first floor of the Monkeypaw office hangs one of the only “Key & Peele” references in the house. It’s an image from a Season 3 sketch called   It stars Peele, in a black toupee and thin mustache, as a rootin’-tootin’ businessman who is informed that his stay at a Comfort Inn-type hotel includes a continental breakfast. “It’s ...  ?” he asks, before he saunters up to the thingy that dumps Froot Loops into a plastic-foam bowl and renames the bewildered Latino busboy “ .” At first, the joke appears to be about the corporate sham of fancifying such shabbiness. Then it appears to be about the kind of black small-timer who takes “continental” at its word and permits inexperience to recast the business-travel buffet spread as the apotheosis of upper crustiness. (“Paper and everything,” he says, marveling at one of those tiny, oily muffins.) But when Peele sits down and begins to sample his selection, his nincompoopery blossoms into musicality. Each item receives a serenade of ignorant delight. (“Baked to perfection,” he sings after he chomps into an unpeeled banana.) He doesn’t eat so much as conduct an orchestra of gluttony (Strauss provides the musical soundtrack). His elation segues first into orgasm, then into blubbering. I always laugh so hard at this sketch that I lose the joke. Peele is that absurdly moving. He gave dozens of tremendous, tremendously original performances. This one happens to be my favorite. The comedy comes from a place of intense passion and utter abandon. The man is a fool. But Peele insists that anyone who can love even this food this deeply deserves more than your laughter. The image that hangs in Peele’s office comes from the sketch’s punch line: It’s a black-and-white photograph of the businessman character beaming at a banquet-hall table, the one black face in an ocean of well-heeled, blank-looking white ones. “Continental Breakfast Buffet 1935,” it reads. The dateline could also be: “Sunken Place, forever.” The sketch was part of that season’s Halloween episode (the last shot alludes to the last shot of Stanley Kubrick’s “The Shining”). A close-up of that photo is also Peele’s Twitter avatar. It’s an embrace of his comedic brilliance that also feels like a reminder:  . Maybe that fear of alienation fostered his fascination with blackness and fueled his determination not to lose touch with or forsake it, no matter how many white best friends and girlfriends and co-writers and producers he has had. I’ve been there. Lots of black people have been there. “Get Out” is a hit because Jordan Peele is not alone. It’s a hit because, not so secretly, it’s about a profound fear of being black and isolated. In the movie, Chris’s best friend is a T.S.A. agent named Rod Williams, who is played by the stand-up Lil Rel Howery. Rod’s skepticism is a surrogate for the audience’s. His sarcasm is more than comic relief; it’s black people talking back to the screen. Howery delivers all the easy laughs. But when the Armitage cabal snares Chris, it’s Rod to the rescue. Comedy saves Chris from horror. But Rod feels far more crucial than that. It’s important that Chris’s best friend is a more down, average black person. It’s important that Rod works for the T.S.A., a para-law-enforcement outfit that screens for safety, often staffed, depending on your city, almost entirely by black people. It’s this guy who comes to save Chris from all this whiteness. They might not be friends in the real world. But in the metaphor, the relationship makes sense. Who else would have realized that two and two equals “coagula”? Who else could get Chris out of the sunken place but a man who refuses to be sunk? Rod is justice of a sort and unconditional support. He’s the movie’s secret weapon and moral SEAL team. It’s the big surprise of “Get Out.” Peele made a nightmare about white evil that doubles as a fairy tale about black unity, black love, black rescue. More than once, Peele said he made this movie for a black audience. More than once, he mentioned how gratifying the black embrace has been for him: “No award will ever equal that to me.”
IF you’ve only recently tuned in to the seemingly endless conversation about bitcoin, you could be forgiven for thinking that the digital currency is little more than the latest Wall Street fetish or a juiced-up version of PayPal. After all, so many headlines in the last few weeks have focused on its market price and the cool stuff you can get with it: Bitcoin breaks  ! Bitcoin  ! Bitcoin  ! Use bitcoin to buy a ride on  ! But all the talk about bitcoin’s value (or lack thereof) obscures the fact that it was never really meant as an investment nor primarily as a way to purchase   or   — let alone a brand-new  . One could argue that bitcoin isn’t chiefly a commercial venture at all, a funny thing to say about a kind of online cash. To its creators and numerous disciples, bitcoin is — and always has been — a mostly ideological undertaking, more philosophy than finance. “The ideas behind it — that’s what attracted me,” said Elizabeth Ploshay, a regular writer for  , which describes its mission as being “the most accurate and up-to-date source of information, news and commentary about bitcoin.” And if the magazine has a mission, so, too, does the subject that it covers. As Ms. Ploshay explained it, bitcoin isn’t merely money; it’s “a movement” — a crusade in the costume of a currency. Depending on whom you talk to, the goal is to unleash repressed economies, to take down global banking or to wage a war against the Federal Reserve. For those with an uncertain understanding of its history, bitcoin entered the world on Jan. 3, 2009, when a shadowy hacker — or team of hackers — working under the name Satoshi Nakamoto released an ingenious string of computer code that established a system permitting people to transfer money to one another online, directly, anonymously and outside government control, in much the way that Napster once allowed the unrestrained transfer of music files. In a 500-word essay that accompanied the code, Nakamoto suggested that the motive for creating bitcoin was anger at the financial crisis: “The root problem with conventional currencies is all the trust that’s required to make it work. The central bank must be trusted not to debase the currency, but the history of fiat currencies is full of breaches of that trust.” It was fundamentally a political document and, as such, it attracted followers among libertarian and anarchist groups who saw in bitcoin a means of removing the money supply from the grasping hands of government. In blog posts and at   around the globe, these evangelists began to spread its gospel. It is only in the last few months, as bitcoin has attracted the attention of  ,   and   that the narrative of bitcoin as a tool for change has been drowned out by a simpler story line: that of bitcoin as a kind of crypto-credit card — or, even more, as a digitized casino game. “Price is the least interesting thing about bitcoin,” said  , an early investor who is often called, in a typical movement phrase, the Bitcoin Jesus. “At first, almost everyone who got involved did so for philosophical reasons. We saw bitcoin as a great idea, as a way to separate money from the state.” While the bitcoin hype has inspired Ron Paulian dreams of evading inflation and undermining the Federal Reserve, the currency has also gained cachet among less conspicuously conservative adherents, like the founders of  , a start-up firm in Nairobi, Kenya, that plans to help Africans abroad send money to their families at home. According to the World Bank, $1.3 billion in remittances is sent each year to Kenya, a process that costs about $110 million in fees. By using bitcoin’s peer-to-peer technology to avoid banks and wire-transfer companies like Western Union, BitPesa hopes to reduce these fees by two-thirds, saving ordinary Africans $74 million annually. You know you’re talking to a true bitcoin believer if you hear the word “disruption.” But that’s how bitcoin is seen within the broader movement: as an unruly tool with potentially transformative effects on entrenched businesses like retail payment and asset management. “Right now in the United States, bitcoin is mainly considered a get-rich-quick scheme with a little financial privacy thrown in,” said Jon Matonis, the executive director of the  , the self-proclaimed center of the decentralized crusade. “But its larger implications down the road are major disruptions to certain legacy industries.” Mr. Matonis added that the ideology of bitcoin was wide enough to accommodate people on all points on the spectrum — “from libertarian capitalists to socialists.” It not only has a following among the anti-central bank crowd, he said; it has also proved attractive to communitarians like the residents of the  , which now boasts the highest density of businesses accepting bitcoin in the world. There are even those who see bitcoin as the ultimate alternative to the global banking system. Ryan Singer, a co-founder of the bitcoin exchange  , based in San Francisco, compared the currency to email, conjecturing that it would gradually supplant traditional banking, just as digital messaging displaced handwritten letters. “When kids wake up to the fact that they don’t need their parents’ help to create a bitcoin wallet,” Mr. Singer said, “when they can use bitcoins for free international transactions, at any hour, in every major city on the planet, then you’ll know that something has changed.” Perhaps the best proof of bitcoin’s ideological underpinnings is that a schism has emerged in recent weeks between moderate elements in the movement who sense the necessity of cooperating with officialdom, and a more uncompromising faction that wants to keep bitcoin free from any government regulation. The hard-line bloc is exemplified by the crypto-anarchist developers of a bitcoin product called  , which is scheduled to be introduced next year and will include extra protections to ensure that bitcoin transactions remain secure, anonymous and difficult to trace. “We see this as part of the total sublation of the state,” said Cody Wilson, Dark Wallet’s director, who gained fame earlier this year when he published online the blueprints to  . “I know I sound like some kind of weird Jehovah’s Witness, but we’ve only just begun. We admit that we are ideologues.”

, the elegant, acerbic all-around man of letters who presided with a certain relish over what he declared to be the end of American civilization, died on Tuesday at his home in the Hollywood Hills section of  , where he moved in 2003 after years of living in Ravello,  . He was 86. The cause was complications of  , his nephew Burr Steers said. Mr. Vidal was, at the end of his life, an Augustan figure who believed himself to be the last of a breed, and he was probably right. Few American writers have been more versatile or gotten more mileage from their talent. He published some 25 novels, two memoirs and several volumes of stylish, magisterial essays. He also wrote plays, television dramas and screenplays. For a while he was even a contract writer at MGM. And he could always be counted on for a spur-of-the-moment aphorism, put-down or sharply worded critique of American foreign policy. Perhaps more than any other American writer except   or  , Mr. Vidal took great pleasure in being a public figure. He twice ran for office — in 1960, when he was the Democratic Congressional candidate for the 29th District in upstate New York, and in 1982, when he campaigned in   for a seat in the Senate — and though he lost both times, he often conducted himself as a sort of unelected shadow president. He once said, “There is not one human problem that could not be solved if people would simply do as I advise.” Mr. Vidal was an occasional actor, appearing in animated form on   and “Family Guy,” in the movie version of his own play   and in the   movie   in which he played an aging, epicene version of himself. He was a more than occasional guest on talk shows, where his poise, wit, good looks and charm made him such a regular that   offered him a spot as a guest host of “The Tonight Show.” Television was a natural medium for Mr. Vidal, who in person was often as cool and detached as he was in his prose. “Gore is a man without an unconscious,” his friend the Italian writer   once said. Mr. Vidal said of himself: “I’m exactly as I appear. There is no warm, lovable person inside. Beneath my cold exterior, once you break the ice, you find cold water.” Mr. Vidal loved conspiracy theories of all sorts, especially the ones he imagined himself at the center of, and he was a famous feuder; he engaged in celebrated on-screen wrangles with Mailer, Capote and   Mr. Vidal did not lightly suffer fools — a category that for him comprised a vast swath of humanity, elected officials particularly — and he was not a sentimentalist or a romantic. “Love is not my bag,” he said. By the time he was 25, he had already had more than 1,000 sexual encounters with both men and women, he boasted in his memoir   Mr. Vidal tended toward what he called “same-sex sex,” but frequently declared that human beings were inherently bisexual, and that labels like gay (a term he disliked) or straight were arbitrary and unhelpful. For 53 years, he had a live-in companion, Howard Austen, a former advertising executive, but the secret of their relationship, he often said, was that they did not sleep together. Mr. Vidal sometimes claimed to be a populist — in theory, anyway — but he was not convincing as one. Both by temperament and by birth he was an aristocrat. Eugene Luther Gore Vidal Jr. was born on Oct. 3, 1925, at the   at West Point, where his father, Eugene, had been an All-American football player and a track star and had returned as a flying instructor and assistant football coach. An aviation pioneer, Eugene Vidal Sr. went on to found three airlines, including one that became T.W.A. He was director of the Bureau of Air Commerce under President  . Mr. Vidal’s mother, Nina, was an actress and socialite and the daughter of Thomas Pryor Gore, a Democratic senator from  . Mr. Vidal, who once said he had grown up in “the House of Atreus,” detested his mother, whom he frequently described as a bullying, self-pitying alcoholic. She and Mr. Vidal’s father divorced in 1935, and she married Hugh D. Auchincloss, the stepfather of   — a connection that Mr. Vidal never tired of bringing up. After her remarriage, Mr. Vidal lived with his mother at Merrywood, the Auchincloss family estate in  , but his fondest memories were of the years the family spent at his maternal grandfather’s sprawling home in the Rock Creek Park neighborhood of Washington. He loved to read to his grandfather, who was blind, and sometimes accompanied him onto the Senate floor. Mr. Vidal’s lifelong interest in politics began to stir back then, and from his grandfather, an America Firster, he probably also inherited his unwavering isolationist beliefs. Mr. Vidal attended St. Albans School in Washington, where he lopped off his Christian names and became simply Gore Vidal, which he considered more literary-sounding. Though he shunned sports himself, he formed an intense romantic and sexual friendship — the most important of his life, he later said — with Jimmie Trimble, one of the school’s best athletes. Trimble was his “ideal brother,” his “other half,” Mr. Vidal said, the only person with whom he ever felt wholeness. Jimmie’s premature death at Iwo Jima in   at once sealed off their relationship in a glow of A. E. Housman-like early perfection, and seemingly made it impossible for Mr. Vidal ever to feel the same way about anyone else. After leaving St. Albans in 1939, Mr. Vidal spent a year at the Los Alamos Ranch School in   before enrolling at Phillips Exeter Academy in  . He contributed stories and poems to the Exeter literary magazine, but he was an indifferent student who excelled mostly at debating. A classmate, the writer John Knowles, later used him as the model for Brinker Hadley, the know-it-all conspiracy theorist in   his Exeter-based novel. Mr. Vidal graduated from Exeter at 17 — only by cheating on virtually every math exam, he later admitted — and enlisted in the Army, becoming first mate on a freight supply ship in the Aleutian Islands. He began work on “Williwaw,” a novel set on a troopship and published in 1946, while he was an associate editor at the publishing company E. P. Dutton, a job he soon gave up. Written in a pared-down, Hemingway-like style, “Williwaw” (the title is a meteorological term for a sudden wind out of the mountains) won some admiring reviews but gave little clue to the kind of writer Mr. Vidal would become. Neither did his second book, “In a   Wood” (1947), about a brokerage clerk and his wartime Italian mistress. Mr. Vidal later said it was so bad, he couldn’t bear to reread it. He nevertheless became a glamorous young literary figure, pursued by Anaïs Nin and courted by Christopher Isherwood and  . In 1948 Mr. Vidal published “  and the Pillar,” which was dedicated to J. T. (Jimmie Trimble). It is what would now be called a coming-out story, about a handsome, athletic young Virginia man who gradually discovers that he is homosexual. By today’s standards it is tame and discreet, but at the time it caused a scandal and was denounced as corrupt and pornographic. Mr. Vidal later claimed that the literary and critical establishment,   especially, had blacklisted him because of the book, and he may have been right. He had such trouble getting subsequent novels reviewed that he turned to writing mysteries under the pseudonym Edgar Box and then, for a time, gave up novel-writing altogether. To make a living he concentrated on writing for television, then for the stage and the movies. Work was plentiful. He wrote for most of the shows that presented hourlong original dramas in the 1950s, including “Studio One,” “Philco Television Playhouse” and “Goodyear Playhouse.” He became so adept, he could knock off an adaptation in a weekend and an original play in a week or two. He turned   his 1955 television drama about an alien who comes to earth to study the art of war, into a Broadway play. His most successful play was “The Best Man,” about two contenders for the presidential nomination. It ran for 520 performances on Broadway before it, too, became a well-received film, in 1964, with a cast headed by   and a screenplay by Mr. Vidal. It was revived on Broadway in 2000 and is now being revived there again as “Gore Vidal’s The Best Man.” Mr. Vidal’s reputation as a script doctor was such that in 1956 MGM hired him as a contract writer; among other projects he helped rewrite the screenplay of   though he was denied an official  . He also wrote the screenplay for the movie adaptation of his friend Tennessee Williams’s play  By the end of the ’50s, though, Mr. Vidal, at last financially secure, had wearied of Hollywood and turned to politics. He had purchased Edgewater, a Greek Revival mansion in  , N.Y., and it became his headquarters for his 1960 run for Congress. He was encouraged by  , a neighbor who had become a friend and adviser. The 29th Congressional District was a Republican stronghold, and though Mr. Vidal, running as Eugene Gore on a platform that included taxing the wealthy, lost, he received more votes in running for the seat than any Democrat in 50 years. And he never tired of pointing out he did better in the district than the Democratic presidential candidate that year,  . Mr. Vidal also returned to writing novels in the ’60s and published three books in fairly quick succession:   (1964), “Washington, D.C.” (1967) and   (1968). “Julian,” which some critics still consider Mr. Vidal’s best, was a painstakingly researched historical novel about the fourth-century Roman emperor who tried to convert Christians back to paganism. (Mr. Vidal himself never had much use for religion, Christianity especially, which he once called “intrinsically funny.”) “Washington, D.C.” was a political novel set in the 1940s. “Myra Breckinridge,” Mr. Vidal’s own favorite among his books, was a campy black comedy about a male homosexual who has sexual reassignment surgery. (A 1970 film version, with   and  , proved to be a disaster.) Perhaps without intending it, Mr. Vidal had set a pattern. In the years to come he found his greatest successes with historical novels, notably what became known as his American Chronicles: “Washington, D.C.,” “Burr” (1973), “1876” (1976),   (1984), “Empire” (1987),  (1990) and “The Golden Age” (2000). He turned out to have a gift for this kind of writing. These novels were learned and scrupulously based on fact, but also witty and contemporary-feeling, full of gossip and shrewd asides.   wrote that Mr. Vidal’s imagination of American politics “is so powerful as to compel awe.” Writing in The Times, Christopher Lehmann-Haupt said, “Mr. Vidal gives us an interpretation of our early history that says in effect that all the old verities were never much to begin with.” But Mr. Vidal also persisted in writing books like “Myron” (1974), a sequel to   and “Live From Golgotha: The Gospel According to Gore Vidal” (1992), which were clearly meant as provocations. “Live From Golgotha,” for example, rewrites the Gospels, with Saint   as a huckster and pederast and Jesus a buffoon. John Rechy said of it in The Los Angeles Times Book Review, “If God exists and Jesus is his son, then Gore Vidal is going to hell.” In the opinion of many critics, though, Mr. Vidal’s ultimate reputation is apt to rest less on his novels than on his essays, many of them written for The New York Review of Books. His collection “The Second American Revolution” won the National Book Critics Circle Award for criticism in 1982. About a later collection, “ : Essays 1952-1992,” R. W. B. Lewis wrote in The New York Times Book Review that Vidal the essayist was “so good that we cannot do without him,” adding, “He is a treasure of state.” Mr. Vidal’s essays were literary, resurrecting the works of forgotten writers like Dawn Powell and William Dean Howells, and also political, taking on issues like sexuality and cultural mores. The form suited him ideally: he could be learned, funny, stylish, show-offy and incisive all at once. Even Jason Epstein, Mr. Vidal’s longtime editor at  , once admitted that he preferred the essays to the novels, calling Mr. Vidal “an American version of Montaigne.” “I always thought about Gore that he was not really a novelist,” Mr. Epstein wrote, “that he had too much ego to be a writer of fiction because he couldn’t subordinate himself to other people the way you have to as a novelist.” Success did not mellow Mr. Vidal. In 1968, while covering the   on television, he called William F. Buckley a “crypto-Nazi.” Buckley responded by calling Mr. Vidal a “queer,” and the two were in court for years. In a 1971 essay he compared Norman Mailer to  , and a few months later Mailer head-butted him in the green room while the two were waiting to appear on the   show. They then took their quarrel on the air in a memorable exchange that ended with Mr. Cavett’s telling Mailer to take a piece of paper on the table in front of them and “fold it five ways and put it where the moon don’t shine.” In 1975 he sued Truman Capote for libel after Capote wrote that Mr. Vidal had been thrown out of the Kennedy White House. Mr. Vidal won a grudging apology. Some of his political positions were similarly quarrelsome and provocative. Mr. Vidal was an outspoken critic of  ’s treatment of the  , and once called  , the editor of Commentary, and his wife, the journalist Midge Decter, “Israeli fifth columnists.” In the 1990s he wrote sympathetically about  , who was executed for the   bombing. And after the Sept. 11 terrorist attacks, he wrote an essay for Vanity Fair arguing that America had brought the attacks upon itself by maintaining imperialist foreign policies. In another essay, for The Independent, he compared the attacks to the Japanese raid on Pearl Harbor, arguing that both Presidents Franklin D. Roosevelt and   knew of them in advance and exploited them to advance their agendas. As for literature, it was more or less over, he declared more than once, and he had reached a point where he no longer much cared. He became a sort of connoisseur of decline, in fact. America is “rotting away at a funereal pace,” he told The Times of London in 2009. “We’ll have a military dictatorship pretty soon, on the basis that nobody else can hold everything together.” In 2003 Mr. Vidal and his companion, Mr. Austen, who was ill, left their cliffside Italian villa La Rondinaia (the Swallow’s Nest) on the Gulf of Salerno and moved to the Hollywood Hills to be closer to Cedars-Sinai Medical Center. Mr. Austen died that year, and in “Point to Point Navigation,” his second volume of memoirs, Mr. Vidal recalled that Mr. Austen asked from his deathbed, “Didn’t it go by awfully fast?” “Of course it had,” Mr. Vidal wrote. “We had been too happy and the gods cannot bear the happiness of mortals.” Mr. Austen was buried in Washington in a plot Mr. Vidal had purchased in Rock Creek Cemetery. The gravestone was already inscribed with their names side by side. Besides his nephew, Burr Steers, Mr. Vidal’s survivors include his sister, Nina Gore Auchincloss Straight. After Mr. Austen’s death, Mr. Vidal lived alone in declining health himself. He was increasingly troubled by a   he suffered in the war, and used a wheelchair to get around. In November 2009 he made a rare public appearance to attend the   in New York, where he was given a lifetime achievement award. He had evidently not prepared any remarks, and instead delivered a meandering impromptu speech that was sometimes funny and sometimes a little hard to follow. At one point he even seemed to speak fondly of Buckley, his old nemesis. It sounded like a summing up. “Such fun, such fun,” he said.
MEXICO CITY — More than a half-century after  ’s elected president Jacobo Arbenz Guzman was overthrown in a coup planned by the   and forced into a wandering exile, President Alvaro Colom apologized on Thursday for what he called a “great crime.” In a muted ceremony at the National Palace in Guatemala City, Mr. Colom turned to Mr. Arbenz’s son Juan Jacobo and asked for forgiveness on behalf of the state. “That day changed Guatemala and we have not recuperated from it yet,” he said. “It was a crime to Guatemalan society and it was an act of aggression to a government starting its democratic spring.” The overthrow in 1954 of Mr. Arbenz, a former army colonel whose policies attempted to narrow the chasm betwen the country’s tiny elite and its impoverished peasants, squashed a 10-year effort to build a democratic state. Under a succession of military rulers who took power after the coup, Guatemala descended into three decades of a brutal civil war in which as many as 200,000 people died, many of them peasants killed by security forces. The Eisenhower Administration painted the coup as an uprising that rid the hemisphere of a Communist government backed by Moscow. But Mr. Arbenz’s real offense was to confiscate unused land owned by the United Fruit Company to redistribute under a land reform plan and to pay compensation for the vastly understated value the company had claimed for its tax payments. Mr. Arbenz “was not a dictator, he was was not a crypto-communist,” said Stephen Schlesinger, an adjunct fellow at the Century Foundation and co-author of “Bitter Fruit: The Story of the American Coup in Guatemala.” “He was simply trying to create a middle class in a country riven by extremes of wealth and poverty and racism,” Mr. Schlesinger said. Under Mr. Colom, Guatemala has taken steps to address its legacy of repression. Prosecutors have won long sentences for soldiers convicted of one of the civil war’s worst massacres, and police files have been opened for families to trace the last moments of relatives who disappeared during the conflict. The president’s apology was one of a number of steps that the government agreed to take to restore Mr. Arbenz’s name and his role in the nation’s history after five years of negotiations overseen by the Inter-American Commission on Human Rights in Washington. “It has taken a lot of courage for the government to do what it is doing,” Dr. Erick Arbenz, the former president’s grandson, said in an interview. Noting that young Guatemalans do not even know who his grandfather was, he said: “We want to become the missing link of this new generation.” The Arbenz family is seeking an apology from the United States for its role in the coup, he said. The government is also revising the school curriculum and has renamed a main highway and a museum wing after Mr. Arbenz. At Thursday’s ceremony, Ruth del Valle, the president of the presidential human rights commission, presented a copy of a memoir written by Mr. Arbenz’s widow, Maria Cristina Vilanova, to their son Juan Jacobo Arbenz Vilanova. The agreement with the family is “an example of how these processes — the search for justice and reparations for victims of the armed conflict or violations of human rights” are irreversible, Ms. Del Valle said in an interview.
This weekend is one for reflecting and looking ahead; for family, friends and football; for sleeping in and starting things off right; for bundling up and bingeing on good (or bad) TV. Whatever you’re doing, take a minute, or a bit more, and indulge in some great journalism. Happy New Year! The magazine embarks on its annual remembrance of some of the artists, innovators and thinkers  . The collection includes essays on Mary Tyler Moore, Chuck Berry, Dick Gregory and Sam Shepard (whose hat is pictured above).  Trump versus Hollywood. Echoes of the Confederacy. Taylor Swift and the alt-right. Here’s a not-so-nostalgic look back at  .   when the temperate weather, the food and the festive spirit attract travelers from near and far.  Most chefs work a lifetime for a Michelin star.  . Why? He can’t afford it. Neither can his declining old mining town.  The victims of sexual harassment who have recently come forward are far from alone: Nearly half of women say they have experienced some form of it at work at least once in their careers. But there has been little research about  . In a new survey, about a third of men said they had done something at work within the past year that would qualify as objectionable behavior or sexual harassment.  With hits for Drake, Rihanna and Maroon 5, an intensely private woman is the  .  Salesforce Tower, which at 1,070 feet is the tallest office building west of the Mississippi, will be inhabited in January,  .  Bombs made in Sardinia are being used in Yemen’s civil war by Saudi Arabia, some of them in attacks on civilians. Italy isn’t the only country arming Saudi Arabia, but   uncovered a massive increase in the export of these bombs in 2017.  He is the beating heart of British basketball, and his journey has taken him from the Bronx to Buckingham Palace.  . “In his mind, age doesn’t apply.”  Every new technology gets a game that helps bring it careening into the mainstream. Social networks had FarmVille. Mobile phones had Angry Birds. And, its investors hope,  . Blockchain technology like Bitcoin and Ethereum, ledgers for recording virtual currency transactions, is booming, and CryptoKitties is the first big blockchain game.  The Times reporter John Leland started following the lives of six New Yorkers over the age of 85, one of the fastest-growing age groups in America. He found that when the elders described their lives, they focused not on their declining abilities   and that they found rewarding. 
The Republican tax plan, which passed Congress Wednesday,  . The telecom giant   that it will pay a $1,000 bonus to more than 200,000 employees in the United States and would increase its capital expenditure budget for next year by $1 billion. (AT&T said last month   an additional $1 billion if the tax bill became law.) At a news conference Wednesday, President Trump cited AT&T’s move.  The company is locked in an antitrust battle with the Justice Department to complete its $85.4 billion acquisition of Time Warner. The department sued to block the deal and it is scheduled to go to trial March 19. The Justice Department has pushed for AT&T to divest either CNN’s parent company, Turner Broadcasting, or its valuable DirecTV service in return for approval. Those terms have raised the question of whether the department was making good on President Trump’s campaign threat to block the deal.  Last month Broadcom’s C.E.O. held a press conference with President Trump to announce   On the day of the announcement,  that it was done to ease approval of Broadcom’s $5.5 billion bid for Brocade, which had been delayed for a year. But the next day   that Broadcom was planning to make an unsolicited $103 billion bid for Qualcomm. Boeing   that it would invest $100 million in employee training and another $100 million in workplace infrastructure. It also said it would increase its corporate giving by $100 million. Comcast also  . The company said it would give $1,000 bonuses to more than 100,000 employees “based on the passage of tax reform and the FCC’s action on broadband.” Republicans are betting it will. Yet so far the tax bill has grown more unpopular as it has neared passage. A new Wall Street Journal/NBC poll  , up from 35 percent in October. A recent CNN poll showed that 55 percent of Americans oppose it. Here are some factors  to measure the policy’s success: : Any sign that the tax bill has worsened rather than eased inequity will hand Democrats a stick to thwack Republicans in 2018’s midterm elections. : The White House’s Council of Economic Advisers say a corporate tax rate of 20 percent – just below the 21 percent on which Congress settled – would result in an average annual income increase of at least $4,000 at the end of 10 years. A visible rise in wages would be a positive effect of the tax bill. Yet it’s also one of the most dubious projections since companies will be under pressure to share earnings gains with shareholders too. : Nonresidential business investment has improved after being sluggish or negative over the last two years. Spending on equipment went up by 10.4 percent in the third quarter, the fastest pace in three years. But the type of investment is important. An increase will really only matter if it helps boost sluggish productivity. : Mr. Trump predicted tax cuts would turbocharge the economy to a 6 percent growth rate, compared to the 3.3 percent annualized expansion in the third quarter. The nonpartisan congressional Joint Committee on Taxation estimated an earlier Senate tax plan would add 0.8 percent to GDP over a decade. Mr. Trump’s estimate is unrealistic but a modest lift is expected. Still, the tax plan won’t pay for itself, as the White House contends, and may add $1.5 trillion to the deficit over 10 years. That trade-off may be this tax bill’s biggest legacy. Here’s a cheat sheet for   by the European Court of Justice: • In being classified as a transport service instead of an online platform, Uber must comply with local rules that govern taxis. • It doesn’t block Uber from operating in any countries where the company currently operates. • But it doesn’t let Uber move forward with any so-called peer-to-peer services in which anyone with a driver’s license and a car can use its app to pick up customers. More from  : From  : No. But here’s what a representative for the company said: • Denmark • Latvia • Hungary • Slovenia • Bulgaria •   Unclear whether Uber’s $68.5 billion valuation would fall. A group led by SoftBank is already   from existing investors at $48 billion. •   Unclear. •   (Unclear, though opponents will surely seize upon the ruling to fight against such nonstandard work arrangements.)  Robert Cyran of Breakingviews wrote yesterday, “Europe will be   in 2018.” The  , the former head of online travel site Orbitz, as its first chief operating officer. When Dara Khosrowshahi took the helm of Uber in September, the former Expedia chief said he was leaning against hiring a C.O.O.,  Mr. Harford is the second big hire of Mr. Khosrowshahi, who is putting his stamp on the company. In October, he appointed Tony West as chief legal officer. Mr. West had been general counsel at PepsiCo. Uber still needs to name a chief financial officer. Mr. Harford is someone that Mr. Khosrowshahi is familiar with, having worked and competed with him over the past decade-plus. • Mr. Harford was an executive at Expedia when Mr. Khosrowshahi became C.E.O. of the company in 2005. • The pair then competed when Mr. Harford was named C.E.O. at Orbitz, one of Expedia’s main rivals, in 2009. • In 2015, Mr. Harford sold Orbitz to Expedia for $1.6 billion. • Mr. Harford has been an adviser at Uber since October. Bill Gurley, a former   and an investor at the Silicon Valley venture capital firm Benchmark, praised the move. Here’s what Alan Graf, FedEx’s chief financial officer, said on  : His comments break somewhat from the narrative that has developed around the Republican tax overhaul. Proponents of the bill argue that cutting the corporate tax rate to 21 percent from 35 percent will lead corporate America to invest more in their businesses and hire more workers. Critics counter that companies will spend their cash windfall on share buybacks and dividends, not on growing their businesses. The latter argument gained more traction last month at The Wall Street Journal’s C.E.O. conference. During a discussion with Gary Cohn, President Trump’s chief economic adviser, a moderator asked the chief executives in attendance whether they planned to increase their capital expenditures if the G.O.P. plan was enacted.  “Why aren’t the other hands up?” Mr. Cohn asked. Shares of the online retailer are down 12 percent premarket after the company’s first earnings as a public company fell short of Wall Street’s hopes. Stitch Fix reported earnings of  , or  , on revenue of $295.6 million, using generally accepted accounting principles. Analysts had expected the company to report earnings of 3 cents a share on revenue of $295 million. But it was the decline in Stitch Fix’s margins that concerned investors. From  : Stitch Fix’s stock had gained 65 percent since its initial public offering last month. Stitch Fix priced its initial public offering at $15 a share, valuing the company at about $1.5 billion. When Max Cherney of MarketWatch asked Stitch Fix for an adjusted earnings-per-share figure, a company representative told him to “ .” He did, and the simplest answer is 13 cents a share. With   the reconciled tax legislation, and the House set to pass the proposal again — because of a technical issue — the $1.5 billion overhaul of the country’s tax code is set to reach President Trump’s desk within days. (  of Republicans’ legislative efforts.) Here’s what Hank Paulson, the former Treasury secretary, emailed us about the bill’s passing: Mr. Trump   to boast about getting the tax bill through Congress and predict an economic boom in the wake of its passage.  Republicans say they are looking as soon as next year to   like Medicare, Medicaid and Social Security with the aim of limiting spending. And Democrats plan to make the bill a central plank of their 2018 election platform, citing its unpopularity with voters. • House Speaker Paul Ryan writes in a WSJ op-ed, “This is about helping a middle class that has been squeezed by a tax code that is expensive, complicated and skewed toward special interests.” ( ) • Private equity firms will take some hits under the tax bill, but overall support the legislation. ( ) • Senator Bob Corker, Republican of Tennessee, probably didn’t ask for a provision in the tax bill that would benefit him financially — but he still voted against his principles, David Leonhardt writes. ( ) • The tax break for graduate students’ tuition fee waivers may have been preserved, but Republicans are still likely to take aim at other higher education subsidies. ( ) • Have questions about the tax bill? Our NYT colleagues Ron Lieber and Patricia Cohen will try to answer them. ( ) • Democrats won’t push for a vote this week on legislation to protect the young immigrants known as Dreamers, amid signs that the party doesn’t have enough votes to force the issue. But a compromise appears to be in the offing. ( ,  ) • A bipartisan group of senators on the Senate Banking Committee rejected the White House’s nomination of Scott Garrett, a former New Jersey congressman, to lead the Export-Import Bank. ( ) • As more states run out of federal funding for the Children’s Health Insurance Program, parents are begging lawmakers to take action before their sons and daughters lose coverage. ( ) • The White House defended its judicial nomination process after three of its nominees withdrew their candidacies amid criticism. ( ) • It isn’t just the employees of famous men: Women on the factory floor of two Ford plants in Chicago say they have suffered harassment and groping for decades. ( ) • The “Today” show has consistently beaten its rival, “Good Morning America,” in viewer ratings since Matt Lauer was fired. ( ) • The House of Representatives paid $115,000 in taxpayer money to secretly settle three sexual harassment claims against lawmakers between 2008 and 2012. But the congressional Office of Compliance rejected a request by Senator Tim Kaine, Democrat of Virginia, to publish information about sexual harassment claims made against senators. ( ,  ) • As awareness of sexual misconduct in the workplace is growing, the dearth of women in leadership positions — just 23 percent of C-suite positions at the top 1,000 American companies are held by female executives — is becoming more glaring. ( ) Within the past day alone, the digital currency has plummeted from $18,385 to $16,626. It’s a timely reminder that when one chooses to jump in on an investing trend/fad, nerves of steel are required. But believers in Bitcoin think that the currency will bounce back. From Jeremy Herron, Randall Jensen and Eric Lam  : The WSJ says that the mini-crash   by Coinbase beginning trading the alternative digital currency Bitcoin Cash. The Winklevoss twins are largely known to the public — thanks to “The Social Network” — as haughty, naïve aristocrats given their comeuppance by Mark Zuckerberg. But in real life, their early bet on Bitcoin appears to have paid off handsomely, with their holdings worth about $1.3 billion as of yesterday. More from Nathaniel Popper of  : A former fruit juice company briefly saw its stock price   yesterday when it changed its name from “SkyPeople Fruit Juice” to “Future FinTech” — despite its business having nothing to do with Bitcoin. HNA’s efforts to cut its enormous debt load has led to some unintended — and probably unwelcome — consequences. Namely, that one of its portfolio companies now counts a major activist investor among its shareholders. How Elliott gained its stake in the duty-free retailer Dufry is pretty complicated, as Robert Smith of the FT  : Since HNA has taken out equity collars for other portfolio companies like Deutsche Bank, have activists jumped into those other holdings as well?  The Mexican billionaire Carlos Slim Helú is   more than half of his 17 percent stake in The New York Times Company to other investors, including hedge funds, Bloomberg reported. Britain will remain   during its transition period, which will end on Dec. 31, 2020, said Michel Barnier, the chief negotiator for the E.U. The transition is intended to give businesses time to adapt to the departure from the bloc. And investment banks in Britain would have to   on issues like bonus caps after Britain leaves the union, even as the European Commission insists that financial services will not be included in a Brexit trade deal. “It’s almost like this sick perversion I have, catching thieves.” • “It’s becoming less and less sexy to be going to the United States.” The Canadian tech industry is aggressively courting foreign companies, with the help of immigration policies. ( ) • Elon Musk sent his telephone number to 16.7 million Twitter followers instead of to John Carmack, the chief technology officer at Oculus. Cue speculation that Mr. Musk is trying to recruit Mr. Carmack. ( ) • Definers Public Affairs has pulled out of a federal contract to provide media-monitoring services to the Environmental Protection Agency after it was disclosed that a lawyer on its staff had been investigating E.P.A. employees critical of the Trump administration. ( ) • In Mr. Trump’s national security plan, intellectual property is king and deals will get a closer look. ( ) •Stitch Fix’s stock price plunged in aftermarket trading after the company reported earnings that were in line with expectations but which included a surge in ad spending. ( ) • Many Kushner buildings are mostly owned by others: The company owns less than 20 percent of half the buildings in which it has a state in New York City. ( ) • An analyst at Nomura Instinet issued a rare downgrade of Apple’s stock, arguing that any surge in user growth is already baked into the share price — and, implicitly, betting that the iPhone maker won’t reach a $1 trillion market capitalization. ( ) • Journalists at Rolling Stone are “cautiously optimistic” about the prospect of being owned by Penske Media Corporation, according to Joe Pompeo. ( ) • Glencore and a group led by Apollo Global Management have been shortlisted to bid on the sale of Rio Tinto’s remaining coal mines, which could fetch more than $1.5 billion, according to people familiar with the matter. ( ) • Michigan offered to let Amazon operate in Detroit with extensive tax breaks for three decades, among other incentives, while promising to create a $120 million program to meet the needs of its work force, according to documents laying out a bid for Amazon’s second headquarters. ( )
SAN FRANCISCO — In 2011, Brett King was promoting his book, “Breaking Banks,” and creating a start-up that he hoped would do to the banks what Amazon did to the retail industry and Facebook did to media. “We had grand ideas of being the Facebook of banking, and being a new form of bank account,” Mr. King said recently. Six years later, his company, Moven, has opened only 60,000 of those new bank accounts. Mr. King has now transitioned to selling his software to the banks he once scorned, who use it as a component of their mobile apps. “We realized that if you want millions of users as a bank, it is a very different proposition than building a social media network,” he said. Silicon Valley has upended a growing number of industries, and it had seemed not too long ago that Wall Street would soon be next. A flurry of financial start-ups rose quickly and grabbed billions of dollars in investments. Mr. King is just one of the many technology entrepreneurs who have since recently run into the enormous moats that surround and protect the existing financial industry. The venture capitalists who have invested billions of dollars in this wave of new financial technology — think Venmo and Bitcoin — have been left waiting for a breakout star that actually looks like a threat to even a part of the big banks’ business. “A lot of people set out saying, ‘We are going to displace the banks,’” said Sheel Mohnot, a venture capitalist at 500 Startups who focuses on financial technology. “We realized along the way that you really have no choice but to work with the banks.” And the difficulty of denting the influence and power of the big banks is only likely to get harder under the Trump administration. President Trump has said he wants to encourage innovation and new business by cutting back on regulations of all sorts, including  . Yet it was the regulations passed after the financial crisis that forced the big banks to reduce their risks in many areas and provided an opening for start-ups like Moven, which were willing to take more risks. Mr. Trump’s plan to dismantle those post-crisis regulations is widely expected to give the big banks more free rein and close the window of opportunity for newcomers. “The degree to which banks have been caught under the yoke of regulatory obligations is very likely to lighten up under Trump,” said Arjan Schütte, the founder of the venture capital firm Core Innovation Capital, which focuses on financial technology. Mr. Schütte has been moving his firm’s investments away from bank disrupters and toward start-ups that are set up to partner with existing financial institutions. Even if there has not been a disruption of the big banks, basic financial services available to consumers are changing rapidly, nonetheless. Americans are now able to send each other money instantly from their phones, thanks to Venmo, and can get approved for a loan in minutes, also from their phone. The consulting firm McKinsey estimated in a report last month that digital disruption could put $90 billion, or 25 percent of bank profits, at risk over the next three years as services become more automated and more tellers are replaced by chatbots. Much of this change, however, is now expected to come from the banks themselves as they absorb new ideas from the technology world and shrink their own operations, without necessarily losing significant numbers of customers to start-ups. Venmo, for, instance, has captured the wallets of many young Americans, but the largest banks have all begun their own versions of the service and some of them say that they already process, as single banks, more instant personal payments than Venmo. The large banks are also teaming up to start a cross-industry mobile phone application, Zelle, that will take Venmo head-on in 2017. Venmo, which was acquired by PayPal, is still trying to find a way to make money from the business, which is currently offered primarily as a free service. Financial start-ups are not facing the same challenges everywhere in the world. In China, the technology company Ant Financial has grown to 450 million users since spinning off from the e-commerce giant Alibaba in 2014. Ant Financial now processes a majority of online payments in China. Ant Financial has used its position as an electronic, phone-based wallet to grab lots of other financial business from Chinese consumers, offering online loans, insurance and investment advice to its hundreds of millions of customers. China has four of the five most valuable financial technology start-ups in the world, according to CB Insights, with Ant Financial leading the way at $60 billion. And investments in financial technology rose 64 percent in China last year, while they were falling 29 percent in the United States, according to CB Insights. In Africa, the financial industry has been shaken up by the rise of new forms of mobile phone-based payment systems like M-Pesa, in Kenya, which was started by the local mobile phone operator rather than a bank, and has risen to become the dominant form of payment in the country. The obvious reason that financial start-ups have not achieved the same level of growth in the United States is that most Americans already have access to a relatively functional set of financial products, unlike in Africa and China. Some start-ups looked at becoming banks, so they could offer deposit insurance — among other things — but they generally found that getting a bank charter required more time and money than is available to even the most successful start-ups. This left most start-ups reliant on banks to hold and move any money they collected from customers. “Operating in America, you needed to get a gatekeeper to approve your access to the networks,” said Josh Reich, who sold his banking start-up, Simple, to the Spanish banking giant BBVA. “If we wanted to touch their money, we needed to be part of the banking system.” Online lenders were particularly ambitious in trying to take on the banks from outside the system. Lending Club, which makes personal loans, and OnDeck, which focuses on small business loans, initially grew swiftly and went public, but both companies have run up against the limits of how fast a lending business can grow without being a bank. The online lenders have struggled with the high cost of acquiring new customers through marketing, which is not as necessary in other industries that have been disrupted by technology. At a more fundamental level, online lenders realized how hard it was to fund the new loans they wanted to give out without having access to cheap deposits, as the banks do. The shares of both Lending Club and OnDeck are now trading far below where they were on the day they went public. One notable success among the new lenders has been SoFi, or Social Finance, but even it has captured only about 250,000 customers, as compared to the 160 million users of Snapchat, the social network that was founded the same year. Start-ups focused on improving payments have had more success — the most valuable recent American technology start-up is Stripe, which helps new companies accept online payments. But Stripe and other payment start-ups like Square are all built on top of the existing credit card and banking infrastructure and have not posed any type of fundamental threat or challenge to the existing giants. “We are explicitly not a threat to the banks,” Tim Drinan, a spokesman for Stripe, said. “From our perspective the banks and card networks have built something pretty good and pretty hard to replicate.” Perhaps the most ambitious recent project aimed at upending the banks was Bitcoin, which promised a new way to hold and move money, totally outside the existing banking system. The virtual currency has not taken off as a way to hold and spend money on a day-to-day basis, as many of its enthusiasts had predicted. At the same time, in a pattern that has been repeated elsewhere in the financial industry, the big banks have been making big investments aimed at harnessing the technology underlying Bitcoin — known as the blockchain — for their own purposes. Tim Swanson, an early Bitcoin follower and analyst who now works with the blockchain consulting firm R3, said that Bitcoin wasn’t able to fulfill the marketing promises that were made for it back in 2012. “It may take some time, but if there is anyone that has the capital base and the developer base to see this through, it’s the banks for sure,” Mr. Swanson said.
Bitcoin action is now available without the Bitcoin. The Chicago Board Options Exchange started offering futures on the cryptocurrency late on Sunday. The new contracts open fresh avenues for trading, but for now they have little utility beyond speculation. The one-month future   from the open to $18,700 before trading below $18,000 Monday morning. With the price of Bitcoin rising two-thirds this month alone, that seems fairly sedate. Volume was roughly $50 million, Breakingviews calculates, less than 0.5 percent of actual Bitcoin trading in the previous 24 hours, according to Coinmarketcap.com. Futures have real-world value, allowing producers or consumers of a commodity to insure themselves against price movements, or helping investors to hedge their positions. In the Bitcoin world, there are so-called miners with investments in processing power and hefty costs like electricity who could use the contracts this way, but that’s about it. And with Bitcoin soaring more than 15-fold in 2017 to well over $16,000 early Monday, selling Bitcoin futures short is likely to be prohibitively expensive. Most market players will be cautious until the contracts settle down. There are, though, other reasons for concern. Bitcoin futures aren’t perfect proxies for the real thing, partly because they will be settled in dollars, not the cryptocurrency, which trades at different dollar prices in different places. Chicago Board Options Exchange settlements, for example, will be based on Bitcoin’s value on the Gemini Exchange, established by Cameron and Tyler Winklevoss of Facebook fame. CME Group’s Bitcoin futures, starting next weekend, will settle at a reference price drawn from multiple exchanges. One opportunity could be arbitrage, exploiting the pricing discrepancies. But it will take time for any patterns to emerge. Proponents reckon that the entry of two big, regulated United States exchanges bolsters the legitimacy of Bitcoin. It certainly broadens the universe of possible investors, and it invites the creation of new exchange-traded funds, which need a liquid benchmark to track. That would bring Bitcoin exposure to retail investors. Yet the Futures Industry Association, which represents clearinghouses and big banks, is apprehensive about the light regulatory scrutiny so far. And making the contracts cash-settled means the exchanges — and their customers — can now ride the Bitcoin bandwagon without touching the cryptocurrency at all.
• Twenty cities made it to the next round in Amazon’s search for its second headquarters. • Morgan Stanley  , while fixed-income trading revenue fell 46 percent. • What to think of Apple’s big cash repatriation. • How Goldman Sachs stumbled. In fact, 20 cities — out of 238 applicants — have made it into the next round to host Amazon’s second headquarters. From  : Detroit, which has become a poster child for reviving American industrial cities and which  More from  : •   — Washington, Montgomery County, Md. and Northern Virginia — are all part of the Washington DC corridor, where Jeff Bezos has been  . • The smallest city is Newark, N.J., whose   in 2016 was  . • This: • Also, this: As it   from foreign subsidiaries, Apple has become a triumphant example for Republicans of what the new tax law can do. : Perhaps more important than the one-time $38 billion that Apple will pay in tax is what said it would do with the rest of the money:  , among other initiatives. Tim Cook said in a statement: How much of an economic effect will this have? The company says more than $350 billion over the next five years, but how much of that goes beyond what it would have spent anyway is unclear. (For starters, its new campus   as Amazon’s planned HQ2.) • Verizon will save nearly $17 billion because of the new tax code’s effect on its deferred tax liabilities. ( ) • What corporate America says will come of the tax overhaul: more annual savings, bigger pension contributions and larger stock buybacks. ( ) Mick Mulvaney, the acting director of the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, is continuing his efforts to rein in the agency. His latest tactic: starve it of cash,  • The consumer bureau is funded directly by the Federal Reserve. Each quarter the watchdog requests money for its operations from the central bank. • On Wednesday, Mr. Mulvaney requested $0 for the current quarter. • Mr. Mulvaney said the bureau is sitting on a $177.1 million reserve fund. He plans to use that to cover the bureau’s projected quarterly expenses of $145 million. While the move is largely symbolic, it follows other recent moves by Mr. Mulvaney that spotlight the Trump administration’s desire to shift the consumer bureau’s trajectory. Ignore all the one-time charges related to the new tax law that banks announced this week, the industry, long-term, should be among the biggest winners. But how much of the windfall will end in the pockets of employees and customers? Since the tax overhaul became law last month, banks . Yet despite this largess, “the industry stands to retain more than 75 percents of the savings” from the tax law, according to S&P Global Market Intelligence. In fact, the total cost of the wage increases and bonuses “will amount to just 1.75 percent of the banking industry’s noninterest expenses in 2018.” Morgan Stanley  , including a one-time charge on $990 million related to the new tax law.  Morgan Stanley’s earnings per share excluding the tax charge. Wall Street expected the firm to report earnings of 77 cents a share.  The bank’s fourth-quarter revenue, up 5.3 percent from a year ago.  Morgan Stanley’s full-year revenue, up 10 percent from 2016. By comparison, the firm’s five rivals reported revenue rose 2 percent and 5 percent,  The firm’s revenue from fixed-income trading, down 45 percent from a year ago. It marked the first time in two years revenue in the division failed to reach $1 billion. Still, the decline was not as severe as Goldman’s. Morgan Stanley’s longtime rival reported a 50 percent drop in fixed-income trading revenue.  Morgan Stanley’s fourth-quarter equity trading revenue, off 2 percent from a year ago.  The bank’s fourth-quarter advisory revenue, down 6 percent “on lower levels of completed M&A activity.” Goldman reported 9 percent decline in advisory revenue. Shares of Morgan Stanley gained 1.5 percent in early trading and are up 29 percent over the past year. Yes, stock’s are down a bit Thursday, but that doesn’t obscure the fact that major equity indexes are off to their best start in years. Wednesday, shares of the Dow Jones industrial average closed above 26,000, the Standard & Poor’s 500 index finished above 2,800, and   its inflation-adjusted peak from the dot-com boom. Investors have piled into stocks to start 2018. It took the Dow industrials just eight trading sessions to go from 25,000 to 26,000, the fastest move between millennial markers on record. So far this month, the S. & P. 500 has risen about 4.8 percent this month. To put that into context, the last time the index climbed 5 percent in January was 2013 and the last 6 percent gain for the month was in 1997. In both years, equities went on the finish the year up more than 30 percent, according to Instinet’s Frank Cappelleri. So what could derail the stock market’s rally? A government shutdown? Escalating tensions with North Korea? Right now neither is weighing on stocks very much. In fact, MoneyBeat’s  that downward pressure, by one measure, is at its lowest level in 50 years. Most of its businesses did well in the fourth quarter. Then there was fixed-income trading. Though Goldman’s   was because of a $4.4 billion charge related to the new tax law, the big number was  . That was how much its so-called FICC (fixed-income, currency and commodities) trading revenue had fallen. Goldman’s FICC revenue for the quarter was $1 billion — the amount the division brought in   at its peak. • Lex suggests that Goldman now “wants to execute more perfunctory corporate transactions of a kind traditionally handled by Bank of America and its ilk.” ( ) • Aaron Back writes of a dip in Goldman’s share price, “Any near-term weakness could prove to be a buying opportunity.” ( ) You may already know Goldman’s co-president as a top-flight investment banker with a taste for fine food. (And almost definitely as DJ D-Sol.) But he’s also   by his former assistant, Nicolas De-Meyer, who was arrested this week. Worth noting: • Among the stolen wines were seven bottles of Domaine de la Romanée-Conti, a Burgundy known as “liquid velvet,” that had cost him $133,650. • Overall, the value of the stolen bottles was over $1.2 million. • The wine storage area in Mr. Solomon’s Manhattan home  .  House Republicans plan to   today or tomorrow to keep the government operating for a month. But it’s unclear whether Democrats would back it without a deal on immigration, or if House Republicans have the votes to  . Not very. Here’s Senator John Cornyn, Republican of Texas, quoted in the WSJ about the current state of affairs: John Kelly, the White House chief of staff, told Democratic lawmakers that some of Mr. Trump’s immigration policies — including the border wall —   according to the WaPo. Mr. Kelly also reiterated that the president supported permanent legal protection for the young immigrants known as Dreamers. • Steve Bannon will be interviewed by Robert Mueller’s investigators instead of testifying before a grand jury, according to an unidentified person, signaling that he’s cooperating. ( ) • A White House lawyer had asked Mr. Bannon to assert executive privilege before the House Intelligence Committee. Mr. Bannon slipped up. ( ,  ) • Two news stories this week offered more details about a purported relationship between Mr. Trump and a porn star professionally known as Stormy Daniels. ( ) The Dow Jones industrial average is on a sprint again, closing yesterday above 26,000 for the first time. Naturally,  . From Corrie Driebusch, Michael Wursthorn and Chris Dieterich of the WSJ: : This post on   by Jeffrey Towson, a professor at Peking University and a former employee of the prince’s Kingdom Holding, has started to circulate around the financial world. (A reminder: Mr. bin Talal has been caught up in Mohammed bin Salman’s anti-corruption purge.) Among Mr. Towson’s forecasts: • Mr. bin Talal would be prepared to stay imprisoned for a long time. • He would not sign any plea deal that implies serious wrongdoing, like corruption.  What will happen to Kingdom Holding, which owns stakes in Citigroup, Lyft and Twitter. • Mike Moritz of Sequoia Capital told Silicon Valley start-ups to be more like Chinese companies, where longer work hours and a disregard for physical fitness is the norm and where discussions about “life’s inequities” are seen as distractions. ( ) • Facebook said it would reopen and broaden an investigation into whether Russia sought to influence the 2016 Brexit vote. ( ) • Microsoft said that A.I. would require new laws and regulations. ( ) • Google has created an A.I. system for creating A.I. applications. ( ) • Apple should try to reduce customers’ iPhone addiction, Farhad Manjoo argues in his latest column. ( ) • See which pieces of art the WSJ’s portraits of Warren Buffett, Sheryl Sandberg and more look like, according to Google’s hit Arts & Culture smartphone app. (Pieter Anthony Wakkerdak’s “Portret van Kenau Simonsdochter Hasselaer” and BToy’s “LizTaylor,” for the record.) ( ) Earlier this week, the virtual currency dropped below $10,000. Now, it’s above $11,000.  in particular for newcomers who were late to the Bitcoin game. This is from a Reddit user who persuaded family members to buy cryptocurrency late last year:    the Nasdaq run of the dot-com boom and, potentially, Dutch tulip-mania, according to Bloomberg.  Ledger, a specialist in blockchain security technology,   in a fund-raising round led by Draper Esprit. William Bain Jr., the management consulting mogul who helped turn Mitt Romney into a private equity power, died on Tuesday. He was 80. The native Tennessean went from Vanderbilt’s alumni office to Boston Consulting Group to founding  . Several years later, he capitalized on his firm’s relationships and expertise to found Bain Capital, where he installed Mr. Romney as C.E.O. Here’s  , via the Boston Globe:
AFTER all 7,000 pages of the Pentagon Papers were released last month, a parlor game was born: Find the 11 words that the government didn’t want you to read. Those 11 words, on a single page, were supposed to be redacted when the papers were made public in their entirety by the National Archives and Records Administration. But the National Declassification Center reversed that decision after the Lyndon B. Johnson presidential library discovered that the full page — with all 11 words — had been released in the early 1970s by the House Armed Services Committee. Any effort to reclassify the words now would only call more attention to them. That has not stopped policy wonks from trying to guess what they were. The answer may never be known, but John Prados, director of the Vietnam Project of the National Security Archive, a research institute at George Washington University, offered up (appropriately enough)   and zeroed in on two. One confirmed that the National Security Agency could monitor Soviet leaders’ encrypted telephone conversations — specifically, one in 1967 between top Soviet leaders about a Vietnam War peace feeler from the Johnson administration, conveyed by the British Prime Minister Harold Wilson. Dr. Prados suggested that the following 11 italicized words may have been the sensitive ones: “At   and said [there was] a great possibility of achieving this aim.” But he was inclined to rule out those words as the redacted ones. One reason: the columnist Jack Anderson had written in 1971 about the security agency’s intercepts. So Dr. Prados focused on a remaining possibility: instructions for an electronic monitoring mission in the Gulf of Tonkin in February 1965. The instructions mentioned an operation (translation: a secret secure-line radio Teletype that automatically encoded sensitive messages). Although the agency declassified documents in 2008 that identified the equipment, this is the most likely redaction, Dr. Prados said, because the agency tends to protect secrets reflexively, whether or not they were already released. Leslie H. Gelb, who directed the government task force that wrote the Pentagon Papers and is now president emeritus of the Council on Foreign Relations, concurs that the radio teletype is the most likely. “I didn’t even remember that was there,” Mr. Gelb said. “If I had focused on it, I wouldn’t have put it in because I wouldn’t have wanted to reveal it.” In the end, Dr. Prados said, what is most revealing is the government’s enduring obsession with secrecy. “The most distressing aspect of the 11 words episode,” he said, “is that anyone at all felt a need to try and put toothpaste back into the tube after the passage of four decades’ time.”
Hi! This is Dan Bilefsky, giving Ian Austen a couple of weeks off from this newsletter as I go on my road trip aimed at rediscovering Quebec, my home province, after an absence of 28 years. I embarked on my journey earlier in the week — accompanied by Leonard Cohen and other Québécois singers on  , which I compiled from suggestions from you and other New York Times readers. My first stop was Montreal. Dozens of readers had urged me to meet Louise Penny, the best-selling detective novelist and an Anglophone who conjures up French-speaking Québécois characters. So I found myself last Monday having a lively coffee-fueled chat with Ms. Penny in the snow-covered town of Knowlton, in the Eastern Townships, a sleepy bucolic place that inspired the fictional Three Pines setting of her novels. In Three Pines, her avuncular Chief Inspector Armand Gamache of the Sûreté du Québec, the provincial police force, excavates the town’s dark secrets. After 13 books in her series, Ms. Penny noted wryly that Three Pines had struggled to “sustain the murder count.” Gamache, whom she confided was named after a local tailor, has become to Quebec what Hercule Poirot is to Belgium, and made Ms. Penny, a former journalist for the CBC, a literary star. She is also a rare breed in Quebec, a native English speaker who writes about French Canada in a province where neuroses about language run deep. “I am a Québécoise writer, and a Canadian writer, but I never wanted to be ghettoized,” she said. “I don’t want to be defined as a Canadian writer, but, rather, a writer who happens to be Canadian.” Ms. Penny’s novels were translated into 23 languages before they were finally translated into Quebec French in 2010, partly reflecting the cultural divide in the province. “My books are love letters to Quebec — the language of my characters is French and I wanted my characters to live in that language,” Ms. Penny, 59, said. “The translation meant so much to me because I wanted my friends and neighbors to be able to read them.” The books have sold well with both English- and French-speaking Quebecers. And legions of Ms. Penny’s fans take a 2.5-hour tour in Quebec City, based on her popular novel “Bury Your Dead,” where they can walk in the footsteps of Gamache as he investigates the murder of an amateur archaeologist at Ms. Penny and I also chatted about Quebec’s culture wars, which she experienced while living in Quebec City during the 1995 referendum on the province’s independence. She pointed out that Quebec had an English minority surrounded by a French majority, who were themselves eclipsed by an English majority in the rest of the country. So in Quebec, she noted, everyone defines themselves as “The Other,” creating a sense of alienation that both inspired and repelled. “As much as the English don’t know the French, the French don’t know the English,” she said. In multilingual Knowlton, however, she stressed that a love of country living and nature overcame any linguistic differences. Even when she was living in Quebec City, and her French was rudimentary, she said, she was “never made to feel like I didn’t belong,” even when she would accidentally order “flaming mice” in a restaurant. Ms. Penny, who oozes humor and easy conviviality, has overcome her fair share of adversity. She said she was on the brink of suicide in her late 30s, consumed with fear of failure and an alcohol problem. She had five years of writer’s block, and her first manuscript was rejected by at least 50 publishers. But with the encouragement of her husband, Michael Whitehead, a doctor who died in 2016, she refused to give up, eventually coming in second in a British writing contest. Gamache, she noted, came to her fully formed. Now she writes one book a year — all infused by her many years in Quebec. “I wanted to write books that I would read, that my 8year-old self would read,” she said. “I had to love them. I created a village where I would live, populated with characters I would befriend and a main character I would marry.” My meeting with Ms. Penny was a highlight of a two-day tour of Montreal, which began with a highly caloric   at Martin Picard’s storied Cabane à Sucre Au Pied de Cochon in Mirabel. I also  , the 91-year-old architect and philanthropist, and with  , the 27-year-old co-leader of a left-wing political party and a strong adherent of an independent Quebec. As I write this, I am in Maniwaki. Here, I met with  , an Indigenous chef, on the Indigenous reserve of Kitigan Zibi. Check out   with Ms. Nottaway and members of The New York Times Race/Related team. During my stay here, the latest trade squabble erupted between Canada and the United States when President Trump   that he had made up an assertion that the United States had a trade deficit with Canada during a meeting with Prime Minister Justin Trudeau. On the reserve, which has been buffeted by alcoholism and drug problems and the legacy of colonial rule, many residents said Mr. Trump’s latest declaration had little effect on them. But Shady Hafez, a youth worker whose mother is Algonquin and whose father is Syrian, said that America’s rightward shift under Mr. Trump had made Canadians feel smug about their liberalism, and that some believed that they had been given a license to support racism in Canada, while others thought that Mr. Trudeau now had an excuse to be complacent about minority rights. “Justin Trudeau looks and sounds amazing compared to what comes out of Trump’s mouth,” Mr. Hafez said. “But he is all talk. What matters is what happens on the ground.” My next stop: Hérouxville, which a decade ago become synonymous with a xenophobic impulse in contemporary Quebec. I want to see how and if attitudes have shifted. If you have any suggestions about whom to meet there or what to see or what to ask, please send them my way. Don’t forget that I’ll be writing a bonus edition of this newsletter on March 21. And please follow me on my journey on  ,   and  , as well as on The Times’s  . —Catherine Porter reports that Canada’s refugee resettlement system is being put to the test by   to welcome Yazidis, a particularly traumatized group. —Viola Desmond, whose act of protest against segregation and whose business success was not widely known until decades after her death, will become the first black person, and the  outside of the royal family, to be featured on a regular Canadian bank note. —As Eugenie Bouchard of Montreal struggles with her game on the tennis court, she’s also   like Nike and Colgate to promoting an e-book about cryptocurrency. —A group of doctors in Quebec are  and asking the province to use the money for nursing and other financially strapped services.
 hope to win the Indiana presidential primaries on Tuesday, all but cementing their nominations. Trade experts warn that  , like imposing heavy tariffs on China, could prompt retaliation and deepen U.S. economic troubles. _____ , giving her $30 million in hand and bringing her total in primary funds to $213.5 million, compared with $210 million for Bernie Sanders. She made in her campaign. Above, Mrs. Clinton with steelworkers in Kentucky. After Indiana,   on June 7. _____   . But many technical experts say he offered insufficient proof. “It would take the real Satoshi about five minutes to provide conclusive proof to the entire Bitcoin community, if the real Satoshi wanted to do that,” one said. The price of Bitcoin fell about $10, to just over $445. _____  Do not cut it close for your next flight. A loss of screeners to budget cuts, new procedures and more passengers are creating   — even before the peak travel season. “This is going to be a rough summer,” an official with the Transportation Security Administration said. _____  The Oscars of the East Coast. An A.T.M. for the Met. Whatever you call it, the Metropolitan Museum of Art hosted its annual Costume Institute gala under the eye of Anna Wintour. Tickets this year were  , and Ms. Wintour has final say over every invitation and attendee. Here are  . _____ , affecting almost 46,000 children. The cash-starved school district said that if the state did not kick in more money, summer school would be canceled and teachers would not be paid for July and August. _____  against abortion providers have pushed some to try to keep their work quiet. But one gynecologist accuses her hospital in Washington, D.C., of going too far.   saying the institution had violated the law and personal rights by forbidding her to speak publicly about abortion _____  of broadcast and cable channels, probably for about $40 a month, according to insiders. The service would cater to the individualized expectations of younger viewers, while allowing advertisers to target particular audiences. , recovering from some of last week’s steep declines. Battered technology stocks like Amazon and Microsoft posted gains, but Apple remained down. _____ . Researchers tracked competitors as they regained most or all of the weight they lost, and discovered how hard the body fights to undo weight loss. Two key factors: slowed metabolic rates, and hormonal changes that create incessant hunger. “It is frightening and amazing,” an obesity expert said. _____  to bring  . “The cessation of hostilities has been put to the test, and it has frayed in certain areas, and it has fallen completely in a few areas,” Secretary of State John Kerry said in Geneva. _____  offer  . Netflix has Hitchcock’s “To Catch a Thief,” with Cary Grant and Grace Kelly. HBO is showing the classic “Grapes of Wrath.” And of course there’s the season finale of “The Good Wife,” on Sunday, 9 p.m. Eastern on CBS. _____ Cubans celebrated the arrival of the Carnival line’s Adonia,  hip  in nearly 40 years. “This is history,” one said. _____
Elisabeth Moss is a vessel for cultural misogyny. Her TV characters have been harassed, sexually assaulted, threatened, degraded, lied to and betrayed. How much sexist abuse can befall one person? Oh, plenty. Between “Mad Men,” in which she played the ambitious but put-upon Peggy Olsen; “Top of the Lake,” in which she plays sex-crimes detective Robin Griffin; and “The Handmaid’s Tale,” in which she plays the enslaved Offred, one can watch Ms. Moss survive sexist torture in stories set in the past, the present and the crypto future. She has plenty more to endure in “Top of the Lake: China Girl,” which premieres Sunday on SundanceTV. In the first season — like this one, it was written and created in part by the filmmaker Jane Campion — Robin ventured to New Zealand to investigate the rape of a 12-year-old girl. That season’s woozy, misty atmosphere, fascinating landscape and poetic lens set it apart from other crime shows. It was still grisly, but it was beautiful, too; steady and special. “China Girl” is a more hollow simulation of that style, a re-enactment of mood without the potency of an actual mood. The rural mystique and literary flare of Season 1 are replaced with urban brutality and sad nonsense. Robin is back in Sydney, investigating the murder of a sex worker whose body is found in a suitcase that washes up on Bondi Beach. As in Season 1, the victim (“Cinnamon,” who is Thai, not Chinese) is barely in the story. The central investigation of the show isn’t into her murder, it’s into Robin’s psyche. But there’s less there than the show seems to realize, and the overreliance on coincidence makes everything feel like a contrivance, not a development. The just-soedness of the plot is too glaring to ignore, even as memorable images, such as a wedding dress on a funeral pyre, leave a strong impression. Robin’s interest in solving sex crimes stems in part from being gang raped as a teenager. That assault resulted in a pregnancy, and Robin put the child up for adoption. In “China Girl,” that daughter — Mary (Alice Englert), now 17 — and Robin are finally in touch, and the two tentatively circle each other. Mary’s teenage-rebellion-phase bad boyfriend is a 45-year-old faux intellectual who has some kind of vague lounge-lecturer role at the very brothel where Cinnamon worked, a connection that’s distractingly ridiculous. Fertility, gestation and the tense, primal maternal bond drive much of the series. We see Robin grapple with whether she considers herself a mother, and Mary’s adoptive mother, Julia (Nicole Kidman, ferocious), bristles at Robin’s entry into their lives. (There’s the added layer that Ms. Englert is Ms. Campion’s daughter.) The detectives eventually uncover an illegal gestational surrogacy ring and meet the desperate women on both sides of the transaction: those driven to apparent insanity by their inability to get pregnant, and the exploited women forced to gestate other people’s children. Too bad none of the characters have read “The Handmaid’s Tale.” Too bad none of them have read any kind of instructional guide to how to be a police officer, a good listener, or an active participant in the world. Sure, there’s a lot about mothering, but the actual beating heart of the series is blank acquiescence to confounding or inappropriate circumstances. Some moments are hypnotic in Ms. Campion’s signature soiled-fairy-tale style — a tendril of Cinnamon’s hair floating out of the underwater suitcase, or a stark swimming hole seen from above — and certain lines elegantly, if brutally, capture modern despair itself. In arguing over how to open an automatic trash can, Mary screams at Julia, “It’s touch-sensitive!” Ah, perhaps it is we who are touch-sensitive. If only “China Girl” had a firmer idea of exactly where its sensitivities lie.
ATLANTA — The City of Atlanta’s 8,000 employees got the word on Tuesday that they had been waiting for: It was O.K. to turn their computers on. But as the city government’s desktops, hard drives and printers flickered back to life for the first time in five days, residents still could not pay their traffic tickets or water bills online, or report potholes or graffiti on a city website. Travelers at the world’s busiest airport still could not use the free Wi-Fi. Atlanta’s municipal government has been brought to its knees since Thursday morning by a ransomware attack — one of the most sustained and consequential cyberattacks ever mounted against a major American city. The digital extortion aimed at Atlanta, which security experts have linked to a shadowy hacking crew known for its careful selection of targets, laid bare once again the vulnerabilities of governments as they rely on computer networks for day-to-day operations. In a  , malicious software cripples a victim’s computer or network and blocks access to important data until a ransom is paid to unlock it. “We are dealing with a hostage situation,” Mayor Keisha Lance Bottoms said this week. The assault on Atlanta, the core of a metropolitan area of about six million people, represented a serious escalation from other recent cyberattacks on American cities, like one last year in Dallas where hackers gained the ability to   in the middle of the night. Part of what makes the attack on Atlanta so pernicious are the criminals behind it: A group that locks up its victims’ files with encryption, temporarily changes their file names to “I’m sorry” and gives the victims a week to pay up before the files are made permanently inaccessible. Threat researchers at Dell SecureWorks, the Atlanta-based security firm helping the city respond to the ransomware attack, identified the assailants as the SamSam hacking crew, one of the more prevalent and meticulous of the dozens of active ransomware attack groups. The SamSam group is known for choosing targets that are the most likely to accede to its high ransom demands — typically the Bitcoin equivalent of about $50,000 — and for finding and locking up the victims’ most valuable data. In Atlanta, where officials said the ransom demand amounted to about $51,000, the group left parts of the city’s network tied in knots. Some major systems were not affected, including those for 911 calls and control of wastewater treatment. But other arms of city government have been scrambled for days. The Atlanta Municipal Court has been unable to validate warrants. Police officers have been writing reports by hand. The city has stopped taking employment applications. Atlanta officials have disclosed few details about the episode or how it happened. They have urged vigilance and tried to reassure employees and residents that their personal information was not believed to have been compromised. Dell SecureWorks and Cisco Security, which are still working to restore the city’s systems, declined to comment on the attacks, citing client confidentiality. Ms. Bottoms, the mayor, has not said whether the city would pay the ransom. The SamSam group has been one of the more successful ransomware rings, experts said. It is believed to have extorted more than $1 million from some 30 target organizations in 2018 alone. It is not ideal to pay up, but in most cases, SamSam’s victims have said that they can more easily afford the $50,000 or so in ransom than the time and cost of restoring their locked data and compromised systems. In the past year, the group has taken to attacking hospitals, police departments and universities — targets with money but without the luxury of going off-line for days or weeks for restoration work. Investigators are not certain who the SamSam hackers are. Judging from the poor English in the group’s ransom notes, security researchers believe they are probably not native English speakers. But they cannot say for sure whether SamSam is a single group of cybercriminals or a loose hacking collective. Ransomware emerged in Eastern Europe in 2009, when cybercriminals started using malicious code to lock up unsuspecting users’ machines and then demanding 100 euros or similar sums to unlock them again. Over the past decade, dozens of online cybercriminal outfits — and even some nation states, including North Korea and Russia — have taken up similar tactics on a larger scale, inflicting digital paralysis on victims and demanding increasing amounts of money. Cybersecurity experts   that criminals made more than $1 billion from ransomware in 2016, according to the F.B.I. Then, last May, came the  : North Korean hackers went after tens of thousands of victims in more than 70 countries around the world, forcing Britain’s public health system to reject patients, paralyzing computers at Russia’s Interior Ministry, at FedEx in the United States, and at shipping lines and telecommunications companies across Europe. A month later, Russian state hackers deployed similar ransomware to   on the eve of the country’s independence day. That attack shut down automated teller machines in Kiev, froze government agencies and even forced workers at the Chernobyl nuclear power plant to monitor radiation levels manually. Collateral damage from that attack affected computers at Maersk, the Danish shipping conglomerate; at Merck, the American-based pharmaceutical giant; and even at businesses in Russia. Attempted ransomware attacks against local governments in the United States have become unnervingly common. A 2016   of chief information officers for jurisdictions across the country found that obtaining ransom was the most common purpose of cyberattacks on a city or county government, accounting for nearly one-third of all attacks. The survey, conducted by the International City/County Management Association and the University of Maryland, Baltimore County, also found that about one-quarter of local governments reported that they were experiencing attacks of one kind or another, successful or not, at least as often as once an hour. Yet less than half of the local governments surveyed said they had developed a formal cybersecurity policy, and only 34 percent said they had a written strategy to recover from breaches. Experts said government officials needed to be more aggressive about preventive measures, like training employees to spot and sidestep “phishing” attempts meant to trick them into opening the digital door for ransomware. “It’s going to be even more important that local governments look for the no-cost/low-cost, but start considering cybersecurity on the same level as public safety,” said David Jordan, the chief information security officer for Arlington County, Va. “A smart local government will have fire, police and cybersecurity at the same level.” Ms. Bottoms, who took office as mayor of Atlanta in January, acknowledged that shoring up the city’s digital defenses had not been a high priority before, but that now “it certainly has gone to the front of the line.” “As elected officials, it’s often quite easy for us to focus on the things that people see, because at the end of the day, our residents are our customers,” Ms. Bottoms said. “But we have to really make sure that we continue to focus on the things that people can’t see, and digital infrastructure is very important.” During the ransomware attack, local leaders have sometimes been able to do little but chuckle at a predicament that was forcing the city to turn the clock back decades. Asked on Monday how long the city might be able to get by doing its business strictly with ink and paper, Ms. Bottoms replied: “It was a sustainable model until we got computer systems. It worked for many years. And for some of our younger employees, it will be a nice exercise in good penmanship.” Security researchers trying to combat ransomware have noticed a pattern in SamSam’s attacks this year: Some of the biggest have occurred around the 20th of the month. Allan Liska, a senior intelligence analyst at Recorded Future who has been tracking the group, said in an interview that he believed that SamSam gains access to its victims’ systems and then waits for weeks before encrypting the victims’ data. That delay, Mr. Liska said, makes it harder for responders to figure out how the group was able to break in — and easier for SamSam’s hackers to strike twice. The Colorado Department of Transportation was able to restore its systems on its own after a SamSam attack, without paying SamSam a dime. But a week later, the hackers struck the department again, with new, more potent ransomware. “They are constantly learning from their mistakes, modifying their code and then launching the next round of attacks,” Mr. Liska said.
A Yiddish play with the title “Toyt fun a Salesman” opened at the Parkway Theater in Brooklyn early in 1951. As most of the audience recognized from the name alone, the show was a translation of  ’s drama “Death of a Salesman.” It seemed a mere footnote to the premiere production, which had completed its triumphal run on Broadway several months earlier, having won the Pulitzer Prize. Even so, a theater critic in Commentary magazine, George Ross,   of the Brooklyn version, “What one feels most strikingly is that this Yiddish play is really the original, and the Broadway production was merely Arthur Miller’s translation into English.” History, it must be said, has not exactly ratified Mr. Ross’s judgment. In an enduring way, however, he framed a penetrating question about Miller’s masterpiece, which has echoed from the 1949 debut to the celebrated revival now on Broadway. Is Willy Loman Jewish? Did Miller create him devoid of ethnic or religious markings to better serve as an American Everyman broken on the wheel of capitalism? Or did he subtly intend for part of Willy’s tragedy to be his estrangement from the Jewish and Judaic heritage that might have provided some ballast as his working life, and with it his very identity, falls to ruin? These are the sort of questions that defy provable answers. Miller himself changed his view of Willy over the decades, evolving from a fierce defense of his indeterminate identity to a perception of him as an untethered Jew. Literary critics, especially Jewish ones, have long argued the point among themselves. Leslie Fiedler dismissed Willy as the “crypto-Jewish” product of Miller’s “pseudo-universalizing,” while Julius Novick maintained that the Loman family’s “separation from the roots ... is what makes them so vulnerable to the false values that undo them.” Miller grew up in a thoroughly Jewish milieu, recalling in his autobiography, “Timebends,” how he sat on his great-grandfather’s lap in synagogue and later had a bar mitzvah ceremony. His adult belief system, though, took the form of left-wing politics, and critiques of capitalism and the McCarthy era’s Red Scare ultimately informed many of his finest plays — “All My Sons,” “A View From the Bridge,” “The Crucible.” “Salesman” had indisputably Jewish origins. Miller based Willy Loman on his uncle Manny Newman, a salesman brought low by the Depression. He tried out earlier versions of the character in stories he wrote in his teens and 20s about salesmen with apparently Jewish surnames — Schoenzeit and Schleifer. So the intriguing question remains why Willy, as finally written, offers so little evidence of heritage. Miller, in a 1969 interview, insisted that the character’s “religious or cultural background ... seems to me irrelevant.” The contemporary playwright Tony Kushner, who is editing Miller’s collected plays for the Library of America, suggested that for Jewish writers in the mid-20th century, “there wasn’t a sense of shame about being Jewish, but of reaching for something universal, and there was some sense that the immigrant experience and the ethnic specificity would limit it.” Miller did write overtly Jewish characters, starting in his 1945 novel about anti-Semitism, “Focus,” and continuing through two plays about the Holocaust, “Incident at Vichy” (1964) and “Broken Glass” (1994). So the decision to leave Willy’s identity indistinct represented a thought-through choice, not a chronic ambivalence about Jewish content. Mr. Novick, for his part, called “Salesman” the sequel to “Fiddler on the Roof” — the tragic culmination of the immigrant’s American dream. Harold Bloom, a scholar of both biblical and modern literature, posited that the play’s heartbreaking, embittered reunion of Willy and his alienated son Biff is an inversion of the Bible’s reuniting of Jacob and Joseph, which he called “the paradigm of Jewish family love.” The playwright David Mamet, himself the grandson of a traveling salesman, said that the play’s tension “between hope, confusion, aspiration and circumstance” was itself “the voice of the second-generation American-Jewish writers.” Some critics have singled out Linda Loman’s famous speech about Willy — “Attention, attention must finally be paid to such a person” — as having a distinctively Yiddish cadence. Over time, Miller came around to acknowledging some Jewish specificity to the Lomans. In   published for the play’s 50th anniversary, in 1999, he described them as “Jews light-years away from religion or a community that might have fostered Jewish identity.” Thus sundered, they are left “on the sidewalk side of the glass looking in at the clean well-lighted place.” In the very absence of their Jewish identity, one might say, is its very presence. The current production — widely lauded and nominated for seven   — has been most notable for its fidelity to Miller’s original intent. It uses the set design and musical score from the original production, and it indelibly portrays Willy’s drift between present and past, between reality and memory and fantasy. Miller’s original title for the play, after all, was “The Inside of His Head.” The producer Scott Rudin was interested enough, though, in the matter of the Loman family’s roots to assemble a research folder of critical and biographical essays grappling with the Jew-Everyman debate. “It’s so much a play about someone who wants to belong to the largest thing he can belong to — a fantasy of America,” Mr. Rudin said in a recent interview. “And he’s become deracinated from his background in the process.” Mike Nichols, the director of the current revival, came to the United States as a Jewish refugee child from Nazi Germany. What he has seen in Willy is not the intensity of the immigrant generation of Jews, with its fervor for education, but the worship of materialism by the second generation, those disparaged in Yiddish as being “alrightniks.” “Willy has no forebears,” Mr. Nichols said in an interview this month. “He’s not from any country. He has no holidays of any religion. So you have to assume Miller’s making a point. We who are struggling to sell enough have to drop everything — religion, nationality, family. There is nothing except, as Willy puts it, being known and being well-liked.”
There has been much discussion about the potential of blockchain, the technology underlying virtual currencies like Bitcoin, to change the world. We have heard waves of inspired commentary on how the technology, with its ability to share information and record transactions, will be as revolutionary as the internet itself. At Accenture, we agree about these huge possibilities, but there is an elephant in the room that will need to be confronted. One of the accepted virtues of blockchain is that it creates a permanent, immutable ledger of transactions. For example, each of the roughly   Bitcoin transactions that have occurred since the cryptocurrency began in 2009 will stay on that ledger as long as Bitcoin exists. That permanence has been vital in building trust in the decentralized currencies, which are used by millions of people. But it could severely limit blockchain’s usefulness in other areas of financial services relied on by billions of people. By clashing with new privacy laws like the “right to be forgotten” and by making it nearly impossible to resolve human error and mischief efficiently, the blockchain’s immutability could end up being its own worst enemy. The financial services industry needs to face the question of how to balance the appeal of pristine accounting with the demands of the real world, where some things simply need to be struck from the records. This challenge is coming to light with new data privacy rules like the European Union’s general data protection regulation, which will add new consumer data privacy and ownership rights over the next two years. These rules will not just affect Europe; they will have a far-reaching impact on global companies, and not least on the back offices of major  . Entities anywhere in the world that handle personal data belonging to Europeans will be affected by such laws, and infractions could lead to fines of 4 percent of revenue. Little wonder that Accenture clients are asking how they will defend the “right to be forgotten” rules using blockchain technology that always remembers. Blockchain’s immutability could eventually run at odds with existing regulations, too. For example, the United States Fair Credit Reporting Act, the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act and the Securities and Exchange Commission’s Regulation S-P all require personal financial data to be easily redacted. For blockchain purists, simply questioning the immutable nature of the technology is a heresy to be resisted. Like the early internet pioneers who saw e-commerce as a crass concept that would spell the end of the web as a place for “cooperation and helpfulness,” many of today’s strongest blockchain advocates, though often highly inventive and visionary, tend to be more idealistic than pragmatic about blockchain’s evolution. (It’s worth noting that the internet, arguably the world’s primary social fabric, now also supports commerce between two billion people every day.) For example, a hacker exploited a programming error this spring in a self-executing blockchain “smart contract,” stealing more than $60 million of “ether” (another digital currency) from a start-up fund called the  . When lawyers argued that the hacker was entitled to the assets under the erroneous code, a surprising number of blockchain purists  . Even after the project’s leaders succeeded in winning a consensus of participants to bifurcate the code at a point before the transaction occurred, a large number of participants   to use the version of the chain where the theft occurred. One thing is clear: If the financial services industry is to embrace a new technology, it cannot be one in which mischief and mistakes are immutable and fraudsters can defend their actions on spurious ideological grounds. Even the smartest contracts can be susceptible to human error, and even the cleverest I.T. architectures will be hit by events that need to be undone. We need the means to solve this challenge, while maintaining blockchain’s vast strengths. At Accenture, we’re working with leading academics on a prototype that would enable blockchains to be amended or redacted where necessary — under responsible governance models potentially developed in cooperation with regulators. The venture capital community has invested more than $1.4 billion in blockchain applications over the last three years, according to the  . This year alone, banks and technology companies are expected to spend more than $1 billion out of their own pockets to develop the technology. But if blockchain is to move beyond cryptocurrency and lab experiments to real and profitable deployments, we need to challenge conventional orthodoxy and rethink the role of absolute immutability. Perhaps we will then soon be able to read more about blockchain’s achievements rather than its potential.
SAN FRANCISCO — A long-running civil war over the design of Bitcoin appears to be over for now, after one side in the fight acknowledged on Wednesday that it had not won sufficient support from other virtual currency backers. The camp that conceded had been hoping to double the number of transactions that could be run through the network that supports Bitcoin, in order to keep transactions cheap and fast. This expansion was vociferously opposed by many of the programmers working on the Bitcoin project, who worried that expanding the network quickly would make it easier for a company or government to exert influence over the decentralized system. The group pushing for expansion had planned to switch to a new version of the Bitcoin software next week, which would have created a split in the network and most likely wreaked havoc on the virtual currency. This planned split, though, was called off on Wednesday, after the companies proposing it failed to win significant support from the Bitcoin community. , the leaders of several of the largest Bitcoin companies said that “unfortunately, it is clear that we have not built sufficient consensus for a clean block size upgrade at this time.” The price of Bitcoin shot up immediately after the email went out, hitting a new high, above $7,800, before retreating. The price has been steadily climbing and is up nearly 1,000 percent over the last year. The rising price has attracted many new users, from places like Japan and South Korea and from big hedge funds, even as the authorities in places like China have cracked down on the currency. All of the new people seeking access to Bitcoin have run up against a limit on the number of transactions that can flow through the system every 10 minutes, which was put in place during Bitcoin’s early years. Because of the limit, the network can process only around five transactions a second. That has led to delays on the network and has pushed up the price of getting a Bitcoin transaction through. Companies that help process Bitcoin payments have been pushing to lift the limit on Bitcoin transactions for several years, arguing that it will be necessary if Bitcoin wants to compete with Visa or PayPal. The opposing camp has argued that quickly expanding the number of transactions flowing through the network would mean only large companies could track Bitcoin transactions, taking power away from individual users. The proponents of keeping the so-called blocks of Bitcoin transactions small said Bitcoin should be viewed more as digital gold: a secure place to keep money, even if it can’t be moved around as quickly and cheaply. Many of the programmers working on the basic Bitcoin software — the so-called core developers — said they would stop working on Bitcoin if the block size was increased. They also complained that the companies pushing through the block size increase were doing so without properly consulting the community. Leaders on both sides of the Bitcoin debate have complained about receiving death threats and hacking attacks, and some top developers have migrated toward other virtual currencies. In August, some of the most outspoken proponents of expanding Bitcoin created their own version, known as Bitcoin Cash, which can handle more transactions than traditional Bitcoin. The price of Bitcoin Cash has gone up since August, but it remains only a small fraction of the size of Bitcoin. On Wednesday, the companies that had been pushing for big blocks said they were calling off their plans in order to restore some measure of peace to the community. “Although we strongly believe in the need for a larger block size, there is something we believe is even more important: keeping the community together,” the email said. The announcement said that the companies still believed that an increase in the size of Bitcoin blocks would be necessary, but that they were willing to wait until the community agreed on a way to deal with the issue. The people opposed to quickly expanding the network say they still wanted to make it easier and cheaper to use Bitcoin. But they hope this will be made possible by new networks built on top of Bitcoin, keeping the Bitcoin network itself more secure and decentralized.

LONDON —  U.S. financial exchange operator CME is taking over London-based peer Nex in a deal that values the British company at 3.9 billion pounds ($5.4 billion). CME and Nex said in a statement Thursday that Nex shares will be paid 10 pounds each, a premium of about 49 percent to their closing price on March 15, when an offer was first made. Chicago-based CME says the deal will give it a greater presence in Europe and Asia. It expects savings of about $200 million by the end of 2021 by cutting costs. It is the biggest deal for the CME since it bought the Nymex in New York in 2008. Last year, the CME launched trading of futures in bitcoin, the most widely known virtual currency.
In Eric Schmidt’s decade running Google, the company went from internet upstart to a tech giant. And as it did, Mr. Schmidt’s profile had grown and broadened. He gave speeches about the economy and  But Google’s size and search dominance also raised concerns among lawmakers and regulators in both the United States and abroad. So when Mr. Schmidt   and became executive chairman, one of his primary focuses was on government outreach. In the years since, he has hopscotched the world, developed close ties to lawmakers and  for the Obama administration. Perhaps Google’s biggest victory during this time  . Officials for the agency had recommended in 2012 that the commission sue to challenge some of Google’s business practices, in what would have been the biggest antitrust case since the government sued Microsoft. In early 2013,   to end the probe after Google agreed to make some minor changes to its search practices. That year Mr. Schmidt also  with former Gov.   of New Mexico to tour the hub of North Korea’s computer industry. In response to European regulators’ concerns about privacy, Google   in 2014 to explain Google’s stance on privacy. Mr. Schmidt was also a supporter of Hillary Clinton’s most recent presidential run and was   according to the hacked emails of Clinton campaign officials that were released by Wikileaks. But Mr. Schmidt’s influence in Washington has waned since President Trump was elected. Mr. Schmidt joined Google in 2001 as chief executive to provide what amounted to adult supervision for the company’s young founders, Larry Page and Sergey Brin. He helped take the company public in 2004. A decade after taking the helm at Google   of the company to Mr. Page and became executive chairman. Mr. Schmidt   at Alphabet’s next board meeting. He will continue to serve on the company’s board and   to Alphabet. No reason was provided for the change. In a statement, Mr. Schmidt said that he, Mr. Page, Mr. Brin and Sundar Pichai, Google’s chief executive, “believe that the time is right in Alphabet’s evolution for this transition.” Goldman Sachs is positioning itself to become the first Wall Street firm to set up a cryptocurrency trading desk,   The firm aims to have the desk up and running by the end of June. The Bloomberg article comes nearly three months after   that Goldman was “weighing a new trading operation dedicated to bitcoin and other digital currencies.” Goldman has been more willing than its rivals to embrace digital currencies. It is one of the few Wall Street banks to clear bitcoin futures offered by the Chicago Mercantile Exchange and Chicago Board Options Exchange. Boeing has held takeover talks with Brazilian aircraft maker Embraer, a deal that would give Boeing a presence in the regional jet market,  . Shares of Embraer jumped more than 31 percent on the news. Boeing’s shares are down slightly on the day. • Embraer has a market value of $3.7 billion as of Thursday morning. According to the WSJ, the two companies “have been discussing a deal that would involve a relatively large premium.” • It’s far from certain the Brazilian government would sign off on a deal given that Embraer is “a crown-jewel of Brazilian industry.” • A deal with Embraer would help Boeing counter Airbus’s plans to “take a majority stake in a joint venture with Bombardier that builds the single-aisle CSeries.” • In a series of initial rulings over the last few months, the Commerce Department   of nearly 300 percent on the Bombardier CSeries, an early victory for Boeing that would increase the price of the rival plane in the United States. A 55 percent surge in the tech giant’s stock has pushed Apple’s market value above $900 billion this fall. That’s a level no other American-listed company has hit. In fact, none have crossed $800 billion. Google-parent Alphabet has gotten the closet with a market capitalization of nearly $750 billion. Yet a deeper historical look from   that Apple’s market value, while still impressive, is not quite as spectacular. When adjusted for inflation, Apple’s market capitalization just recently surpassed Microsoft’s all-time high. At the heights of the dot-com bubble in 1999, Microsoft’s market capitalization peaked at $647 billion. In today’s dollars, that’s $901 billion. General Electric’s value in 2000 hits $848 billion when adjusted for inflation. By another measure, Apple’s size is even less impressive. Apple’s share of the total stock market doesn’t even rank in the top 20 going back to 1925. Consider that in May 1932, AT&T constituted 13 percent of the entire stock market — more than five times higher than Apple’s proportion today. In fact, Apple shares represented a larger share of the total stock market in September 2012 than they do now, 3.2 percent compared with 2.5 percent today. Morgan Stanley made the tech giant its top stock pick for 2018. The reason? What it sees as Apple’s growing share of China’s smartphone market. That goes against the recent trend, in which cheaper smartphone rivals have taken market share away from Apple in China. Here’s a breakdown of Morgan Stanley’s key points (note that Morgan Stanley’s data is through Nov. 19, when iPhone X had been on sale for just 16 days.): • “iPhone X adoption in China is on a faster pace than the iPhone 8 or 8 Plus.” • “Significant pent-up demand” for iPhone upgrades “from the base of 2+-year-old iPhone owners” • Apple has a 57 percent retention rate among iPhone users when they upgrade. That’s 20 percentage points higher than any other brand in China. • Apple’s net switching rate, “or percentage of non-iPhone smartphone owners that switched to an iPhone minus the percentage of iPhone owners that switched away to a different smartphone brand,” increased in China to 9.2 percent during the four-weeks prior to Nov. 19.Only one other brand in China had a positive net switching rate over that period.  “Ultimately, these data points show that faster iPhone X penetration, coupled with increasing switching rates to Apple, have accelerated market share gains for the iPhone in China.”  IPhone sales accounted for more than 55 percent of Apple’s revenue last quarter, while Greater China accounted for nearly 20 percent of company’s sales. But Apple’s share of China’s smartphone market has been sliding,  . Swiss financial watchdog FINMA said on Thursday the Swiss subsidiary of U.S. bank JPMorgan had committed serious anti-money laundering breaches in relation to Malaysian sovereign wealth fund 1MDB,  • “Enforcement proceedings conducted by FINMA between May 2016 and June 2017 uncovered serious shortcomings in the anti-money laundering controls of J.P. Morgan (Switzerland) Ltd in connection with business relationships and transactions associated with the allegedly corrupt Malaysian sovereign wealth fund 1MDB.” • “The bank failed in particular to identify the money-laundering risks relating to cash flows between business accounts and personal accounts.” • “In one case, it credited hundreds of millions of U.S. dollars from the 1MDB sovereign wealth fund, allegedly earmarked for the purchase of a company, to the personal account of an individual with close ties to a 1MDB business partner.” • “The resolution announced by FINMA relates to matters that took place many years ago in the Swiss private bank, and since that time we have increased training, added staff and made improvements in monitoring and surveillance.” FINMA, which did not impose monetary penalties on the bank, has appointed a monitor “to carry out an on-site review of the appropriateness and functioning of the bank’s controls and monitor them on an ongoing basis.” “SkyPeople Juice International” became “Future Group” — and briefly  . When asked,   unidentified lawmakers and a well-organized lobbying effort by the private equity industry. As it turns out,  , according to the WaPo. Lobbyists for private equity, venture capital and real estate investors held weekly organization conference calls. Then they worked lawmakers. More from Tory Newmyer of the WaPo: Twenty-two lawmakers in the House — and the support of Representative Kevin Brady of Texas, who was a primary writer of the House legislation, was enough to potentially block that chamber’s bill. In a surely coincidental series of announcements, several companies — including AT&T, Comcast, Wells Fargo, Fifth Third Bancorp and Boeing — announced that they were giving their employees bonuses or higher wages, and increasing investment in light of the passage of the Republican tax bill. An aim of the tax bill is  , in the belief that they will in turn bolster the economy as a whole. (Justin Fox of Bloomberg View writes that AT&T’s bonuses  , but a natural consequence of a corporate tax cut.) But skeptics have asserted that   to get on President Trump’s good side. (AT&T, for example, is seeking approval for its Time Warner deal despite a lawsuit by the Justice Department. At a news conference, Mr. Trump praised AT&T’s bonus and capital investment plans.) , courtesy of Binyamin Appelbaum of  :  How long can any economic stimulus from the tax bill last? From Patricia Cohen of  : • Expect more mergers next year, as clarity on tax policy settles in and penalties for selling businesses fall away, Aaron Back writes. ( ) • The tax overhaul doesn’t change the fact that automation will still cause job losses, and that giants like Apple and Alphabet will still pay lower taxes than nascent rivals, Farhad Manjoo writes in his latest State of the Art. ( ) • Highly indebted companies like Dell are still worried about the limits on deductions tied to corporate debt. ( ) • Daniel Shaviro of N.Y.U.’s School of Law says of Mr. Trump, “I’m not even aware of a single provision in the bill that disadvantages him or his family, other than the change to state and local tax deductibility.” ( ) The finding by the European Court of Justice that the ride-hailing giant is a transportation service instead of an online platform throws a hurdle into Uber’s expansion plan. The company won’t be kicked out of any countries, but the ruling does prevent the rollout of any services involving nonprofessional drivers — like UberPop (or UberX in the United States). The decision comes as a group led by SoftBank is trying to buy out existing investors through a tender offer. Expect some negotiating between the two sides up until the last minute of the offer period, but SoftBank has gotten a bit more negotiating leverage thanks to the E.C.J. Didi Chuxing, Uber’s frenemy in China, has just raised $4 billion from SoftBank and the Abu Dhabi state fund Mubadala. Uber is technically an investor in Didi now, thanks to a truce the two struck last year — but Didi is reportedly   into North America. • Technically, Uber has retained its   valuation because SoftBank’s group has bought $1 billion of new shares at that level. • But the SoftBank consortium is trying to buy out shareholders at a   valuation. • Didi’s new fund-raising round values that company at  .  Uber  , the former C.E.O. of Orbitz, as its chief operating officer. Sequoia, the hugely successful venture capital firm, is   for its next growth fund. That target is   the size of the V.C. firm’s last fund. It appears to be a reflection of an increasingly clear fact: When SoftBank has almost $100 billion in its Vision Fund to invest — and can write a $250 million check in one go — more traditional players will be forced to react. One way is to try to go bigger. As one unidentified V.C. investor told Kara Swisher of Recode: Remember when we reported earlier this week TPG Growth   for its own new fund? Why not go whole hog? The fund’s managing partner, Bill McGlashan, told Michael: “It’d change the kind of companies we’d invest in.” (Translation: Trying to play in the Vision Fund’s kind of megadeals means taking bigger risks to make the kind of returns that the fund earns now.) Penske — which already owns Variety, Deadline and WWD — has paid about $51 million for a majority stake in the onetime music industry touchstone. Rolling Stone was valued at about $100 million. More from Sydney Ember of  :  James Dolan of Madison Square Garden and the investment firm Rizvi Traverse,  . • Two women who had settled sexual harassment claims with the former Fox News host Bill O’Reilly have joined a defamation lawsuit against him and the network, asserting that they had been wrongfully depicted as liars and extortionists. ( ) • The NYT said that it would remove the reporter Glenn Thrush from the White House beat, but would not fire him, after investigating accusations that he had sexually harassed women at previous jobs. ( ) • The artist Chuck Close apologized for making insensitive remarks to women after he faced accusations of sexually harassing them when they came to his studio. ( ) • Damian Green, one of Prime Minister Theresa May’s top deputies, stepped down from her cabinet after an investigation found that he had made misleading claims about pornography on his work computer. ( ) • The presenter Catt Sadler resigned from E! Entertainment because, she said, she was being paid half of what her co-host of “E! News” was making. ( ) Bitcoin is   — because it has fallen 20 percent off its high point, which was set on Monday. But that hasn’t deterred some of Wall Street’s most sophisticated investors from wanting to dive into the world of digital currencies. (Why? Bitcoin is still up some 1,600 percent for the year.) From Greg Zuckerman of  : Coinbase is   in the Bitcoin offshoot. After the exchange reopened trading in Bitcoin Cash, the digital currency fell, and as of this morning was trading at about $3,632. • North Korea is suspected of carrying out a heist at a South Korean Bitcoin exchange, Youbit, that led to the company filing for bankruptcy protection. ( ) • An unidentified trader has made a nearly $1 million bet that Bitcoin will reach $50,000 next year, using options. ( ) • The founder of Litecoin, another digital currency, has sold his holdings. ( ) Backers of the Broadway production of “Hamilton,” including the billionaire Len Blavatnik, have made   on their investment, according to the FT. Investors in the London production, which officially opens today, expect to collect a similar kind of return. • Royal Dutch Shell and Eni will go on trial in March on charges of corruption in a $1.3 billion oil deal in Nigeria. ( ) • The zero bonus, or doughnut, could be looming for bond traders as bank revenue from fixed-income sales and trading units has been falling. ( ) • Facebook job ads, targeted to particular age groups, have raised concerns about age discrimination. ( ,  ) • Millions of Americans have been caught up in the debate on repeal of net neutrality rules, but the most vocal and committed activity may have come from digitally savvy teenagers who grew up with an open internet. ( ) • Litigation for past misconduct that contributed to the financial crisis could cost European banks more than $100 billion, with several lenders still facing cases that could require billions of dollars to settle. ( ) • The special-purpose acquisition vehicle Nomad Foods is in talks to buy Britain’s Goodfella’s Pizza for about 200 million pounds, or about $267 million. ( ) • A New Zealand regulator blocked the HNA’s planned acquisition of UDC, a finance company, saying that it couldn’t determine which foreign person owned and controlled HNA’s local subsidiary. ( ) • Guggenheim Partners has joined Carl Icahn in opposing a deal for the oil company SandRidge Energy to buy Bonanza Creek. ( ) • CEFC, a Chinese oil conglomerate, and Penta Investments, a Czech-Slovak financial group, have submitted a joint bid for Time Warner’s Central European Media Enterprises, which could be worth about $2 billion. ( ) • Spotify is expected to receive approval from the Securities and Exchange Commission for the direct listing of its shares on the New York Stock Exchange. ( )

• Regulatory concerns sink Ant Financial’s purchase of MoneyGram. The value of the digital currency leapt about $1,000 this afternoon. Why? Turns out that  . From Rob Copeland of the WSJ: As of this writing, Bitcoin is valued at about $14,655. Founders Fund is, after all, a venture firm rather than a hedge fund. But the firm apparently believes that start-up valuations currently are sky-high, while digital currencies will continue to climb in worth. The WSJ reports, citing its unnamed sources, that the firm bought about $15 million in Bitcoin and that its stake is now worth hundreds of millions of dollars. So much for Jack Ma’s charm offensive. United States officials  . Ant Financial, the electronic payments company controlled by Mr. Ma, became the latest Chinese firm to have its acquisition of an American company fall apart because it was unable to secure approval from the Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States, or Cfius. The deal failed despite a charm offensive by Jack Ma, the Chinese internet. Shortly after President Trump won the 2016 election, Mr. Ma famously stood with the president-elect in Trump Tower in New York City and pledged that his e-commerce empire would help create one million American jobs. The attempted purchase of MoneyGram was   of the Trump administration’s political and regulatory approach to China, and the deal’s failure could spell trouble for other Chinese companies considering major acquisitions. The strong flow of Chinese money into the United States has prompted growing worries. Lawmakers from both parties have   calling for greater scrutiny of Chinese investments in the United States. They are pushing for a significant expansion of Cfius, a multiagency panel that reviews foreign deals for potential threats to national security. Of the deal,  : MoneyGram’s shares are down 6.8 percent after the close. The Nasdaq Composite rose 1.5 percent Tuesday to close above 7,000 for the first time. The gain was driven by Netflix, Facebook, Google-parent Alphabet and Apple, which jumped between 18 percent and 4.8 percent. Tuesday’s rally follows a 28 percent gain for the Nasdaq last year. That beat the 25 percent gain for the Dow Jones industrial average and the 19 percent rise for the Standard & Poor’s 500 index.  As of Friday, the index was trading at 27.55 times the last 12 months of earnings, well above the S.&P. 500′s level of 18.27 times earnings,   But the Nasdaq’s current price-to-earnings ratio remains well below 72.2, which it hit in March 2000.  Yes, Apple, Microsoft and Amazon.com drove the Nasdaq’s run to 7,000. But Riot Blockchain saw the biggest percentage gain between the Nasdaq’s first close above 6,000 in April to its close above 7,000 on Tuesday,  . Shares of Riot “surged more than 640 percent during that period, with the bulk of those gains coming after the company switched its focus to investing in blockchain technology October.”  Senator Orrin Hatch, Republican of Utah,  , according to the NYT. That gives Mitt Romney — former presidential candidate, former Massachusetts governor,  , current (and increasingly frequent)   — a chance to run for the seat. Money is cheap, the global economy is gaining momentum and markets are at records. “Yet things  ,” writes Quentin Webb of Breakingviews. With that as the backdrop, here are a few of Breakingviews’ predictions for 2018: • “For the first time in years, rich-world bond issuance will outstrip buying by the Fed and friends,” and “bond vigilantes will rise from the dead.” • “Passive funds will, despite their name, dethrone a chief executive.” • “In tech, investors can consider a tasty new dish: SLAW, for Spotify, Lyft, Airbnb and WeWork, four prospective candidates for public life.” • Apple’s position as a privacy-sensitive hardware specialist will give it some shelter from mounting anger at Silicon Valley’s power and lack of accountability. We’re just two days into 2018, and we already have a huge M.&A. prediction, courtesy of the analyst Gene Munster. From  : Getting the timing on this is difficult, but seeing the value of the combination is easy. Amazon believes the future of retail is a mix of mostly online and some offline. Target is the ideal offline partner for Amazon for two reasons, shared demographic and manageable but comprehensive store count. It’s a big, if logical, assumption given the ever-expanding empire that Amazon has been assembling — one that   on their back heels. Target shares were up nearly 4 percent as of this afternoon.  Yes. Yes, but it’d be pretty expensive. Target’s market capitalization as of Tuesday morning was nearly $37 billion. Amazon had about $24.3 billion in cash and short-term investments on its balance sheet as of Sept. 30, meaning that the company would have to borrow a hefty amount. Assuming a 20 percent takeover premium, Target would be almost $40 billion. Amazon could pay in stock as well as cash, but it hasn’t struck a big deal using stock since its takeover of Zappos in 2009. And stock remains an expensive form of currency, though that hasn’t stopped the likes of Disney from stock deals. (Mr. Munster asserts that a deal is affordable because the cost of a Target acquisition is just 8 percent of Amazon’s market cap. Obviously, I think it’s a bit more complicated than that.) Obviously, it’s antitrust. Mr. Munster notes that a combined Amazon-Target would only have about a 13 percent share of the overall American retail market, compared to Walmart’s 23 percent. But it’s hard to determine at the moment what the Trump administration’s yardstick for market concentration is: • AT&T and Time Warner say that their proposed deal is a vertical deal that falls within the bounds of acceptable deals. The Justice Department  . • Disney and Fox have announced a deal that would inevitably lead to lots of layoffs. President Trump   as potentially “great for jobs.” “As for antitrust, the Trump administration won’t do any favors for Jeff Bezos, but the market share numbers suggest the deal will be approved,” Mr. Munster writes. That’s a potentially big assumption. Kevin McLaughlin of   that the two companies “are actively working to replace Oracle software running on critical business systems with open-source database software alternatives, and have made significant progress toward getting off Oracle entirely,” citing people familiar with the matter. Oracle’s shares are down nearly 2 percent. They had been trading about 1 percent higher before the report. The Dow Jones industrial average jumped 25 percent in 2017. Does that mean investors should turn bearish on stocks this year? The answer is no if history is any indicator, LPL Financial’s Ryan Detrick points out. Also, is the first day of trading predictive of the stock market’s performance for the full year? If you couldn’t recall last year’s highlights over the recent holidays, Andrew can remind you with his   (the humor of which is his and his alone). A sample: But it’s a new year, and   we’ll be keeping our eyes on: • Now that the tax fight is over, the White House is  . Will Gary Cohn and Steven Mnuchin be able to tame President Trump’s hard-line tendencies? • Can Congress make progress on   it’s facing? • SoftBank  . Will the ride-hailing giant make further strides toward going public this year? ( .) And what will Masa Son of SoftBank and his $100 billion Vision Fund get up to? • What other industries   this year? And   can Mr. Bezos’s behemoth get? • North Korea is trying to   between South Korea and the U.S. And it  . How will Mr. Trump — and the global economy — respond? • Stevie Cohen is   for his new hedge fund. But how much presence will he retain in the industry? • In the world of M. & A. fights, who will AT&T or the Justice Department prevail? Broadcom or Qualcomm? And will Disney and Fox get their deal done? And the Trump administration’s deregulatory push   — even if skeptics question whether rolling back government rules stimulates corporate growth. Corporate leaders always cite “uncertainty” as a reason to hold back on capital expenditures or transformative acquisitions. And fewer than half of the respondents in the National Association of Manufacturers’ most recent survey said they faced an “unfavorable business climate.” Yet some see a bigger phenomenon at work. This is what Mark Zandi of Moody’s Analytics told the NYT: • Corporate America’s great loophole scavenger hunt has begun. ( ) • China has responded to the tax law by temporarily exempting foreign companies from taxes on their earnings in the country — but there’s a catch. ( ) • Democrats in high-tax states are seeking ways to blunt some of the impact of the tax overhaul. ( ) • The gig economy could get a boost. ( ) • Betting on the dollar continuing to strengthen in 2018, thanks to the tax law. ( ) The Murdoch family tensions behind the Disney deal. It may have been a brief sales negotiation with Verizon that prompted Rupert Murdoch to consider selling pieces of 21st Century Fox. But the NYT reports that friction between the media mogul and his son James   toward the Disney transaction. From the article by Brooks Barnes and Sydney Ember: • James Murdoch has privately grumbled about the control that his father still exerted at Fox and has chafed at some of the elements of Fox News’s coverage. • Rupert Murdoch was wary of how Hollywood was being reshaped by digital giants like Netflix, Apple and Amazon, and unsure his empire could compete. • Lachlan Murdoch, who is more conservative than his brother, has become the heir apparent at what would remain of Fox, but was initially uneasy about a sell-off. Beyond easing family tensions among the trio, the deal could make the Murdochs some of Disney’s biggest shareholders. Yes, Ron Baron has lowered fees on some of his smaller funds. But he’s unapologetic about charging roughly 54 percent more than the industry average.  Landon Thomas Jr. of the NYT:  Chalk it up to a combination of looser oversight, the $10 trillion of investor money still dedicated to actively managed funds and a lack of investor awareness that high fees don’t necessarily pay for performance. One fund investor’s take in the NYT: Bruce Steinberg, an executive at the hedge fund, and his family were among the 12 killed when a single-engine plane   on Sunday. Ray Dalio of Bridgewater   yesterday:  Richard Cousins, the C.E.O. of Compass Group, the world’s biggest catering company, was one of six killed in   on Sunday. What’s notable is that Time’s Up — formed by more than 300 women and including a legal-defense fund — isn’t focused only on the entertainment industry. It plans to offer help to janitors, nurses, hotel staff and other blue-collar workers. Here’s what  , told Cara Buckley of the NYT: The actresses America Ferrera, Eva Longoria and Reese Witherspoon; Donna Langley, the chairwoman of Universal Pictures; and roughly 295 other women in Hollywood. The Time’s Up Legal Defense Fund, which is backed by $13 million in donations and is overseen by Tina Tchen, a former chief of staff to Michelle Obama. It will help provide less-privileged women with lawyers to bring misconduct cases to court and protect them from blowback. • Take a peek behind the curtain at the monthly drug- and sex-fueled monthly parties attended by some of Silicon Valley’s most powerful men, in an excerpt from “Brotopia,” the forthcoming book by the Bloomberg anchor Emily Chang. ( ) • The former Fox News anchor Gretchen Carlson, who was a Miss America, will take over as chairwoman of the pageant as it works through its harassment scandal. ( ) • Business schools in the United States are hastily reshaping their curriculums with case studies on sexual harassment. ( ) • Political partisans are starting to exploit the #MeToo movement. ( ) • The former C.E.O. of SoFi, Mike Cagney, has approached potential investors about backing a fintech start-up. ( ) • The longtime leader of the New York City Ballet, Peter Martins, has retired after accusations of sexual harassment and verbal and physical abuse. He denies wrongdoing. ( ) Last week, the NYT reported on how the Metropolitan Transportation Authority ends up with some of  . Some facts: • The Second Avenue subway cost  . Expanding Grand Central Terminal is now expected to cost  . • Construction companies inflate their projected costs by up to   for M.T.A. work. Labor unions have arranged for up to   the necessary staffing on some projects. • Consultants have persuaded officials to spend heavily on design and management. Here’s what Mr. Blankfein, Andrew’s choice as 2017’s best corporate tweeter,  : (Mr. Blankfein has good reasons for pique over the tax law: Goldman Sachs   in its fourth-quarter earnings tied to the changes.) • Caterpillar faces a potential tax bill of $2 billion from the I.R.S., which says it has underpaid on profits from parts sales through its Swiss unit. ( ) • The new Salesforce Tower in San Francisco is the tallest office building west of the Mississippi, and a symbol of tech’s triumph in the city. ( ) • Morgan Stanley is entering the robo-advice market, with an automated service that includes a choice of exchange-traded funds, mutual funds and seven themed portfolios. ( ) • Europe’s new “MiFID II” investment rules — on how research is paid for, how trades are documented and executed, and how brokers share information — come into force tomorrow. ( ) • Playboy Enterprises is considering shutting the print magazine to concentrate on licensing deals and brand partnerships. ( ) • Retail cannabis shops in California opened their doors on Monday, inaugurating what proponents say will become the world’s largest legal market for recreational marijuana. ( ) • One of America’s biggest rehab companies built an empire. But after a patient died, its enemies — investors and rivals alike — struck hard. ( ) • Andrew picked his favorite business (and business-adjacent) books of 2017, including “The Spider Network” by David Enrich, “Reset” by Ellen Pao” and “Principles” by Ray Dalio. ( )
“The genius of you Americans,” the Egyptian president Gamal Abdel Nasser teasingly told a senior C.I.A. official, Miles A. Copeland Jr., in the late 1950s, “is that you never made clear-cut stupid moves, only   stupid moves.” By then, Nasser had good reason to gloat. For years, the State Department and the C.I.A. had sought to marginalize — if not altogether eliminate — the upstart Egyptian leader. Instead, through a colossal series of missteps, the Eisenhower administration had helped catapult Nasser onto the global stage, where he became the undisputed spokesman for Pan-Arab nationalism and the United States’ chief nemesis in the Middle East. Which might also explain why Nasser remained on friendly terms with Copeland; given the C.I.A.’s track record, who knew what other munificence the bungling Americans might inadvertently throw his way? If hard to imagine today, there were two distinct moments when the United States was regarded as a beacon of hope to the peoples of the Middle East. The first opportunity was thrown away at the end of World War I when, with the collapse of the Ottoman Empire, Arab leaders sued for either independence or American conservatorship, believing that the nation’s “disinterested benevolence” might save them from the imperial grasps of Britain and France. By turning his back on those desires, Woodrow Wilson consigned the region to its fate: a carving up by the European powers that created the fractious borders of today. At the end of World War II, however, with the British and French empires in rapid and terminal decline, the Americans were granted a do-over. It is this vitally important juncture in Middle Eastern history that is the subject of Hugh Wilford’s frustratingly uneven “America’s Great Game: The C.I.A.’s Secret Arabists and the Shaping of the Modern Middle East.” Wilford centers his narrative on just three men who, by his account, were largely responsible for that shaping: Copeland, along with Archie and Kermit (Kim) Roosevelt, first cousins and both grandsons of President Theodore ­Roose­velt. Born to privilege and status, the Roose­velt boys were Groton- and Harvard-educated Yankee blue bloods. Copeland, by contrast, was a college dropout from Alabama, an aspiring jazz trumpeter and self-described riverboat gambler. What united the three men in the post-World War II era was a thirst for adventure and — ­owing to their varied intelligence roles during the war — an abiding concern for the promotion of American interests through “crypto-diplomacy.” In the late 1940s, all signed on with the newly created C.I.A. to become the principal American intelligence gatherers in the Middle East, Copeland and Archie Roosevelt as the C.I.A. station chiefs in Damascus and Beirut, Kim Roosevelt as director of the region’s covert operations unit. Testament to the pasted-together nature of America’s new spy agency, not one of this powerful troika had yet turned 35. They were also joined together by a robust view of their job duties. Intent on channeling the nationalistic fervor then sweeping the Middle East to American benefit, the young C.I.A. “Arabists” forged ties with progressive politicians and military officers throughout the region, and worked against the British- and French-installed puppet regimes whose grip on power was slipping by the day. Kim Roose­velt carried this effort to the domestic front by funneling C.I.A. money to an anti-Zionist and pro-Arab nationalist lobbying group called the American Friends of the Middle East. It was an exciting time to be a spy. From their respective bases, the three Arabists roamed the region, sometimes in disguise, setting up informant networks, meeting with would-be coup plotters and carrying on a friendly competition over whose adventures in the new Great Game were the most picaresque or exotic. With little in the way of supervision, they didn’t need to sweat the details. “What’s the difference between my fabricating reports,” Copeland reportedly twitted Archie Roosevelt from Damascus, “and your letting your agents do it? At least mine make sense.” The first damper on their fun was quick in coming. The 1948 Arab-Israeli war and the Truman administration’s immediate recognition of Israeli independence spurred a wave of anti-Americanism across the Arab world. But if a heavy blow, that event was not a mortal one; in the years immediately after, the C.I.A. Arabists continued to woo an array of nationalist leaders, the so-called Young Effendis. These included the then-colonel Gamal Abdel Nasser, the mastermind of the 1952 Free Officers coup that ousted Britain’s satrap in Cairo, King Farouk. A change in Washington put an end to the flirtations. For this, Wilford places blame chiefly on one man: President Eisenhower’s secretary of state John Foster Dulles. As the Cold War deepened, Dulles came to regard the participants in nationalistic or anticolonial movements in the Arab world — indeed, all across the globe — as potential Communist fellow travelers, their causes not to be encouraged but strangled in the crib. When it came to the Middle East, Dulles’s hostility to any reformist movement became so pronounced — being rid of Nasser was a special obsession — that many in the C.I.A. openly wondered if the secretary of state had gone mad. Not that this view was likely to gain much in-house support, considering that John Foster’s brother, Allen, was the director of central intelligence. What is most remarkable in this tale, though, is how quickly our three Arabists were willing to jump to the other side of the street, to go from identifying and encouraging progressive Arab leaders to trying to neutralize them, to go from deriding the client regimes left behind by the European powers to cozying up to them. Certainly the most infamous example was Kim Roosevelt’s intimate role in the 1953 coup that toppled the Iranian prime minister Mohammad Mossadegh, but there were many others: Copeland’s involvement in schemes to assassinate Nasser, Archie Roosevelt’s repeated efforts to overthrow the Nasser-aligned government of Syria. To say this all backfired would be a gross understatement; by the end of the decade, the United States was just as reviled in large parts of the Middle East as the European powers it had come to supplant. Obviously, this is a wonderfully rich canvas upon which to draw, but in his effort to do so, Wilford hobbles himself in two critical ways. The first difficulty is not entirely of his making. Denied access to the relevant C.I.A. documents, he has had to rely heavily on the published records and private papers of his three principal characters, but — perhaps to be expected of spies — none of these come across as particularly trustworthy. Immediately after Mossadegh’s overthrow, for example, Kim Roosevelt openly boasted of — and possibly exaggerated — his pivotal role in the coup, only to backpedal when the notion of the United States toppling democratically elected governments had lost some of its luster. Certainly, the greatest doubt falls on Copeland, a man for whom the term “congenital liar” might well have been coined. It’s to Wilford’s credit that he highlights the inconsistencies — and often, outright falsehoods — of his main sources, but the result is a pattern of presenting evidence in support of one version of events, then reversing to make the case for a wholly different version. What’s more, this fence-straddling occurs at almost every key juncture of America’s Great Game, leaving readers to ponder crucial questions on their own: In the 1949 coup that brought the Syrian colonel Husni al-Za’im to power, did the C.I.A. play a decisive role, a limited role, or no role at all? Did the agency help groom Nasser to seize power in Egypt, or was it caught completely by surprise? Stranded by his own diffidence on these points, Wilford has no choice but to move his thesis along by turning to the highly qualified assertion: “It is reasonable to assume” or “The story seems plausible enough.” On such tenuous foundations charitable readers might go along for the ride once or twice, but they are highly unlikely to do so for the innumerable times asked of them here. The second problem is downright baffling. A professor of history at California State University, Long Beach, Wilford clearly labors under the misconception that the landmark moments of 1950s Middle Eastern history are common knowledge (if the past half-century is any judge, they aren’t even common knowledge at the C.I.A.), and chooses to glide over them in favor of the trivial and obscure. As a result, the tragicomic details of the 1953 coup against Mossadegh, an episode that continues to color United States-Iran relations, are dispensed with in a short chapter, while the 1956 Suez Canal crisis, a seminal event that sounded the death knell for British and French influence in the region, is dismissed in a few paragraphs, with the observation that its ramifications are “world-famous.” In lieu of a reminder of those ramifications, the reader is then subjected to a 10-page disquisition on the organizational restructuring and revamped pamphleteering of the American Friends of the Middle East, an outfit most noteworthy, by all evidence, for its utter uselessness. This is history drained not just of its interesting bits but of its very import, and at such times Wilford seems less an inartful storyteller than a kind of lecture-hall ­sadist. That is a shame, because the period he set out to explore is one of the most vital and least explored epochs in contemporary American history, that brief moment when the United States was seen as a potential agent for positive change in the Middle East, a moment surely never to come again.
